New York, session 2025-2026, S9003.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. a) The several amounts specified in this chapter for aid to
localities, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the
purposes designated by the appropriations, are hereby appropriated and
authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the respective public
officers and for the several purposes specified.
b) Where applicable, appropriations made by this chapter for expend-
iures from federal grants for aid to localities may be allocated for
spending from federal grants for any grant period beginning, during, or
prior to, the state fiscal year beginning on April 1, 2026 except as
otherwise noted.
c) The several amounts named herein, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, being the undisbursed
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD12653-09-6

12653-09-6
and/or unexpended balances of the prior year's appropriations, are here-
by reappropriated from the same funds and made available for the same
purposes as the prior year's appropriations, unless herein amended, for
the fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. Certain reappropriations in
this chapter are shown using abbreviated text, with three leader dots
(an ellipsis) followed by three spaces (... ) used to indicate where
existing law that is being continued is not shown. However, unless a
change is clearly indicated by the use of brackets [ ] for deletions and
underscores for additions, the purposes, amounts, funding source and all
other aspects pertinent to each item of appropriation shall be as last
appropriated.
For the purpose of complying with the state finance law, the year,
chapter and section of the last act reappropriating a former original
appropriation or any part thereof is, unless otherwise indicated, chap-
ter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025.
d) No moneys appropriated by this chapter shall be available for
payment until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director
of the budget, who shall file such certificate with the department of
audit and control, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and
the chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee.
e) Notwithstanding any provision contained herein or any other law to
the contrary, if, on a cash basis of accounting, a general fund imbal-
ance has or is expected to occur in fiscal year 2026-27, the budget
director is hereby authorized to withhold all or some of the amounts
appropriated herein, including amounts that are to be paid on specific
dates prescribed in law or regulation. Prior to withholding any amounts,
the director shall consider whether other means are available for accom-
plishing the purposes of this provision. Provided further, the director
shall consider the impact of any such amounts to be withheld. To the
extent the state is obligated to make payment to any individual or enti-
ty pursuant to any appropriation contained herein, such obligation shall
be reduced commensurate with such payments withheld by the director of
the budget.
The following types of appropriations shall be exempt from such with-
holds pursuant to this provision: (a) public assistance payments for
families and individuals and payments for eligible aged, blind and disa-
bled persons related to supplemental social security; (b) any reductions
that would violate federal law; (c) payments of debt service and related
expenses for which the state is constitutionally obligated to pay debt
service or is contractually obligated to pay debt service, subject to an
appropriation, including where the state has a contingent contractual
obligation; and (d) payments the state is obligated to make pursuant to
court orders or judgments.
For purposes of this provision, a general fund imbalance shall occur
if any state fiscal year 2026-27 quarterly financial plan update
required by subdivision 4 of section 23 of the state finance law
reflects, or if at any point during the final quarter of state fiscal
year 2026-27 the budget director projects, that estimated general fund
receipts and/or estimated general fund disbursements have or will vary
from the estimates included in the state fiscal year 2026-27 enacted
budget financial plan required by sections 22 and 23 of the state
finance law results in a cumulative budget imbalance of $2,000,000,000
or more. Provided however, that such $2,000,000,000 must be calculated
without considering any payments withheld in accordance with this
provision or any depletion of the state fiscal year 2026-27 transaction
risk reserve accounting mechanism.

12653-09-6
"Estimated general fund receipts" shall mean general fund tax
receipts, after payment of debt service and miscellaneous receipts esti-
mated by the budget director to be received during state fiscal year
2026-27.
"Estimated general funds disbursements" shall mean general funds
disbursements, including transfers, estimated by the budget director to
be made during state fiscal year 2026-27.
No later than ten business days following the issuance of any state
fiscal year 2026-27 quarterly financial plan update that includes a
determination, and/or the date in the final quarter of the state fiscal
year 2026-27 upon which the budget director determines, that a general
fund imbalance exists, the budget director shall provide notification of
payments that will be withheld pursuant to this provision to the presi-
dent pro tempore of the senate and the speaker of the assembly.
Provided, however, the aggregate amount of payments withheld pursuant to
this provision shall at no point be in an amount greater than the deter-
mined cumulative general fund imbalance. Provided further however,
before any payments may be withheld pursuant to this provision, the
budget director shall first deplete the $2,000,000,000 transaction risk
reserve accounting mechanism to resolve the determined general fund
imbalance, as practicable. Such notification will also identify any
other means the budget director intends to use to resolve any portion of
the general fund imbalance, including but not limited to the aforemen-
tioned depletion of the transaction risk reserve and/or any other
resources.
Following such budget director notification, the legislature shall
have ten business days to prepare and adopt by concurrent resolution its
own withhold plan which conforms with the requirements of this
provision, and which achieves the same aggregate of payment withholds as
the budget director's withhold plan. If after ten business days follow-
ing the budget director's notification the legislature fails to prepare
and adopt its own withhold plan, or if the budget director determines
that the withhold plan prepared and adopted by the legislature does not
conform with the requirements of this provision, the withholds identi-
fied in the budget director's withhold plan will immediately take
effect.
Notwithstanding any other provision contained herein or any other
provision of law to the contrary, any payments withheld pursuant to this
section may be paid in full or in part if a subsequent general fund
surplus materializes in state fiscal year 2026-27.
f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for purposes
of any appropriation made by this chapter which authorizes spending in
an amount net of refunds, rebates, reimbursements, credits, repayments,
and/or disallowances, "refunds" shall mean funds received to the state
resulting from the overpayment of monies, "rebates" shall mean funds
received to the state resulting from a return of a full or partial
amount previously paid, as for goods or services, serving as a
reduction, discount or rebate to the original payment amount,
"reimbursements" shall mean funds received to the state as repayment in
an equivalent amount for goods or services, including but not limited to
personal service costs, incurred by the state in the first instance
being provided to a third party for their benefit and partially or in
full financed by such third party, "credit" shall mean monies made
available to the state that reduce the amount owed to a third party,
including but not limited to billing errors, rebates, and prior overpay-
ments, "repayment" shall mean the return of monies as pay back for

12653-09-6
expenses incurred, and "disallowance" shall mean monies made available
to the state that were not allowed or accepted officially by the
intended recipient, based on a determination the payment is not accepta-
ble and/or valid. When the office of the state comptroller receives any
such refunds, rebates, reimbursements, credits, repayments, and/or
disallowances, he or she shall credit the refunded, rebated, reimbursed,
credited, repaid, and disallowed amount back to the original appropri-
ation and reduce expenditures in the year which such credit is received
regardless of the timing of the initial expenditure.
g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, subject to
the approval of the director of the budget, the federal funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for the purposes of the stated program,
regardless of the federal agency administering such program, and may be
expended for all eligible costs consistent with applicable federal laws
and regulations, including pursuant to a memorandum of understanding or
interagency agreement with other state departments or agencies for the
administration or operation of such program.
h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon enact-
ment of this chapter of the laws of 2026 containing the aid to locali-
ties budget bill for the state fiscal year 2026-27, all appropriations
and reappropriations contained in chapter 53 of the laws of 2025, which
would otherwise lapse by operation of law on March 31, 2027 are hereby
repealed.
i) The appropriations contained in this chapter shall be available for
the fiscal year beginning on April 1, 2026 except as otherwise noted.

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 257,262,841 298,968,513
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 172,244,000 372,090,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 1,230,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All funds ........................ 430,736,841 671,058,513
================ ================
SCHEDULE
COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM ................................. 430,736,841
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to
April 1, 2026 related to the community
services for the elderly grant program.
Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of para-
graph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 214
of the elder law and any other provision
of law to the contrary, up to $3,500,000
of the funds appropriated herein may, at
the discretion of the director of the
budget, be used by the state to reimburse
counties for more than the 75 percent of
the total annual expenditures of approved
community services for the elderly
programs. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director
of the budget has approved a plan submit-
ted by the office outlining the amounts
and purposes of such expenditures and the
allocation of funds among the counties.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule
or regulation to the contrary, subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, funds appropriated herein for the
community services for the elderly program
(CSE) and the expanded in-home services
for the elderly program (EISEP) may be
used in accordance with a waiver or
reduction in county maintenance of effort
requirements established pursuant to
section 214 of the elder law, except for
base year expenditures. To the extent that
funds hereby appropriated are sufficient

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
to exceed the per capita limit established
in section 214 of the elder law, the
excess funds shall be available to supple-
ment the existing per capita level in a
uniform manner consistent with statutory
allocations.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the director shall
not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living, type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement (10318) ....................... 43,344,734
For planning and implementation, including
the payment of liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2026, of a program of expanded
in-home, case management and ancillary
community services for the elderly
(EISEP).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, including but not
limited to the state reimbursement and
county maintenance of effort requirements
specified in the elder law, up to
$15,000,000 of the funds appropriated
herein shall be used to address the unmet
needs of the elderly as reported to the
office for the aging through the reporting
requirements set forth in section 214 of
the elder law. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, up to
$15,000,000 hereby appropriated may be
interchanged or transferred with any other
general fund appropriation within the
office for the aging to address the unmet
needs of the elderly as reported to the
office for the aging through the reporting
requirements set forth in section 214 of
the elder law. The office for the aging
shall provide an annual report to the
governor, the temporary president of the
senate, and the speaker of the assembly by
September 1, 2026 that shall include the
area agencies on aging that have received
these funds, the amount of funds received
by each area agency on aging, the number

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of participants served, and the services
provided.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, including but not
limited to the state reimbursement and
county maintenance of effort requirements
specified in the elder law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, up
to $2,000,000 of the amount appropriated
herein, may be transferred to state oper-
ations for the administration of programs.
No expenditures shall be made from this
appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a plan submitted by
the office outlining the amounts and
purposes of such expenditures and the
allocation of funds among the counties,
including the city of New York.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the director shall
not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement (10319) ....................... 72,003,868
For services and expenses of grants to area
agencies on aging and the Association on
Aging in New York State for the establish-
ment and operation of caregiver resource
centers (10321) ................................ 353,000
For services and expenses, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to
April 1, 2026, associated with the well-
ness in nutrition (WIN) program, formerly
known as the supplemental nutrition
assistance program (SNAP), including a
suballocation to the department of agri-
culture and markets to be transferred to
state operations for administrative costs
of the farmers market nutrition program.
Up to $200,000 of this appropriation may
be made available to the LiveOn NY to
provide outreach within the older adult
SNAP initiative. No expenditure shall be
made from this appropriation until the
director of the budget has approved a plan
submitted by the office outlining the

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
amounts and purpose of such expenditures
and the allocation of funds among the
counties.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the director shall
not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement (10322) ....................... 42,920,739
Local grants for services and expenses of
the long-term care ombudsman program.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall not be subject to section 112 of the
state finance law, section 163 of the
state finance law and funding priority
shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the
aging (10323) ................................ 6,190,000
For state aid grants to providers of respite
services to the elderly. Funding priority
shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the
aging. No expenditures shall be made from
this appropriation until the director of
the budget has approved a plan submitted
by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10328) ................ 656,000
For state aid grants to providers of social
model adult day services. Funding priority
shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the
aging. No expenditures shall be made from
this appropriation until the director of
the budget has approved a plan submitted
by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10329) .............. 1,072,000
For state aid grants to naturally occurring
retirement communities (NORC). Funding
priority shall be given to the renewal and
funding increase of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging
notwithstanding section 112 and section
163 of state finance law, section 209 of
elder law, and section 142 of economic
development law. New programs may be

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
selected subject to available funding,
pursuant to the regular procurement proc-
esses of the state finance and economic
development law. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation until the
director of the budget has approved a plan
submitted by the office outlining the
amounts to be distributed by provider
(10330) ...................................... 8,027,500
For state aid grants to neighborhood
naturally occurring retirement communities
(NNORC). Funding priority shall be given
to the renewal and funding increase of
existing contracts with the state office
for the aging notwithstanding section 112
and section 163 of state finance law,
section 209 of elder law, and section 142
of economic development law. New programs
may be selected subject to available fund-
ing, pursuant to the regular procurement
processes of the state finance and econom-
ic development law. No expenditures shall
be made from this appropriation until the
director of the budget has approved a plan
submitted by the office outlining the
amounts to be distributed by provider any
activities or provide any services (10331)
.............................................. 8,027,500
For grants in aid to the 59 designated area
agencies on aging for transportation oper-
ating expenses related to serving the
elderly. Funds shall be allocated from
this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the director of the state
office for the aging and approved by the
director of the budget (10885) ............... 1,121,000
For grants to the area agencies on aging for
the health insurance information, coun-
seling and assistance program (10335) ........ 1,000,000
For state matching funds for services and
expenses to match federally funded model
projects and/or demonstration grant
programs, a portion of which may be trans-
ferred to state operations or to other
entities as necessary to meet federal
grant objectives (10336) ....................... 175,000
For the managed care consumer assistance
program for the purpose of providing
education, outreach, one-on-one coun-
seling, monitoring of the implementation
of medicare part D, and assistance with
drug appeals and fair hearings related to

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
medicare part D coverage for persons who
are eligible for medical assistance and
who are also beneficiaries under part D of
title XVIII of the federal social security
act and for participants of the elderly
pharmaceutical insurance coverage program
(EPIC) in accordance with the following:
Medicare Rights Center (10340) ................... 793,000
New York StateWide Senior Action Council,
Inc. (10341) ................................... 354,000
New York Legal Assistance Group (10342) .......... 222,000
Legal Aid Society of New York (10343) ............ 111,000
Empire Justice Center (10345) .................... 155,000
Community Service Society (10346) ................ 132,000
For services and expenses of the retired and
senior volunteer program (RSVP) (10324) ........ 216,500
For services and expenses of the EAC/Nassau
senior respite program (10325) ................. 118,500
For services and expenses of the home aides
of central New York, Inc. senior respite
program (10326) ................................. 71,000
For services and expenses of the New York
foundation for senior citizens home shar-
ing and respite care program (10327) ............ 86,000
For services and expenses of the foster
grandparents program (10332) .................... 98,000
For services and expenses of Lifespan of
Greater Rochester for an elderly abuse
education and outreach program for the
elderly (10333) ................................ 745,000
For services and expenses of the Association
on Aging in New York State related to the
livable New York initiative to create
neighborhoods that consider the evolving
needs and preferences of all their resi-
dents pursuant to a plan prepared by the
director of the state office for the aging
and approved by the director of the budget
(10866) ........................................ 122,500
For services and expenses of the New York
state adult day services association, inc.
related to providing training and techni-
cal assistance to social adult day
services programs in New York state
regarding the quality of services (10867) ...... 122,500
For services and expenses related to the
congregate services initiative. No expend-
itures shall be made from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts and purposes of such

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
expenditures and the allocation of funds
among the counties (10320) ..................... 403,000
For services and expenses of New York State-
wide Senior Action Council, Inc. for the
patients' rights hotline and advocacy
project (10334) ................................. 31,500
For services and expenses for Lifespan of
Greater Rochester, Inc. for sustainability
and expansion of Enhanced Multi-Discipli-
nary Teams as implemented under the feder-
al Elder Abuse Preventions Interventions
Initiative and related data collection and
reporting (10833) ............................ 1,500,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, up to the amount
appropriated herein, may be transferred to
the general fund state purposes account
for services and expenses of the Associ-
ation on Aging in New York State to
provide training, education and technical
assistance to the area agencies on aging
and aging network service contractor staff
for professional development which must
include but not be limited to developing
priority training needs of all aging
network staff, submitting an implementa-
tion plan for approval by the office for
the aging in advance, prioritizing expan-
sion of state certified aging network
staff, and developing contracts and vouch-
ers in a timely manner (10810) ................. 250,000
For services and expenses of the Holocaust
Survivors Initiative. Funds shall be used
to support case management services for
holocaust survivors statewide and may
include, but not be limited to, mental
health services, trauma informed care,
crisis prevention, legal services and
entitlement counseling, emergency finan-
cial assistance for food, housing,
prescriptions, medical and dental care,
socialization programs, training and
support for caregivers and home health
aides working with survivors, and end of
life care including hospice and ethical
wills (10715) ................................ 1,000,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, including but not
limited to the state reimbursement and
county maintenance of effort requirements
specified in the elder law, up to

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
$53,000,000 of the funds appropriated
herein shall be used to address the unmet
needs of the elderly as reported to the
office for the aging through the reporting
requirements set forth in section 214 of
the elder law. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, up to
$53,000,000 hereby appropriated may be
interchanged or transferred with any other
general fund appropriation within the
office for the aging to address the unmet
needs of the elderly as reported to the
office for the aging through the reporting
requirements set forth in section 214 of
the elder law. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation until the
director of the budget has approved a plan
submitted by the office outlining the
amounts and purposes of such expenditures
and the allocation of funds among the
counties, including the city of New York
(10716) ..................................... 53,000,000
For services and expenses related to elder
abuse outreach, education and mitigation
of Lifespan of Greater Rochester (10736) ....... 250,000
For services and expenses related to the
expansion of online classes for GetSetUp
to combat social isolation, improve health
and wellness and provide lifelong learning
opportunities (10737) .......................... 350,000
For services and expenses for Ageless Inno-
vation to reduce social isolation (10738) ...... 350,000
For services and expenses related to the
expansion of online classes for Self Help,
Inc to combat social isolation, improve
health and wellness and provide lifelong
learning opportunities (10739) ................. 200,000
For service and expenses for Intuition
Robotics related to accessing digital
technology and assisting with accessing
affordable internet services for low-in-
come older adults (10740) ...................... 700,000
For services and expenses to TRUALTA for
caregiver training and supports (10741) ........ 400,000
For services and expenses for GoGo Grandpar-
ent for transportation expansion and
capacity building (10742) ...................... 500,000
For services and expenses to LTCOP and
HIICAP to expand stipend program to retain
volunteers (10743) ............................. 150,000
For services and expenses of Lifespan of
Greater Rochester, Inc. for expanding bill

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
payer programs for the older adults in up
to ten counties (10755) ........................ 750,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Elder Law and Justice (Prevention of Elder
Abuse) ......................................... 175,000
For services and expenses of Jewish Communi-
ty Council of Greater Coney Island, Inc. ....... 250,000
For services and expenses of Lenox Hill
Neighborhood House Inc. ........................ 115,000
For services and expenses of Lifespan of
Greater Rochester, Inc. ........................ 125,000
For services and expenses of Lifespan of
Greater Rochester, Inc (Elder Abuse
Prevention) .................................... 125,000
For services and expenses for LiveOn NY. ......... 100,000
For services and expenses of New York State-
wide Senior Action Council, Inc. ............... 100,000
For services and expenses of Services &
Advocacy for Gay, Lesbian, Bisexual and
Transgender Elders Inc. (SAGE) ................. 200,000
For services and expenses of the Service
Program for Older People, Inc. (SPOP) .......... 50,000
For services and expenses of the Westchester
Residential Opportunities Inc. ................. 250,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing Holocaust Survivors Initiative
programs or services. Funds appropriated
herein shall not be subject to section 112
of the state finance law and section 163
of the state finance law ....................... 300,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing services for the Project Guardi-
anship program. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency or authority to effectuate
the intent of this appropriation with the
approval of the temporary president of
senate and the director of the division of
the budget. Provided further, notwith-
standing any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
(i) approved by the temporary president of
the senate and the director of the divi-
sion of the budget which sets forth either
an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling
for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate
upon a roll call vote ........................ 1,000,000
For additional services and expenses for
state aid grants to naturally occurring
retirement communities (NORC) and neigh-
borhood naturally occurring retirement
communities (NNORC). Funding priority
shall be given to supplemental allocations
to existing contracts .......................... 500,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based services providers, not-for-pro-
fit services providers or their employees
providing Holocaust Survivors Initiative
programs or services. Funds appropriated
herein shall not be subject to section 112
of the state finance law and section 163
of the state finance law ..................... 1,090,000
For services and expenses of Holocaust &
Human Rights Education Center .................. 100,000
For services and expenses for India Home,
Inc. ............................................ 50,000
For services and expenses for Jewish Associ-
ation for Services for the Aged for the
Bay Eden Senior Center .......................... 25,000
For additional services and expenses of
Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. ............ 250,000
For additional services and expenses of
Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
elderly scam prevention ........................ 125,000
For services and expenses for LiveOn NY,
Inc. ........................................... 100,000
For services and expenses for Metropolitan
New York Coordinating Council on Jewish
Poverty ........................................ 900,000
For services and expenses of Older Adults
Technology Services, Inc. (OATS) .............. 200,000
For services and expenses for Project Guar-
dianship, Inc. ................................. 112,000
For services and expenses for Guardianship
Corp ........................................... 112,000

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Regional Aid
for Interim Needs, Inc. ........................ 400,000
For services and expenses of the SAGE, Inc.
(LGBT Welcoming Elder Housing) ................. 100,000
For services and expenses for Spring Creek
Senior Partners, Inc. (NORC) .................... 50,000
For additional services and expenses of New
York Statewide Senior Action Council, Inc.
(Patients' Rights Hotline) ..................... 100,000
For services and expenses for Wayside Out-
Reach Development, Inc ......................... 150,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Center for Elder Law and Justice, Inc. for
the prevention of elder abuse .................. 175,000
For services and expenses of the New York
Foundation for Senior Citizens, Inc. (Home
Sharing and Respite Program) ................... 186,000
For services and expenses of the Colonie
Senior Services Center, Inc. ................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the LISMA Foun-
dation, Inc. ................................... 700,000
For services and expenses of Glen Cove
Senior Center ................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Riseboro Commu-
nity Partnership, Inc. ......................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Tropicalfete,
Inc. ........................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Hebrew Home
for the Aged at Riverdale Foundation, Inc.
(Weinberg Center) .............................. 200,000
For services and expenses of West Side
Federation for Senior and Supportive Hous-
ing, Inc ....................................... 125,000
For services and expenses of Samuel Waxman
Institute for Aging and Cancer ................. 200,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 257,262,841
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
FHHS Aid to Localities Account - 25177
For programs provided under the titles of
the federal older Americans act and other
health and human services programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of these funds may be
transferred to any other appropriation
within the Office for the Aging for
services and expenses of the Association
on Aging in New York State to provide

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
training, education and technical assist-
ance to the area agencies on aging and
aging network service contractor staff for
professional development which must
include but not be limited to developing
priority training needs of all aging
network staff, submitting an implementa-
tion plan for approval by the office for
the aging in advance, prioritizing expan-
sion of state certified aging network
staff, and developing contracts and vouch-
ers in a timely manner, pursuant to a plan
prepared by the director of the state
office for the aging and approved by the
director of the budget.
Title III-b social services (10894) ........... 24,069,000
Title III-c nutrition programs, including a
suballocation to the department of health
to be transferred to state operations for
nutrition program activities (10893) ....... 102,610,000
Title III-e caregivers (10892) ................ 14,000,000
Health and human services programs (10891) ..... 9,965,000
Nutrition services incentive program (10890) .. 12,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 162,644,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Office for the Aging Federal Grants Account - 25300
For services and expenses related to the
provision of aging services programs
(10883) ........................................ 600,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 600,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Senior Community Service Employment Account - 25444
For the senior community service employment
program provided under title V of the
federal older Americans act (10887) .......... 9,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 9,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Aging Grants and Bequest Account - 20196

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the state
office for the aging (81034) ................... 980,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 980,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Senior Wellness in Nutrition - 23815
For services and expenses related to senior
wellness in nutrition programs approved by
the state office for the aging, for the
purpose of providing home delivered meals
to seniors pursuant to section 91-g of
state finance law, as added by chapter 659
of the laws of 2019 ............................ 250,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 250,000
--------------

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriations made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025,
are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2025 related to the community services
for the elderly grant program. Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 214 of the elder law and
any other provision of law to the contrary, up to $3,500,000 of the
funds appropriated herein may, at the discretion of the director of
the budget, be used by the state to reimburse counties for more than
the 75 percent of the total annual expenditures of approved communi-
ty services for the elderly programs. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts and
purposes of such expenditures and the allocation of funds among the
counties. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation
to the contrary, subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein for the community services for the
elderly program (CSE) and the expanded in-home services for the
elderly program (EISEP) may be used in accordance with a waiver or
reduction in county maintenance of effort requirements established
pursuant to section 214 of the elder law, except for base year
expenditures. To the extent that funds hereby appropriated are
sufficient to exceed the per capita limit established in section 214
of the elder law, the excess funds shall be available to supplement
the existing per capita level in a uniform manner consistent with
statutory allocations.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the director shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living, type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10318) .....
41,663,244 ....................................... (re. $41,552,000)
For planning and implementation, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of a program of expanded in-home,
case management and ancillary community services for the elderly
(EISEP).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law, up to
$15,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to
address the unmet needs of the elderly as reported to the office for
the aging through the reporting requirements set forth in section
214 of the elder law. Subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, up to $15,000,000 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or
transferred with any other general fund appropriation within the

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
office for the aging to address the unmet needs of the elderly as
reported to the office for the aging through the reporting require-
ments set forth in section 214 of the elder law. The office for the
aging shall provide an annual report to the governor, the temporary
president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly by Septem-
ber 1, 2026 that shall include the area agencies on aging that have
received these funds, the amount of funds received by each area
agency on aging, the number of participants served, and the services
provided.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, up to
$2,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein, may be transferred to
state operations for the administration of programs.
No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and the
allocation of funds among the counties, including the city of New
York.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the director shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10319) .....
69,866,436 ....................................... (re. $67,483,000)
For services and expenses of grants to area agencies on aging and the
Association on Aging in New York State for the establishment and
operation of caregiver resource centers (10321) ....................
353,000 ............................................. (re. $353,000)
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2025, associated with the wellness in
nutrition (WIN) program, formerly known as the supplemental nutri-
tion assistance program (SNAP), including a suballocation to the
department of agriculture and markets to be transferred to state
operations for administrative costs of the farmers market nutrition
program. Up to $200,000 of this appropriation may be made available
to the LiveOn NY to provide outreach within the older adult SNAP
initiative. No expenditure shall be made from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a plan submitted by
the office outlining the amounts and purpose of such expenditures
and the allocation of funds among the counties.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the director shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10322) .....
40,491,920 ....................................... (re. $40,264,000)

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Local grants for services and expenses of the long-term care ombudsman
program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein shall not be subject to section 112 of the state
finance law, section 163 of the state finance law and funding prior-
ity shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts with the
state office for the aging (10323) .................................
6,190,000 ......................................... (re. $6,059,000)
For state aid grants to providers of respite services to the elderly.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10328) ... 656,000 ......... (re. $656,000)
For state aid grants to providers of social model adult day services.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10329) ... 1,072,000 ..... (re. $1,072,000)
For state aid grants to naturally occurring retirement communities
(NORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall
be made from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10330) ... 4,027,500 ..... (re. $3,788,000)
For state aid grants to neighborhood naturally occurring retirement
communities (NNORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal
of existing contracts with the state office for the aging. No
expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts to be distributed by provider any activities
or provide any services (10331) ... 4,027,500 ..... (re. $3,345,000)
For grants in aid to the 59 designated area agencies on aging for
transportation operating expenses related to serving the elderly.
Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the director of the state office for the aging and
approved by the director of the budget (10885) .....................
1,121,000 ......................................... (re. $1,121,000)
For grants to the area agencies on aging for the health insurance
information, counseling and assistance program (10335) .............
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For state matching funds for services and expenses to match federally
funded model projects and/or demonstration grant programs, a portion
of which may be transferred to state operations or to other entities
as necessary to meet federal grant objectives (10336) ..............
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For the managed care consumer assistance program for the purpose of
providing education, outreach, one-on-one counseling, monitoring of
the implementation of medicare part D, and assistance with drug
appeals and fair hearings related to medicare part D coverage for
persons who are eligible for medical assistance and who are also
beneficiaries under part D of title XVIII of the federal social

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
security act and for participants of the elderly pharmaceutical
insurance coverage program (EPIC) in accordance with the following:
Medicare Rights Center (10340) ... 793,000 .......... (re. $793,000)
New York StateWide Senior Action Council, Inc. (10341) ...............
354,000 ............................................. (re. $354,000)
New York Legal Assistance Group (10342) ... 222,000 ... (re. $222,000)
Legal Aid Society of New York (10343) ... 111,000 ..... (re. $111,000)
Empire Justice Center (10345) ... 155,000 ............. (re. $155,000)
Community Service Society (10346) ... 132,000 ......... (re. $132,000)
For services and expenses of the retired and senior volunteer program
(RSVP) (10324) ... 216,500 .......................... (re. $216,500)
For services and expenses of the EAC/Nassau senior respite program
(10325) ... 118,500 ................................. (re. $118,500)
For services and expenses of the home aides of central New York, Inc.
senior respite program (10326) ... 71,000 ............ (re. $71,000)
For services and expenses of the New York foundation for senior citi-
zens home sharing and respite care program (10327) .................
86,000 ............................................... (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses of the foster grandparents program (10332)
... 98,000 ........................................... (re. $98,000)
For services and expenses of Lifespan of Greater Rochester for an
elderly abuse education and outreach program for the elderly (10333)
... 745,000 ......................................... (re. $745,000)
For services and expenses of the Association on Aging in New York
State related to the livable New York initiative to create neighbor-
hoods that consider the evolving needs and preferences of all their
residents pursuant to a plan prepared by the director of the state
office for the aging and approved by the director of the budget
(10866) ... 122,500 ................................. (re. $122,500)
For services and expenses of the New York state adult day services
association, inc. related to providing training and technical
assistance to social adult day services programs in New York state
regarding the quality of services (10867) ..........................
122,500 ............................................. (re. $122,500)
For services and expenses related to the congregate services initi-
ative. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until
the director of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the
office outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and
the allocation of funds among the counties (10320) .................
403,000 ............................................. (re. $403,000)
For services and expenses of New York Statewide Senior Action Council,
Inc. for the patients' rights hotline and advocacy project (10334)
... 31,500 ........................................... (re. $31,500)
For services and expenses for Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
sustainability and expansion of Enhanced Multi-Disciplinary Teams as
implemented under the federal Elder Abuse Preventions Interventions
Initiative and related data collection and reporting (10833) .......
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, up to the amount appropri-
ated herein, may be transferred to the general fund state purposes
account for services and expenses of the Association on Aging in New

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
York State to provide training, education and technical assistance
to the area agencies on aging and aging network service contractor
staff for professional development which must include but not be
limited to developing priority training needs of all aging network
staff, submitting an implementation plan for approval by the office
for the aging in advance, prioritizing expansion of state certified
aging network staff, and developing contracts and vouchers in a
timely manner (10810) ... 250,000 ................... (re. $223,000)
For services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initiative. Funds
shall be used to support case management services for holocaust
survivors statewide and may include, but not be limited to, mental
health services, trauma informed care, crisis prevention, legal
services and entitlement counseling, emergency financial assistance
for food, housing, prescriptions, medical and dental care, sociali-
zation programs, training and support for caregivers and home health
aides working with survivors, and end of life care including hospice
and ethical wills (10715) ... 1,000,000 ........... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the development of a state master
plan for aging. A portion of this appropriation may be suballocated
or transferred to the department of health.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, up to
$1,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein, may be transferred to
state operations (10735) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $1,000,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law, up to
$53,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to
address the unmet needs of the elderly as reported to the office for
the aging through the reporting requirements set forth in section
214 of the elder law. Subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, up to $53,000,000 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or
transferred with any other general fund appropriation within the
office for the aging to address the unmet needs of the elderly as
reported to the office for the aging through the reporting require-
ments set forth in section 214 of the elder law. No expenditures
shall be made from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the
amounts and purposes of such expenditures and the allocation of
funds among the counties, including the city of New York (10716) ...
53,000,000 ....................................... (re. $53,000,000)
For services and expenses related to elder abuse outreach, education
and mitigation of Lifespan of Greater Rochester (10736) ............
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses related to the expansion of online classes
for GetSetUp to combat social isolation, improve health and wellness
and provide lifelong learning opportunities (10737) ................
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses related to the expansion of online classes
for Self Help, Inc to combat social isolation, improve health and
wellness and provide lifelong learning opportunities (10739) .......
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For service and expenses for Intuition Robotics related to accessing
digital technology and assisting with accessing affordable internet
services for low-income older adults (10740) .......................
700,000 ............................................. (re. $700,000)
For services and expenses to TRUALTA for caregiver training and
supports (10741) ... 400,000 ........................ (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses for GoGo Grandparent for transportation
expansion and capacity building (10742) ............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses to LTCOP and HIICAP to expand stipend
program to retain volunteers (10743) ...............................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
expanding bill payer programs for the older adults in up to ten
counties (10755) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $750,000)
The appropriations made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024,
are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2024, related to the community services
for the elderly grant program. Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 214 of the elder law and
any other provision of law to the contrary, up to $3,500,000 of the
funds appropriated herein may, at the discretion of the director of
the budget, be used by the state to reimburse counties for more than
the 75 percent of the total annual expenditures of approved communi-
ty services for the elderly programs. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts and
purposes of such expenditures and the allocation of funds among the
counties. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation
to the contrary, subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein for the community services for the
elderly program (CSE) and the expanded in-home services for the
elderly program (EISEP) may be used in accordance with a waiver or
reduction in county maintenance of effort requirements established
pursuant to section 214 of the elder law, except for base year
expenditures. To the extent that funds hereby appropriated are
sufficient to exceed the per capita limit established in section 214
of the elder law, the excess funds shall be available to supplement
the existing per capita level in a uniform manner consistent with
statutory allocations.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2024 authorizing a 2.84 percent cost of
living adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2024 and
ending March 31, 2025 the director shall not apply any other cost of
living adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10318) ...............
39,509,508 ........................................ (re. $2,335,000)
For planning and implementation, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of a program of expanded in-home,

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
case management and ancillary community services for the elderly
(EISEP).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law, up to
$15,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to
address the unmet needs of the elderly as reported to the office for
the aging through the reporting requirements set forth in section
214 of the elder law. Subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, up to $15,000,000 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or
transferred with any other general fund appropriation within the
office for the aging to address the unmet needs of the elderly as
reported to the office for the aging through the reporting require-
ments set forth in section 214 of the elder law. The office for the
aging shall provide an annual report to the governor, the temporary
president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly by Septem-
ber 1, 2025 that shall include the area agencies on aging that have
received these funds, the amount of funds received by each area
agency on aging, the number of participants served, and the services
provided.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, up to
$2,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein, may be transferred to
state operations for the administration of programs.
No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and the
allocation of funds among the counties, including the city of New
York.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2024 authorizing a 2.84 percent cost of
living adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2024 and
ending March 31, 2025 the director shall not apply any other cost of
living adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10319) ...............
68,357,277 .......................................... (re. $448,000)
For services and expenses of grants to area agencies on aging for the
establishment and operation of caregiver resource centers (10321) ..
353,000 .............................................. (re. $23,000)
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2024, associated with the wellness in
nutrition (WIN) program, formerly known as the supplemental nutri-
tion assistance program (SNAP), including a suballocation to the
department of agriculture and markets to be transferred to state
operations for administrative costs of the farmers market nutrition
program. Up to $200,000 of this appropriation may be made available
to the Council of Senior Centers and Services of New York City to
provide outreach within the older adult SNAP initiative. No expendi-
ture shall be made from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
amounts and purpose of such expenditures and the allocation of funds
among the counties.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2024 authorizing a 2.84 percent cost of
living adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2024 and
ending March 31, 2025 the director shall not apply any other cost of
living adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10322) ...............
38,153,816 ........................................ (re. $2,954,000)
Local grants for services and expenses of the long-term care ombudsman
program. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein shall not be subject to section 112 of the state
finance law, section 163 of the state finance law and funding prior-
ity shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts with the
state office for the aging (10323) .................................
3,690,000 ......................................... (re. $1,697,000)
For state aid grants to providers of respite services to the elderly.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10328) ... 656,000 ......... (re. $622,000)
For state aid grants to providers of social model adult day services.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10329) ... 1,072,000 ....... (re. $908,000)
For state aid grants to naturally occurring retirement communities
(NORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall
be made from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10330) ... 4,027,500 ..... (re. $2,626,000)
For state aid grants to neighborhood naturally occurring retirement
communities (NNORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal
of existing contracts with the state office for the aging. No
expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts to be distributed by provider any activities
or provide any services (10331) ... 4,027,500 ..... (re. $3,332,000)
For grants in aid to the 59 designated area agencies on aging for
transportation operating expenses related to serving the elderly.
Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the director of the state office for the aging and
approved by the director of the budget (10885) .....................
1,121,000 ........................................... (re. $522,000)
For grants to the area agencies on aging for the health insurance
information, counseling and assistance program (10335) .............
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $34,000)
For state matching funds for services and expenses to match federally
funded model projects and/or demonstration grant programs, a portion

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of which may be transferred to state operations or to other entities
as necessary to meet federal grant objectives (10336) ..............
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For the managed care consumer assistance program for the purpose of
providing education, outreach, one-on-one counseling, monitoring of
the implementation of medicare part D, and assistance with drug
appeals and fair hearings related to medicare part D coverage for
persons who are eligible for medical assistance and who are also
beneficiaries under part D of title XVIII of the federal social
security act and for participants of the elderly pharmaceutical
insurance coverage program (EPIC) in accordance with the following:
Medicare Rights Center (10340) ... 793,000 ............ (re. $313,000)
Legal Aid Society of New York (10343) ... 111,000 ....... (re. $2,000)
Empire Justice Center (10345) ... 155,000 .............. (re. $84,000)
Community Service Society (10346) ... 132,000 ......... (re. $132,000)
For services and expenses of the retired and senior volunteer program
(RSVP) (10324) ... 216,500 ........................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the home aides of central New York, Inc.
senior respite program (10326) ... 71,000 ............ (re. $71,000)
For services and expenses of the New York foundation for senior citi-
zens home sharing and respite care program (10327) .................
86,000 ............................................... (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses of the foster grandparents program (10332)
... 98,000 ........................................... (re. $29,000)
For services and expenses related to an elderly abuse education and
outreach program in accordance with section 219 of the elder law
funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging (10333) ........................
745,000 ............................................. (re. $373,000)
For services and expenses of the Association on Aging in New York
State related to the livable New York initiative to create neighbor-
hoods that consider the evolving needs and preferences of all their
residents pursuant to a plan prepared by the director of the state
office for the aging and approved by the director of the budget
(10866) ... 122,500 ................................. (re. $122,500)
For services and expenses of the New York state adult day services
association, inc. related to providing training and technical
assistance to social adult day services programs in New York state
regarding the quality of services (10867) ..........................
122,500 ............................................. (re. $122,500)
For services and expenses related to the congregate services initi-
ative. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until
the director of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the
office outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and
the allocation of funds among the counties (10320) .................
403,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of New York Statewide Senior Action Council,
Inc. for the patients' rights hotline and advocacy project (10334)
... 31,500 ........................................... (re. $31,500)
For services and expenses for Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
sustainability and expansion of Enhanced Multi-Disciplinary Teams as
implemented under the federal Elder Abuse Preventions Interventions

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Initiative and related data collection and reporting (10833) .......
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,163,000)
For services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initiative. Funds
shall be used to support case management services for holocaust
survivors statewide and may include, but not be limited to, mental
health services, trauma informed care, crisis prevention, legal
services and entitlement counseling, emergency financial assistance
for food, housing, prescriptions, medical and dental care, sociali-
zation programs, training and support for caregivers and home health
aides working with survivors, and end of life care including hospice
and ethical wills (10715) ..........................................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $548,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law, up to
$8,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to address
the unmet needs of the elderly as reported to the office for the
aging through the reporting requirements set forth in section 214 of
the elder law. Subject to the approval of the director of the budg-
et, up to $8,000,000 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or
transferred with any other general fund appropriation within the
office for the aging to address the unmet needs of the elderly as
reported to the office for the aging through the reporting require-
ments set forth in section 214 of the elder law. No expenditures
shall be made from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the
amounts and purposes of such expenditures and the allocation of
funds among the counties, including the city of New York (10716) ...
18,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,500,000)
For services and expenses related to elder abuse outreach, education
and mitigation of Lifespan of Greater Rochester (10736) ............
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses for Ageless Innovation to reduce social
isolation (10738) ... 350,000 ........................ (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses for GoGo Grandparent for transportation
expansion and capacity building (10742) ............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses to LTCOP and HIICAP to expand stipend
program to retain volunteers (10743) ... 150,000 .... (re. $103,000)
For services and expenses of Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
expanding bill payer programs for the older adults in up to ten
counties (10755) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $466,000)
For additional services and expenses of the long-term care ombudsman
program (10878) ... 2,500,000 ..................... (re. $2,427,000)
The appropriations made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023,
are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2023, related to the community services
for the elderly grant program. Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 214 of the elder law and
any other provision of law to the contrary, up to $3,500,000 of the

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
funds appropriated herein may, at the discretion of the director of
the budget, be used by the state to reimburse counties for more than
the 75 percent of the total annual expenditures of approved communi-
ty services for the elderly programs. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts and
purposes of such expenditures and the allocation of funds among the
counties. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation
to the contrary, subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein for the community services for the
elderly program (CSE) and the expanded in-home services for the
elderly program (EISEP) may be used in accordance with a waiver or
reduction in county maintenance of effort requirements established
pursuant to section 214 of the elder law, except for base year
expenditures. To the extent that funds hereby appropriated are
sufficient to exceed the per capita limit established in section 214
of the elder law, the excess funds shall be available to supplement
the existing per capita level in a uniform manner consistent with
statutory allocations.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2023 authorizing a 4 percent cost of living
adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2023 and ending
March 31, 2024 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10318) ...............
37,682,638 ........................................ (re. $1,300,000)
For planning and implementation, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2023, of a program of expanded in-home,
case management and ancillary community services for the elderly
(EISEP).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law, up to
$15,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to
address the unmet needs of the elderly as reported to the office for
the aging through the reporting requirements set forth in section
214 of the elder law. Subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, up to $15,000,000 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or
transferred with any other general fund appropriation within the
office for the aging to address the unmet needs of the elderly as
reported to the office for the aging through the reporting require-
ments set forth in section 214 of the elder law. The office for the
aging shall provide an annual report to the governor, the temporary
president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly by Septem-
ber 1, 2024 that shall include the area agencies on aging that have
received these funds, the amount of funds received by each area
agency on aging, the number of participants served, and the services
provided.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, up to

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
$2,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein, may be transferred to
state operations for the administration of programs.
No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and the
allocation of funds among the counties, including the city of New
York.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2023 authorizing a 4 percent cost of living
adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2023 and ending
March 31, 2024 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10319) ...............
67,498,000 ........................................ (re. $3,261,000)
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2023, associated with the wellness in
nutrition (WIN) program, formerly known as the supplemental nutri-
tion assistance program (SNAP), including a suballocation to the
department of agriculture and markets to be transferred to state
operations for administrative costs of the farmers market nutrition
program. Up to $200,000 of this appropriation may be made available
to the Council of Senior Centers and Services of New York City to
provide outreach within the older adult SNAP initiative. No expendi-
ture shall be made from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the
amounts and purpose of such expenditures and the allocation of funds
among the counties.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2023 authorizing a 4 percent cost of living
adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2023 and ending
March 31, 2024 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10322) ...............
35,648,296 .......................................... (re. $988,000)
Local grants for services and expenses of the long-term care ombudsman
program (10323) ... 3,690,000 ....................... (re. $448,000)
For state aid grants to providers of respite services to the elderly.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10328) ... 656,000 ......... (re. $158,000)
For state aid grants to providers of social model adult day services.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10329) ... 1,072,000 ....... (re. $158,000)
For state aid grants to naturally occurring retirement communities
(NORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall
be made from this appropriation until the director of the budget has

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10330) ... 4,027,500 ..... (re. $3,061,000)
For state aid grants to neighborhood naturally occurring retirement
communities (NNORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal
of existing contracts with the state office for the aging. No
expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts to be distributed by provider any activities
or provide any services (10331) ... 4,027,500 ..... (re. $2,326,000)
For grants in aid to the 59 designated area agencies on aging for
transportation operating expenses related to serving the elderly.
Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the director of the state office for the aging and
approved by the director of the budget (10885) .....................
1,121,000 ............................................ (re. $31,000)
For grants to the area agencies on aging for the health insurance
information, counseling and assistance program (10335) .............
1,000,000 ............................................. (re. $8,000)
For state matching funds for services and expenses to match federally
funded model projects and/or demonstration grant programs, a portion
of which may be transferred to state operations or to other entities
as necessary to meet federal grant objectives (10336) ..............
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For the managed care consumer assistance program for the purpose of
providing education, outreach, one-on-one counseling, monitoring of
the implementation of medicare part D, and assistance with drug
appeals and fair hearings related to medicare part D coverage for
persons who are eligible for medical assistance and who are also
beneficiaries under part D of title XVIII of the federal social
security act and for participants of the elderly pharmaceutical
insurance coverage program (EPIC) in accordance with the following:
Empire Justice Center (10345) ... 155,000 ............... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the retired and senior volunteer program
(RSVP) (10324) ... 216,500 ............................ (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of the home aides of central New York, Inc.
senior respite program (10326) ... 71,000 ............ (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of the foster grandparents program (10332)
... 98,000 ........................................... (re. $29,000)
For services and expenses of the Association on Aging in New York
State related to the livable New York initiative to create neighbor-
hoods that consider the evolving needs and preferences of all their
residents pursuant to a plan prepared by the director of the state
office for the aging and approved by the director of the budget
(10866) ... 122,500 ................................. (re. $112,000)
For services and expenses related to the congregate services initi-
ative. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until
the director of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the
office outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and
the allocation of funds among the counties (10320) .................
403,000 .............................................. (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses for Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
sustainability and expansion of Enhanced Multi-Disciplinary Teams as

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
implemented under the federal Elder Abuse Preventions Interventions
Initiative and related data collection and reporting (10833) .......
500,000 .............................................. (re. $21,000)
For services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initiative. Funds
shall be used to support case management services for holocaust
survivors statewide and may include, but not be limited to, mental
health services, trauma informed care, crisis prevention, legal
services and entitlement counseling, emergency financial assistance
for food, housing, prescriptions, medical and dental care, sociali-
zation programs, training and support for caregivers and home health
aides working with survivors, and end of life care including hospice
and ethical wills (10715) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $456,000)
For services and expenses related to the development of a state master
plan for aging. A portion of this appropriation may be suballocated
or transferred to the department of health.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, up to
$1,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein, may be transferred to
state operations (10735) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $128,000)
For services and expenses for GoGo Grandparent for transportation
expansion and capacity building (10742) ............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses to LTCOP and HIICAP to expand stipend
program to retain volunteers (10743) ... 150,000 ..... (re. $84,000)
For services and expenses of Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
expanding bill payer programs for the older adults in up to ten
counties (10755) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $115,000)
For additional services and expenses of the expanded in-home services
for the elderly program (10880) ... 9,300,000 ..... (re. $4,650,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initi-
atives. Funds appropriated herein shall not be subject to section
112 of the state finance law, section 163 of the state finance law,
or section 142 of the economic development law (10703) .............
1,080,000 ........................................... (re. $303,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initi-
atives. Funds appropriated herein shall not be subject to section
112 of the state finance law, section 163 of the state finance law,
or section 142 of the economic development law (10703) .............
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For additional services and expenses of the long-term care ombudsman
program ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $1,962,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2022, related to the community services
for the elderly grant program. Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 214 of the elder law and
any other provision of law to the contrary, up to $3,500,000 of the
funds appropriated herein may, at the discretion of the director of
the budget, be used by the state to reimburse counties for more than
the 75 percent of the total annual expenditures of approved communi-
ty services for the elderly programs. No expenditures shall be made

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts and
purposes of such expenditures and the allocation of funds among the
counties. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation
to the contrary, subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein for the community services for the
elderly program (CSE) and the expanded in-home services for the
elderly program (EISEP) may be used in accordance with a waiver or
reduction in county maintenance of effort requirements established
pursuant to section 214 of the elder law, except for base year
expenditures. To the extent that funds hereby appropriated are
sufficient to exceed the per capita limit established in section 214
of the elder law, the excess funds shall be available to supplement
the existing per capita level in a uniform manner consistent with
statutory allocations.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2022 authorizing a 5.4 percent cost of living
adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2022 and ending
March 31, 2023 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10318) ...............
33,617,000 .......................................... (re. $940,000)
For planning and implementation, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2022, of a program of expanded in-home,
case management and ancillary community services for the elderly
(EISEP).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law, up to
$15,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to
address the unmet needs of the elderly as reported to the office for
the aging through the reporting requirements set forth in state
elder law section 214. Subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, up to $15,000,000 hereby appropriated may be inter-
changed or transferred with any other general fund appropriation
within the office for the aging to address the unmet needs of the
elderly as reported to the office for the aging through the report-
ing requirements set forth in state elder law section 214. The
office for the aging shall provide an annual report to the governor,
the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the assem-
bly by September 1, 2023 that shall include the area agencies on
aging that have received these funds, the amount of funds received
by each area agency on aging, the number of participants served, and
the services provided.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, up to
$2,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein, may be transferred to
state operations for the administration of programs.
No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and the
allocation of funds among the counties, including the city of New
York.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2022 authorizing a 5.4 percent cost of living
adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2022 and ending
March 31, 2023 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10319) ...............
67,498,000 ........................................ (re. $1,206,000)
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2022, associated with the wellness in
nutrition (WIN) program, formerly known as the supplemental nutri-
tion assistance program (SNAP), including a suballocation to the
department of agriculture and markets to be transferred to state
operations for administrative costs of the farmers market nutrition
program. Up to $200,000 of this appropriation may be made available
to the Council of Senior Centers and Services of New York City to
provide outreach within the older adult SNAP initiative. No expendi-
ture shall be made from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the
amounts and purpose of such expenditures and the allocation of funds
among the counties.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2022 authorizing a 5.4 percent cost of living
adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2022 and ending
March 31, 2023 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10322) ...............
33,474,000 .......................................... (re. $241,000)
For state aid grants to providers of respite services to the elderly.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10328) ... 656,000 ......... (re. $123,000)
For state aid grants to providers of social model adult day services.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10329) ... 1,072,000 ........ (re. $54,000)
For state aid grants to naturally occurring retirement communities
(NORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall
be made from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10330) ... 2,027,500 ....... (re. $595,000)
For state aid grants to neighborhood naturally occurring retirement
communities (NNORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal
of existing contracts with the state office for the aging. No
expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts to be distributed by provider any activities
or provide any services (10331) ... 2,027,500 ....... (re. $196,000)
For grants in aid to the 59 designated area agencies on aging for
transportation operating expenses related to serving the elderly.
Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the director of the state office for the aging and
approved by the director of the budget (10885) .....................
1,121,000 ............................................ (re. $20,000)
For grants to the area agencies on aging for the health insurance
information, counseling and assistance program (10335) .............
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $55,000)
For state matching funds for services and expenses to match federally
funded model projects and/or demonstration grant programs, a portion
of which may be transferred to state operations or to other entities
as necessary to meet federal grant objectives (10336) ..............
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For the managed care consumer assistance program for the purpose of
providing education, outreach, one-on-one counseling, monitoring of
the implementation of medicare part D, and assistance with drug
appeals and fair hearings related to medicare part D coverage for
persons who are eligible for medical assistance and who are also
beneficiaries under part D of title XVIII of the federal social
security act and for participants of the elderly pharmaceutical
insurance coverage program (EPIC) in accordance with the following:
Legal Aid Society of New York (10343) ... 111,000 ... (re. $111,000)
For services and expenses of the retired and senior volunteer program
(RSVP) (10324) ... 216,500 ........................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of the home aides of central New York, Inc.
senior respite program (10326) ... 71,000 ............ (re. $36,000)
For services and expenses of the foster grandparents program (10332)
... 98,000 ........................................... (re. $29,000)
For services and expenses related to the livable New York initiative
to create neighborhoods that consider the evolving needs and prefer-
ences of all their residents (10866) ...............................
122,500 .............................................. (re. $27,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state adult day services
association, inc. related to providing training and technical
assistance to social adult day services programs in New York state
regarding the quality of services (10867) ..........................
122,500 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses related to the congregate services initi-
ative. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until
the director of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the
office outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and
the allocation of funds among the counties (10320) .................
403,000 ............................................... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses for Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
sustainability and expansion of Enhanced Multi-Disciplinary Teams as
implemented under the federal Elder Abuse Preventions Interventions
Initiative and related data collection and reporting (10833) .......
500,000 .............................................. (re. $80,000)

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional services and expenses for state aid grants to naturally
occurring retirement communities (NORC). Funding priority shall be
given to supplemental allocations to existing contracts (10800) ....
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,367,000)
For additional services and expenses for state aid grants to neighbor-
hood naturally occurring retirement communities (NNORC). Funding
priority shall be given to supplemental allocations to existing
contracts (10801) ... 2,000,000 ................... (re. $1,408,000)
For services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initiative. Funds
shall be used to support case management services for holocaust
survivors statewide and may include, but not be limited to, mental
health services, trauma informed care, crisis prevention, legal
services and entitlement counseling, emergency financial assistance
for food, housing, prescriptions, medical and dental care, sociali-
zation programs, training and support for caregivers and home health
aides working with survivors, and end of life care including hospice
and ethical wills (10715) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $291,000)
For services and expenses to LTCOP and HIICAP to expand stipend
program to retain volunteers (10743) ... 150,000 ..... (re. $66,000)
For services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initiatives
(10703) ... 1,600,000 ............................... (re. $319,000)
For additional services and expenses of the long-term care ombudsman
program (10878) ... 2,500,000 ....................... (re. $400,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2021, related to the community services
for the elderly grant program. Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 214 of the elder law and
any other provision of law to the contrary, up to $3,500,000 of the
funds appropriated herein may, at the discretion of the director of
the budget, be used by the state to reimburse counties for more than
the 75 percent of the total annual expenditures of approved communi-
ty services for the elderly programs. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts and
purposes of such expenditures and the allocation of funds among the
counties. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation
to the contrary, subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein for the community services for the
elderly program (CSE) and the expanded in-home services for the
elderly program (EISEP) may be used in accordance with a waiver or
reduction in county maintenance of effort requirements established
pursuant to section 214 of the elder law, except for base year
expenditures. To the extent that funds hereby appropriated are
sufficient to exceed the per capita limit established in section 214
of the elder law, the excess funds shall be available to supplement
the existing per capita level in a uniform manner consistent with
statutory allocations.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except a chapter of
the laws of 2021 authorizing a 1 percent cost of living adjustment
increase, but including section 1 of part C of chapter 57 of the

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
laws of 2006, as amended by section 1 of part I of chapter 60 of the
laws of 2014, for the period commencing on April 1, 2021 and ending
March 31, 2022 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10318) ...............
29,801,000 .......................................... (re. $250,000)
For planning and implementation, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2021, of a program of expanded in-home,
case management and ancillary community services for the elderly
(EISEP).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
including but not limited to the state reimbursement and county
maintenance of effort requirements specified in the elder law, up to
$15,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to
address the unmet needs of the elderly as reported to the office for
the aging through the reporting requirements set forth in state
elder law section 214. Subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, up to $15,000,000 hereby appropriated may be inter-
changed or transferred with any other general fund appropriation
within the office for the aging to address the unmet needs of the
elderly as reported to the office for the aging through the report-
ing requirements set forth in state elder law section 214. The
office for the aging shall provide an annual report to the governor,
the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the assem-
bly by September 1, 2022 that shall include the area agencies on
aging that have received these funds, the amount of funds received
by each area agency on aging, the number of participants served, and
the services provided.
No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and the
allocation of funds among the counties, including the city of New
York.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except a chapter of
the laws of 2021 authorizing a 1 percent cost of living adjustment
increase, but including section 1 of part C of chapter 57 of the
laws of 2006, as amended by section 1 of part I of chapter 60 of the
laws of 2014, for the period commencing on April 1, 2021 and ending
March 31, 2022 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10319) ...............
65,120,000 ........................................ (re. $1,858,000)
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2021, associated with the wellness in
nutrition (WIN) program, formerly known as the supplemental nutri-
tion assistance program (SNAP), including a suballocation to the
department of agriculture and markets to be transferred to state
operations for administrative costs of the farmers market nutrition
program. Up to $200,000 of this appropriation may be made available
to the Council of Senior Centers and Services of New York City to
provide outreach within the older adult SNAP initiative. No expendi-
ture shall be made from this appropriation until the director of the

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
budget has approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the
amounts and purpose of such expenditures and the allocation of funds
among the counties.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except a chapter of
the laws of 2021 authorizing a 1 percent cost of living adjustment
increase, but including section 1 of part C of chapter 57 of the
laws of 2006, as amended by section 1 of part I of chapter 60 of the
laws of 2014, for the period commencing on April 1, 2021 and ending
March 31, 2022 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (10322) ...............
28,281,000 ........................................... (re. $75,000)
For state aid grants to providers of respite services to the elderly.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10328) ... 656,000 ......... (re. $154,000)
For state aid grants to providers of social model adult day services.
Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall be made
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10329) ... 1,072,000 ........ (re. $79,000)
For state aid grants to naturally occurring retirement communities
(NORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing
contracts with the state office for the aging. No expenditures shall
be made from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a plan submitted by the office outlining the amounts to be
distributed by provider (10330) ... 2,027,500 ....... (re. $404,000)
For state aid grants to neighborhood naturally occurring retirement
communities (NNORC). Funding priority shall be given to the renewal
of existing contracts with the state office for the aging. No
expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until the direc-
tor of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the office
outlining the amounts to be distributed by provider any activities
or provide any services (10331) ... 2,027,500 ........ (re. $82,000)
For grants in aid to the 59 designated area agencies on aging for
transportation operating expenses related to serving the elderly.
Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the director of the state office for the aging and
approved by the director of the budget (10885) .....................
1,121,000 ............................................ (re. $15,000)
For grants to the area agencies on aging for the health insurance
information, counseling and assistance program (10335) .............
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $59,000)
For state matching funds for services and expenses to match federally
funded model projects and/or demonstration grant programs, a portion
of which may be transferred to state operations or to other entities
as necessary to meet federal grant objectives (10336) ..............
175,000 ............................................. (re. $142,000)

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the managed care consumer assistance program for the purpose of
providing education, outreach, one-on-one counseling, monitoring of
the implementation of medicare part D, and assistance with drug
appeals and fair hearings related to medicare part D coverage for
persons who are eligible for medical assistance and who are also
beneficiaries under part D of title XVIII of the federal social
security act and for participants of the elderly pharmaceutical
insurance coverage program (EPIC) in accordance with the following:
Empire Justice Center (10345) ... 155,000 ............ (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of the retired and senior volunteer program
(RSVP) (10324) ... 216,500 ............................ (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of the EAC/Nassau senior respite program
(10325) ... 118,500 .................................. (re. $42,000)
For services and expenses of the home aides of central New York, Inc.
senior respite program (10326) ... 71,000 ............ (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of the New York foundation for senior citi-
zens home sharing and respite care program (10327) .................
86,000 ............................................... (re. $22,000)
For services and expenses of the foster grandparents program (10332)
... 98,000 ........................................... (re. $29,000)
For services and expenses related to an elderly abuse education and
outreach program in accordance with section 219 of the elder law
funding priority shall be given to the renewal of existing contracts
with the state office for the aging (10333) ........................
745,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses related to the livable New York initiative
to create neighborhoods that consider the evolving needs and prefer-
ences of all their residents (10866) ...............................
122,500 ............................................. (re. $122,500)
For services and expenses of the New York state adult day services
association, inc. related to providing training and technical
assistance to social adult day services programs in New York state
regarding the quality of services (10867) ..........................
122,500 .............................................. (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses related to the congregate services initi-
ative. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation until
the director of the budget has approved a plan submitted by the
office outlining the amounts and purposes of such expenditures and
the allocation of funds among the counties (10320) .................
403,000 ............................................... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses for Lifespan of Greater Rochester, Inc. for
sustainability and expansion of Enhanced Multi-Disciplinary Teams as
implemented under the federal Elder Abuse Preventions Interventions
Initiative and related data collection and reporting (10833) .......
500,000 .............................................. (re. $58,000)
For additional services and expenses for state aid grants to naturally
occurring retirement communities (NORC). Funding priority shall be
given to supplemental allocations to existing contracts (10800) ....
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,236,000)
For additional services and expenses for state aid grants to neighbor-
hood naturally occurring retirement communities (NNORC). Funding

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
priority shall be given to supplemental allocations to existing
contracts (10801) ... 2,000,000 ..................... (re. $605,000)
For services and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with
certain municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwith-
standing section twenty-four of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan approved by the speaker
of the assembly and the director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropriation
(10714) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,139,000)
For services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initiative. Funds
shall be used to support case management services for holocaust
survivors statewide and may include, but not be limited to, mental
health services, trauma informed care, crisis prevention, legal
services and entitlement counseling, emergency financial assistance
for food, housing, prescriptions, medical and dental care, sociali-
zation programs, training and support for caregivers and home health
aides working with survivors, and end of life care including hospice
and ethical wills (10715) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $147,000)
For services and expenses of the Holocaust Survivors Initiative
(10703) ... 350,000 .................................. (re. $21,000)
For services and expenses of the state office for the aging to imple-
ment subdivision 3-c of section 1 of part C of chapter 57 of the
laws of 2006, as amended by part I of chapter 60 of the laws of
2014, by part Q chapter 57 of the laws of 2017, by part N of chapter
57 of the laws of 2018, and by part Y of chapter 57 of the laws of
2019, to provide funding for a cost of living adjustment for the
purpose of establishing rates of payments, contracts or any other
form of reimbursement increases for the period April 1, 2021 through
March 31, 2022. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, and subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
the amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by
interchange or transfer without limit to any local assistance appro-
priation, and may include advances to local governments and volun-
tary agencies, to accomplish this purpose (10722) ..................
2,022,013 ......................................... (re. $2,022,013)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
FHHS Aid to Localities Account - 25177
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans
act and other health and human services programs.
Title III-b social services (10894) ..................................
49,069,000 ....................................... (re. $49,069,000)
Title III-c nutrition programs, including a suballocation to the
department of health to be transferred to state operations for
nutrition program activities (10893) ...............................
69,610,000 ....................................... (re. $69,610,000)
Title III-e caregivers (10892) ... 12,000,000 ...... (re. $12,000,000)

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Health and human services programs (10891) ...........................
14,965,000 ....................................... (re. $14,954,000)
Nutrition services incentive program (10890) .........................
17,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans
act and other health and human services programs.
Title III-b social services (10894) ..................................
49,069,000 ....................................... (re. $28,336,000)
Title III-c nutrition programs, including a suballocation to the
department of health to be transferred to state operations for
nutrition program activities (10893) ...............................
69,610,000 ....................................... (re. $39,358,000)
Title III-e caregivers (10892) ... 12,000,000 ...... (re. $11,920,000)
Health and human services programs (10891) ...........................
14,965,000 ....................................... (re. $10,027,000)
Nutrition services incentive program (10890) .........................
17,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,905,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans
act and other health and human services programs.
Title III-b social services (10894) ..................................
26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,432,000)
Title III-c nutrition programs, including a suballocation to the
department of health to be transferred to state operations for
nutrition program activities (10893) ...............................
41,385,000 ........................................ (re. $9,108,000)
Title III-e caregivers (10892) ... 12,000,000 ....... (re. $7,816,000)
Health and human services programs (10891) ...........................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,174,000)
Nutrition services incentive program (10890) .........................
17,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,245,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans
act and other health and human services programs.
Title III-b social services (10894) ..................................
26,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,441,000)
Title III-e caregivers (10892) ... 12,000,000 ....... (re. $1,257,000)
Health and human services programs (10891) ...........................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,477,000)
Nutrition services incentive program (10890) .........................
17,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,907,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans
act and other health and human services programs.
Title III-b social services (10894) ..................................
26,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,274,000)
Title III-e caregivers (10892) ... 12,000,000 ....... (re. $1,325,000)

12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE AGING
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Health and human services programs (10891) ...........................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,606,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans
act and other health and human services programs.
Title III-b social services (10894) ..................................
26,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,985,000)
Title III-c nutrition programs, including a suballocation to the
department of health to be transferred to state operations for
nutrition program activities (10893) ...............................
41,385,000 ........................................ (re. $2,373,000)
Health and human services programs (10891) ...........................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,604,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans
act and other health and human services programs.
Title III-e caregivers (10892) ... 12,000,000 ....... (re. $1,601,000)
Health and human services programs (10891) ...........................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,290,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Senior Community Service Employment Account - 25444
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the senior community service employment program provided under
title V of the federal older Americans act (10887) .................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $9,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the senior community service employment program provided under
title V of the federal older Americans act (10887) .................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,820,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the senior community service employment program provided under
title V of the federal older Americans act (10887) .................
9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,176,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 93,558,000 122,704,250
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 20,000,000 80,000,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 113,558,000 202,704,250
================ ================
AGRICULTURAL BUSINESS SERVICES PROGRAM ..................... 113,558,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the New York
state veterinary diagnostic laboratory at
Cornell university including but not
limited to animal health surveillance and
control, avian disease, cattle health,
milk production, johnes disease and salmo-
nella dublin bacteria, genomic surveil-
lance, and forensic pathology programs
(11319) ...................................... 8,270,000
For additional services and expenses of the
New York state veterinary diagnostic labo-
ratory at Cornell university (10908) ........... 700,000
Cornell university berry research (11416) ........ 263,000
Cornell university honeybee research (11455) ..... 152,000
Cornell university maple research (11456) ......... 76,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the Cornell university maple research
(11316) ........................................ 150,000
Cornell university onion research (10948).......... 51,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the Cornell university onion research
(10949) ......................................... 20,000
Cornell university vegetable research
(11401) ......................................... 51,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the Cornell university vegetable research
(11300) ......................................... 75,000
Cornell university hard cider research
(11441) ........................................ 202,000
Cornell university for concord grape
research (11444) ............................... 202,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the Cornell university concord grape
research (11301) ................................ 50,000
Cornell university Geneva experiment station

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
barley evaluation and field testing
program (11466) ................................ 303,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the Cornell university Geneva experiment
station barley evaluation and field test-
ing program (11451) ............................. 50,000
Cornell university golden nematode program
(10932) ......................................... 63,000
For services and expenses of Cornell univer-
sity, including but not limited to, work-
force development and education for the
hemp industry, including the extension of
cannabidiol; and the research and develop-
ment for the growth of hemp and varietal
development (11320) .......................... 1,000,000
Cornell university ruminant center (11368) ....... 375,000
Cornell university agriculture in the class-
room to support nutritional education
programs (10938) ............................... 500,000
Cornell university future farmers of Ameri-
ca, (10939) .................................. 1,000,000
Cornell university 4-H (11367) ................... 250,000
Cornell university association of agricul-
tural educators for teacher recruitment,
professional development, and administra-
tive assistance (10940) ........................ 500,000
Cornell university farmnet program for farm
family assistance (10926) .................... 1,400,000
Cornell university pro-dairy program (11470) ... 1,338,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the Cornell university pro-dairy program
(11406) ........................................ 213,000
Cornell university small farms program (11417) ... 500,000
Cornell university farm labor specialist to
assist farmers and farm workers with labor
law compliance, leadership development and
workplace issues (11425) ....................... 702,000
For services and expenses of Cornell Univer-
sity New York City urban agriculture
education and outreach (11304) ................. 250,000
For services and expenses of the Harvest New
York program (11434) ........................... 600,000
Cornell Small Farms Equitable Farm Futures
Initiative (11308) ............................. 500,000
For services and expenses of a legal clinic
within the Elisabeth Haub School of Law at
Pace University to provide pro bono legal
assistance to small farms and related food
and beverage businesses and nonprofits
(11328) ........................................ 225,000
New York farm viability institute (10916) ...... 1,000,000
For the additional services and expenses of

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the New York farm viability institute
(10917) ...................................... 1,150,000
New York farm viability institute, for
services and expenses of New York state
berry growers association (11462) ............... 61,000
For services and expenses of New York corn
and soybean growers (11454) ..................... 76,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the New York corn and soybean growers
(11348) ......................................... 49,000
For services and expenses of programs to
promote agricultural economic development.
All or a portion of this appropriation may
be suballocated to any department, agency,
or public authority. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the director of
the budget is hereby authorized to trans-
fer up to $1,000,000 of this appropriation
to state operations (10902) .................. 2,020,000
New York state brewers association (11428) ........ 76,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the New York state brewers association
(11349) ......................................... 74,000
New York cider association (11429) ............... 326,000
New York state distillers guild (11430) ........... 76,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the New York state distillers guild
(11351) ......................................... 24,000
New York wine and grape foundation (10915) ..... 1,075,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the New York wine and grape foundation
(11352) ........................................ 150,000
Christmas tree farmers association of New
York for programs to promote Christmas
trees (11461) .................................. 126,000
New York state apple growers association
(10943) ........................................ 483,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the New York state apple growers associ-
ation (11458) .................................. 759,000
Maple producers association for programs to
promote maple syrup (10945) .................... 152,000
For the additional services and expenses of
the Maple producers association (11302) ......... 99,000
For services and expenses of the New York
state apple research and development
program, in consultation with the apple
research and development advisory board
(11400) ........................................ 505,000
For services and expenses of programs to
promote dairy excellence, including but

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
not limited to programs at Cornell univer-
sity.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the director of the budget is hereby
authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of
this appropriation to state operations for
programs including administration of dairy
profit teams (11495) ........................... 374,000
For services and expenses of the electronic
benefits transfer program administered by
the Farmers' Market Federation of NY
(11412) ........................................ 139,000
For services and expenses of programs to
create new and support existing MANRRS
(minorities in agriculture, natural
resources, and related science) chapters
at colleges and universities in New York
state (11322) ................................... 50,000
Black farmers united of New York state, for
services and expenses of programs to
support capacity building and assist farms
and food businesses owned by people of
color in New York state (11324) ................ 100,000
For the additional services and expenses of
Black farmers united of New York state for
services and expenses of programs to
support capacity building and assist farms
and food businesses owned by people of
color in New York state (11329) ................ 100,000
For marketing, advertising, and retail oper-
ations to promote local agritourism and
New York produced food and beverage goods
and products, including but not limited to
up to $128,000 for the City of Geneva, up
to $375,000 for the NY Wine and Culinary
Center, up to $250,000 for Cornell Cooper-
ative Extension of Broome County, up to
$410,000 for the Montgomery County Chapter
of NYARC, Inc., up to $385,000 for Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Nassau County, up
to $350,000 for the Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Saratoga County, up to
$425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Columbia and Greene Counties,
up to $425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Sullivan County, up to
$450,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension
of Erie County, up to $550,000 for the
Thousand Islands Bridge Authority for the
operation and maintenance of the North
Country Welcome Center, up to $300,000 for
the Cornell Cooperative Extension of

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Jefferson County, for the retail operation
located within the North Country Welcome
Center, up to $215,000 for Cornell Cooper-
ative Extension of Cayuga County, and up
to $200,000 for the Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Dutchess County. At the
direction of the director of the budget,
all or a portion of this appropriation may
be suballocated to any department, agency,
or public authority or transferred to
state operations (11450) ..................... 5,800,000
For services and expenses of the Cornell
University Integrated Pest Management
program including support of farmers for
adopting integrated pest management prac-
tices and field trials (11358) ............... 4,250,000
For services and expenses of a program to
develop farm to school initiatives that
will help schools purchase more food from
local farmers and expand access to healthy
local food for school children. The funds
shall be awarded through a competitive
process (11405) ................................ 758,000
For additional services and expenses of a
program to develop farm to school initi-
atives that will help schools purchase
more food from local farmers and expand
access to healthy local food for school
children (11330) ............................... 750,000
New York federation of growers and process-
ors agribusiness child development program
(10913) ..................................... 11,300,000
For reimbursement for the promotion of agri-
culture and domestic arts in accordance
with article 24 of the agriculture and
markets law (10914) ............................ 500,000
For services and expenses related to train-
ing and recruiting new entrants in the
food and agricultural fields (11346) ......... 1,000,000
On-farm health and safety program adminis-
tered by Mary Imogene Basset hospital
(11473) ...................................... 1,250,000
For services and expenses to promote or
administer annual fairs or expositions for
the promotion of agriculture and domestic
arts that receive premium reimbursements
pursuant to article 24 of the agriculture
and markets law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, up to $550,000 to be allocated
by the commissioner in amounts not to
exceed $50,000 to such eligible agricul-

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
tural and horticultural corporations or
county extension services on a non-compet-
itive basis until such funds are exhausted
for the purposes of providing advertising,
promotion, and education programs and up
to $500,000 to support off season events
at county fairs (11347) ...................... 2,500,000
John May Farm Safety Fund (11336) ................ 450,000
For additional services and expenses of the
John May Farm Safety Fund ....................... 50,000
For services and expenses of a program to
provide payments or benefits to eligible
farm operations that meet certain finan-
cial criteria or agricultural metrics and
grow, produce, or raise eligible specialty
crops, livestock and or livestock
products, or aquaculture products. Such
program, including all financial criteria
or agricultural metrics, shall be subject
to a plan approved by the director of the
budget after consultation with the commis-
sioner of the department of agriculture
and markets. Such approved plan will be
submitted to the chair of the senate
finance committee and the chair of the
assembly ways and means committee and
shall be posted on the department of agri-
culture and markets' website before appli-
cations for such payments may be submit-
ted. Such payments shall not be less than
one thousand dollars and may not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars for any
single eligible farm operation. Such
payments may consider payments or benefits
received from the U.S. Department of Agri-
culture's Assistance for Specialty Crop
Farmers Program. The department shall
submit a report by June thirtieth 2027
accounting for all expenditures from this
appropriation to the director of the budg-
et, the secretary of the senate finance
committee, and the secretary of the assem-
bly ways and means committee detailing (a)
the total amount of funds committed to
each applicant; (b) the location of each
applicant; and (c) such other information
as established in such criteria. Funds
appropriated herein shall not be subject
to section 112 of the state finance law,
section 163 of the state finance law ........ 30,000,000
American Farmland Trust for Farmland for a
New Generation (11443) ......................... 700,000

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For grants to beginning farmers. The depart-
ment of agriculture and markets shall
consult with organizations working with or
representing beginning farmers, and a farm
credit bureau or member of the farm credit
system or a banking institution with a
demonstrated ability to provide financial
assistance and service to agricultural
producers to establish criteria governing
the award of such grants. Such criteria
shall include but not be limited to, farm-
ers who have not operated a farm for more
than ten years, and who will materially
and substantially participate in operating
a farm within a region of the state and
may include urban farmers. Grants shall be
awarded on a competitive basis. Grants
shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred
fifty thousand dollars for any single
beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a
required match from the recipient of no
more than twenty percent of the grant
amount. The department is authorized to
enter into agreements with municipalities,
public benefit corporations, local devel-
opment corporations, or not-for-profit
organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance
for the administration of the grant
program. Up to fifteen percent of the
total appropriation amount may be made
available for the services and expenses of
such organization directly related to the
administration of the grant program. Such
grants may be awarded for purposes includ-
ing, but not limited to, the start-up,
improvement or expansion of a farm opera-
tion, worker or apprenticeship training,
marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures
thereon, the purchase of machinery, equip-
ment or livestock, or the construction or
improvement of physical structures,
including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land
leased by the recipient. The department
shall submit a report annually on December
thirty-first to the director of the budg-
et, the temporary president of the senate,
the speaker of the assembly, the minority
leader of the senate and the minority

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each
applicant; (b) the location of each appli-
cant; and (c) such other information as
established in such criteria (11337) ......... 1,000,000
For the Cornell Cooperative Extension bridg-
ing the upstate-downstate food network
divide (11312) ................................. 150,000
For the Comfort Food Community (11313) ............ 50,000
For the Dutchess County Cornell Cooperative
Extension (11331) .............................. 100,000
Cornell hops breeding research and extension
program (11315) ................................ 300,000
For services and expenses of the Cornell
University pro-livestock program (11355) ....... 250,000
For grants to socially and economically
disadvantaged farmers. The department of
agriculture and markets shall consult with
organizations working with or representing
socially and economically disadvantaged
farmers, and a farm credit bureau or
member of the farm credit system or a
banking institution with a demonstrated
ability to provide financial assistance
and service to agricultural producers and
to establish criteria governing the award
of such grants. For the purposes of this
grant program, "socially disadvantaged"
shall mean individuals who have been
subject to discrimination by virtue of
their membership of a particular group
which may include, but not be limited to
Black or African American, American Indian
or Alaska Native, Hispanic or Latino, and
Asian or Pacific Islander; "economically
disadvantaged" shall mean socially disad-
vantaged individuals whose ability to
enter into farming or whose farm enter-
prise has been impaired due to diminished
capital, credit opportunities or access to
land, among other things, as compared to
other similarly situated individuals who
are not socially disadvantaged. Such
criteria shall include, but not be limited
to, farmers who will materially and
substantially participate in operating a
farm within the state and may include
urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be
less than five thousand dollars and may
not exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars for any single beneficiary. Grants

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
shall be issued with a required match from
the recipient of no more than twenty
percent of the grant amount. The depart-
ment is authorized to enter into agree-
ments with municipalities, public benefit
corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations
that provide financial assistance, includ-
ing capital assistance for the adminis-
tration of the grant program. Up to
fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the
services and expenses of such organization
directly related to the administration of
the grant program. Such grants may be
awarded to socially and economically
disadvantaged farmers for purposes includ-
ing, but not limited to, the start-up,
improvement or expansion of a farm opera-
tion, worker or apprenticeship training,
marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures
thereon, the purchase of machinery, equip-
ment or livestock, or the construction or
improvement of physical structures,
including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land
leased by the recipient. The department
shall submit a report annually on December
thirty-first to the director of the budg-
et, the temporary president of the senate,
the speaker of the assembly, the minority
leader of the senate and the minority
leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each
applicant; (b) the location of each appli-
cant; and (c) such other information as
established in such criteria (11338) ......... 1,000,000
Empire Sheep Producers Association (11306) ........ 75,000
For the services and expenses of Grow NYC
(11357) ........................................ 850,000
Hop Growers of New York to promote New York
hops (11317) ................................... 100,000
Northeast Organic Farming Association of New
York (11334) ................................... 200,000
Northern New York agricultural development
program administered by Cornell cooper-
ative extension of Jefferson County
(10941) ........................................ 300,000
For the Pitney Meadows Community Farm
(11314) ......................................... 50,000

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For the services and expenses of the turf-
grass environmental stewardship fund
administered by the New York state green-
grass association (11472) ...................... 200,000
Volunteers Improving Neighborhood Environ-
ment (11318) .................................... 75,000
Hudson Valley AgriBusiness Development
Corporation (11365) ............................ 200,000
Cornell Agriculture Workforce Development ......... 75,000
For the Cannabis Association of New York and
suballocation to other state agencies,
authorities, and entities (11353) .............. 100,000
For the Cannabis Farmers Alliance and subal-
location to other state agencies, authori-
ties, and entities (11363) ..................... 100,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 93,558,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal Agriculture and Markets Account - 25021
For services and expenses of non-point
source pollution control, farmland preser-
vation, and other agricultural programs
including suballocation to other state
departments and agencies including liabil-
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2026.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state
finance law and any other provision of law
to the contrary, the funds appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer from/to appropriations for any
prior or subsequent grant period within
the same federal fund/program and between
state operations and aid to localities to
accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation, as long as such corresponding
prior/subsequent grant periods within such
appropriations have been reappropriated as
necessary (11498) ........................... 20,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 20,000,000
--------------

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
AGRICULTURAL BUSINESS SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the New York state veterinary diagnostic
laboratory at Cornell university including but not limited to animal
health surveillance and control, avian disease, cattle health, milk
production, johnes disease and salmonella dublin bacteria, genomic
surveillance, and forensic pathology programs (11319) ..............
8,270,000 ......................................... (re. $4,291,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York state veterinary
diagnostic laboratory at Cornell university (10908) ................
700,000 ............................................. (re. $700,000)
Cornell university berry research (11416) ............................
263,000 ............................................. (re. $263,000)
Cornell university honeybee research (11455) .........................
152,000 ............................................. (re. $152,000)
Cornell university maple research (11456) ... 76,000 ... (re. $76,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the Cornell university
maple research (11316) ... 75,000 .................... (re. $75,000)
Cornell university onion research (10948) ... 51,000 ... (re. $51,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the Cornell university
onion research (10949) ... 20,000 .................... (re. $20,000)
Cornell university vegetable research (11401) ........................
51,000 ............................................... (re. $51,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the Cornell university
vegetable research (11300) ... 75,000 ................ (re. $75,000)
Cornell university hard cider research (11441) .......................
202,000 ............................................. (re. $202,000)
Cornell university for concord grape research (11444) ................
202,000 ............................................. (re. $202,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the Cornell university
concord grape research (11301) ... 50,000 ............ (re. $50,000)
Cornell university Geneva experiment station barley evaluation and
field testing program (11466) ... 303,000 ........... (re. $303,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the Cornell university
Geneva experiment station barley evaluation and field testing
program (11451) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $50,000)
Cornell university golden nematode program (10932) ...................
63,000 ............................................... (re. $63,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not
limited to, workforce development and education for the hemp indus-
try, including the extension of cannabidiol; and the research and
development for the growth of hemp and varietal development (11320)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)
Cornell university ruminant center (11368) ...........................
375,000 ............................................. (re. $375,000)
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom to support nutritional
education programs (10938) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Cornell university future farmers of America, (10939) ................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
Cornell university 4-H (11367) ... 250,000 ............ (re. $250,000)
Cornell university association of agricultural educators for teacher
recruitment, professional development, and administrative assistance
(10940) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000)
Cornell university farmnet program for farm family assistance (10926)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)
Cornell university pro-dairy program (11470) .........................
1,338,000 ......................................... (re. $1,338,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the Cornell university
pro-dairy program (11406) ... 125,000 ............... (re. $125,000)
Cornell university small farms program (11417) .......................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers and farm
workers with labor law compliance, leadership development and work-
place issues (11425) ... 702,000 .................... (re. $702,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University New York City urban
agriculture education and outreach (11304) .........................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Harvest New York program (11434) ...
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
Cornell Small Farms Equitable Farm Futures Initiative (11308) ........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of a legal clinic within the Elisabeth Haub
School of Law at Pace University to provide pro bono legal assist-
ance to small farms and related food and beverage businesses and
nonprofits (11328) ... 225,000 ...................... (re. $225,000)
New York farm viability institute (10916) ............................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the New York farm viabil-
ity institute (10917) ... 1,150,000 ............... (re. $1,150,000)
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York state berry growers association (11462) .......................
61,000 ............................................... (re. $61,000)
For services and expenses of New York corn and soybean growers (11454)
... 76,000 ........................................... (re. $76,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the New York corn and
soybean growers (11348) ... 49,000 ................... (re. $49,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby
authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 of this appropriation to
state operations (10902) ...........................................
2,020,000 ......................................... (re. $2,015,000)
New York state brewers association (11428) ...........................
76,000 ............................................... (re. $76,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the New York state brewers
association (11349) ... 24,000 ....................... (re. $24,000)
New York cider association (11429) ... 76,000 .......... (re. $76,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the additional services and expenses of the New York cider associ-
ation (11350) ... 32,750 ............................. (re. $32,750)
New York state distillers guild (11430) ... 76,000 ..... (re. $76,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the New York state distil-
lers guild (11351) ... 24,000 ........................ (re. $24,000)
New York wine and grape foundation (10915) ...........................
1,075,000 ......................................... (re. $1,075,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the New York wine and
grape foundation (11352) ... 150,000 ................ (re. $150,000)
Christmas tree farmers association of New York for programs to promote
Christmas trees (11461) ... 126,000 ................. (re. $126,000)
New York state apple growers association (10943) .....................
483,000 ............................................. (re. $483,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the New York state apple
growers association (11458) ... 758,500 ............. (re. $758,500)
Maple producers association for programs to promote maple syrup
(10945) ... 152,000 ................................. (re. $123,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the Maple producers asso-
ciation (11302) ... 99,000 ........................... (re. $99,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state apple research and
development program, in consultation with the apple research and
development advisory board (11400) ... 505,000 ...... (re. $505,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote dairy excellence,
including but not limited to programs at Cornell university.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations for programs including administration of
dairy profit teams (11495) .........................................
374,000 ............................................. (re. $374,000)
For services and expenses of the electronic benefits transfer program
administered by the Farmers' Market Federation of NY (11412) ...
139,000 ............................................. (re. $139,000)
For services and expenses of programs to create new and support exist-
ing MANRRS (minorities in agriculture, natural resources, and
related science) chapters at colleges and universities in New York
state (11322) ... 50,000 ............................. (re. $50,000)
Black farmers united of New York state, for services and expenses of
programs to support capacity building and assist farms and food
businesses owned by people of color in New York state (11324) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For the additional services and expenses of Black farmers united of
New York state for services and expenses of programs to support
capacity building and assist farms and food businesses owned by
people of color in New York state (11329) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local
agritourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and
products, including but not limited to up to $128,000 for the City
of Geneva, up to $375,000 for the NY Wine and Culinary Center, up to
$250,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Broome County, up to
$410,000 for the Montgomery County Chapter of NYARC, Inc., up to
$385,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Nassau County, up to

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
$350,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Saratoga County,
up to $425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Columbia and
Greene Counties, up to $425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Exten-
sion of Sullivan County, up to $450,000 for Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Erie County, up to $550,000 for the Thousand Islands
Bridge Authority for the operation and maintenance of the North
Country Welcome Center, up to $300,000 for the Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Jefferson County, for the retail operation located
within the North Country Welcome Center, up to $215,000 for Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Cayuga County, and up to $200,000 for the
Cornell Cooperative Extension of Dutchess County. At the direction
of the director of the budget, all or a portion of this appropri-
ation may be suballocated to any department, agency, or public
authority or transferred to state operations (11450) ...............
5,800,000 ......................................... (re. $5,659,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest
Management program including support of farmers for adopting inte-
grated pest management practices and field trials (11358) ..........
4,250,000 ......................................... (re. $4,250,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
758,000 ............................................. (re. $758,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to develop farm to
school initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from
local farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school
children (11330) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $750,000)
New York federation of growers and processors agribusiness child
development program (10913) ... 10,300,000 ....... (re. $10,300,000)
For the additional services and expenses of the New York federation of
growers and processors agribusiness child development program
(10905) ... 110,000 ................................. (re. $110,000)
For reimbursement for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts
in accordance with article 24 of the agriculture and markets law
(10914) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the reimbursement for
the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts in accordance with
article 24 of the agriculture and markets law (11453) ..............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses related to training and recruiting new
entrants in the food and agricultural fields (11346) ...............
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
On-farm health and safety program administered by Mary Imogene Basset
hospital (11473) ... 1,250,000 .................... (re. $1,250,000)
For services and expenses to promote or administer annual fairs or
expositions for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts that
receive premium reimbursements pursuant to article 24 of the agri-
culture and markets law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, up to $550,000
to be allocated by the commissioner in amounts not to exceed $50,000
to such eligible agricultural and horticultural corporations or

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
county extension services on a non-competitive basis until such
funds are exhausted for the purposes of providing advertising,
promotion, and education programs (11347) ..........................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
John May Farm Safety Fund (11336) ... 250,000 ......... (re. $250,000)
For additional services and expenses of the John May Farm Safety Fund
(11370) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
Cornell hops breeding research and extension program (11315) .........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell University pro-livestock
program (11355) ... 250,000 ......................... (re. $250,000)
Empire Sheep Producers Association (11306) ...........................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
Hop Growers of New York to promote New York hops (11317) .............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
American Farmland Trust for Farmland for a New Generation (11443)
700,000 ............................................. (re. $700,000)
For the services and expenses of Grow NYC (11357) ....................
850,000 ............................................. (re. $850,000)
Northeast Organic Farming Association of New York (11334) ............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For the services and expenses of the turf-grass environmental steward-
ship fund administered by the New York state green-grass association
(11472) ... 200,000 ................................. (re. $200,000)
For the Cannabis Association of New York and suballocation to other
state agencies, authorities, and entities (11353) ..................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For the Cannabis Farmers Alliance and suballocation to other state
agencies, authorities, and entities (11363) ........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
Northern New York agricultural development program administered by
Cornell cooperative extension of Jefferson County (10941) ..........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For the Pitney Meadows Community Farm (11314) ........................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
Volunteers Improving Neighborhood Environment (11318) ................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For the Comfort Food Community (11313) ... 50,000 ...... (re. $50,000)
For the Cornell University's College of Agriculture and Life Sciences
to study the ecological impacts of agrivoltaics (11356) ............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
Cornell Agriculture Workforce Development (11371) ....................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For the Dutchess County Cornell Cooperative Extension (11331) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For the Cornell Cooperative Extension bridging the upstate-downstate
food network divide (11312) ... 50,000 ............... (re. $50,000)
Hudson Valley AgriBusiness Development Corporation (11365) ...........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For grants to beginning farmers. The department of agriculture and
markets shall consult with organizations working with or represent-
ing beginning farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
farm credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated
ability to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural
producers to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
Such criteria shall include but not be limited to, farmers who have
not operated a farm for more than ten years, and who will materially
and substantially participate in operating a farm within a region of
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars for
any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required match
from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program.
Such grants may be awarded for purposes including, but not limited to,
the start-up, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker
or apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-
first to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11337) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000)
For grants to socially and economically disadvantaged farmers. The
department of agriculture and markets shall consult with organiza-
tions working with or representing socially and economically disad-
vantaged farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the farm
credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated ability
to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural produc-
ers and to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
For the purposes of this grant program, "socially disadvantaged"
shall mean individuals who have been subject to discrimination by
virtue of their membership of a particular group which may include,
but not be limited to Black or African American, American Indian or
Alaska Native, Hispanic or Latino, and Asian or Pacific Islander;
"economically disadvantaged" shall mean socially disadvantaged indi-
viduals whose ability to enter into farming or whose farm enterprise
has been impaired due to diminished capital, credit opportunities or
access to land, among other things, as compared to other similarly
situated individuals who are not socially disadvantaged.

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, farmers who will
materially and substantially participate in operating a farm within
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars for
any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required match
from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program. Such grants may be awarded to socially and economically
disadvantaged farmers for purposes including, but not limited to,
the start-up, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker
or apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-first
to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11338) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Cornell university berry research (11416) ............................
263,000 ............................................. (re. $263,000)
Cornell university honeybee research (11455) .........................
152,000 ............................................. (re. $152,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university maple
research (11316) ... 75,000 .......................... (re. $61,000)
Cornell university onion research (10948) ............................
51,000 ................................................ (re. $6,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university onion
research (10949) ... 20,000 .......................... (re. $11,000)
Cornell university vegetable research (11401) ........................
51,000 ............................................... (re. $51,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university vegeta-
ble research (11300) ... 75,000 ....................... (re. $2,000)
Cornell university hard cider research (11441) .......................
202,000 ............................................. (re. $202,000)
Cornell university for concord grape research (11444) ................
202,000 ............................................. (re. $202,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university concord
grape research (11301) ... 50,000 .................... (re. $50,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Cornell university Geneva experiment station barley evaluation and
field testing program (11466) ... 303,000 ........... (re. $279,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university Geneva
experiment station barley evaluation and field testing program
(11451) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not
limited to, workforce development and education for the hemp indus-
try, including the extension of cannabidiol; and the research and
development for the growth of hemp and varietal development (11320)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom to support nutritional
education programs (10938) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $311,000)
Cornell university future farmers of America, including up to $250,000
for an agricultural youth leadership conference (10939) ............
1,250,000 ........................................... (re. $286,000)
Cornell university association of agricultural educators for teacher
recruitment, professional development, and administrative assistance
(10940) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $185,000)
Cornell university farmnet program for farm family assistance (10926)
... 1,000,000 ....................................... (re. $833,000)
Cornell university pro-dairy program (11470) .........................
1,213,000 ........................................... (re. $127,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university
prodairy program (11406) ... 250,000 ................. (re. $26,000)
Cornell university small farms program (11417) .......................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $383,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers and farm
workers with labor law compliance, leadership development and work-
place issues (11425) ... 702,000 .................... (re. $571,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University New York City urban
agriculture education and outreach (11304) .........................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Harvest New York program (11434) ....
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
Cornell Small Farms Equitable Farm Futures Initiative (11308) ........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $405,000)
New York farm viability institute (10916) ............................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York farm viability
institute (10917) ... 1,150,000 ................... (re. $1,150,000)
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York state berry growers association (11462) .......................
61,000 ............................................... (re. $61,000)
For services and expenses of New York corn and soybean growers (11454)
... 76,000 ........................................... (re. $40,000)
For additional services and expenses of New York corn and soybean
growers (11348) ... 49,000 ........................... (re. $49,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby
authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 of this appropriation to

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state operations (10902) ...........................................
2,020,000 ......................................... (re. $1,995,000)
New York state brewers association (11428) ...........................
76,000 ............................................... (re. $76,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York state brewers
association (11349) ... 24,000 ....................... (re. $24,000)
New York state distillers guild (11430) ... 76,000 ..... (re. $13,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York state distillers
guild (11351) ... 24,000 ............................. (re. $24,000)
New York wine and grape foundation (10915) ...........................
1,075,000 ........................................... (re. $154,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York wine and grape
foundation (11352) ... 150,000 ....................... (re. $98,000)
Christmas tree farmers association of New York for programs to promote
Christmas trees (11461) ... 126,000 .................. (re. $95,000)
Maple producers association for programs to promote maple syrup
(10945) ... 152,000 .................................. (re. $47,000)
For additional services and expenses of the maple producers associ-
ation for programs to promote maple syrup (11302) ..................
99,000 ............................................... (re. $99,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state apple research and
development program, in consultation with the apple research and
development advisory board (11400) ... 505,000 ...... (re. $260,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote dairy excellence,
including but not limited to programs at Cornell university.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations for programs including administration of
dairy profit teams (11495) .........................................
374,000 ............................................. (re. $374,000)
For services and expenses of the electronic benefits transfer program
administered by the Farmers' Market Federation of NY (11412) .......
139,000 ............................................. (re. $139,000)
For services and expenses of programs to create new and support exist-
ing MANRRS (minorities in agriculture, natural resources, and
related science) chapters at colleges and universities in New York
state (11322) ... 50,000 ............................. (re. $50,000)
For additional services and expenses of Black farmers united of New
York state (11329) ... 100,000 ....................... (re. $27,000)
For marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local
agritourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and
products, including but not limited to up to $125,000 for the City
of Geneva, up to $375,000 for the NY Wine and Culinary Center, up to
$250,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Broome County, up to
$410,000 for the Montgomery County Chapter of NYARC, Inc., up to
$385,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Nassau County, up to
$350,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Saratoga County,
up to $425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Columbia and
Greene Counties, up to $425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Exten-
sion of Sullivan County, up to $450,000 for Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Erie County, up to $550,000 for the Thousand Islands
Bridge Authority for the operation and maintenance of the North

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Country Welcome Center, up to $300,000 for the Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Jefferson County, for the retail operation located
within the North Country Welcome Center, up to $215,000 for Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Cayuga County, and up to $150,000 for the
Cornell Cooperative Extension of Dutchess County. At the direction
of the director of the budget, all or a portion of this appropri-
ation may be suballocated to any department, agency, or public
authority or transferred to state operations (11450) ...............
5,750,000 ......................................... (re. $4,073,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell University Integrated Pest
Management program including support of farmers for adopting inte-
grated pest management practices and field trials (11358) ..........
4,250,000 ......................................... (re. $2,805,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
758,000 ............................................. (re. $704,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to develop farm to
school initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from
local farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school
children (11330) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $750,000)
New York federation of growers and processors agribusiness child
development program (10913) ... 10,300,000 .......... (re. $931,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York federation of
growers and processors agribusiness child development program
(10905) ... 110,000 ................................. (re. $110,000)
For reimbursement for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts
in accordance with article 24 of the agriculture and markets law
(10914) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $240,000)
For services and expenses related to training and recruiting new
entrants in the food and agricultural fields (11346) ...............
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
On-farm health and safety program administered by Mary Imogene Basset
hospital (11473) ... 1,250,000 ...................... (re. $259,000)
For services and expenses to promote or administer annual fairs or
expositions for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts that
receive premium reimbursements pursuant to article 24 of the agri-
culture and markets law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, up to $550,000
to be allocated by the commissioner in amounts not to exceed $50,000
to such eligible agricultural and horticultural corporations or
county extension services on a non-competitive basis until such
funds are exhausted for the purposes of providing advertising,
promotion, and education programs (11347) ..........................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,607,000)
For services and expenses to promote or administer annual fairs or
expositions for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts that
receive premium reimbursements pursuant to article 24 of the agri-
culture and markets law (11364) ... 50,000 ........... (re. $50,000)
Hop Growers of New York to promote New York hops (11317) .............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $75,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Northeast Organic Farming Association of New York (11334) ............
200,000 .............................................. (re. $62,000)
For the Cornell Cooperative Extension bridging the upstate-downstate
food network divide (11312) ... 150,000 ............. (re. $140,000)
Empire sheep producers association (11306) ...........................
60,000 ............................................... (re. $45,000)
For the Cannabis Association of New York and suballocation to other
state agencies, authorities, and entities ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University pro-livestock program
(11355) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For the Dutchess County Cornell Cooperative Extension (11331) ........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
Northern New York agricultural development program administered by
Cornell cooperative extension of Jefferson County (10941) ..........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
Volunteers Improving Neighborhood Environment (11318) ................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $19,000)
Cornell university hops breeding research and extension program
(11315) ... 300,000 ................................. (re. $300,000)
American Farmland Trust for Farmland for a New Generation (11443) ....
700,000 ............................................. (re. $475,000)
For grants to beginning farmers. The department of agriculture and
markets shall consult with organizations working with or represent-
ing beginning farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the
farm credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated
ability to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural
producers to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, farmers who have
not operated a farm for more than ten years, and who will materially
and substantially participate in operating a farm within a region of
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
for any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required
match from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program.
Such grants may be awarded for purposes including, but not limited to,
the start-up, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker
or apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-first
to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11337) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000)
For grants to socially and economically disadvantaged farmers. The
department of agriculture and markets shall consult with organiza-
tions working with or representing socially and economically disad-
vantaged farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the farm
credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated ability
to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural produc-
ers and to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
For the purposes of this grant program, "socially disadvantaged"
shall mean individuals who have been subject to discrimination by
virtue of their membership of a particular group which may include,
but not be limited to Black or African American, American Indian or
Alaska Native, Hispanic or Latino, and Asian or Pacific Islander;
"economically disadvantaged" shall mean socially disadvantaged indi-
viduals whose ability to enter into farming or whose farm enterprise
has been impaired due to diminished capital, credit opportunities or
access to land, among other things, as compared to other similarly
situated individuals who are not socially disadvantaged.
Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, farmers who will
materially and substantially participate in operating a farm within
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
for any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required
match from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program. Such grants may be awarded to socially and economically
disadvantaged farmers for purposes including, but not limited to,
the start-up, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker
or apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-first
to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11338) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Cornell university maple research (11456) ............................
76,000 ................................................ (re. $1,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university onion
research (10949) ... 20,000 ........................... (re. $6,000)
Cornell university vegetable research (11401) ........................
51,000 ................................................ (re. $9,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university vegeta-
ble research (11300) ... 75,000 ....................... (re. $4,000)
Cornell university for concord grape research (11444) ................
202,000 ............................................. (re. $187,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university concord
grape research (11301) ... 50,000 .................... (re. $50,000)
Cornell university Geneva experiment station barley evaluation and
field testing program (11466) ... 303,000 ............ (re. $12,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university Geneva
experiment station barley evaluation and field testing program
(11451) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not
limited to, workforce development and education for the hemp indus-
try, including the extension of cannabidiol; and the research and
development for the growth of hemp and varietal development (11320)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom to support nutritional
education programs (10938) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $1,000)
Cornell university future farmers of America (10939) .................
1,000,000 ............................................. (re. $2,000)
Cornell university farmnet program for farm family assistance (10926)
... 1,000,000 ........................................ (re. $78,000)
Cornell university small farms program (11417) .......................
500,000 .............................................. (re. $26,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers with labor
law compliance (11425) ... 202,000 .................. (re. $114,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university farm
labor specialist to assist farmers with labor law compliance (11327)
... 199,000 ......................................... (re. $199,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University New York City urban
agriculture education and outreach (11304) .........................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $234,000)
For services and expenses of the Harvest New York program (11434) ....
600,000 ............................................. (re. $264,000)
Cornell Small Farms Equitable Farm Futures Initiative (11308) ........
500,000 .............................................. (re. $34,000)
New York farm viability institute (10916) ............................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $561,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York farm viability
institute (10917) ... 900,000 ....................... (re. $597,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York state berry growers association (11462) .......................
61,000 ............................................... (re. $61,000)
For additional services and expenses of New York corn and soybean
growers (11348) ... 49,000 ........................... (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby
authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 of this appropriation to
state operations (10902) ...........................................
2,020,000 ......................................... (re. $1,883,000)
New York state distillers guild (11430) ... 76,000 ...... (re. $8,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York state distillers
guild (11351) ... 24,000 .............................. (re. $9,000)
Christmas tree farmers association of New York for programs to promote
Christmas trees (11461) ... 126,000 ................. (re. $126,000)
Maple producers association for programs to promote maple syrup
(10945) ... 152,000 .................................. (re. $29,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state apple research and
development program, in consultation with the apple research and
development advisory board (11400) ... 505,000 ....... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote dairy excellence,
including but not limited to programs at Cornell university.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations for programs including administration of
dairy profit teams (11495) .........................................
374,000 ............................................. (re. $258,000)
For services and expenses of the electronic benefits transfer program
administered by the Farmers' Market Federation of NY (11412) .......
139,000 .............................................. (re. $41,000)
For services and expenses of programs to create new and support exist-
ing MANRRS (minorities in agriculture, natural resources, and
related science) chapters at colleges and universities in New York
state (11322) ... 50,000 ............................. (re. $50,000)
For services, expenses, and grants related to the farmers' market
resiliency grant program, including but not limited to the increas-
ing farmers' markets resiliency through the development and enhance-
ment of farmers' market infrastructure and on-line sales and deliv-
ery capabilities across the state (11323) ..........................
700,000 ............................................. (re. $539,000)
For services, expenses, and grants related to the urban farms and
community gardens grant program, including but not limited to up to
$325,000 for Cornell University (11325) ............................
2,325,000 ......................................... (re. $1,583,000)
For marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local
agritourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and
products, including but not limited to up to $125,000 for the City
of Geneva, up to $375,000 for the NY Wine and Culinary Center, up to
$350,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Broome County, up to
$410,000 for the Montgomery County Chapter of NYARC, Inc., up to

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
$485,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Nassau County, up to
$350,000 for the Lake George Regional Chamber of Commerce, up to
$425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Columbia and
Greene Counties, up to $425,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Exten-
sion of Sullivan County, up to $450,000 for Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Erie County, up to $850,000 for the Thousand Islands
Bridge Authority, up to $215,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension
of Cayuga County, and up to $150,000 for the Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Dutchess County. At the direction of the director of
the budget, all or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority or transferred
to state operations (11450) ........................................
5,750,000 ......................................... (re. $1,993,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
758,000 ............................................. (re. $101,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to develop farm to
school initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from
local farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school
children (11330) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $346,000)
For reimbursement for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts
in accordance with article 24 of the agriculture and markets law
(10914) ... 500,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses related to training and recruiting new
entrants in the food and agricultural fields (11346) ...............
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses to promote or administer annual fairs or
expositions for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts that
receive premium reimbursements pursuant to article 24 of the agri-
culture and markets law, including but not limited to, up to $85,000
for the New York State Association of Agricultural Fairs for the
completion of an economic impact study of local and county fairs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, up to $550,000
to be allocated by the commissioner in amounts not to exceed $50,000
to such eligible agricultural and horticultural corporations or
county extension services on a non-competitive basis until such
funds are exhausted for the purposes of providing advertising,
promotion, and education programs (11347) ..........................
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $454,000)
Cornell university hops breeding research and extension program
(11315) ... 300,000 ................................. (re. $245,000)
Empire sheep producers association (11306) ...........................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $38,000)
Hop Growers of New York to promote New York hops (11317) .............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For Cornell University's College of Agriculture and Life Sciences to
study the ecological impacts of agrovoltaics (11356) ...............
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $848,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the turfgrass environmental stewardship
fund administered by the New York state greengrass association
(11472) ... 175,000 ................................... (re. $2,000)
For the Dutchess County Cornell Cooperative Extension (11331) ........
100,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University pro-livestock program
(11355) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $233,000)
Northern New York agricultural development program administered by
Cornell cooperative extension of Jefferson County (10941) ..........
300,000 .............................................. (re. $14,000)
For grants to beginning farmers. The department of agriculture and
markets shall consult with organizations working with or represent-
ing beginning farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the
farm credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated
ability to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural
producers to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, farmers who have
not operated a farm for more than ten years, and who will materially
and substantially participate in operating a farm within a region of
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
for any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required
match from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program.
Such grants may be awarded for purposes including, but not limited to,
the start-up, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker
or apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-first
to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11337) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000)
For grants to socially and economically disadvantaged farmers. The
department of agriculture and markets shall consult with organiza-
tions working with or representing socially and economically disad-
vantaged farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the farm
credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated ability

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural produc-
ers and to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
For the purposes of this grant program, "socially disadvantaged"
shall mean individuals who have been subject to discrimination by
virtue of their membership of a particular group which may include,
but not be limited to Black or African American, American Indian or
Alaska Native, Hispanic or Latino, and Asian or Pacific Islander;
"economically disadvantaged" shall mean socially disadvantaged indi-
viduals whose ability to enter into farming or whose farm enterprise
has been impaired due to diminished capital, credit opportunities or
access to land, among other things, as compared to other similarly
situated individuals who are not socially disadvantaged.
Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, farmers who will
materially and substantially participate in operating a farm within
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
for any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required
match from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program. Such grants may be awarded to socially and economically
disadvantaged farmers for purposes including, but not limited to,
the start-up, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker
or apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-first
to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11338) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Cornell university honeybee research (11455) .........................
152,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
Cornell university maple research (11456) ... 76,000 .... (re. $7,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university onion
research (10949) ... 20,000 .......................... (re. $14,000)
Cornell university for concord grape research (11444) ................
202,000 .............................................. (re. $17,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university concord
grape research (11301) ... 50,000 .................... (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not
limited to, workforce development and education for the hemp indus-
try, including the extension of cannabidiol; and the research and
development for the growth of hemp and varietal development (11320)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom to support nutritional
education programs (10938) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $1,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers with labor
law compliance (11425) ... 202,000 ................... (re. $22,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University New York City urban
agriculture education and outreach (11304) .........................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Harvest New York program (11434) ...
600,000 .............................................. (re. $73,000)
Cornell Small Farms Equitable Farm Futures Initiative (11308) ........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
New York farm viability institute (10916) ............................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $370,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York farm viability
institute (10917) ... 850,000 ....................... (re. $561,000)
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York state berry growers association (11462) .......................
61,000 ............................................... (re. $40,000)
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York corn and soybean growers (11454) ... 76,000 ..... (re. $51,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations (10902) ..................................
2,020,000 ......................................... (re. $1,980,000)
New York state distillers guild (11430) ... 76,000 ..... (re. $27,000)
Christmas tree farmers association of New York for programs to promote
Christmas trees (11461) ... 126,000 ................. (re. $126,000)
Maple producers association for programs to promote maple syrup
(10945) ... 152,000 ................................... (re. $6,000)
For additional services and expenses of the maple producers associ-
ation (11302) ... 75,000 ............................. (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state apple research and
development program, in consultation with the apple research and
development advisory board (11400) ... 505,000 ....... (re. $51,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote dairy excellence,
including but not limited to programs at Cornell university.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations for programs including administration of
dairy profit teams (11495) .........................................
374,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of programs to create new and support exist-
ing MANRRS (minorities in agriculture, natural resources, and
related science) chapters at colleges and universities in New York
state (11322) ... 50,000 ............................. (re. $50,000)
For services, expenses, and grants related to the farmers' market
resiliency grant program, including but not limited to the increas-
ing farmers' markets resiliency through the development and enhance-
ment of farmers' market infrastructure and on-line sales and deliv-
ery capabilities across the state (11323) ..........................
700,000 ............................................. (re. $165,000)
For services, expenses, and grants related to the urban farms and
community gardens grant program, including but not limited to the
development and enhancement of community gardens, school gardens and
urban farms across the state (11325) ... 800,000 .... (re. $171,000)
For marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local
agritourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and
products, including but not limited to up to $125,000 for the City
of Geneva, up to $375,000 for the NY Wine and Culinary Center,
$350,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Broome County, up to
$350,000 for the Montgomery County Chapter of NYARC, Inc., up to
$485,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Nassau County, up to
$350,000 for the Lake George Regional Chamber of Commerce, up to
$450,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Columbia and
Greene Counties, up to $950,000 for the Cornell Cooperative Exten-
sion of Sullivan County, up to $475,000 for Cornell Cooperative
Extension of Erie County, up to $850,000 for the Thousand Islands
Bridge Authority, and up to $190,000 for Cornell Cooperative Exten-
sion of Cayuga County. At the direction of the director of the budg-
et, all or a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to
any department, agency, or public authority or transferred to state
operations (11450) ... 6,000,000 .................. (re. $1,011,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
758,000 .............................................. (re. $79,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to develop farm to
school initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from
local farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school
children (11330) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $371,000)
For reimbursement for the promotion of agriculture and domestic arts
in accordance with article 24 of the agriculture and markets law
(10914) ... 500,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
On-farm health and safety program administered by Mary Imogene Basset
hospital (11473) ... 250,000 .......................... (re. $5,000)
Empire sheep producers association (11306) ... 50,000 .. (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of the turfgrass environmental stewardship
fund administered by the New York state greengrass association
(11472) ... 150,000 ................................... (re. $1,000)
For the Dutchess County Cornell Cooperative Extension (11331) ........
100,000 ............................................... (re. $9,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Northern New York agricultural development program administered by
Cornell cooperative extension of Jefferson County (10941) ..........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain agricultural organizations.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary presi-
dent of the senate and the director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and
(ii) which is thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for
the expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by
a majority vote of all members elected to the senate upon roll call
vote (11333) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $126,000)
For grants to beginning farmers. The department of agriculture and
markets shall consult with organizations working with or represent-
ing beginning farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the
farm credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated
ability to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural
producers to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, farmers who have
not operated a farm for more than ten years, and who will materially
and substantially participate in operating a farm within a region of
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
for any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required
match from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program.
Such grants may be awarded for purposes including, but not limited to,
the startup, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker or
apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of agri-
cultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-first
to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11337) ... 1,000,000 ................. (re. $963,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For grants to socially and economically disadvantaged farmers. The
department of agriculture and markets shall consult with organiza-
tions working with or representing socially and economically disad-
vantaged farmers, and a farm credit bureau or member of the farm
credit system or a banking institution with a demonstrated ability
to provide financial assistance and service to agricultural produc-
ers and to establish criteria governing the award of such grants.
For the purposes of this grant program, "socially disadvantaged"
shall mean individuals who have been subject to discrimination by
virtue of their membership of a particular group which may include,
but not be limited to Black or African American, American Indian or
Alaska Native, Hispanic or Latino, and Asian or Pacific Islander;
"economically disadvantaged" shall mean socially disadvantaged indi-
viduals whose ability to enter into farming or whose farm enterprise
has been impaired due to diminished capital, credit opportunities or
access to land, among other things, as compared to other similarly
situated individuals who are not socially disadvantaged.
Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to, farmers who will
materially and substantially participate in operating a farm within
the state and may include urban farmers. Grants shall be awarded on
a competitive basis. Grants shall not be less than five thousand
dollars and may not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
for any single beneficiary. Grants shall be issued with a required
match from the recipient of no more than twenty percent of the grant
amount.
The department is authorized to enter into agreements with munici-
palities, public benefit corporations, local development corpo-
rations, or not-for-profit organizations that provide financial
assistance, including capital assistance for the administration of
the grant program. Up to fifteen percent of the total appropriation
amount may be made available for the services and expenses of such
organization directly related to the administration of the grant
program. Such grants may be awarded to socially and economically
disadvantaged farmers for purposes including, but not limited to,
the start-up, improvement or expansion of a farm operation, worker
or apprenticeship training, marketing activities, the purchase of
agricultural land and physical structures thereon, the purchase of
machinery, equipment or livestock, or the construction or improve-
ment of physical structures, including semi-permanent structures.
Grants may be awarded for projects on land leased by the recipient.
The department shall submit a report annually on December thirty-first
to the director of the budget, the temporary president of the
senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the
senate and the minority leader of the assembly detailing (a) the
total amount of funds committed to each applicant; (b) the location
of each applicant; and (c) such other information as established in
such criteria (11338) ... 4,000,000 ............... (re. $3,826,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
Cornell university maple research (11456) ............................
75,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Cornell university onion research (10948) ............................
50,000 ................................................ (re. $9,000)
Cornell university for concord grape research (11444) ................
200,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
Cornell university Geneva experiment station barley evaluation and
field testing program (11466) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $2,000)
Cornell university small farms program for veterans (11417) ..........
115,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers with labor
law compliance (11425) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $199,000)
New York farm viability institute (10916) ............................
800,000 ............................................. (re. $296,000)
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York corn and soybean growers (11454) ... 75,000 ..... (re. $52,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby
authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 of this appropriation to
state operations (10902) ... 2,000,000 ............ (re. $1,807,000)
New York state distillers guild (11430) ... 75,000 ..... (re. $30,000)
Christmas tree farmers association of New York for programs to promote
Christmas trees (11461) ... 125,000 ................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the electronic benefits transfer program
administered by the Farmers' Market Federation of NY (11412) .......
138,000 .............................................. (re. $97,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
750,000 ............................................. (re. $381,000)
On-farm health and safety program administered by Mary Imogene Basset
hospital (11473) ... 125,000 .......................... (re. $3,000)
For additional services and expenses of Cornell university for concord
grape research (11301) ... 50,000 .................... (re. $13,000)
For additional services and expenses of the New York farm viability
institute (10917) ... 1,050,000 ................... (re. $1,050,000)
Empire sheep producers association (11306) ...........................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
Northern New York agricultural development program administered by
Cornell cooperative extension of Jefferson County (10941) ..........
300,000 .............................................. (re. $17,000)
For additional services and expenses of Cornell University onion
research (10949) ... 20,000 .......................... (re. $11,000)
For Walkway Over the Hudson, including $15,000 to plan for a farmers
market, $30,000 to renovate the Friends Pavilion, and $75,000 for a
farm to market project manager (11309) ... 120,000 .... (re. $6,000)
For the Madison County Cornell Cooperative Extension (11310) .........
40,000 ............................................... (re. $27,000)
For the Craft Beverages Trail of the Catskills (11311) ...............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $75,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the Cornell Cooperative extension bridging the upstate-downstate
food network divide (11312) ... 84,000 ................ (re. $4,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
Cornell university berry research (11416) ............................
260,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
Cornell university onion research (10948) ... 50,000 ... (re. $12,000)
Cornell university for concord grape research (11444) ................
200,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
Cornell university pro-dairy program (11470) .........................
1,201,000 ............................................. (re. $8,000)
Cornell university small farms program for veterans (11417) ..........
115,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers with labor
law compliance (11425) ... 200,000 ................... (re. $20,000)
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York state berry growers association (11462) .......................
60,000 ............................................... (re. $11,000)
New York farm viability institute, for services and expenses of New
York corn and soybean growers (11454) ... 75,000 ..... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations (10902) ..................................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,894,000)
Christmas tree farmers association of New York for programs to promote
Christmas trees (11461) ... 125,000 ................. (re. $110,000)
For services and expenses of the turfgrass environmental stewardship
fund administered by the New York State greengrass association
(11472) ... 125,000 ................................... (re. $2,000)
Northern New York agricultural development program administered by
Cornell cooperative extension of Jefferson County (10941) ..........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote dairy excellence,
including but not limited to programs at Cornell university.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations for programs including administration of
dairy profit teams (11495) ... 370,000 .............. (re. $299,000)
For services and expenses of the electronic benefits transfer program
administered by the Farmers' Market Federation of NY (11412) .......
138,000 .............................................. (re. $21,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
750,000 ............................................. (re. $170,000)
For services and expenses of the Harvest New York program (11434)
300,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of institutions, not-for-profit corpo-
rations, municipalities, or any other entity that provides agricul-
tural services. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation (10901) ..........................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $164,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
Cornell university honeybee research (11455) .........................
150,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000)
Cornell university Geneva experiment station hop and barley evaluation
and field testing program (11466) ... 400,000 ......... (re. $2,000)
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom to support nutritional
education programs (10938) ... 380,000 ............... (re. $12,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers with labor
law compliance (11425) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $1,000)
For services, expenses and grants related to the taste New York
program, including but not limited to marketing and advertising to
promote New York produced food and beverage goods and products,
including but not limited to up to $550,000 for the New York wine
and culinary center, provided that moneys hereby appropriated shall
be available to the program net of refunds, rebates, reimbursements,
credits, and deductions taken by contractors for fees associated
with operating the taste New York program. All or a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to any department, agency, or
public authority. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to
$1,100,000 of this appropriation to state operations (11450) .......
1,100,000 ........................................... (re. $174,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development, including but not limited to farmland viability and up
to $500,000 for Cornell University Maple Program at Arnot Forest, in
accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by
the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up
to $1,000,000 of this appropriation to state operations (10902)
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $24,000)
New York state distillers guild (11430) ... 75,000 ..... (re. $28,000)
For services and expenses of programs to promote dairy excellence,
including but not limited to programs at Cornell university.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget
is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri-
ation to state operations for programs including administration of
dairy profit teams (11495) ... 370,000 ............... (re. $19,000)
For services and expenses of the electronic benefits transfer program
administered by the Farmers' Market Federation of NY (11412) .......
138,000 .............................................. (re. $35,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
750,000 ............................................. (re. $114,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university Geneva
experiment station hop and barley evaluation and field testing
program (11451) ... 260,000 ........................... (re. $9,000)
For services, expenses and grants related to the taste New York
program, including but not limited to marketing and advertising to
promote New York produced food and beverage goods and products,
including but not limited to up to $550,000 for the New York wine
and culinary center, provided that moneys hereby appropriated shall
be available to the program net of refunds, rebates, reimbursements
and credits. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby
authorized to transfer up to $1,100,000 of this appropriation to
state operations (11450) ... 1,100,000 ............... (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
750,000 .............................................. (re. $86,000)
To the Adirondack North Country Association for a program to develop
farm to school initiatives that will help schools purchase more food
from local farmers (11415) ... 300,000 ............... (re. $22,000)
Cornell university berry research (11416) ............................
260,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the eastern equine encephalitis program
administered by Oswego county, including suballocation to other
state departments and agencies. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer
up to $175,000 of this appropriation to state operations (11467) ...
175,000 .............................................. (re. $50,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers with labor
law compliance (11425) ... 200,000 ................... (re. $13,000)
New York state distillers guild (11430) ... 75,000 ..... (re. $38,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state senior farmers market
nutrition program. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to
$180,000 of this appropriation to state operations (11409) .........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $322,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For services, expenses and grants related to the taste New York
program, including but not limited to marketing and advertising to
promote New York produced food and beverage goods and products,
including but not limited to up to $550,000 for the New York wine

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and culinary center, provided that moneys hereby appropriated shall
be available to the program net of refunds, rebates, reimbursements
and credits. All or a portion of this appropriation may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency, or public authority. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby
authorized to transfer up to $1,100,000 of this appropriation to
state operations (11450) ... 1,100,000 ............... (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
750,000 ............................................. (re. $117,000)
Tractor rollover protection program administered by Mary Imogene
Basset hospital (11473) ... 250,000 .................. (re. $27,000)
Cornell university berry research (11416) ... 260,000 ... (re. $4,000)
New York farm viability, for services and expenses of New York corn
and soybean growers (11454) ... 75,000 ............... (re. $11,000)
Cornell university farm labor specialist to assist farmers with labor
law compliance (11425) ... 200,000 ................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state senior farmers market
nutrition program. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law,
the director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to
$180,000 of this appropriation to state operations (11409) .........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $233,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
Cornell university farmnet program for farm family assistance (10926)
.... 384,000 .......................................... (re. $4,000)
Cornell university Geneva experiment station hop and barley evaluation
and field testing program (11466) ... 40,000 .......... (re. $6,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university Geneva
experiment station hop and barley evaluation and field testing
program (11451) ... 160,000 ........................... (re. $2,000)
Cornell university berry research (11416) ............................
260,000 .............................................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of dairy profit teams administered by the
New York farm viability institute (11459) ..........................
220,000 .............................................. (re. $36,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
Cornell university Geneva experiment station hop and barley evaluation
and field testing program (11466) ... 40,000 .......... (re. $7,000)
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom (10938) ..............
80,000 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of a program to develop farm to school
initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from local
farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school children.
The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process (11405) ...
250,000 .............................................. (re. $13,000)
Tractor rollover protection program administered by Mary Imogene
Basset hospital (11473) ... 250,000 .................. (re. $48,000)

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Cornell university maple research (11456) ... 125,000 ... (re. $4,000)
Cornell university vegetable research (11401) ........................
100,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell university Geneva
experiment station hop and barley evaluation and field testing
program (11451) ... 160,000 ........................... (re. $7,000)
Cornell university vegetable research (11401) ........................
100,000 ............................................... (re. $7,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
Cornell university Geneva experiment station hop evaluation and field
testing program (11466) ... 40,000 .................... (re. $3,000)
Cornell university pro-dairy program (11470) .........................
822,000 .............................................. (re. $28,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development, including but not limited to farmland viability, in
accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by
the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up
to $3,000,000 of this appropriation to state operations (10902) ....
3,000,000 ............................................ (re. $43,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
Cornell university farm family assistance (10926) ....................
384,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom (10938) ..............
80,000 ................................................ (re. $7,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010:
Cornell university agriculture in the classroom (10938) ..............
80,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009:
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development, including but not limited to farmland viability, in
accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by
the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up
to $600,000 of this appropriation to state operations (10902) ......
600,000 ............................................... (re. $9,000)
For additional services and expenses of golden nematode control,
including a contract with empire state potato growers. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law, the director of the budget is
hereby authorized to transfer up to $30,000 of this appropriation to
state operations (10935) ... 30,000 ................... (re. $5,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter
496, section 6, of the laws of 2008:

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of programs to promote agricultural economic
development, including but not limited to farmland viability, in
accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to be approved by
the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up
to $2,357,000 of this appropriation to state operations, provided,
however, that the amount of this appropriation available for expend-
iture and disbursement on and after September 1, 2008 shall be
reduced by six percent of the amount that was undisbursed as of
August 15, 2008 (10902) ... 1,809,000 ................ (re. $16,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 1,
section 4, of the laws of 2009:
For additional services and expenses of the center for dairy excel-
lence administered by the New York farm viability institute (10918)
... 376,000 .......................................... (re. $28,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007:
For additional services and expenses of programs to promote agricul-
tural economic development, including but not limited to farmland
viability, in accordance with a programmatic and financial plan to
be approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer up to $118,000 of this appropriation to state operations
(11487) ... 118,000 ................................. (re. $110,000)
For services and expenses of NY Agritourism (11496) ..................
1,130,000 ........................................... (re. $202,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006:
For services and expenses of NY Agritourism (11496) ..................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $140,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal Agriculture and Markets Account - 25021
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of non-point source pollution control, farm-
land preservation, and other agricultural programs including subal-
location to other state departments and agencies including liabil-
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. Notwithstanding section 51 of
the state finance law and any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, the funds appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer from/to appropriations for any prior or subsequent grant
period within the same federal fund/program and between state oper-
ations and aid to localities to accomplish the intent of this appro-
priation, as long as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant peri-
ods within such appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary
(11498) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:

12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of non-point source pollution control, farm-
land preservation, and other agricultural programs including subal-
location to other state departments and agencies including liabil-
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. Notwithstanding section 51 of
the state finance law and any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, the funds appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer from/to appropriations for any prior or subsequent grant
period within the same federal fund/program and between state oper-
ations and aid to localities to accomplish the intent of this appro-
priation, as long as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant peri-
ods within such appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary
(11498) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of non-point source pollution control, farm-
land preservation, and other agricultural programs including subal-
location to other state departments and agencies including liabil-
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2021. Notwithstanding section 51 of
the state finance law and any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, the funds appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer from/to appropriations for any prior or subsequent grant
period within the same federal fund/program and between state oper-
ations and aid to localities to accomplish the intent of this appro-
priation, as long as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant peri-
ods within such appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary
(11498) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of non-point source pollution control, farm-
land preservation, and other agricultural programs including subal-
location to other state departments and agencies including liabil-
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. Notwithstanding section 51 of
the state finance law and any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, the funds appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer from/to appropriations for any prior or subsequent grant
period within the same federal fund/program and between state oper-
ations and aid to localities to accomplish the intent of this appro-
priation, as long as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant peri-
ods within such appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary
(11498) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000)

12653-09-6
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 25,000,000 15,000,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 25,000,000 15,000,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
CANNABIS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ................................. 25,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
New York State Community Grants Reinvestment Fund
New York State Community Grants Reinvestment Account -
24803
For services and expenses related to the New
York state community grants reinvestment
fund, pursuant to section 99-kk of the
state finance law as added by chapter 92
of the laws of 2021 (11512) ................. 25,000,000
--------------

12653-09-6
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
CANNABIS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
New York State Community Grants Reinvestment Fund
New York State Community Grants Reinvestment Account - 24803
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the New York state community
grants reinvestment fund, pursuant to section 99-kk of the state
finance law as added by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021 (11512) .....
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the New York state community
grants reinvestment fund, pursuant to section 99-kk of the state
finance law as added by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021 (11512) .....
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the New York state community
grants reinvestment fund, pursuant to section 99-kk of the state
finance law as added by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021 (11512) .....
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 81,635,000 81,812,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 1,413,000 2,625,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 746,000 496,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 83,794,000 84,933,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS PROGRAM ................................. 83,294,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For state financial assistance for the arts.
Notwithstanding any other section of law
to the contrary, this appropriation may be
used for state financial assistance to
nonprofit cultural organizations offering
services to the general public, including
but not limited to, orchestras, dance
companies, museums and theatre groups
including nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions, botanical gardens, zoos, aquariums
and public benefit corporations offering
programs of arts related education for
elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, $100,000 shall
be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rocke-
feller empire state plaza performing arts
center corporation in support of programs
for performing arts and other cultural
events, and related uses for the benefit
of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly
undertaken by the grantee, or indirectly
by regranting of state funds by regional
or local arts councils, among other organ-
izations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded
may be used for programs and activities
relating to arts disciplines including,
but not limited to, architecture, dance,
design, music, theater, media, literature,

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts,
and arts in education programs (12111) ...... 60,635,000
For additional state financial assistance
for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this
appropriation may be used for state finan-
cial assistance to nonprofit cultural
organizations offering services to the
general public, including but not limited
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums
and theatre groups including nonprofit
cultural organizations, botanical gardens,
zoos, aquariums and public benefit corpo-
rations offering programs of arts related
education for elementary and secondary
school pupils. Such programs may include
activities directly undertaken by the
grantee, or indirectly by regranting of
state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to
nonprofit cultural organizations. Grants,
including capital grants, awarded may be
used for programs and activities relating
to arts disciplines including, but not
limited to, architecture, dance, design,
music, theater, media, literature, museum
activities, visual arts, folk arts, and
arts in education programs .................. 20,000,000
For services and expenses of stabilization
grants up to $50,000 to support the oper-
ating expenses of small and mid-sized arts
organizations .................................. 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 81,135,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Council on the Arts Account - 25376
For financial assistance to nonprofit
cultural organizations (12111) ............... 1,413,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,413,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Arts Capital Grants Fund
Arts Capital Grants Account - 21851
For services and expenses of the arts capi-
tal grants fund (12111) ........................ 196,000

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 196,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Gifts to the Arts Account - 23814
For services and expenses of the arts fund
pursuant to section 97-yyyy of the state
finance law (12111) ............................ 300,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 300,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
New York State Music Grant Fund
New York State Music Grant Account - 21750
For services and expenses of the New York
State Music Grant Fund (12111) ................. 250,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 250,000
--------------
EMPIRE STATE PLAZA PERFORMING ARTS CENTER CORPORATION
PROGRAM ...................................................... 500,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For state financial assistance for the
empire state plaza performing arts center
corporation (12105) ............................ 500,000
--------------

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ARTS AND CULTURAL ORGANIZATION RECOVERY GRANT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to the recovery of the New York arts
and cultural community. These funds shall provide grants to support
the operations budget of arts and cultural nonprofit organizations
statewide and be administered by the New York state council on the
arts. Funds are to be used for the general costs of operating arts
and cultural nonprofit organizations in a COVID-19 compliant envi-
ronment, including expenses of artistic, programmatic, administra-
tive and other personnel, space (rent, mortgage, utilities, costs of
temporary or permanent outdoor performance spaces), talent, artistic
and other contractual fees, equipment, and other operating costs
such as marketing and communications costs. Funds shall be spent by
the organizations within a period no greater than three years as
determined by the New York state council on the arts in its procure-
ment guidelines. Such programs may include activities directly
undertaken by the grantee, or indirectly by regranting of state
funds by regional or local arts councils, among other organizations,
to nonprofit cultural organizations. Grants awarded may be used for
programs and activities relating to arts disciplines including, but
not limited to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media,
literature, museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in
education programs. Funds shall be administered in a competitive
process. The New York state council on the arts shall establish
procurement guidelines including a process to ensure that no
expenses funded by the New York state council on the arts are also
funded through another state, local or federal government fund and
the evaluative criteria and review process for awards prior to coun-
cil approval of awards. The guidelines for the program and compet-
itive process shall ensure that such funding is made available for
uses throughout the state and takes into account regional distrib-
ution, includes no match requirement, is not limited to prior recip-
ients of council grants, and gives priority to small to midsize
eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations (12118) ...
40,000,000 ............................................ (re. $5,000)
For grants to Regional Arts and Cultural Councils outside of New York
City related to the recovery of the New York arts and cultural
community, including not less than $1,000,000 for ArtsWestchester,
not less than $1,000,000 for Arts Services Initiative of Western New
York, not less than $1,000,000 for Arts Mid-Hudson, not less than
$1,000,000 for Huntington Arts Council, not less than $1,000,000 for
Arts Center of the Capital Region, not less than $1,000,000 for
Genesee Valley Council on the Arts, and not less than $1,000,000 for
CNY Arts (12123) ... 10,000,000 ...................... (re. $19,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the recovery of the New York arts
and cultural community. These funds shall provide grants to support

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the operations budget of arts and cultural nonprofit organizations
statewide and be administered by the New York state council on the
arts. Funds are to be used for the general costs of operating arts
and cultural nonprofit organizations in a COVID-19 compliant envi-
ronment, including expenses of artistic, programmatic, administra-
tive and other personnel, space (rent, mortgage, utilities, costs of
temporary or permanent outdoor performance spaces), talent, artistic
and other contractual fees, equipment, and other operating costs
such as marketing and communications costs. Funds shall be spent by
the organizations within a period no greater than three years as
determined by the New York state council on the arts in its procure-
ment guidelines. Such programs may include activities directly
undertaken by the grantee, or indirectly by regranting of state
funds by regional or local arts councils, among other organizations,
to nonprofit cultural organizations. Grants awarded may be used for
programs and activities relating to arts disciplines including, but
not limited to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media,
literature, museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in
education programs. Funds shall be administered in a competitive
process. The New York state council on the arts shall establish
procurement guidelines including a process to ensure that no
expenses funded by the New York state council on the arts are also
funded through another state, local or federal government fund and
the evaluative criteria and review process for awards prior to coun-
cil approval of awards. The guidelines for the program and compet-
itive process shall ensure that such funding is made available for
uses throughout the state and takes into account regional distrib-
ution, includes no match requirement, is not limited to prior recip-
ients of council grants, and gives priority to small to midsize
eligible nonprofit arts and cultural organizations (12118) ...
40,000,000 ............................................ (re. $1,000)
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for
state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations
offering services to the general public, including but not limited
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups includ-
ing nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
$100,000 shall be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rockefeller empire
state plaza performing arts center corporation in support of
programs for performing arts and other cultural events, and related
uses for the benefit of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for programs and
activities relating to arts disciplines including, but not limited
to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media, literature,
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in education
programs (12111) ... 60,635,000 .................. (re. $60,535,000)
For additional state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstand-
ing any other section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may
be used for state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organ-
izations offering services to the general public, including but not
limited to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups
including nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions. Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for
programs and activities relating to arts disciplines including, but
not limited to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media,
literature, museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in
education programs (12119) ... 20,000,000 ........ (re. $20,000,000)
For services and expenses of stabilization grants up to $50,000 to
support the operating expenses of small and mid-sized arts organiza-
tions (12120) ... 500,000 ........................... (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for
state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations
offering services to the general public, including but not limited
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups includ-
ing nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
$100,000 shall be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rockefeller empire
state plaza performing arts center corporation in support of
programs for performing arts and other cultural events, and related
uses for the benefit of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for programs and
activities relating to arts disciplines including, but not limited
to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media, literature,
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in education
programs (12111) ... 40,635,000 ..................... (re. $277,000)

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstand-
ing any other section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may
be used for state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organ-
izations offering services to the general public, including but not
limited to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups
including nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions. Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for
programs and activities relating to arts disciplines including, but
not limited to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media,
literature, museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in
education programs (12119) ... 40,000,000 ............ (re. $55,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as
amended by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as supple-
mented by an interchange in accordance with the state finance law,
is hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for
state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations
offering services to the general public, including but not limited
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups includ-
ing nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
$100,000 shall be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rockefeller empire
state plaza performing arts center corporation in support of
programs for performing arts and other cultural events, and related
uses for the benefit of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for programs and
activities relating to arts disciplines including, but not limited
to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media, literature,
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in education
programs (12111) ... [40,635,000]41,535,000 .......... (re. $32,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1 of the laws of 2024:
For additional state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstand-
ing any other section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may
be used for state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organ-
izations offering services to the general public, including but not
limited to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups
including nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions. Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for
programs and activities relating to arts disciplines including, but
not limited to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media,
literature, museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in
education programs (12119) ... 40,000,000 ........... (re. $154,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for
state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations
offering services to the general public, including but not limited
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups includ-
ing nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
$100,000 shall be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rockefeller empire
state plaza performing arts center corporation in support of
programs for performing arts and other cultural events, and related
uses for the benefit of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for programs and
activities relating to arts disciplines including, but not limited
to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media, literature,
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in education
programs (12111) ... 40,635,000 ....................... (re. $1,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain not-for-profit arts and
cultural organizations. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (12122) ................
750,000 .............................................. (re. $97,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for
state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations
offering services to the general public, including but not limited

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups includ-
ing nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
$100,000 shall be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rockefeller empire
state plaza performing arts center corporation in support of
programs for performing arts and other cultural events, and related
uses for the benefit of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for programs and
activities relating to arts disciplines including, but not limited
to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media, literature,
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in education
programs (12111) ... 40,635,000 ....................... (re. $5,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain not-for-profit arts and
cultural organizations. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the
state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the direc-
tor of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of gran-
tees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for
allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included
in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (12122) ................
771,000 ............................................. (re. $120,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for
state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations
offering services to the general public, including but not limited
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups includ-
ing nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
$100,000 shall be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rockefeller empire
state plaza performing arts center corporation in support of
programs for performing arts and other cultural events, and related
uses for the benefit of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for programs and
activities relating to arts disciplines including, but not limited
to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media, literature,

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in education
programs (12111) ... 40,635,000 ....................... (re. $4,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For state financial assistance for the arts. Notwithstanding any other
section of law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for
state financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations
offering services to the general public, including but not limited
to, orchestras, dance companies, museums and theatre groups includ-
ing nonprofit cultural organizations, botanical gardens, zoos,
aquariums and public benefit corporations offering programs of arts
related education for elementary and secondary school pupils
provided that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
$100,000 shall be interchanged to the Nelson A. Rockefeller empire
state plaza performing arts center corporation in support of
programs for performing arts and other cultural events, and related
uses for the benefit of the citizens of New York state. Such
programs may include activities directly undertaken by the grantee,
or indirectly by regranting of state funds by regional or local arts
councils, among other organizations, to nonprofit cultural organiza-
tions.
Grants, including capital grants, awarded may be used for programs and
activities relating to arts disciplines including, but not limited
to, architecture, dance, design, music, theater, media, literature,
museum activities, visual arts, folk arts, and arts in education
programs (12111) ... 40,635,000 ....................... (re. $7,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Council on the Arts Account - 25376
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations (12111)
... 1,413,000 ..................................... (re. $1,413,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations (12111)
... 1,413,000 ....................................... (re. $318,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations (12111)
... 1,413,000 ....................................... (re. $437,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For financial assistance to nonprofit cultural organizations (12111)
... 1,413,000 ....................................... (re. $457,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Arts Capital Grants Fund
Arts Capital Grants Account - [21850]21851
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

12653-09-6
COUNCIL ON THE ARTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the arts capital grants fund (12111) ...
196,000 ............................................. (re. $196,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Gifts to the Arts Account - 23814
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the arts fund pursuant to section 97-yyyy
of the state finance law (12111) ... 300,000 ........ (re. $300,000)

12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 2,424,866,400 25,085,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 2,424,866,400 25,085,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
CITY UNIVERSITY--COMMUNITY COLLEGES ........................ 255,674,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
OPERATING ASSISTANCE
For state financial assistance, net of
disallowances, for operating expenses of
community colleges to be expended pursuant
to regulations developed jointly by the
state university trustees and the city
university trustees and approved by the
director of the budget, which shall
include funds available on a matching
basis to implement programs for the
provision of education and training
services to individuals eligible under the
federal personal responsibility and work
opportunity reconciliation act of 1996.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
rule or regulation, aid payable from this
appropriation to community colleges shall
be distributed to the colleges according
to guidelines established by the city
university trustees; provided that no
community college shall receive less than
100 percent of the base aid funding that
it had received in the college fiscal year
2025-26.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or
regulation to the contrary, full funding
for aidable community college enrollment
for the college fiscal year 2026-27 and
heretofore as provided under this appro-
priation shall be determined by the oper-
ating aid formulas defined in rules and
regulations developed jointly by the
boards of trustees of the state and city
universities and approved by the director

12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of the budget, provided that the local
sponsor may use funds contained in
reserves for excess student revenue for
operating support of a community college
program even though said expenditures may
cause expenses and student revenues to
exceed one-third of the college's net
operating budget for the college fiscal
year 2026-27, provided that such funds do
not cause the college's revenue from the
local sponsor's contribution in aggregate
to be less than the comparable amounts for
the previous community college fiscal
year, and further provided that pursuant
to standards and regulations of the state
university trustees and the city universi-
ty trustees for the college fiscal year
2026-27, community colleges may increase
tuition and fees above the amount allow-
able under the education law if such stan-
dards and regulations require that in
order to exceed the tuition limit other-
wise set forth in the education law, local
sponsor contributions either in the aggre-
gate or for each full-time equivalent
student shall be no less than the compara-
ble amounts for the previous community
college fiscal year (15496) ................ 218,048,000
For additional operating services and
expenses of community colleges pursuant to
a plan approved by the director of the
budget (15495) .............................. 10,666,000
For further additional operating services
and expenses of community colleges pursu-
ant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget ................................... 6,000,000
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, next generation job linkage
funds shall be made available to community
colleges based on a workforce development
plan submitted by the city university of
New York for approval by the director of
the budget (15543) ........................... 2,000,000
CATEGORICAL PROGRAMS
For the payment of aid for community college
categorical programs to be distributed to
the colleges according to guidelines
established by the city university trus-
tees:

12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the
establishment, renovation, alteration,
expansion, improvement or operation of
child care centers for the benefit of
students at the community college campuses
of the city university of New York,
provided that matching funds of at least
35 percent from nonstate sources be made
available (15497) ............................ 1,715,000
For payment of rental aid (15498) .............. 8,948,000
For state financial assistance for community
college contract courses and work force
development (15536) .......................... 1,880,000
For student financial assistance to expand
opportunities in the community colleges of
the city university for the educationally
and economically disadvantaged in accord-
ance with section 6452 of the education
law (15537) .................................. 1,781,000
For additional student financial assistance
to expand opportunities in the community
colleges of the city university for the
educationally and economically disadvan-
taged in accordance with section 6452 of
the education law .............................. 136,000
For services and expenses of the accelerated
study in associates program (15545) .......... 2,500,000
For services and expenses of the apprentice
CUNY program to support CUNY Community
Colleges in establishing and developing
registered apprenticeship programs with
area businesses, which may include educa-
tional opportunity centers (15406) ........... 2,000,000
--------------
NEW YORK OPPORTUNITY PROMISE SCHOLARSHIP .................... 21,988,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the New York
opportunity promise scholarship program,
including costs incurred prior to April 1,
2026, pursuant to a plan approved by the
director of the budget, provided that the
funds appropriated herein may be expended
on student awards, advising and other
student support, operating costs,
outreach, marketing, and administration;
provided further that student awards under
this program shall be calculated on a per

12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
term basis prior to the start of each term
the applicant is successfully enrolled and
shall not exceed the positive difference,
if any, of (i) the sum of actual tuition,
fees, books, and applicable supplies
charged to the applicant and approved by
the applicable community college, less
(ii) the sum of all payments received by
the applicant from all sources of finan-
cial aid received by the applicant with
the exception of aid received pursuant to
federal work-study programs authorized
under sections 1087-51 through 1087-58 of
title 20 of the United States code and
educational loans taken by the applicant
or guardian.
Provided further that an eligible student
shall meet the following conditions: (a)
be at least 25 years of age, but in no
case more than 55 years of age, as of
January 1 of the calendar year for the
semester for which the applicant makes
initial application; (b) have applied for
a New York state tuition assistance
program award pursuant to section 667 of
the education law, a federal Pell grant
pursuant to section 1070 of title 20 of
the United States code, et. seq., and any
other applicable financial aid; (c) be
matriculated at a community college within
the city university of New York in an
approved program directly leading to an
associate's degree in a high-demand field
including but not limited to advanced
manufacturing, technology, cybersecurity,
engineering, artificial intelligence,
nursing and allied health professions,
green and renewable energy, and pathways
to teaching in shortage areas; (d) be
eligible for the payment of tuition and
fees at a rate no greater than that
imposed for resident students in community
colleges; (e) complete at least 6 credits
per semester, for a total of at least 12
credits per academic year, in an approved
program of study; (f) have been contin-
uously enrolled without a gap of more than
one academic year, provided, however, that
such duration may be extended for an
allowable interruption of study including,
but not limited to, death of a family
member, medical leave, military service,

12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
and parental leave; (g) continue to make
satisfactory academic progress; and (h)
have not already obtained any postsecon-
dary degree prior, unless that student is
pursuing an associate's degree in nursing.
Provided further that eligible students
include a student who is already enrolled
in an eligible associate degree program
and meets all other requirements.
Provided further that by September 1, 2027,
the chancellor of the city university of
New York shall submit a report on the
program to the governor, the speaker of
the assembly, and the temporary president
of the senate, including but not limited
to the following information: (i) enroll-
ment by full- and part-time status; (ii)
retention and completion rates by full-
and part-time status; (iii) barriers to
student participation; (iv) demographic
data related to the program; (v) average
prior learning and transfer credit
awarded; (vi) the total amount of funds
awarded and the average award per student;
and (vii) post-completion outcomes includ-
ing transfer, employment, and wages, as
applicable. Provided further that partic-
ipating campuses shall take steps consist-
ent with established policy to maximize
the award of credit for prior learning and
the transferability of earned credit for
participating students.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein and designated
for uses other than student awards may be
transferred to any city university of New
York enterprise fund to accomplish the
purpose of this appropriation (15559) ....... 21,800,000
For services and expenses of the reconnect
for foster scholars program .................... 188,000
--------------
CITY UNIVERSITY--SENIOR COLLEGES ......................... 2,131,704,400
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
CITY UNIVERSITY--SENIOR COLLEGE PROGRAMS

12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For the costs of the state share, as
prescribed herein, as reimbursement to the
city of New York to be paid during the
state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026
for the operating expenses of the senior
college approved programs and services of
the city university of New York as defined
in section 6230 of the education law.
Notwithstanding paragraphs 3 and 4 of subdi-
vision A of section 6221 of the education
law, the amount appropriated herein shall
constitute the maximum state payment for
the 2026-27 state fiscal year beginning
April 1, 2026 to the city of New York, of
which $428,000,000 is a state liability to
the city for the period beginning April 1,
2026 through June 30, 2027, for reimburse-
ment of costs incurred by the city at any
time during the 2025-26 academic year.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the dormitory authority of the
state of New York may issue bonds for the
purpose of reimbursing equipment disburse-
ments subject to subdivision 14 of section
1680 of the public authorities law, and
upon transfer of bond proceeds for equip-
ment disbursements, from the city univer-
sity special revenue fund, facilities and
planning income reimbursable account (NA)
to an account of the city of New York, the
general fund appropriations herein shall
be reduced by amounts equivalent to such
transfers but in no event less than
$20,000,000 for the 12-month period begin-
ning July 1, 2026; the transfer of such
bond proceeds shall immediately and equiv-
alently reduce the general fund amounts
appropriated herein; and the portions of
such general fund appropriations so
affected shall have no further force or
effect.
The state share of operating expenses, a
portion of which is appropriated herein as
reimbursement to New York city, shall be
an amount equal to the net operating
expenses of the senior college approved
programs and services which shall equal
the total operating expenses of approved
programs and services less:
(a) all excess tuition and instructional and
noninstructional fees attributable to the

100 12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
senior colleges received from the city
university construction fund;
(b) miscellaneous revenue and fees, includ-
ing bad debt recoveries and income fund
reimbursable cost recoveries;
(c) pursuant to section 6221 of the educa-
tion law, a representative share of the
operating costs of those activities within
central administration and university-wide
programs which, as determined by the state
budget director, relate jointly to the
senior colleges and community colleges,
and New York city support for associate
degree programs at the College of Staten
Island and Medgar Evers College and
notwithstanding any other provision of
law, rule or regulation, New York city
support for associate degree programs at
New York city college of technology and
John Jay college, with such support based
on the 2023-24 full-time equivalent (FTE)
associate degree enrollments at these
campuses and calculated using the New York
city contribution per city university
community college FTE in the 2023-24 base
year, totaling $32,275,000;
Items (a) and (b) of the foregoing shall be
hereafter referred to as the senior
college revenue offset, and item (c) as
the central administration and universi-
ty-wide programs offset.
In no event shall the state support for the
operating expenses of the senior college
approved programs and services for the 12
month period beginning July 1, 2026 exceed
2,180,387,400 (15422) .................... 2,083,668,650
For services and expenses of the CUNY school
of labor and urban studies (15499) ........... 5,000,000
For further additional operating assistance
at senior colleges; provided that such
funds shall be allocated pursuant to a
plan approved by the director of the budg-
et .......................................... 27,375,000
For additional services and expenses for the
CUNY School of Medicine ...................... 3,000,000
For additional services and expenses of the
school of labor and urban studies ............ 1,875,000
For services and expenses of the New York
opportunity promise scholarship program
expansion to associate-degree-granting
institutions ................................. 2,250,000
For services and expenses of the CUNY law

101 12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
school W. Haywood Burns Chair in Human and
Civil Rights ................................... 262,500
For services and expenses of the Center for
Byzantine and Modern Greek Studies at
Queens College ................................. 225,000
For additional services and expenses related
to the expansion of nursing programs ........... 750,000
For additional services and expenses of the
SEEK program ................................. 2,134,500
For additional services and expenses of
increasing mental health services .............. 750,000
For services and expenses of the CUNY Black
Male Initiative ................................ 881,250
For services and expenses to fund the estab-
lishment of a Jumpstart Summer Academy at
Medgar Evers College ........................... 626,250
For services and expenses to fund the estab-
lishment of a Biomedical AI Research and
Education Center (BAIREC) at Medgar Evers
College ........................................ 750,000
For services and expenses of the model New
York State Senate session project .............. 112,500
For services and expenses for the Asian
American/Asian Research Institute .............. 881,250
For services and expenses of the CUNY Medgar
Evers College Dr. John L. Flateau Chair in
Election Data Analysis and Research ............ 187,500
For services and expenses for the CUNY-spon-
sored midwifery program ........................ 375,000
For services and expenses of the CUNY Gradu-
ate School of Public Health and Health
Policy - Sexual and Reproductive Justice
Hub ............................................ 375,000
For services and expenses of the CUNY law
school CLEAR clinic ............................ 187,500
For services and expenses of the Evelyn
Linares legacy scholarship at city college ...... 37,500
--------------
CITY UNIVERSITY--SENIOR COLLEGE PENSION PAYMENTS ............. 2,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of financial assistance to the
city of New York for certain costs of
retirement incentive programs and other
liabilities attributable to employee
retirement systems and for special pension
payments attributable to employees of the
senior colleges of the city university of

102 12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
New York pursuant to chapters 975, 976,
and 977 of the laws of 1977, in accordance
with section 6231 of the education law and
chapter 958 of the laws of 1981, as
amended (15500) .............................. 2,000,000
--------------
METROPOLITAN COMMUTER TRANSPORTATION MOBILITY TAX ........... 13,500,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of the metropolitan commuter
transportation mobility tax pursuant to
article 23 of the tax law for the period
July 1, 2026 to June 30, 2027 on behalf of
those senior college employees employed in
the commuter transportation district.
Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, this appropriation may not be
decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation (15481) ....................... 13,500,000
--------------

103 12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
CITY UNIVERSITY--COMMUNITY COLLEGES
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
OPERATING ASSISTANCE
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, next generation
job linkage funds shall be made available to community colleges
based on a workforce development plan submitted by the city univer-
sity of New York for approval by the director of the budget (15543)
... 2,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,000,000)
CATEGORICAL PROGRAMS
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the payment of aid for community college categorical programs to
be distributed to the colleges according to guidelines established
by the city university trustees:
For state financial assistance for community college contract courses
and work force development (15536) .................................
1,880,000 ......................................... (re. $1,880,000)
For services and expenses of the apprentice CUNY program to support
CUNY Community Colleges in establishing and developing registered
apprenticeship programs with area businesses, which may include
educational opportunity centers (15406) ............................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For the payment of aid for community college categorical programs to
be distributed to the colleges according to guidelines established
by the city university trustees:
For state financial assistance for community college contract courses
and work force development (15536) ... 1,880,000 .... (re. $189,000)
For services and expenses of the apprentice CUNY program to support
CUNY Community Colleges in establishing and developing registered
apprenticeship programs with area businesses which may include
educational opportunity centers (15406) ............................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For the payment of aid for community college categorical programs to
be distributed to the colleges according to guidelines established
by the city university trustees:
For state financial assistance for community college contract courses
and work force development (15536) ... 1,880,000 .. (re. $1,880,000)
For services and expenses of the apprentice CUNY program to support
CUNY Community Colleges in establishing and developing registered
apprenticeship programs with area businesses which may include
educational opportunity centers (15406) ............................
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $245,000)

104 12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For state financial assistance for community college contract courses
and work force development (15536) .................................
1,880,000 ......................................... (re. $1,691,000)
NEW YORK OPPORTUNITY PROMISE SCHOLARSHIP
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the New York opportunity promise scholar-
ship program for the 2025-26 academic year pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget, provided that the funds
appropriated herein may be expended on student awards, advising and
other student support, operating costs, outreach, marketing, and
administration; provided further that student awards under this
program shall be calculated on a per term basis prior to the start
of each term the applicant is successfully enrolled and shall not
exceed the positive difference, if any, of (i) the sum of actual
tuition, fees, books, and applicable supplies charged to the appli-
cant and approved by the applicable community college, less (ii) the
sum of all payments received by the applicant from all sources of
financial aid received by the applicant with the exception of aid
received pursuant to federal work-study programs authorized under
sections 1087-51 through 1087-58 of title 20 of the United States
code and educational loans taken by the applicant or guardian.
Provided further that an eligible student shall meet the following
conditions: (a) be at least 25 years of age, but in no case more
than 55 years of age, as of January 1 of the calendar year for the
semester for which the applicant makes initial application; (b) have
applied for a New York state tuition assistance program award pursu-
ant to section 667 of the education law, a federal Pell grant pursu-
ant to section 1070 of title 20 of the United States code, et.
seq., and any other applicable financial aid; (c) be matriculated at
a community college within the city university of New York in an
approved program directly leading to an associate's degree in a
high-demand field including but not limited to advanced manufactur-
ing, technology, cybersecurity, engineering, artificial intelli-
gence, nursing and allied health professions, green and renewable
energy, and pathways to teaching in shortage areas; (d) be eligible
for the payment of tuition and fees at a rate no greater than that
imposed for resident students in community colleges; (e) complete at
least 6 credits per semester, for a total of at least 12 credits per
academic year, in an approved program of study; (f) have been
continuously enrolled without a gap of more than one academic year,
provided, however, that such duration may be extended for an allow-
able interruption of study including, but not limited to, death of a
family member, medical leave, military service, and parental leave;
(g) continue to make satisfactory academic progress; and (h) have
not already obtained any postsecondary degree prior. Provided
further that eligible students include a student who is already
enrolled in an eligible associate degree program and meets all other
requirements.

105 12653-09-6
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Provided further that by September 1, 2026, the chancellor of the city
university of New York shall submit a report on the program to the
governor, the speaker of the assembly, and the temporary president
of the senate, including but not limited to the following informa-
tion: (i) enrollment by full- and part-time status; (ii) retention
and completion rates by full- and part-time status; (iii) barriers
to student participation; (iv) demographic data related to the
program; (v) average prior learning and transfer credit awarded;
(vi) the total amount of funds awarded and the average award per
student; and (vii) post-completion outcomes including transfer,
employment, and wages, as applicable. Provided further that partic-
ipating campuses shall take steps consistent with established policy
to maximize the award of credit for prior learning and the transfer-
ability of earned credit for participating students.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, a portion of the funds
appropriated herein and designated for uses other than student
awards may be transferred to any city university of New York enter-
prise fund to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation (15559)
... 14,100,000 ................................... (re. $14,100,000)

106 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 9,000,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 9,000,000 0
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADMINISTRATION AND INFORMATION MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ............ 9,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment to public authorities or munici-
pal corporations that are eligible to
receive reimbursement pursuant to section
92-d of the general municipal law for
costs of providing sick leave for officers
and employees with a qualifying world
trade center condition, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to
April 1, 2026. Amounts appropriated herein
may be suballocated, pursuant to a plan
approved by the division of budget, to the
department of civil service state oper-
ations for appropriate administrative
costs (16604) ................................ 9,000,000
--------------

107 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 31,013,000 123,396,000
Internal Service Funds ............. 9,000,000 19,996,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 40,013,000 143,392,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
COMMUNITY SUPERVISION PROGRAM ............................... 19,133,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of services and expenses relat-
ing to the operation of a program with the
center for employment opportunities to
assist with vocational or employment
skills training or the attainment of
employment (17576) ........................... 1,029,000
For costs associated with the provision of
treatment, residential stabilization and
other related services for offenders in
the community, including residential
stabilization for sex offenders, pursuant
to existing contracts or to be distributed
through a competitive process; and
programs which provide direct payments of
temporary stipends or housing assistance
to recipients that may include, but are
not limited to offenders, to proprietors
of households, landlords, or other govern-
mental entities to offset housing costs.
By April 1 of each year, the department of
corrections and community supervision
shall provide the chairs of the senate
committee on crime victims, crime, and
corrections, and the assembly committee on
correction with an annual report on the
program. The report shall include, but not
be limited to, the number of participants,
average time in the program, and number of
permanent housing placements (17570) ......... 9,104,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 10,133,000
--------------
Internal Service Funds

108 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Agencies Internal Service Fund
Neighborhood Work Project Account - 55059
For services and expenses related to estab-
lishing and administering a vocational
training program for parolees, other
offenders, or former incarcerated individ-
uals from city of New York jails partic-
ipating in community based programs with
the center for employment opportunities.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the chairman of the board
of parole, or a designated officer of the
department of corrections and community
supervision may authorize participants to
perform service projects at sites made
available by any state or local government
or public benefit corporation (17569) ........ 9,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 9,000,000
--------------
HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM ..................................... 14,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the money hereby appropriated may
be used for the payment of prior year
liabilities and may be increased or
decreased by interchange or transfer with
any other general fund appropriation with-
in the department of corrections and
community supervision with the approval of
the director of the budget. A portion of
these funds may be transferred or suballo-
cated to the department of health or other
state agencies.
For the state share of medical assistance
services expenses incurred by the depart-
ment of corrections and community super-
vision related to the provision of medical
assistance services to incarcerated indi-
viduals (17503) ............................. 14,000,000
--------------
PROGRAM SERVICES PROGRAM ..................................... 1,680,000
--------------
General Fund

109 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of a program at
the Albion correctional facility, and
other correctional facilities related to
family televisiting (Osborne Association)
(17567) ........................................ 430,000
For services and expenses of a program at
the Queensboro correctional facility,
and/or other correctional facilities as
determined by the commissioner, related to
re-entry with a focus on family (Osborne
Association) (17504) ........................... 250,000
For services and expenses of the Osborne
Association to provide transportation for
visitors to and from state correctional
facilities (17518) ........................... 1,000,000
--------------
SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM ..................................... 5,200,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to
April 1, 2026, of localities for the hous-
ing and board of felony offenders pursuant
to section 601-c of the correction law
(17501) ...................................... 5,200,000
--------------

110 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
COMMUNITY SUPERVISION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of services and expenses relating to the operation of a
program with the center for employment opportunities to assist with
vocational or employment skills training or the attainment of
employment (17576) ... 1,029,000 .................. (re. $1,029,000)
For costs associated with the provision of treatment, residential
stabilization and other related services for offenders in the commu-
nity, including residential stabilization for sex offenders, pursu-
ant to existing contracts or to be distributed through a competitive
process; and programs which provide direct payments of temporary
stipends or housing assistance to recipients that may include, but
are not limited to offenders, to proprietors of households, land-
lords, or other governmental entities to offset housing costs. By
April 1 of each year, the department of corrections and community
supervision shall provide the chairs of the senate committee on
crime victims, crime, and corrections, and the assembly committee on
correction with an annual report on the program. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, the number of participants, average
time in the program, and number of permanent housing placements
(17570) ... 9,104,000 ............................. (re. $8,572,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of services and expenses relating to the operation of a
program with the center for employment opportunities to assist with
vocational or employment skills training or the attainment of
employment (17576) ... 1,029,000 .................... (re. $439,000)
For costs associated with the provision of treatment, residential
stabilization and other related services for offenders in the commu-
nity, including residential stabilization for sex offenders, pursu-
ant to existing contracts or to be distributed through a competitive
process; and programs which provide direct payments of temporary
stipends or housing assistance to recipients that may include, but
are not limited to offenders, to proprietors of households, land-
lords, or other governmental entities to offset housing costs. By
April 1 of each year, the department of corrections and community
supervision shall provide the chairs of the senate committee on
crime victims, crime, and corrections, and the assembly committee on
correction with an annual report on the program. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, the number of participants, average
time in the program, and number of permanent housing placements
(17570) ... 9,104,000 ............................. (re. $6,135,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For costs associated with the provision of treatment, residential
stabilization and other related services for offenders in the commu-

111 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
nity, including residential stabilization for sex offenders, pursu-
ant to existing contracts or to be distributed through a competitive
process; and a pilot program which provides direct payments of
temporary weekly stipends or housing assistance to recipients that
may include, but are not limited to offenders, to proprietors of
households, landlords, or other governmental entities to offset
housing costs. By April 1 of each year, the department of
corrections and community supervision shall provide the chairs of
the senate committee on crime victims, crime, and corrections, and
the assembly committee on correction with an annual report on the
pilot program. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the
number of participants, average time in the program, and number of
permanent housing placements (17570) ...............................
7,104,000 ......................................... (re. $3,823,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For costs associated with the provision of treatment, residential
stabilization and other related services for offenders in the commu-
nity, including residential stabilization for sex offenders, pursu-
ant to existing contracts or to be distributed through a competitive
process; and a pilot program which provides direct payments of
temporary weekly stipends or housing assistance to recipients that
may include, but are not limited to offenders, to proprietors of
households, landlords, or other governmental entities to offset
housing costs. By April 1 of each year, the department of
corrections and community supervision shall provide the chairs of
the senate committee on crime victims, crime, and corrections, and
the assembly committee on correction with an annual report on the
pilot program. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the
number of participants, average time in the program, and number of
permanent housing placements (17570) ...............................
7,104,000 ......................................... (re. $4,021,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For costs associated with the provision of treatment, residential
stabilization and other related services for offenders in the commu-
nity, including residential stabilization for sex offenders, pursu-
ant to existing contracts or to be distributed through a competitive
process (17570) ... 4,584,000 ..................... (re. $1,996,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For costs associated with the provision of treatment, residential
stabilization and other related services for offenders in the commu-
nity, including residential stabilization for sex offenders, pursu-
ant to existing contracts or to be distributed through a competitive
process (17570) ... 4,584,000 ..................... (re. $1,909,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For costs associated with the provision of treatment, residential
stabilization and other related services for offenders in the commu-
nity, including residential stabilization for sex offenders, pursu-

112 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ant to existing contracts or to be distributed through a competitive
process (17570) ... 4,584,000 ..................... (re. $2,424,000)
Internal Service Funds
Agencies Internal Service Fund
Neighborhood Work Project Account - 55059
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to establishing and administering a
vocational training program for parolees, other offenders, or former
incarcerated individuals from city of New York jails participating
in community based programs with the center for employment opportu-
nities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the chairman of the board of parole, or a designated officer of the
department of corrections and community supervision may authorize
participants to perform service projects at sites made available by
any state or local government or public benefit corporation (17569)
... 9,000,000 ..................................... (re. $9,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to establishing and administering a
vocational training program for parolees, other offenders, or former
incarcerated individuals from city of New York jails participating
in community based programs with the center for employment opportu-
nities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the chairman of the board of parole, or a designated officer of the
department of corrections and community supervision may authorize
participants to perform service projects at sites made available by
any state or local government or public benefit corporation (17569)
... 9,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,638,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to establishing and administering a
vocational training program for parolees, other offenders, or former
incarcerated individuals from city of New York jails participating
in community based programs with the center for employment opportu-
nities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the chairman of the board of parole, or a designated officer of the
department of corrections and community supervision may authorize
participants to perform service projects at sites made available by
any state or local government or public benefit corporation (17569)
... 9,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,971,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to establishing and administering a
vocational training program for parolees, other offenders, or former
incarcerated individuals from city of New York jails participating
in community based programs with the center for employment opportu-
nities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the chairman of the board of parole, or a designated officer of the
department of corrections and community supervision may authorize
participants to perform service projects at sites made available by

113 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
any state or local government or public benefit corporation (17569)
... 9,000,000 ..................................... (re. $3,860,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to establishing and administering a
vocational training program for parolees, other offenders, or former
incarcerated individuals from city of New York jails participating
in community based programs with the center for employment opportu-
nities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the chairman of the board of parole, or a designated officer of the
department of corrections and community supervision may authorize
participants to perform service projects at sites made available by
any state or local government or public benefit corporation (17569)
... 9,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,527,000)
HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may be used for the payment of prior year liabilities
and may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with
any other general fund appropriation within the department of
corrections and community supervision with the approval of the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health or other state agencies.
For the state share of medical assistance services expenses incurred
by the department of corrections and community supervision related
to the provision of medical assistance services to incarcerated
individuals (17503) ... 14,000,000 ............... (re. $13,999,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may be used for the payment of prior year liabilities
and may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with
any other general fund appropriation within the department of
corrections and community supervision with the approval of the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health or other state agencies.
For the state share of medical assistance services expenses incurred
by the department of corrections and community supervision related
to the provision of medical assistance services to incarcerated
individuals (17503) ... 14,000,000 ............... (re. $13,998,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may be used for the payment of prior year liabilities
and may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with
any other general fund appropriation within the department of

114 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
corrections and community supervision with the approval of the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health or other state agencies.
For the state share of medical assistance services expenses incurred
by the department of corrections and community supervision related
to the provision of medical assistance services to incarcerated
individuals (17503) ... 14,000,000 ............... (re. $13,997,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may be used for the payment of prior year liabilities
and may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with
any other general fund appropriation within the department of
corrections and community supervision with the approval of the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health or other state agencies.
For the state share of medical assistance services expenses incurred
by the department of corrections and community supervision related
to the provision of medical assistance services to incarcerated
individuals (17503) ... 14,000,000 ............... (re. $13,997,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may be used for the payment of prior year liabilities
and may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with
any other general fund appropriation within the department of
corrections and community supervision with the approval of the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health or other state agencies.
For the state share of medical assistance services expenses incurred
by the department of corrections and community supervision related
to the provision of medical assistance services to incarcerated
individuals (17503) ... 14,000,000 ............... (re. $13,997,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may be used for the payment of prior year liabilities
and may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with
any other general fund appropriation within the department of
corrections and community supervision with the approval of the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health or other state agencies.
For the state share of medical assistance services expenses incurred
by the department of corrections and community supervision related
to the provision of medical assistance services to incarcerated
individuals (17503) ... 14,000,000 ............... (re. $12,837,000)
PROGRAM SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund

115 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a program at the Albion correctional
facility, and other correctional facilities related to family tele-
visiting (Osborne Association) (17567) .............................
430,000 ............................................. (re. $430,000)
For services and expenses of a program at the Queensboro correctional
facility, and/or other correctional facilities as determined by the
commissioner, related to re-entry with a focus on family (Osborne
Association) (17504) ... 250,000 .................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Osborne Association to provide trans-
portation for visitors to and from state correctional facilities
(17518) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a program at the Albion correctional
facility, and other correctional facilities related to family tele-
visiting (Osborne Association) (17567) .............................
430,000 ............................................. (re. $205,000)
For services and expenses of the Osborne Association to provide trans-
portation for visitors to and from state correctional facilities
(17518) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2025, of localities for the housing and
board of felony offenders pursuant to section 601-c of the
correction law (17501) ... 5,200,000 .............. (re. $5,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2024, of localities for the housing and
board of felony offenders pursuant to section 601-c of the
correction law (17501) ... 5,200,000 .............. (re. $2,138,000)

116 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 699,116,000 1,036,311,363
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 44,300,000 151,461,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 41,296,000 147,418,029
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 784,712,000 1,335,190,392
================ ================
SCHEDULE
CRIME PREVENTION AND REDUCTION STRATEGIES PROGRAM .......... 784,712,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment to the New York state prosecu-
tors training institute for services and
expenses related to the prosecution of
crimes and the provision of continuing
legal education, training, and support for
medicaid fraud prosecution. The funds
hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (20242) ......... 2,078,000
For services and expenses of the New York
state district attorneys association. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (39798) ........... 100,000
For services and expenses associated with a
witness protection program pursuant to a
plan developed by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (20243) ........... 287,000
For grants to counties for district attorney
salaries. Notwithstanding the provisions
of subdivisions 10 and 11 of section 700
of the county law or any other law to the
contrary, for state fiscal year 2026-27
the state reimbursement to counties for
district attorney salaries shall be
distributed according to a plan developed
by the commissioner of criminal justice
services, and approved by the director of
the budget (20244) ........................... 4,212,000

117 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Payment of state aid for expenses of the
special narcotics prosecutor. The funds
hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (20245) ........... 825,000
For payment of state aid for expenses of
crime laboratories for accreditation,
training, capacity enhancement and lab
related services to maintain the quality
and reliability of forensic services to
criminal justice agencies, to be distrib-
uted pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the
director of the budget. Some of these
funds herein appropriated may be trans-
ferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies
(20205) ..................................... 12,973,000
For reimbursement of the services and
expenses of municipal corporations, public
authorities, the division of state police,
authorized police departments of state
public authorities or regional state park
commissions for the purchase of ballistic
soft body armor vests, such sum shall be
payable on the audit and warrant of the
state comptroller on vouchers certified by
the commissioner of the division of crimi-
nal justice services and the chief admin-
istrative officer of the municipal corpo-
ration, public authority, or state entity
making requisition and purchase of such
vests. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (20207) ......... 1,350,000
For services and expenses of programs aimed
at reducing the risk of re-offending, to
be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared
by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by
the director of the budget (20249) .......... 11,526,000
For services and expenses of project GIVE
and related efforts to reduce gun violence
as allocated pursuant to a plan prepared
by the commissioner of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of
the budget which will include an evalu-
ation of the effectiveness of such

118 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
program. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein that are trans-
ferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or
interchanged from this appropriation
(20942) ..................................... 36,380,000
For services and expenses of the statewide
targeted reductions in intimate partner
violence initiative and related efforts to
reduce domestic violence and non-domestic
sexual assaults as allocated pursuant to a
plan prepared by the commissioner of crim-
inal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget. These funds may be
transferred to state operations or subal-
located to other state agencies (60212) ..... 38,170,000
For payment of state aid to counties and the
city of New York for the operation of
local probation departments subject to the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law,
the state aid for probationary services to
counties and the city of New York shall be
distributed to counties and the city of
New York pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of crimi-
nal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget which shall be to
the greatest extent possible, distributed
in a manner consistent with the prior year
distribution amounts (21038) ................ 44,876,000
For payment of state aid to counties and the
city of New York for local alternatives to
incarceration, including those that
provide alcohol and substance abuse treat-
ment programs, and other related inter-
ventions pursuant to article 13-A of the
executive law. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law, state assistance shall
be distributed pursuant to a plan submit-
ted by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by
the director of the budget. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies (21037) ................. 5,217,000
For payment to not-for-profit and government
operated entities, including residential
centers providing services to individuals

119 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
on probation, programs providing alterna-
tives to incarceration, and community
supervision and/or employment programs, to
be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared
by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by
the director of the budget. Eligible
services shall include, but not be limited
to offender employment, offender assess-
ments, treatment program placement and
participation, monitoring client compli-
ance with program interventions, TASC
program services, and alternatives to
prison or jail. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agen-
cies (20239) ................................ 31,420,000
For services and expenses of the establish-
ment, or continued operation by existing
grantees, of regional Operation S.N.U.G.
programs. Funds appropriated herein shall
be expended pursuant to a plan prepared by
the division of criminal justice services
and approved by the director of the budg-
et. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations (20250) .......... 20,965,000
For services and expenses of rape crisis
centers for services to rape victims and
programs to prevent rape, to be distrib-
uted pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the
director of the budget. A portion or all
of these funds may be transferred or
suballocated to other state agencies
(39718) ..................................... 12,841,000
For payment to district attorneys who
participate in the crimes against revenue
program to be distributed according to a
plan developed by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services, in
consultation with the department of taxa-
tion and finance, and approved by the
director of the budget (20235) .............. 13,521,000
For services and expenses of law enforcement
agencies, for gang prevention youth
programs in Nassau and/or Suffolk counties
and law enforcement agencies may consult
with community-based organizations and/or
schools, pursuant to a plan by the commis-
sioner of criminal justice services
(20238) ........................................ 500,000

120 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses related to state
and local crime reduction, youth justice
and gang prevention programs, and criminal
justice programs including but not limited
to street outreach, crime analysis,
research, targeted violence prevention and
response, services to victims of crime,
criminal justice demonstration projects,
and shooting/violence reduction programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall be
expended pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of
the budget. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and/or
suballocated to other state agencies
(39797) ..................................... 26,063,000
For additional services and expenses related
to state and local crime reduction, youth
justice and gang prevention programs, and
criminal justice programs including but
not limited to street outreach, crime
analysis, research, targeted violence
prevention and response, services to
victims of crime, criminal justice demon-
stration projects, and shooting/violence
reduction programs, in accordance with the
following schedule:
67th Precinct Clergy Council Inc. ................. 65,000
Back to Basics Outreach Ministries, Inc. .......... 50,000
Be Proud Inc. ..................................... 10,000
Big Brothers Big Sisters of Westchester
County, Inc. .................................... 50,000
Boys and Girls Clubs of the Capital Area, Inc. .... 50,000
Bronx County District Attorney's Office .......... 100,000
Broome County Gang Prevention Inc. ................ 50,000
Brownsville Think Tank Matter, Inc. ............... 50,000
CAMBA, Inc. ....................................... 50,000
Catholic Charities Community Services, Arch-
diocese of New York ............................. 50,000
Center for NuLeadership on Urban Solutions, Inc. .. 50,000
Center for Teen Empowerment Inc. .................. 25,000
City of Albany .................................... 50,000
City of Syracuse Police Department ................ 50,000
Cops and Kids New York Inc. ....................... 50,000
East Flatbush Village ............................. 50,000
Elite Learners Inc. ............................... 50,000
Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities ................ 100,000
Family Services, Inc. ............................. 25,000
Getting Out and Staying Out, Inc. (GOSO) ......... 325,000

121 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Harlem Mothers Stop Another Violent End,
Inc. (SAVE) ..................................... 25,000
Justice Innovation Inc. DBA Center for Court
Innovation ...................................... 50,000
Kings County District Attorney's Office ........... 50,000
Kips Bay Boys and Girls Club Inc. ................. 25,000
LIFE Camps Inc. ................................... 50,000
Living Redemption Community Development
Corporation ..................................... 50,000
M.K. Gandhi Institute for Nonviolence ............. 25,000
NYPD 70th Precinct ................................ 50,000
NYC Health + Hospitals: Jacobi Medical
Center .......................................... 65,000
NYC Health + Hospitals: Lincoln Medical
Center .......................................... 65,000
NYPD 50th Precinct ................................ 30,000
Oneida County District Attorney's Office .......... 50,000
Onondaga County District Attorney's Office ........ 50,000
Regional Economic Community Action Program
Inc. (RECAP) .................................... 25,000
Richmond University Medical Center ................ 50,000
S.T.R.O.N.G Youth Inc. ............................ 50,000
Schenectady County Sheriff ........................ 50,000
Southside United HDFC ............................. 50,000
Stop the Violence Coalition ....................... 65,000
Street Corner Resources ........................... 25,000
Suffolk County Police Department .................. 50,000
The Center for Youth .............................. 50,000
Ulster County District Attorney's Office .......... 50,000
United Black Men of Queens Foundation Inc. ........ 75,000
Urban Justice Center .............................. 25,000
Urban Youth Alliance International ................ 50,000
For additional services and expenses, grants
or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing state or local crime reduction,
youth justice and gang prevention
programs, including but not limited to
street outreach, crime analysis, research
and shooting/violence reduction programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation may be suballocated or transferred
between any state department, agency or
authority including but not limited to the
office of victim services, the office for
the prevention of domestic violence, the
division of homeland security and emergen-
cy services, and the office of indigent
legal services, to effectuate the intent

122 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of this appropriation with the approval of
the temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............. 2,500,000
For services and expenses related to the
operation of crime analysis centers and
related efforts to reduce crime, including
but not limited to the establishment of
crime gun intelligence centers. Funds
appropriated herein shall be expended
pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the
director of the budget. These funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies
(60172) ..................................... 37,450,000
For services and expenses related to part-
nerships and programs operated by and
between government and community-based
organizations to respond, repair and
rebuild in the aftermath of violence, and
serve the needs of communities and resi-
dents victimized by crimes involving guns.
Funds appropriated herein shall be distrib-
uted through a community engagement proc-
ess pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of division of criminal
justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (60173) .............. 20,000,000
For payment to not-for-profit and government
operated programs providing pretrial
services, including but not limited to
screening, assessments, and supervision,
to be distributed pursuant to a plan
submitted by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services and

123 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
approved by the director of the budget. A
portion of these funds may be transferred
to state operations and/or suballocated to
other state agencies (60174) ................ 20,000,000
For services and expenses related to discov-
ery implementation, including but not
limited to digital evidence transmission
technology, administrative support,
computers, hardware and operating soft-
ware, data connectivity, development of
training materials, staff training, over-
time costs, and litigation readiness.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be
limited to counties, cities with popu-
lations less than one million, and law
enforcement and prosecutorial entities
within towns and villages. Receipt of
funding is contingent upon recipients
providing periodic reports, as determined
by the commissioner, to the division on
the status and use of such funding,
including but not limited to support for
personal services, non-personal services,
caseload volumes, and case processing.
These funds shall be distributed pursuant
to a plan submitted by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services
and approved by the director of the budget
(60176) ..................................... 45,000,000
For prosecutorial services of counties to be
distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of crimi-
nal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget. The funds hereby
appropriated are to be available for
payment of liabilities heretofore accrued
or hereafter accrued (60189) ................ 47,000,000
For services and expenses of local and state
law enforcement associated with enforcing
and investigating extreme risk protection
orders. Funding is to be distributed
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commis-
sioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of
the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred, inter-
changed or suballocated to any state oper-
ations appropriation within the division
of state police (60192) ..................... 10,000,000
For prosecutorial services and expenses, in
cities with a population greater than one

124 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
million, related to discovery implementa-
tion, including but not limited to digital
evidence transmission technology, adminis-
trative support, computers, hardware and
operating software, data connectivity,
development of training materials, staff
training, overtime costs, and litigation
readiness. Receipt of funding is contin-
gent upon recipients providing periodic
reports, as determined by the commission-
er, to the division on the status and use
of such funding, including but not limited
to support for personal services, non-per-
sonal services, caseload volumes, and case
processing. These funds shall be distrib-
uted pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (60193) .............. 45,000,000
For defense services and expenses related to
discovery implementation, including but
not limited to digital evidence trans-
mission technology, administrative
support, computers, hardware and operating
software, data connectivity, development
of training materials, staff training,
overtime costs, and litigation readiness.
Eligible entities shall include, but not
be limited to, government entities and
not-for-profits that provide defense
services. Receipt of funding is contingent
upon recipients providing periodic
reports, as determined by the commission-
er, to the division on the status and use
of such funding, including but not limited
to support for personal services, non-per-
sonal services, caseload volumes, and case
processing. These funds shall be distrib-
uted pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (60194) .............. 45,000,000
For defense services and expenses incurred
by government entities and not-for-pro-
fits. Funds shall be distributed pursuant
to a plan prepared by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services
and approved by the director of the budg-
et. The funds hereby appropriated are to
be available for payment of liabilities
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(60195) ..................................... 40,000,000

125 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, for reimbursement to the city of
New York of services and expenses of local
law enforcement in the city of New York
related to overtime and enhanced patrol in
subways and mass transit systems, pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services
and approved by the director of the budg-
et, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2026 (60216) ..... 77,000,000
For services and expenses associated with
law enforcement and correctional activ-
ities performed by, or in coordination
with, county sheriffs pursuant to a plan
submitted by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget ...... 14,000,000
For services and expenses of the office of
attorney general and grants to district
attorney offices, to support enforcement
and community outreach and education
activities related to preventing and
combating deed theft, pursuant to a plan
by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by
the director of the budget. Notwithstand-
ing any inconsistent provision of law, the
amount herein appropriated may be trans-
ferred, interchanged and/or suballocated
to any state operations appropriation
within the office of attorney general ........ 3,000,000
For additional payment to New York State
Defenders association for services and
expenses related to the provision of
training and other assistance ................ 2,100,000
For services and expenses of the New York
Wing Civil Air Patrol .......................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Queens
Borough Safety Patrol (QBSP) Inc. .............. 300,000
For services and expenses United Jewish
Organizations of Williamsburg .................. 250,000
For services and expenses for Center for
Employment Opportunities, Inc. .................. 75,000
For services and expenses of Child Center of
New York ....................................... 250,000
For services and expenses of the Community
Service Society of New York (Next-Door
Project) ....................................... 300,000
For services and expenses of the Fortune
Society, Inc. .................................. 275,000

126 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Common Justice,
Inc. ........................................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Families and
Friends of the Wrongfully Convicted ............ 100,000
For services and expenses related to the NYS
Judicial Institute (Legal Education Oppor-
tunity Program). All or a portion of these
funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and suballocated to the Judiciary ....... 275,000
For services and expenses of New York County
Defender Services .............................. 200,000
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn
Defender Services .............................. 175,000
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn
Legal Services Corporation A ................... 250,000
For services and expenses of the Correction-
al Association of New York (ATI) ............. 1,000,000
For services and expenses of Goddard River-
side Community Center .......................... 125,000
For services and expenses of Bailey House -
Project FIRST, Inc. ............................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Research Foun-
dation of the City University of New York
(John Jay College - Prison to College
Pipeline) ...................................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Groundswell
Community Mural Project, Inc. ................... 75,000
For services and expenses of Economic Oppor-
tunity Council of Suffolk, Inc. (S.N.U.G.
Wyandanch) ..................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Emerald Isle
Immigration Center Inc. ........................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Shalom Task
Force Inc. ..................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth
and Adult Activities ............................ 75,000
For services and expenses of Legal Services
NYC (Staten Island) ............................ 125,000
For services and expenses of the Osborne
Association, Inc. (ATI) ......................... 50,000
For services and expenses related to NYU
(Veteran's Entrepreneurship Program) ............ 50,000
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin
Community Development Corporation .............. 200,000
For services and expenses of The Bronx
Defenders ...................................... 250,000
For services and expenses of the Greenburger
Center for Social and Criminal Justice ......... 100,000
For services and expenses of Getting Out and
Staying Out, Inc. (GOSO) ....................... 125,000
For services and expenses of Mobilization
for Justice, Inc. .............................. 100,000

127 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Neighborhood
Legal Services, Inc. (Buffalo) ................. 400,000
For services and expenses of Neighborhood
Defender Service, Inc. .......................... 50,000
For services and expenses of the Glendale
Civilian Observation Patrol, Inc. ............... 25,000
For services and expenses of the LSNY -
Bronx Corporation (DBA Bronx Legal
Services) ...................................... 300,000
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge
Heights Community Center, Inc. ................. 250,000
For services and expenses of Moshoula
Montefiore Community Center, Inc. .............. 250,000
For services and expenses of BARD College
(Prison Initiative) ............................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Kings Against
Violence Initiative (K.A.V.I), Inc. ............ 150,000
For services and expenses of Central Family
Life Center .................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Justice
Innovation Inc. (Center for Court Inno-
vation Youth SOS - Crown Heights) .............. 100,000
For services and expenses of Legal Action
Center of the City of New York, Inc. ............ 75,000
For services and expenses of Cityline Ozone
Park Civilian Patrol ............................ 50,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Family Representation .......................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Brownsville
Think Tank Matter, Inc. ........................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Kings Bay YM
YWHA, Inc. (Heal the Violence Initiative) ...... 200,000
For services and expenses of New Hour for
Women and Children LI-Inc. ...................... 20,000
For services and expenses of Suffolk County
Police (Asian Jade Society) ..................... 10,000
For services and expenses of Youth Justice
Network ........................................ 150,000
For services and expenses of the Albany Law
School - Immigration Clinic .................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Legal Aid Soci-
ety - Immigration Law Unit ..................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Legal Services
NYC - DREAM Clinics ............................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Haitian-Ameri-
cans United for Progress Inc. .................. 150,000
For services and expenses of programs that
prevent domestic violence or aid victims
of domestic violence:

128 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Brooklyn Legal Services, Inc. ..................... 45,722
Center for Safety & Change, Inc. .................. 45,722
Empire Justice Center ............................. 52,251
Hope's Door, Inc. ................................. 45,722
Legal Aid Society of Mid-New York ................. 45,729
Legal Aid Society (DV Services) ................... 71,831
My Sisters' Place ................................. 45,722
Neighborhood Legal Services Inc. of Erie
County .......................................... 45,722
Queens Legal Services Corporation ................. 45,722
Rochester Legal Aid Society ....................... 59,159
Sanctuary for Families ............................ 59,976
Volunteer Legal Services Project of Monroe
County .......................................... 45,722
For services and expenses of Bard College
(Prison Initiative) ............................ 200,000
For services and expenses of Bronx Legal
Services (Legal Services NYC) .................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal
Services Inc. .................................. 300,000
For services and expenses of Capital
District Women's Bar Association Legal
Project Inc. (CDWBA Legal Project) ............. 160,000
For services and expenses for Center for
Employment Opportunities, Inc. .................. 75,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Family Representation (CFR) .................... 125,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Justice Innovation, Inc. (Redhook Commu-
nity Justice Center) ........................... 100,000
For services and expenses of City of Yonkers
(Police Department - Safe Summer Initiative) ... 100,000
For services and expenses of Community
Services Society of NY (Next Door Project) ..... 300,000
For services and expenses of Cornell Univer-
sity (Criminal Justice Employment Initi-
ative) ......................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Correctional
Association of New York (CANY) ............... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of Greenburger
Center for Social and Criminal Justice ......... 100,000
For services and expenses of Hamilton-Her-
kimer College (College in Prison Program) ...... 100,000
For services and expenses for Harlem Police
Athletic League ................................. 20,000
For services and expenses for Hope's Door,
Inc. ............................................ 64,000
For services and expenses of Housing Court
Answers, Inc. .................................. 135,000
For services and expenses of John Jay
College (Research Foundation of the City

129 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
University of New York - CUNY RF for Pris-
on to College Pipeline) ........................ 150,000
For services and expenses of International
Muslim Women's Initiative for Self-Empow-
erment Inc. (Malikah, Inc.) .................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Legal Services
of the Hudson Valley (Domestic Violence
Project) ....................................... 120,000
For services and expenses of Mobilization
for Justice Inc. (MFJ) ........................ 290,000
For services and expenses for My Sisters'
Place, Inc. ..................................... 64,000
For services and expenses of New York County
Defender Services Inc. (NYCDS) ................ 175,000
For services and expenses of Opportunities
for A Better Tomorrow Inc. ..................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Osborne Associ-
ation, Inc. (Familyworks Program in
Buffalo) ....................................... 180,000
For services and expenses of Pace University
(Pace Women's Justice Center - PWJC) ........... 250,000
For services and expenses of Richmond County
District Attorney's Office ..................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Treatment
Alternatives for Safer Communities (TASC)
of the Capital District ........................ 200,000
For services and expenses of Westchester
County Policing Program ...................... 3,000,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing gun violence prevention, street
outreach, anti-violence shooting/violence
reduction programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
may be suballocated or transferred between
any state department, agency or authority
including but not limited to the office of
victim services, the office for the
prevention of domestic violence, the divi-
sion of homeland security and emergency
services, and the office of indigent legal
services, to effectuate the intent of this
appropriation with the approval of the
temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated

130 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............. 1,540,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing criminal and/or civil legal
services in counties upstate New York.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
may be suballocated or transferred between
any state department, agency or authority
including but not limited to the office of
victim services, the office for the
prevention of domestic violence, the divi-
sion of homeland security and emergency
services, and the office of indigent legal
services, to effectuate the intent of this
appropriation with the approval of the
temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............. 3,500,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees

131 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
providing community safety and restorative
justice programs, which include but are
not limited to, support for survivors of
crime, domestic violence, gun violence
prevention, legal services, alternatives
to incarceration, community supervision
and re-entry initiatives, gang and crime
reduction strategies.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
may be suballocated or transferred between
any state department, agency or authority
including but not limited to the office of
victim services, the office for the
prevention of domestic violence, the divi-
sion of homeland security and emergency
services, and the office of indigent legal
services, to effectuate the intent of this
appropriation with the approval of the
temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............. 3,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 699,116,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Crime Identification and Technology Account - 25475
For services and expenses related to iden-
tification technology grants including,
but not limited to, crime lab improvement
and DNA programs. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agen-
cies (20204) ................................. 2,250,000
--------------

132 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Program account subtotal ................... 2,250,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
DCJS Miscellaneous Discretionary Account - 25470
Funds herein appropriated may be used to
disburse unanticipated federal grants in
support of state and local programs to
prevent crime, support law enforcement,
improve the administration of justice, and
assist victims. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agen-
cies (20202) ................................ 26,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 26,500,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Edward Byrne Memorial Grant Account - 25540
For services and expenses related to the
federal Edward Byrne memorial justice
assistance formula program, including
enhanced prosecution, enhanced defense,
local law enforcement programs, youth
violence and/or crime reduction programs,
crime laboratories, re-entry services, and
judicial diversion and alternative to
incarceration programs. A portion of these
funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state
agencies (20209) ............................. 5,400,000
For services and expenses of drug, violence,
and crime control and prevention programs.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the speaker of the Assem-
bly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by
each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved

133 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
by a majority vote of all members elected
to the assembly upon a roll call vote .......... 300,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing drug, anti-violence, crime
control, and prevention programs, includ-
ing but not limited to; youth violence
and/or crime reduction programs, enhanced
defense, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, judicial diversion, alternative
to incarceration programs, support for
survivors of domestic violence, gun
violence prevention, community super-
vision, gang and crime reduction strate-
gies, and local law enforcement programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation may be suballocated or transferred
between any state department, agency or
authority including but not limited to the
office of victim services, the office for
the prevention of domestic violence, the
division of homeland security and emergen-
cy services, and the office of indigent
legal services, to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of
the temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............... 300,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 6,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund

134 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Formula
Account - 25436
For payment of federal aid to localities
pursuant to the provisions of the federal
juvenile justice and delinquency
prevention act in accordance with a
distribution plan determined by the juve-
nile justice advisory group and affirmed
by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies (20213) ................. 2,050,000
For payment of federal aid to localities
pursuant to the provisions of title V of
the juvenile justice and delinquency
prevention act of 1974, as amended for
local delinquency prevention programs,
including sub-allocation to state oper-
ations for the administration of this
grant in accordance with a distribution
plan determined by the juvenile justice
advisory group and affirmed by the commis-
sioner of the division of criminal justice
services.
For services and expenses associated with
the juvenile justice and delinquency
prevention formula account. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies (20215) ................... 100,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,150,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Violence Against Women Account - 25477
For payment of federal aid to localities
pursuant to an expenditure plan developed
by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services, provided howev-
er that up to 10 percent of the amount
herein appropriated may be used for
program administration. A portion of these
funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20216) ....................... 7,400,000
--------------

135 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Program account subtotal ................... 7,400,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551
For payment to New York state defenders
association for services and expenses
related to the provision of training and
other assistance. The funds hereby appro-
priated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereaft-
er accrued (20247) ........................... 1,030,000
For defense services to be distributed in
the same manner as the prior year or
through a competitive process. The funds
hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (20246) ......... 7,658,000
For payment to prisoner's legal services for
services and expenses related to legal
representation and assistance to indigent
incarcerated individuals. The funds hereby
appropriated are to be available for
payment of liabilities heretofore accrued
or hereafter accrued (20979) ................. 7,400,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 16,088,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Medical Cannabis Fund
Medical Cannabis Law Enforcement Account - 23753
For a program of discretionary grants to
state and local law enforcement agencies
that demonstrate a need relating to title
5-A of article 33 of the public health
law. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies
(20235) ...................................... 2,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Drug Enforcement Task Force Account - 22102

136 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For distribution to the state's political
subdivisions and for services and expenses
of the drug enforcement task forces. Some
of these funds may be transferred to state
operations appropriations (20235) .............. 100,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Legal Services Assistance Account - 22096
For prosecutorial services of counties, to
be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared
by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by
the director of the budget. The funds
hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (20241) ........ 12,549,000
For services and expenses of the district
attorney and indigent legal services
attorney loan forgiveness program pursuant
to section 679-e of the education law.
These funds may be suballocated to the
higher education services corporation
(20220) ...................................... 2,430,000
For services and expenses of the Legal
Action Center (20376) .......................... 180,000
For services, expenses or reimbursement of
expenses incurred by local government
agencies and/or not-for-profit providers
or their employees providing civil or
criminal legal services in accordance with
the following schedule:
Access Justice Brooklyn, Inc. ..................... 49,574
Capital District Women's Bar Association
Legal Project, Inc. ............................. 85,782
Caribbean Women's Health Association .............. 22,574
Center for Family Representation ................. 112,872
Day One New York .................................. 34,313
Empire Justice Center ............................ 174,725
Family and Children's Association ................. 39,496
Family Legal Care (LIFT) .......................... 39,496
Frank H. Hiscock Legal Aid Society ................ 21,942
Goddard Riverside Community Center ................ 53,605
Manhattan Legal Services (Harlem) ................ 133,344
Her Justice ....................................... 75,000

137 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Legal Aid Bureau of Buffalo ....................... 54,548
Legal Aid Society of Mid New York ................. 65,827
Legal Aid Society of Northeastern New York ........ 48,272
The Legal Aid Society (NYC) ....................... 25,000
The Legal Aid Society (NYC) ...................... 263,307
Legal Aid Society of Rochester .................... 89,425
Legal Aid Society of Rockland County .............. 21,942
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc.
(Monroe County) ................................. 35,108
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc.
(Chemung County) ................................ 40,000
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc.
(Southern Tier Legal Services) .................. 61,438
Legal Services for New York City (LSNY) .......... 118,488
Legal Services of Central New York ................ 13,364
Legal Services of Long Island ..................... 48,272
Legal Services of the Hudson Valley .............. 151,667
Mobilization for Justice, Inc. .................... 43,885
Neighborhood Legal Services ....................... 80,000
New York Legal Assistance Group (NYLAG) ........... 25,000
New York Legal Assistance Group (NYLAG) -
Tenants' Right Unit ............................ 120,000
Northern Manhattan Improvement Corp ............... 89,425
Osborne Association El Rio Program ................ 35,985
Project Guardianship ............................. 138,208
Rural Law Center of New York ...................... 21,942
Sanctuary for Families ........................... 163,994
Advocates for Trans Equality ...................... 75,000
Volunteers of Legal Service (VOLS) ................ 39,496
Volunteer Legal Services Project of Monroe
County .......................................... 21,942
Western New York Law Center ....................... 60,634
Worker's Justice Law Center of New York,
Inc. ............................................ 35,108
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing civil or criminal legal
services, which include but are not limit-
ed to, legal services for survivors of
domestic violence and legal assistance and
representation to indigent individuals on
parole. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or
transferred between any state department,
agency or authority including but not
limited to the office of victim services,
the office for the prevention of domestic
violence, and the office of indigent legal

138 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services to effectuate the intent of this
appropriation, with the approval of the
temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............. 1,370,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 19,359,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
State Police Motor Vehicle Law Enforcement and Motor
Vehicle Theft and Insurance Fraud Prevention Fund
Motor Vehicle Theft and Insurance Fraud Account - 22801
For services and expenses associated with
local anti-auto theft programs, in accord-
ance with section 89-d of the state
finance law, distributed through a compet-
itive process, or pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget.
(20235) ...................................... 3,749,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 3,749,000
--------------

139 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
CRIME PREVENTION AND REDUCTION STRATEGIES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment to the New York state prosecutors training institute for
services and expenses related to the prosecution of crimes and the
provision of continuing legal education, training, and support for
medicaid fraud prosecution. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20242) ... 2,078,000 ..................... (re. $2,078,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state district attorneys
association. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for
payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(39798) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses associated with a witness protection program
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20243) ... 287,000 ......................... (re. $287,000)
Payment of state aid for expenses of the special narcotics prosecutor.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20245) ........
825,000 ............................................. (re. $825,000)
For reimbursement of the services and expenses of municipal corpo-
rations, public authorities, the division of state police, author-
ized police departments of state public authorities or regional
state park commissions for the purchase of ballistic soft body armor
vests, such sum shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the
state comptroller on vouchers certified by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and the chief administrative
officer of the municipal corporation, public authority, or state
entity making requisition and purchase of such vests. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations and may be subal-
located to other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are
to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (20207) ..........................................
1,350,000 ......................................... (re. $1,350,000)
For services and expenses of programs aimed at reducing the risk of
re-offending, to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (20249) .....................
11,526,000 ....................................... (re. $11,526,000)
For services and expenses of project GIVE and related efforts to
reduce gun violence as allocated pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget which will include an evaluation of the effective-
ness of such program. These funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations or suballocated to other state agencies (20942) ...
36,380,000 ....................................... (re. $36,380,000)

140 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the statewide targeted reductions in
intimate partner violence initiative and related efforts to reduce
domestic violence and non-domestic sexual assaults as allocated
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. These funds may
be transferred to state operations or suballocated to other state
agencies (60212) ... 38,170,000 .................. (re. $38,170,000)
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for
local alternatives to incarceration, including those that provide
alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs, and other related
interventions pursuant to article 13-A of the executive law.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, state assistance shall be
distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and approved by the director
of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (21037)
... 5,217,000 ..................................... (re. $5,217,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated entities,
including residential centers providing services to individuals on
probation, programs providing alternatives to incarceration, and
community supervision and/or employment programs, to be distributed
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budg-
et. Eligible services shall include, but not be limited to offender
employment, offender assessments, treatment program placement and
participation, monitoring client compliance with program inter-
ventions, TASC program services, and alternatives to prison or jail.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20239) ................
31,420,000 ....................................... (re. $31,020,000)
For services and expenses of the establishment, or continued operation
by existing grantees, of regional Operation S.N.U.G. programs. Funds
appropriated herein shall be expended pursuant to a plan prepared by
the division of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations (20250) ... 20,965,000 .......... (re. $20,965,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers for services to rape
victims and programs to prevent rape, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion or all of these funds may be transferred or suballocated to
other state agencies (39718) ... 12,841,000 ...... (re. $12,841,000)
For payment to district attorneys who participate in the crimes
against revenue program to be distributed according to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services, in consultation with the department of taxation and
finance, and approved by the director of the budget (20235) ........
13,521,000 ....................................... (re. $13,521,000)
For services and expenses of law enforcement agencies, for gang
prevention youth programs in Nassau and/or Suffolk counties and law
enforcement agencies may consult with community-based organizations

141 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and/or schools, pursuant to a plan by the commissioner of criminal
justice services (20238) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses related to state and local crime reduction,
youth justice and gang prevention programs, and criminal justice
programs including but not limited to street outreach, crime analy-
sis, research, targeted violence prevention and response, services
to victims of crime, criminal justice demonstration projects, and
shooting/violence reduction programs. Funds appropriated herein
shall be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner
of criminal justice services and approved by the director of the
budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (39797) ...
26,063,000 ....................................... (re. $26,063,000)
For additional services and expenses related to state and local crime
reduction, youth justice and gang prevention programs, and criminal
justice programs including but not limited to street outreach, crime
analysis, research, targeted violence prevention and response,
services to victims of crime, criminal justice demonstration
projects, and shooting/violence reduction programs. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the Assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (60219)
... 2,500,000 ..................................... (re. $2,484,000)
For additional services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of
expenses incurred by local government agencies and/or community-
based service providers, not-for-profit service providers or their
employees providing state or local crime reduction, youth justice
and gang prevention programs, including but not limited to street
outreach, crime analysis, research and shooting/violence reduction
programs. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or transferred
between any state department, agency or authority including but not
limited to the office of victim services, the office for the
prevention of domestic violence, the division of homeland security
and emergency services, and the office of indigent legal services,
to effectuate the intent of this appropriation with the approval of
the temporary president of senate and the director of the division
of the budget. Provided further, notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary presi-
dent of the senate and the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to

142 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the senate upon a roll call vote (60220) ...........................
2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of crime analysis
centers and related efforts to reduce crime, including but not
limited to the establishment of crime gun intelligence centers.
Funds appropriated herein shall be expended pursuant to a plan submit-
ted by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services
and approved by the director of the budget. These funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (60172) ... 32,950,000 ............ (re. $15,790,000)
For services and expenses related to partnerships and programs oper-
ated by and between government and community-based organizations to
respond, repair and rebuild in the aftermath of violence, and serve
the needs of communities and residents victimized by crimes involv-
ing guns. Funds appropriated herein shall be distributed through a
community engagement process pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of division of criminal justice services and approved
by the director of the budget (60173) ..............................
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated programs provid-
ing pretrial services, including but not limited to screening,
assessments, and supervision, to be distributed pursuant to a plan
submitted by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations and/or suballo-
cated to other state agencies (60174) ..............................
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000)
For additional payments to not-for-profit and government operated
programs providing pretrial services, including but not limited to
screening, assessments, and supervision, to be distributed pursuant
to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and/or
suballocated to other state agencies (60221) .......................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, and litigation readiness. Eligible entities
shall include, but not be limited to counties, cities with popu-
lations less than one million, and law enforcement and prosecutorial
entities within towns and villages. Receipt of funding is contingent
upon recipients providing periodic reports, as determined by the
commissioner, to the division on the status and use of such funding,
including but not limited to support for personal services, non-per-
sonal services, caseload volumes, and case processing. These funds
shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commission-
er of the division of criminal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (60176) .....................................
45,000,000 ....................................... (re. $45,000,000)

143 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For prosecutorial services of counties to be distributed pursuant to a
plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (60189) ..............
47,000,000 ....................................... (re. $47,000,000)
For services and expenses of local and state law enforcement associ-
ated with enforcing and investigating extreme risk protection
orders. Funding is to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the amount herein appropriated may be
transferred, interchanged or suballocated to any state operations
appropriation within the division of state police (60192) ..........
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For prosecutorial services and expenses, in cities with a population
greater than one million, related to discovery implementation,
including but not limited to digital evidence transmission technolo-
gy, administrative support, computers, hardware and operating soft-
ware, data connectivity, development of training materials, staff
training, overtime costs, and litigation readiness. Receipt of fund-
ing is contingent upon recipients providing periodic reports, as
determined by the commissioner, to the division on the status and
use of such funding, including but not limited to support for
personal services, non-personal services, caseload volumes, and case
processing. These funds shall be distributed pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget (60193) ........
45,000,000 ....................................... (re. $45,000,000)
For defense services and expenses related to discovery implementation,
including but not limited to digital evidence transmission technolo-
gy, administrative support, computers, hardware and operating soft-
ware, data connectivity, development of training materials, staff
training, overtime costs, and litigation readiness. Eligible enti-
ties shall include, but not be limited to, government entities and
not-for-profits that provide defense services. Receipt of funding is
contingent upon recipients providing periodic reports, as determined
by the commissioner, to the division on the status and use of such
funding, including but not limited to support for personal services,
non-personal services, caseload volumes, and case processing. These
funds shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (60194) .....................
45,000,000 ....................................... (re. $45,000,000)
For defense services and expenses incurred by government entities and
not-for-profits. Funds shall be distributed pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. The funds here-
by appropriated are to be available for payment of liabilities here-
tofore accrued or hereafter accrued (60195) ........................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000)

144 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment to the correctional association of New York (60214) ......
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for reimbursement
to the city of New York of services and expenses of local law
enforcement in the city of New York related to overtime and enhanced
patrol in subways and mass transit systems, pursuant to a plan
developed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (60216) .....
77,000,000 ....................................... (re. $38,500,000)
For additional payment to New York State Defenders association for
services and expenses related to the provision of training and other
assistance (20999) ... 2,100,000 .................. (re. $2,100,000)
For additional payment to Prisoners' Legal Services, Inc. for services
and expenses related to legal representation and assistance to indi-
gent incarcerated individuals (39709) ..............................
2,100,000 ......................................... (re. $2,100,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Wing Civil Air Patrol
(39777) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Borough Safety Patrol (QBSP)
Inc. (60206) ... 300,000 ............................ (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of United Jewish Organizations of Williams-
burg (60207) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses for Center for Employment Opportunities,
Inc. (60065) ... 75,000 .............................. (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Child Center of New York (39756) ........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Community Service Society of New York
(Next-Door Project) (60181) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the Fortune Society, Inc. (20941) .......
275,000 ............................................. (re. $275,000)
For services and expenses of Common Justice, Inc. (60002) ............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Families and Friends of the Wrongfully
Convicted (60208) ... 100,000 ....................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses related to the NYS Judicial Institute (Legal
Education Opportunity Program). All or a portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and suballocated to the Judiciary
(39723) ... 275,000 ................................. (re. $275,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services (60145)
... 200,000 ......................................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Defender Services (20939)
... 175,000 ......................................... (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Legal Services Corporation A
(60222) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Correctional Association of New York
(ATI) (20947) ... 127,000 ........................... (re. $127,000)
For services and expenses of Goddard Riverside Community Center
(20373) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Bailey House - Project FIRST, Inc.
(20943) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)

145 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of [John Jay College (Prison to College
Pipeline)] Research Foundation of the City University of New York
(John Jay College - Prison to College Pipeline) (60197) ............
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Groundswell Community Mural Project, Inc.
(20938) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Economic Opportunity Council of Suffolk,
Inc. (S.N.U.G. Wyandanch) (39775) ... 100,000 ....... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Emerald Ise Immigration Center Inc.
(60223) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Shalom Task Force Inc. (60049) ..........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities (20258)
... 75,000 ........................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services NYC (Staten Island)
(60224) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Osborne Association, Inc. (ATI)
(20946) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses related to NYU (Veteran's Entrepreneurship
Program)(39725) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (20996) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Greenburger Center for Social and
Criminal Justice(60064) ... 100,000 ................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Haitian American Lawyers Association
(60209) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Mobilization for Justice, Inc. (60005)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Neighborhood Legal Services, Inc.
(Buffalo) (60182) ... 400,000 ....................... (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses of the Glendale Civilian Observation Patrol,
Inc. (60009) ... 25,000 .............................. (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the LSNY - Bronx Corporation (DBA Bronx
Legal Services) (60101) ... 300,000 ................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge Heights Community Center,
Inc. (60109) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Moshoula Montefiore Community Center,
Inc. (60110) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of BARD College (Prison Initiative) (60198)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Kings Against Violence Initiative
(K.A.V.I), Inc.(60111) ... 150,000 .................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Central Family Life Center (60026) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of [the Center for Court Innovation Youth
SOS - Crown Heights] Justice Innovation Inc. (Center for Court Inno-
vation Youth SOS - Crown Heights) (60007) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Action Center of the City of New
York, Inc.(20376) ... 75,000 ......................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of City Line Ozone Park Civilian Patrol
(60183) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)

146 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Center for Family Representation (60184)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Brownsville Think Tank Matter, Inc.
(60081) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Kings Bay YM YWHA, Inc. (Heal the
Violence Initiative)(60200) ... 200,000 ............. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of John F. Finn Institute for Public Safety,
Inc. (60201) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New Hour for Women and Children LI-Inc.
(60202) ... 20,000 ................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Suffolk County Police (Asian Jade Socie-
ty) (60204) ... 10,000 ............................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Justice Network (60211) ...........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Albany Law School - Immigration Clin-
ic (39730) ... 150,000 .............................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Aid Society - Immigration Law Unit
(20944) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services NYC - DREAM Clinics
(20968) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Haitian-Americans United for Progress
Inc. (60061) ... 150,000 ............................ (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence
or aid victims of domestic violence:
Center for Safety & Change, Inc. (21047) ... 45,722 .... (re. $45,722)
Empire Justice Center (21046) ... 52,251 ............... (re. $52,251)
Hope's Door, Inc. (60225) ... 45,722 ................... (re. $45,722)
Legal Aid Society of Mid-New York (21045) ... 45,729 ... (re. $45,729)
Legal Aid Society (DV Services) (20334) ... 71,831 ..... (re. $71,831)
Brooklyn Legal Services, Inc. (20333) ... 45,722 ....... (re. $45,722)
Queens Legal Services Corporation (20337) ... 45,722 ... (re. $45,722)
My Sisters' Place (20340) ... 45,722 ................... (re. $45,722)
Neighborhood Legal Services Inc. of Erie County (20336) ..............
45,722 ............................................... (re. $45,722)
Sanctuary for Families (21042) ... 59,976 .............. (re. $59,976)
Rochester Legal Aid Society (20335) ... 59,159 ......... (re. $59,159)
Volunteer Legal Services Project of Monroe County (21043) ............
45,722 ............................................... (re. $45,722)
For services and expenses of Bard College (Prison Initiative) (21016)
... 200,000 ......................................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Legal Services (Legal Services NYC)
(60118) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal Services Inc. (60093) ...
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Capital District Womans' Bar Association
Legal Project Inc. (CDWBA Legal Project) (60040) ...................
160,000 ............................................. (re. $160,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Family Representation (CFR)
(20297) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Justice Innovation Inc.
(Redhook Community Justice Center) (60044) .........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)

147 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Cornell University (Criminal Justice
Employment Initiative) (60042) ... 100,000 .......... (re. $100,000)
For additional services and expenses of Correctional Association of
New York (CANY) (60226) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of Firemen's Association of the State of New
York (FASNY) (39758) ... 250,000 .................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Greenburger Center for Social and Crimi-
nal Justice (60003) ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Hamilton-Herkimer College (College in
Prison Program) (60227) ... 100,000 ................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Housing Court Answers, Inc. (60039) .....
135,000 ............................................. (re. $135,000)
For services and expenses of [John Jay College (Prison to College
Pipeline)] Research Foundation of the City University of New York
(John Jay College - Prison to College Pipeline) (20966) ............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
(Domestic Violence Project) (60047) ... 90,000 ....... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Mobilization for Justice Inc. (MBJ)
(60023) ... 290,000 ................................. (re. $290,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services Inc.
(NYCDS) (39755) ... 175,000 ......................... (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Opportunities for A Better Tomorrow Inc.
(60046) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Osborne Association, Inc. (Familyworks
Program in Buffalo) (60105) ... 180,000 ............. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of Pace University (Pace Women's Justice
Center-PWJC)(60104) ... 200,000 ..................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Prisoners' Legal Services of New York
(60156) ... 1,100,000 ............................. (re. $1,100,000)
For services and expenses of Richmond County District Attorney's
Office (39700) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Treatment Alternatives for Safer Communi-
ties (TASC) of the Capital District (60058) ........................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Policing Program
(20206) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,000,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing gun violence prevention, street outreach, anti-violence
shooting/violence reduction programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or transferred between any state
department, agency or authority including but not limited to the
office of victim services, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence, the division of homeland security and emergency services,
and the office of indigent legal services, to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of the temporary president
of senate and the director of the division of the budget. Provided
further, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan

148 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the direc-
tor of the division of the budget which sets forth either an item-
ized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for the expendi-
ture of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote
(60179) ... 1,540,000 ............................. (re. $1,540,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing criminal and/or civil legal services in counties upstate
New York.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or transferred between any state
department, agency or authority including but not limited to the
office of victim services, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence, the division of homeland security and emergency services,
and the office of indigent legal services, to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of the temporary president
of senate and the director of the division of the budget. Provided
further, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the direc-
tor of the division of the budget which sets forth either an item-
ized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for the expendi-
ture of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote
(60178) ... 3,500,000 ............................. (re. $3,500,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing community safety and restorative justice programs, which
include but are not limited to, support for survivors of crime,
domestic violence, gun violence prevention, legal services, alterna-
tives to incarceration, community supervision and re-entry initi-
atives, gang and crime reduction strategies.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or transferred between any state
department, agency or authority including but not limited to the
office of victim services, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence, the division of homeland security and emergency services,
and the office of indigent legal services, to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of the temporary president
of the senate and the director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the
senate and the director of the division of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be

149 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be
approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the senate
upon a roll call vote (60177) ......................................
6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $6,000,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment to the New York state prosecutors training institute for
services and expenses related to the prosecution of crimes and the
provision of continuing legal education, training, and support for
medicaid fraud prosecution. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20242) ... 2,078,000 ....................... (re. $770,000)
For services and expenses associated with a witness protection program
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20243) ... 287,000 ......................... (re. $287,000)
For reimbursement of the services and expenses of municipal corpo-
rations, public authorities, the division of state police, author-
ized police departments of state public authorities or regional
state park commissions for the purchase of ballistic soft body armor
vests, such sum shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the
state comptroller on vouchers certified by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and the chief administrative
officer of the municipal corporation, public authority, or state
entity making requisition and purchase of such vests. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations and may be subal-
located to other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are
to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (20207) ..........................................
1,350,000 ......................................... (re. $1,350,000)
For services and expenses of programs aimed at reducing the risk of
re-offending, to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (20249) .....................
11,526,000 ........................................ (re. $8,633,000)
For services and expenses of project GIVE and related efforts to
reduce gun and domestic violence as allocated pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget which will include an evalu-
ation of the effectiveness of such program. These funds may be
transferred to state operations or suballocated to other state agen-
cies (20942) ... 72,050,000 ...................... (re. $38,223,000)
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for the
operation of local probation departments subject to the approval of
the director of the budget.
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for
local alternatives to incarceration, including those that provide
alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs, and other related

150 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
interventions pursuant to article 13-A of the executive law.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, state assistance shall
be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(21037) ... 5,217,000 ............................. (re. $3,200,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated entities,
including residential centers providing services to individuals on
probation, programs providing alternatives to incarceration, and
community supervision and/or employment programs, to be distributed
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budg-
et. Eligible services shall include, but not be limited to offender
employment, offender assessments, treatment program placement and
participation, monitoring client compliance with program inter-
ventions, TASC program services, and alternatives to prison or jail.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20239) ................
31,420,000 ....................................... (re. $24,121,000)
For services and expenses of the establishment, or continued operation
by existing grantees, of regional Operation S.N.U.G. programs. Funds
appropriated herein shall be expended pursuant to a plan prepared by
the division of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations (20250) ... 20,965,000 .......... (re. $13,809,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers for services to rape
victims and programs to prevent rape, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion or all of these funds may be transferred or suballocated to
other state agencies (39718) ... 6,341,000 ........ (re. $5,364,000)
For additional services and expenses of rape crisis centers for
services to rape victims and programs to prevent rape (39773) ......
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For payment to district attorneys who participate in the crimes
against revenue program to be distributed according to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services, in consultation with the department of taxation and
finance, and approved by the director of the budget (20235) ........
13,521,000 ........................................ (re. $9,376,000)
For services and expenses of law enforcement agencies, for gang
prevention youth programs in Nassau and/or Suffolk counties and law
enforcement agencies may consult with community-based organizations
and/or schools, pursuant to a plan by the commissioner of criminal
justice services (20238) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses related to state and local crime reduction,
youth justice and gang prevention programs, including but not limit-
ed to street outreach, crime analysis, research, and
shooting/violence reduction programs. Funds appropriated herein
shall be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner
of criminal justice services and approved by the director of the

151 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (39797) .........
31,063,000 ....................................... (re. $30,449,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of crime analysis
centers and related efforts to reduce crime, including but not
limited to the establishment of crime gun intelligence centers.
Funds appropriated herein shall be expended pursuant to a plan
submitted by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. These funds may
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (60172) ... 32,950,000 ............ (re. $19,432,000)
For services and expenses related to partnerships and programs oper-
ated by and between government and community-based organizations to
respond, repair and rebuild in the aftermath of violence, and serve
the needs of communities and residents victimized by crimes involv-
ing guns. Funds appropriated herein shall be distributed through a
community engagement process pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of division of criminal justice services and approved
by the director of the budget (60173) ..............................
20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,859,000)
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, and litigation readiness.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be limited to counties,
cities with populations less than one million, and law enforcement
and prosecutorial entities within towns and villages. Receipt of
funding is contingent upon recipients providing periodic reports, as
determined by the commissioner, to the division on the status and
use of such funding, including but not limited to support for
personal services, non-personal services, caseload volumes, and case
processing. These funds shall be distributed pursuant to a plan
submitted by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget (60176) ........
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,587,000)
For services and expenses of local and state law enforcement associ-
ated with enforcing and investigating extreme risk protection
orders. Funding is to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the amount herein appropriated may be
transferred, interchanged or suballocated to any state operations
appropriation within the division of state police (60192) ..........
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,500,000)
For defense services and expenses related to discovery implementation,
including but not limited to digital evidence transmission technolo-
gy, administrative support, computers, hardware and operating soft-
ware, data connectivity, development of training materials, staff
training, overtime costs, and litigation readiness. Eligible enti-
ties shall include, but not be limited to, government entities and
not-for-profits that provide defense services. Receipt of funding is

152 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
contingent upon recipients providing periodic reports, as determined
by the commissioner, to the division on the status and use of such
funding, including but not limited to support for personal services,
non-personal services, caseload volumes, and case processing. These
funds shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (60194) .....................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,197,000)
For defense services and expenses incurred by government entities and
not-for-profits. Funds shall be distributed pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. The funds here-
by appropriated are to be available for payment of liabilities here-
tofore accrued or hereafter accrued (60195) ........................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,913,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing community safety and restorative justice programs, which
include but are not limited to, support for survivors of sexual
assault, domestic violence, gun violence prevention, legal services,
alternatives to incarceration, community supervision and re-entry
initiatives, gang and crime reduction strategies.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred between other
state agencies, including but not limited to the office of victim
services, the office for the prevention of domestic violence, the
division of homeland security and emergency services, and the office
of indigent legal services, with the approval of the temporary pres-
ident of senate and the director of the budget. Provided further,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from
this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60177) ................
7,200,000 ......................................... (re. $6,060,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing criminal and/or civil legal services in counties upstate
New York.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred between other
state agencies, including but not limited to the office of victim
services, the office for the prevention of domestic violence, the
division of homeland security and emergency services, and the office
of indigent legal services, with the approval of the temporary pres-
ident of senate and the director of the budget. Provided further,

153 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from
this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60178) ................
3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,808,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing gun violence prevention, street outreach, anti violence
shooting/violence reduction programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred between other
state agencies, including but not limited to the office of victim
services, the office for the prevention of domestic violence, the
division of homeland security and emergency services, and the office
of indigent legal services, with the approval of the temporary pres-
ident of senate and the director of the budget. Provided further,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from
this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60179) ................
1,540,000 ......................................... (re. $1,460,000)
For services and expenses of Bard College (Prison Initiative) (21016)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Legal Services (Legal Services NYC)
(60118) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal Services Inc (60093)
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Capital District Womens' Bar Association
Legal Project Inc. (CDWBA Legal Project) (60040) ...................
160,000 ............................................. (re. $160,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Family Representation Inc.
(20297) ... 125,000 .................................. (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Justice Innovation Inc
(Redhook Community Justice Center) (60044) .........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University (Criminal Justice
Employment Initiative) (60042) ... 100,000 ........... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of the Firemen's Association of the State of
New York (39758) ... 250,000 ........................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of [John Jay College (Prison-to-College
Pipeline)] Research Foundation of the City University of New York

154 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(John Jay College - Prison to College Pipeline) (20966) ............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
(Domestic Violence Prevention Project) (60047) .....................
90,000 ............................................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services Inc
(39755) ... 175,000 ................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Opportunities for a Better Tomorrow Inc
(60046) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Osborne Association, Inc. (Familyworks
Program in Buffalo) (60105) ... 180,000 .............. (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Pace University (Pace Women's Justice
Center-PWJC) (60104) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Prisoners' Legal Services of NY Inc
(60156) ... 2,100,000 ............................. (re. $2,100,000)
For services and expenses of Treatment Alternatives for Safer Communi-
ties of the Capital District (60058) ...............................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $155,000)
For additional payment to New York State Defenders association for
services and expenses related to the provision of training and other
assistance (20999) ... 2,100,000 ..................... (re. $29,000)
For additional payment to Prisoners' Legal Services, Inc. for services
and expenses related to legal representation and assistance to indi-
gent inmates (39709) ... 2,100,000 ................ (re. $1,300,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Wing Civil Air Patrol
(39777) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Borough Safety Patrol (QBSP)
Inc. (60206) ... 300,000 ............................ (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses for Center for Employment Opportunities, Inc
(60065) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Child Center of New York (39756) ........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Community Service Society of New York
(Next-Door Project) (60181) ... 300,000 ............. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the Fortune Society, Inc. (20941) .......
275,000 .............................................. (re. $64,000)
For services and expenses of Common Justice, Inc. (60002) ............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $121,000)
For services and expenses of Families and Friends of the Wrongfully
Convicted (60208) ... 100,000 ....................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses related to the NYS Judicial Institute (Legal
Education Opportunity Program). All or a portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and suballocated to the Judiciary
(39723) ... 275,000 ................................. (re. $275,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services (60145)
... 200,000 ......................................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Defender Services (20939)
... 175,000 ......................................... (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Goddard Riverside Community Center
(20373) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Bailey House - Project FIRST, Inc.
(20943) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $34,000)

155 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of [John Jay College (Prison to College
Pipeline)] Research Foundation of the City University of New York
(John Jay College - Prison to College Pipeline) (60197) ............
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Groundswell Community Mural Project, Inc.
(20938) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Economic Opportunity Council of Suffolk,
Inc. (S.N.U.G. Wyandanch) (39775) ... 100,000 ....... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Shalom Task Force Inc (60049) ...........
150,000 .............................................. (re. $99,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities (20258)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (20996) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Greenburger Center for Social and
Criminal Justice (60064) ... 100,000 ................ (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Haitian American Lawyers Association
(60209) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Neighborhood Legal Services, Inc
(Buffalo) (60182) ... 400,000 ....................... (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses of the Glendale Civilian Observation Patrol,
Inc (60009) ... 25,000 ............................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the LSNY - Bronx Corporation (DBA Bronx
Legal Services) (60101) ... 300,000 ................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge Heights Community Center, Inc
(60109) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Mosholu Montefiore Community Center, Inc
(60110) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of BARD College (Prison Initiative) (60198)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Kings Against Violence Initiative
(K.A.V.I), Inc (60111) ... 150,000 .................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Central Family Life Center (60026) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Nassau-Suffolk Law Services Committee,
Inc (20391) ... 120,000 .............................. (re. $74,000)
For services and expenses of [the Center for Court Innovation Youth
SOS - Crown Heights] Justice Innovation Inc. (Center for Court Inno-
vation Youth SOS - Crown Heights) (60007) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Action Center of the City of New
York, Inc (20376) ... 75,000 ......................... (re. $27,000)
For services and expenses of City Line Ozone Park Civilian Patrol
(60183) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Family Representation (60184)
100,000 .............................................. (re. $51,000)
For services and expenses of Brownsville Think Tank Matter, Inc
(60081) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Kings Bay YM YWHA, Inc. (Heal the
Violence Initiative) (60200) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of John F. Finn Institute for Public Safety,
Inc. (60201) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $75,000)

156 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of New Hour for Women and Children LI-Inc.
(60202) ... 20,000 ................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of NYC Police Department (60020) ...........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Rockland County Sheriff (60210) ...
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Justice Network (60211) ...........
150,000 .............................................. (re. $51,000)
For services and expenses of the Albany Law School - Immigration Clin-
ic (39730) ... 150,000 .............................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services NYC - DREAM Clinics
(20968) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence
or aid victims of domestic violence:
Center for Safety & Change, Inc. (21047) ... 45,722 .... (re. $23,000)
Empire Justice Center (21046) ... 52,251 ............... (re. $13,000)
Legal Aid Society of Mid-New York (21045) ... 45,729 ... (re. $18,000)
Brooklyn Legal Services, Inc (20333) ... 45,722 ........ (re. $45,722)
Queens Legal Services Corporation (20337) ... 45,722 ... (re. $45,722)
THE SAFE CENTER LI INC. (20341) ... 45,722 ............. (re. $45,722)
Neighborhood Legal Services Inc. of Erie County (20336) ..............
45,722 ............................................... (re. $23,000)
Sanctuary for Families (21042) ... 59,976 .............. (re. $59,976)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as
amended by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is hereby
amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment to the New York state prosecutors training institute for
services and expenses related to the prosecution of crimes and the
provision of continuing legal education, training, and support for
medicaid fraud prosecution. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20242) ... 2,078,000 ....................... (re. $191,000)
For services and expenses associated with a witness protection program
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20243) ... 287,000 ......................... (re. $287,000)
For reimbursement of the services and expenses of municipal corpo-
rations, public authorities, the division of state police, author-
ized police departments of state public authorities or regional
state park commissions for the purchase of ballistic soft body armor
vests, such sum shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the
state comptroller on vouchers certified by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and the chief administrative
officer of the municipal corporation, public authority, or state
entity making requisition and purchase of such vests. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations and may be subal-
located to other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are
to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (20207) ... 1,350,000 ........... (re. $1,350,000)

157 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of programs aimed at reducing the risk of
re-offending, to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (20249) .....................
11,526,000 ........................................ (re. $6,774,000)
For services and expenses of project GIVE as allocated pursuant to a
plan prepared by the commissioner of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget which will include an evalu-
ation of the effectiveness of such program. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations or suballocated to other
state agencies (20942) ... 36,380,000 ............. (re. $6,671,000)
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for the
operation of local probation departments subject to the approval of
the director of the budget.
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for
local alternatives to incarceration, including those that provide
alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs, and other related
interventions pursuant to article 13-A of the executive law.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, state assistance shall
be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(21037) ... 5,217,000 ............................. (re. $2,018,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated entities,
including residential centers providing services to individuals on
probation, programs providing alternatives to incarceration, and
community supervision and/or employment programs, to be distributed
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budg-
et. Eligible services shall include, but not be limited to offender
employment, offender assessments, treatment program placement and
participation, monitoring client compliance with program inter-
ventions, TASC program services, and alternatives to prison or jail.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20239) ................
31,420,000 ....................................... (re. $13,758,000)
For services and expenses of the establishment, or continued operation
by existing grantees, of regional Operation S.N.U.G. programs. Funds
appropriated herein shall be expended pursuant to a plan prepared by
the division of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations (20250) ... 20,965,000 ........... (re. $4,302,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers for services to rape
victims and programs to prevent rape, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion or all of these funds may be transferred or suballocated to
other state agencies (39718) ... 3,553,000 ........ (re. $1,121,000)
For additional services and expenses of rape crisis centers for
services to rape victims and programs to prevent rape (39773) ......
147,000 ............................................. (re. $147,000)

158 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment to district attorneys who participate in the crimes
against revenue program to be distributed according to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services, in consultation with the department of taxation and
finance, and approved by the director of the budget (20235) ........
13,521,000 ........................................ (re. $1,711,000)
For services and expenses of law enforcement agencies, for gang
prevention youth programs in Nassau and/or Suffolk counties and law
enforcement agencies may consult with community-based organizations
and/or schools, pursuant to a plan by the commissioner of criminal
justice services (20238) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses related to state and local crime reduction,
youth justice and gang prevention programs, including but not limit-
ed to street outreach, crime analysis, research, and
shooting/violence reduction programs, provided that up to $2,500,000
shall be made available for the Office of Gun Violence Prevention.
Funds appropriated herein shall be expended pursuant to a plan
developed by the commissioner of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and/or suballocated to other
state agencies (39797) ... 31,063,000 ............ (re. $28,012,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of crime analysis
centers, including but not limited to the establishment of crime gun
intelligence centers. Funds appropriated herein shall be expended
pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budg-
et. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations
and may be suballocated to other state agencies (60172) ...
17,950,000 ........................................ (re. $3,684,000)
For services and expenses related to partnerships and programs oper-
ated by and between government and community-based organizations to
respond, repair and rebuild in the aftermath of violence, and serve
the needs of communities and residents victimized by crimes involv-
ing guns. Funds appropriated herein shall be distributed through a
community engagement process pursuant to a plan submitted by the
commissioner of division of criminal justice services and approved
by the director of the budget (60173) ..............................
20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,744,000)
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, and litigation readiness.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be limited to counties,
cities with populations less than one million, and law enforcement
and prosecutorial entities within towns and villages. These funds
shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commission-
er of the division of criminal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (60176) .....................................
40,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,624,000)
For services and expenses of local and state law enforcement associ-
ated with enforcing and investigating extreme risk protection

159 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
orders. Funding is to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (60192) .....................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For defense services and expenses related to discovery implementation,
including but not limited to digital evidence transmission technolo-
gy, administrative support, computers, hardware and operating soft-
ware, data connectivity, development of training materials, staff
training, overtime costs, and litigation readiness. Eligible enti-
ties shall include, but not be limited to, government entities and
not-for-profits that provide defense services. These funds shall be
distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and approved by the director
of the budget (60194) ... 40,000,000 .............. (re. $1,844,000)
For defense services and expenses incurred by government entities and
not-for-profits. Funds shall be distributed pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. The funds here-
by appropriated are to be available for payment of liabilities here-
tofore accrued or hereafter accrued (60195) ........................
40,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,650,000)
For services and expenses of community safety and restorative justice
programs, which include but are not limited to, support for survi-
vors of sexual assault, domestic violence, gun violence prevention,
legal services, alternatives to incarceration, community supervision
and re-entry initiatives, gang and crime reduction strategies
managed by local governments and/or community-based not-for-profits
service providers. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amount appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other state agencies, including but not limited
to the department of corrections and community supervision, the
office of indigent legal services, the office of victim services,
and the office for the prevention of domestic violence, with the
approval of the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the Senate upon a roll call vote (60177) ................
7,200,000 ......................................... (re. $3,244,000)
For services and expenses of criminal and/or civil legal services in
counties upstate New York. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other state agencies, including but not limited
to the department of corrections and community supervision, the
office of indigent legal services, the office of victim services,
and the office for the prevention of domestic violence, with the

160 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
approval of the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the Senate upon a roll call vote (60178) ................
3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,122,000)
For additional services and expenses of gun violence prevention,
street outreach, anti violence shooting/violence reduction programs
managed by local governments and/or community-based not-for-profits
service providers. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amount appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other state agencies, including but not limited
to the department of corrections and community supervision, the
office of indigent legal services, the office of victim services,
and the office for the prevention of domestic violence, with the
approval of the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the Senate upon a roll call vote (60179) ................
1,540,000 ......................................... (re. $1,303,000)
For services and expenses of Bard College (Prison Initiative) (21016)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Legal Services (Legal Services NYC)
(60118) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal Services Inc (60093) ...
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Capital District Women's Bar Association
Legal Project Inc. (CDWBA Legal Project) (60040) ...................
160,000 ............................................. (re. $160,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University (Criminal Justice
Employment Initiative) (60042) ... 100,000 ............ (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of Firemen's Association of the State of New
York (39758) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Justice Innovation Inc. (Redhook Communi-
ty Justice Center) (60044) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Opportunities for A Better Tomorrow Inc
(60046) ... 100,000 ................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Osborne Association, Inc. (Familyworks
Program in Buffalo) (60105) ... 180,000 .............. (re. $50,000)

161 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Prisoners' Legal Services of NY Inc
(60156) ... 1,000,000 ............................... (re. $383,000)
For services and expenses of Richmond County District Attorney's
Office (39700) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Treatment Alternatives for Safer Communi-
ties (TASC) of the Capital District (60058) ........................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $38,000)
For the cost of conducting a study on Missing Black Indigenous and
People of Color (BIPOC) Women and Girls. The study shall explore
ways to reduce disparities in attention, resources and commitment to
finding BIPOC girls and women. A portion or all of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (60196) ... 750,000 .................. (re. $750,000)
For additional payments to not-for-profit and government operated
programs providing services, including, but not limited to screen-
ing, assessments, supervision, job placement, counseling, drug
treatment, legal services, pretrial services and restorative justice
services. Notwithstanding any section of the state finance law or
any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
speaker of the Assembly and the director of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call (60180) ..................................
3,300,000 ......................................... (re. $3,123,000)
For additional payment to New York State Defenders association for
services and expenses related to the provision of training and other
assistance (20999) ... 2,100,000 ...................... (re. $2,000)
For additional payment to Prisoners' Legal Services for services and
expenses related to legal representation and assistance to indigent
inmates (39709) ... 2,100,000 ....................... (re. $101,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Wing Civil Air Patrol
(39777) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses of Child Care Center of New York (39756) ...
250,000 .............................................. (re. $69,000)
For services and expenses of The Community Service Society of New York
(60181) ... 300,000 ................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the Fortune Society (20941) .............
275,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses related to the Legal Education Opportunity
Program. All or a portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and suballocated to the Judiciary (39723) ...............
225,000 ............................................. (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of Goddard Riverside Community Center
(20373) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Bailey House - Project FIRST (20943) ....
100,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of [the John Jay College] Research Founda-
tion of the City University of New York (John Jay College - Prison

162 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to College Pipeline) (60197) .......................................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities Program
(20258) ... 31,000 ................................... (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of the Osborne Association (20946) .........
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (20996) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $153,000)
For services and expenses of Neighborhood Legal Services, Inc of
Buffalo (60182) ... 400,000 ......................... (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses of the Glendale Civilian Patrol (60009) ....
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Legal Services (60108) ........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge Heights Community Center
(60109) ... 250,000 .................................. (re. $29,000)
For services and expenses of Moshoula Montefiore Community Center
(60110) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of The BARD Prison Initiative (60198) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Kings Against Violence Initiative
(K.A.V.I) (60111) ... 150,000 ......................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Central Family Life Center (60026) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Nassau/Suffolk Law Services Committee,
Inc (20391) ... 120,000 ............................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of [the Center for Court Innovation Youth
SOS - Crown Heights] Justice Innovation Inc. (Center for Court Inno-
vation Youth SOS - Crown Heights) (60007) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Cityline Ozone Park Civilian Patrol
(60183) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Brownsville Think Tank Matter, Inc
(60081) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Community Capacity Development (60199)
... 250,000 ......................................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of John Finn Institute for Public Safety
(60201) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $73,000)
For services and expenses of NYC Police Department (60020) ...........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Rockland Police Department (60203) ...
75,000 ................................................ (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Wildcat Service Corporation (60205) .....
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Albany Law School - Immigration Clin-
ic (39730) ... 150,000 .............................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence
or aid victims of domestic violence:
Empire Justice Center (21046) ... 52,251 ................ (re. $2,000)

163 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as
amended by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, is hereby
amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment to the New York state prosecutors training institute for
services and expenses related to the prosecution of crimes and the
provision of continuing legal education, training, and support for
medicaid fraud prosecution. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20242) ... 2,078,000 ....................... (re. $313,000)
For services and expenses associated with a witness protection program
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20243) ... 287,000 ......................... (re. $245,000)
For reimbursement of the services and expenses of municipal corpo-
rations, public authorities, the division of state police, author-
ized police departments of state public authorities or regional
state park commissions for the purchase of ballistic soft body armor
vests, such sum shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the
state comptroller on vouchers certified by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and the chief administrative
officer of the municipal corporation, public authority, or state
entity making requisition and purchase of such vests. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations and may be subal-
located to other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are
to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (20207) ..........................................
1,350,000 ......................................... (re. $1,350,000)
For services and expenses of programs aimed at reducing the risk of
re-offending, to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (20249) .....................
3,842,000 ........................................... (re. $617,000)
For services and expenses of project GIVE as allocated pursuant to a
plan prepared by the commissioner of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget which will include an evalu-
ation of the effectiveness of such program. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations or suballocated to other
state agencies (20942) ... 18,190,000 ............. (re. $4,733,000)
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for the
operation of local probation departments subject to the approval of
the director of the budget.
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for
local alternatives to incarceration, including those that provide
alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs, and other related
interventions pursuant to article 13-A of the executive law.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, state assistance shall
be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(21037) ... 5,217,000 ............................. (re. $2,242,000)

164 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated programs provid-
ing alternatives to incarceration, community supervision and/or
employment programs to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget. Eligible services shall
include, but not be limited to offender employment, offender assess-
ments, treatment program placement and participation, monitoring
client compliance with program interventions, TASC program services,
and alternatives to prison. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other state
agencies (20239) ... 13,819,000 ................... (re. $3,309,000)
For residential centers providing services to individuals on probation
and for community corrections programs to be distributed in the same
manner as the prior year or through a competitive process (21000)
... 945,000 ........................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of the establishment, or continued operation
by existing grantees, of regional Operation S.N.U.G. programs,
pursuant to a plan prepared by the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations (20250) .........
20,965,000 ........................................ (re. $6,608,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers for services to rape
victims and programs to prevent rape, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion or all of these funds may be transferred or suballocated to
other state agencies (39718) ... 3,553,000 .......... (re. $668,000)
For additional services and expenses of rape crisis centers for
services to rape victims and programs to prevent rape (39773) ......
147,000 .............................................. (re. $67,000)
For payment to district attorneys who participate in the crimes
against revenue program to be distributed according to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services, in consultation with the department of taxation and
finance, and approved by the director of the budget (20235) ........
13,521,000 ........................................ (re. $2,042,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated programs provid-
ing services including but not limited to defendant screening,
assessment, referral, monitoring, and case management, to be
distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and approved by the director
of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations (39744) ... 946,000 ...................... (re. $156,000)
For services and expenses of law enforcement agencies, for gang
prevention youth programs in Nassau and/or Suffolk counties and law
enforcement agencies may consult with community-based organizations
and/or schools, pursuant to a plan by the commissioner of criminal
justice services (20238) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses related to state and local crime reduction,
youth justice and gang prevention programs, including but not limit-
ed to street outreach, crime analysis, research, and
shooting/violence reduction programs, provided that up to $2,500,000

165 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall be made available for the Office of Gun Violence Prevention.
Funds appropriated herein shall be expended pursuant to a plan
developed by the commissioner of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and/or suballocated to other
state agencies (39797) ... 31,063,000 ............ (re. $18,859,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of crime analysis
centers, including but not limited to the establishment of crime gun
intelligence centers. Funds appropriated herein shall be expended
pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budg-
et. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations
and may be suballocated to other state agencies (60172) ............
14,950,000 ........................................ (re. $1,773,000)
For services and expenses related to partnerships and programs oper-
ated by and between government and community-based organizations to
respond, repair and rebuild in the aftermath of violence, and serve
the needs of communities and residents victimized by crimes involv-
ing guns, to be distributed through a community engagement process
pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of division of
criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budget
(60173) ... 20,000,000 ............................ (re. $7,749,000)
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, and litigation readiness.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be limited to counties,
cities with populations less than one million, and law enforcement
and prosecutorial entities within towns and villages. These funds
shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commission-
er of the division of criminal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (60176) ... 40,000,000 ..... (re. $1,497,000)
For services and expenses of community safety and restorative justice
programs, which include but are not limited to, support for survi-
vors of sexual assault, domestic violence, gun violence prevention,
legal services, alternatives to incarceration, community supervision
and re-entry initiatives, gang and crime reduction strategies
managed by local governments and/or community-based not-for-profits
service providers. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote (60177) ...........................
7,300,000 ......................................... (re. $3,819,000)
For services and expenses of criminal and/or civil legal services in
counties upstate New York. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state

166 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call (60178) .....................
3,500,000 ........................................... (re. $796,000)
For additional services and expenses of gun violence prevention,
street outreach, antiviolence shooting/violence reduction programs
managed by local governments and/or community-based not-for-profits
service providers. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote (60179) ...........................
1,540,000 ......................................... (re. $1,177,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Legal Services (60093) ...
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District Womens Bar Associ-
ation Legal Project Inc (60040) ... 160,000 ......... (re. $114,000)
For services and expenses of [the Center for Court Innovation -
Redhook Community Justice Center] Justice Innovation Inc. (Redhook
Community Justice Center) (60044) ..................................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Firemen's Association of the State of New
York (39758) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Huntington Youth Bureau Youth Development
Research Institute Inc (60048) ... 135,000 ............ (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services (39755)
... 175,000 .......................................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of Osborne Association Familyworks Program
in Buffalo (60105) ... 180,000 ...................... (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of Treatment Alternatives for Safer Communi-
ties of the Capital District (60058) ...............................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $53,000)
For additional payments to not-for-profit and government operated
programs providing services, including, but not limited to screen-
ing, assessments, supervision, job placement, counseling, drug
treatment, legal services, pretrial services, and restorative
justice services. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the speaker of the Assembly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be

167 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call (60180) ... 5,000,000 ... (re. $3,629,000)
For additional payment to New York State Defenders association for
services and expenses related to the provision of training and other
assistance (20999) ... 2,100,000 .................... (re. $276,000)
For additional payment to Prisoners' Legal Services for services and
expenses related to legal representation and assistance to indigent
inmates (39709) ... 1,200,000 ......................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Wing Civil Air Patrol
(39777) ... 200,000 ................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Child Care Center of New York (39756) ...
250,000 .............................................. (re. $67,000)
For services and expenses of the Fortune Society (20941) .............
275,000 .............................................. (re. $91,000)
For services and expenses related to the Legal Education Opportunity
Program. All or a portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and suballocated to the Judiciary (39723) ...............
225,000 ............................................. (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services (60063)
... 150,000 ........................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Goddard Riverside Community Center
(20373) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of [the John Jay College] Research Founda-
tion of the City University of New York (John Jay College - Prison
to College Pipeline) (20966) .......................................
100,000 .............................................. (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of Exodus Transitional Community (39727) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of S.N.U.G. Wyandanch (39775) ..............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities Program
(20258) ... 31,000 ................................... (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (20996) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Jacob Riis Settlement House (20260) ...
100,000 .............................................. (re. $21,000)
For services and expenses of NYPD Law Enforcement Explorers-Bronx
(60008) ... 80,000 ................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of the Glendale Civilian Patrol (60009) ...
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge Heights Community Center
(60109) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $162,000)
For services and expenses of Moshoula Montefiore Community Center
(60110) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of The BARD Prison Initiative (21016) ......
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Kings Against Violence Initiative
(K.A.V.I) (60111) ... 100,000 ....................... (re. $100,000)

168 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Suffolk County Police Hispanic Society
(60112) ... 20,000 ................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of [the Center for Court Innovation Youth
SOS - Crown Heights] Justice Innovation Inc. (Center for Court Inno-
vation Youth SOS - Crown Heights) (60007) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Cityline Ozone Park Civilian Patrol
(60183) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence
or aid victims of domestic violence:
Legal Services for New York City - Queens (20337) ....................
45,722 ............................................... (re. $45,722)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as
amended by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is hereby
amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment to the New York state prosecutors training institute for
services and expenses related to the prosecution of crimes and the
provision of continuing legal education, training, and support for
medicaid fraud prosecution. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20242) ... 2,078,000 ....................... (re. $228,000)
For services and expenses associated with a witness protection program
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20243) ... 287,000 ......................... (re. $287,000)
For payment of state aid for expenses of crime laboratories for
accreditation, training, capacity enhancement and lab related
services to maintain the quality and reliability of forensic
services to criminal justice agencies, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. Some of
these funds herein appropriated may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20205) ...
6,273,000 ........................................... (re. $101,000)
For reimbursement of the services and expenses of municipal corpo-
rations, public authorities, the division of state police, author-
ized police departments of state public authorities or regional
state park commissions for the purchase of ballistic soft body armor
vests, such sum shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the
state comptroller on vouchers certified by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and the chief administrative
officer of the municipal corporation, public authority, or state
entity making requisition and purchase of such vests. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations and may be subal-
located to other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are
to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (20207) ... 1,350,000 ............. (re. $249,000)
For services and expenses of programs aimed at reducing the risk of
re-offending, to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and

169 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
approved by the director of the budget (20249) .....................
3,842,000 ........................................... (re. $379,000)
For services and expenses of project GIVE as allocated pursuant to a
plan prepared by the commissioner of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget which will include an evalu-
ation of the effectiveness of such program. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations or suballocated to other
state agencies (20942) ... 14,390,000 ............... (re. $612,000)
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for
local alternatives to incarceration, including those that provide
alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs, and other related
interventions pursuant to article 13-A of the executive law.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, state assistance shall
be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(21037) ... 5,217,000 ............................. (re. $2,193,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated programs provid-
ing alternatives to incarceration, community supervision and/or
employment programs to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget. Eligible services shall
include, but not be limited to offender employment, offender assess-
ments, treatment program placement and participation, monitoring
client compliance with program interventions, TASC program services,
and alternatives to prison. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other state
agencies (20239) ... 13,819,000 ................... (re. $3,214,000)
For residential centers providing services to individuals on probation
and for community corrections programs to be distributed in the same
manner as the prior year or through a competitive process (21000)
... 945,000 ......................................... (re. $333,000)
For services and expenses of the establishment, or continued operation
by existing grantees, of regional Operation S.N.U.G. programs,
pursuant to a plan prepared by the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations (20250) .........
4,865,000 ......................................... (re. $3,935,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers for services to rape
victims and programs to prevent rape, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion or all of these funds may be transferred or suballocated to
other state agencies (39718) ... 3,553,000 .......... (re. $484,000)
For payment to district attorneys who participate in the crimes
against revenue program to be distributed according to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services, in consultation with the department of taxation and
finance, and approved by the director of the budget (20235) ........
13,521,000 ........................................ (re. $1,934,000)

170 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated programs provid-
ing services including but not limited to defendant screening,
assessment, referral, monitoring, and case management, to be
distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and approved by the director
of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations (39744) ... 946,000 ...................... (re. $603,000)
For services and expenses of law enforcement agencies, for gang
prevention youth programs in Nassau and/or Suffolk counties and law
enforcement agencies may consult with community-based organizations
and/or schools, pursuant to a plan by the commissioner of criminal
justice services (20238) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses related to state and local crime reduction,
youth justice and gang prevention programs, including but not limit-
ed to street outreach, crime analysis, research, and
shooting/violence reduction programs. Funds appropriated herein
shall be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner
of criminal justice services and approved by the director of the
budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (39797) .........
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,681,000)
For additional services of State and local crime reduction, youth
justice and gang prevention programs, including but not limited to
street outreach, crime analysis, research, and shooting/violence
reduction programs. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the speaker of the Assembly and the director of the
budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an
assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, up to $2.5 million from this
appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency or authority including but not limited to the
office of children and family services, pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the speaker of the Assembly and the director of the
budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an
assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (60107) ..............
8,500,000 ......................................... (re. $6,354,000)
For additional payment to New York state defenders association for
services and expenses related to the provision of training and other
assistance (20999) ... 1,059,000 .................... (re. $154,000)
For additional payment to prisoners' legal services for services and
expenses related to legal representation and assistance to indigent
inmates (39709) ... 750,000 .......................... (re. $61,000)

171 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Neighborhood Legal Services (20393) ...
400,000 ............................................. (re. $173,000)
For services and expenses of Child Care Center of New York (39756) ...
250,000 .............................................. (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses related to the Legal Education Opportunity
Program. All or a portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and suballocated to the Judiciary (39723) ...............
225,000 .............................................. (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of the Fortune Society (20941) .............
200,000 .............................................. (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of Bailey House - Project FIRST (20943) ...
100,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of [the John Jay College] Research Founda-
tion of the City University of New York (John Jay College - Prison
to College Pipeline) (20966) .......................................
100,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of [the Center for Court Innovation Youth
SOS - Crown Heights] Justice Innovation Inc. (Center for Court Inno-
vation Youth SOS - Crown Heights) (60007) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Mohawk Consortium (39726) ...........
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses for Center for Employment Opportunities
(60065) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Exodus Transitional Community (39727) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities Program
(20258) ... 31,000 ................................... (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of the Osborne Association (20946) .........
20,000 ................................................ (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (20996) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Jacob Riis Settlement House (20260) ...
100,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of NYPD Law Enforcement Explorers-Bronx
(60008) ... 80,000 ................................... (re. $66,000)
For services and expenses of the Glendale Civilian Patrol (60009) ...
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge Heights Community Center
(60109) ... 250,000 .................................. (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses of Mosholu Montefiore Community Center
(60110) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $179,000)
For services and expenses of Suffolk County Police Hispanic Society
(60112) ... 20,000 ................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Staten Island Legal Services (60004) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence
or aid victims of domestic violence:
Empire Justice Center (21046) ... 52,251 ................ (re. $2,000)
Legal Services for New York City - Queens (20337) ....................
45,722 ............................................... (re. $45,722)

172 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of 100 Suits for 100 Men Inc. (60068) ......
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of 100 Suits for 100 Men Inc. (60067) ......
16,000 ............................................... (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses of 100 Suits for 100 Men Inc. - SNUG (60114)
... 20,000 ........................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of 67th Precinct Clergy Council Inc.
(60080) ... 45,000 .................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Black Vets for Social Justice (60098) ...
24,000 ............................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Immigration Partnership (60116) ...
23,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Legal Services (60117) ............
50,000 ................................................ (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Legal Services NYC (60118) ........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Defenders (60119) ..............
40,000 ............................................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal Services (60120) .........
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal Services Corp A. (60123)
... 25,000 ........................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal Services, Inc. (60093) ...
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Brownsville Think Tank Matters (60081)
... 5,000 ............................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Capital District Women's Bar Association
Legal Project Inc. (60040) ... 160,000 .............. (re. $160,000)
For services and expenses of [Center for Court Innovation - Redhook
Community Justice Center] Justice Innovation Inc. (Redhook Community
Justice Center) (60044) ............................................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of [Center for Court Innovation (Brownsville
Community Justice Center)] Justice Innovation Inc. (Brownsville
Community Justice Center) (60082) ..................................
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Safety and Change Inc. (60090)
... 24,000 ........................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Central Family Life Center Inc (60026)
... 250,000 ......................................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell University - Criminal Justice
Employment Initiative (60042) ... 100,000 ............. (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Elite Learners Inc. (60083) .............
40,000 ............................................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities Inc.
(60069) ... 156,666 ................................. (re. $156,666)
For services and expenses of Family Justice Center Forensic Medical
Unit (60131) ... 100,000 .............................. (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Family Residence and Essential Enterprise
Inc. (FREE) (39788) ... 15,000 ........................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Family Services of Westchester Inc.
(60086) ... 4,000 ..................................... (re. $4,000)

173 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Father's Alive In The Hood (F.A.I.T.H)
Inc. (60071) ... 20,000 .............................. (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Father's Alive In The Hood (F.A.I.T.H)
Inc.- SNUG (60132) ... 10,000 ......................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Girls Vow Inc. (60057) ..................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Good Shepherd Services B.R.A.G. program
(60136) ... 30,000 .................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Good Shepherd Services (60087) ..........
4,000 ................................................. (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Hope's Door. (60138) ....................
70,000 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Huntington Youth Bureau Youth Development
Research Institute Inc. (60048) ... 135,000 ........... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of It's A Process Inc. (60072) .............
16,667 ............................................... (re. $16,667)
For services and expenses of Community Capacity Development Inc (Coney
Island Anti-Violence Collaborative) (39768) ........................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of King of Kings Foundation Inc. (60073) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of King of Kings Foundation Inc. (60074) ...
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of King of Kings Foundation Inc. - SNUG
(60141) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Action Center (20376) .............
5,000 ................................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Life progressive services. (60143) ......
5,000 ................................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Long Beach Coalition To Prevent Underage
Drinking Inc (60144) ... 5,000 ........................ (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Neighborhood Defender Services of Harlem
Inc. (20392) ... 24,000 .............................. (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services (39755)
... 175,000 ........................................... (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses of Northern Manhattan Improvement Corp
(20324) ... 54,000 ................................... (re. $54,000)
For services and expenses of NY County Defenders (60148) .............
50,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of NY County Defenders (60149) .............
50,000 ................................................ (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of NYIC (60151) ... 40,000 ... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of NYIC (60152) ... 65,000 ... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Opportunities for A Better Tomorrow Inc.
(60046) ... 100,000 ................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Osborne Association FamilyWorks Program
in Buffalo (60105) ... 180,000 ....................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of Prisoner's Legal Services of New York
(60156) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of Prisoner's Legal Services of New York
(60038) ... 550,000 ................................. (re. $181,000)

174 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Queens Defenders for Youth Justice Court
(60157) ... 20,000 ................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Queens Law Associates Not-For-Profit
Corporation (60100) ... 24,000 ....................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Richmond County District Attorney's
Office (39700) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Rockaway Youth Task Force Inc. (60078)
... 30,000 ........................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of S.T.R.O.N.G Youth Inc. (39774) ..........
60,000 ............................................... (re. $60,000)
For services and expenses of Safe Passage Project (60160) ............
60,000 ............................................... (re. $60,000)
For services and expenses of Save Our Streets a/k/a S.O.S (60084) ...
45,000 ............................................... (re. $45,000)
For services and expenses of Sheltering Arms Children and Family
Services (60079) ... 11,000 .......................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of Sheltering Arms Children and Family
Services - SNUG (60161) ... 12,000 ................... (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of Southside United Housing Development Fund
Corp (60099) ... 24,000 .............................. (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of The Police Athletic League (60163) ......
85,000 ............................................... (re. $85,000)
For services and expenses of The Safe Center LI Inc. (60051) .........
160,000 .............................................. (re. $95,000)
For services and expenses of Touro Law School (60095) ................
24,000 ............................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Treatment Alternative for Safer Communi-
ties of the Capital District (60058) ... 200,000 ..... (re. $60,000)
For services and expenses of Ujamaa Community Development Corporation
(60088) ... 9,000 ..................................... (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses of Victims Information Bureau of Suffolk
Inc. (60096) ... 24,000 ............................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Washington Heights CORNER Project, Inc.
(60091) ... 4,000 ..................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Counseling Center (60165) ......
20,000 ................................................ (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of The Jewish Board (60167) ................
15,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or not-for-profit service providers or
their employees providing civil or criminal legal services and/or
public safety programs and services. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, up to $3,500,000 shall be made available to counties
upstate New York. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the Senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each or the methodology for allocating such appro-
priation (60169) ... 4,130,000 .................... (re. $1,050,000)
For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers providing

175 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
gun violence prevention programs and/or Operation SNUG programs in
Kings County. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or
any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the Senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each or the methodology for allocating such appro-
priation (60170) ... 200,000 ........................ (re. $146,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of Gun Violence Research Institute or other
gun violence programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60033) ................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment to the New York state prosecutors training institute for
services and expenses related to the prosecution of crimes and the
provision of continuing legal education, training, and support for
medicaid fraud prosecution. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20242) ... 2,078,000 ....................... (re. $559,000)
For services and expenses associated with a witness protection program
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of the division of
criminal justice services. The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (20243) ... 287,000 ......................... (re. $150,000)
For payment of state aid for expenses of crime laboratories for
accreditation, training, capacity enhancement and lab related
services to maintain the quality and reliability of forensic
services to criminal justice agencies, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. Some of
these funds herein appropriated may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20205) ...
6,273,000 ............................................ (re. $48,000)
For services and expenses of programs aimed at reducing the risk of
re-offending, to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget (20249) .....................
3,842,000 ........................................... (re. $440,000)

176 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of project GIVE as allocated pursuant to a
plan prepared by the commissioner of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget which will include an evalu-
ation of the effectiveness of such program. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations or suballocated to other
state agencies (20942) ... 14,390,000 ............... (re. $790,000)
For payment of state aid to counties and the city of New York for
local alternatives to incarceration, including those that provide
alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs, and other related
interventions pursuant to article 13-A of the executive law.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, state assistance shall be
distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and approved by the director
of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (21037)
... 5,217,000 ..................................... (re. $2,233,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated programs provid-
ing alternatives to incarceration, community supervision and/or
employment programs to be distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the commissioner of the division of criminal justice services and
approved by the director of the budget. Eligible services shall
include, but not be limited to offender employment, offender assess-
ments, treatment program placement and participation, monitoring
client compliance with program interventions, TASC program services,
and alternatives to prison. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other state
agencies (20239) ... 13,819,000 ................... (re. $4,375,000)
For residential centers providing services to individuals on probation
and for community corrections programs to be distributed in the same
manner as the prior year or through a competitive process (21000)
... 945,000 ......................................... (re. $317,000)
For services and expenses of the establishment, or continued operation
by existing grantees, of regional Operation S.N.U.G. programs,
pursuant to a plan prepared by the division of criminal justice
services and approved by the director of the budget. A portion of
these funds may be transferred to state operations (20250) .........
4,865,000 ........................................... (re. $898,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers for services to rape
victims and programs to prevent rape, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion or all of these funds may be transferred or suballocated to
other state agencies (39718) ... 3,553,000 .......... (re. $435,000)
For payment to district attorneys who participate in the crimes
against revenue program to be distributed according to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice
services, in consultation with the department of taxation and
finance, and approved by the director of the budget (20235) ........
13,521,000 .......................................... (re. $692,000)
For payment to not-for-profit and government operated programs provid-
ing services including but not limited to defendant screening,
assessment, referral, monitoring, and case management, to be

177 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of the
division of criminal justice services and approved by the director
of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations (39744) ... 946,000 ...................... (re. $211,000)
For services and expenses of law enforcement agencies, for gang
prevention youth programs in Nassau and/or Suffolk counties and law
enforcement agencies may consult with community-based organizations
and/or schools, pursuant to a plan by the commissioner of criminal
justice services (20238) ... 500,000 ................ (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses related to state and local crime reduction,
youth justice and gang prevention programs, including but not limit-
ed to street outreach, crime analysis, research, and shooting/
violence reduction programs. Funds appropriated herein shall be
expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of crimi-
nal justice services and approved by the director of the budget. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and/or
suballocated to other state agencies (39797) .......................
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,331,000)
For additional payment to New York state defenders association for
services and expenses related to the provision of training and other
assistance (20999) ... 1,059,000 .................... (re. $188,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services NYC-DREAM Clinics (20968)
... 150,000 ........................................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of Southside United HDFC (60062) ...........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Child Care Center of New York (39756) ...
250,000 ............................................. (re. $119,000)
For services and expenses related to the Legal Education Opportunity
Program. All or a portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and suballocated to the Judiciary (39723) ...............
225,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Fortune Society (20941) .............
200,000 .............................................. (re. $51,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services (60063)
... 175,000 .......................................... (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of Bailey House-Project FIRST (20943) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of [the John Jay College] Research Founda-
tion of the City University of New York (John Jay College - Prison
to College Pipeline) (20966) .......................................
100,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of [the Center for Court Innovation Youth
SOS - Crown Heights] Justice Innovation Inc. (Center for Court Inno-
vation Youth SOS - Crown Heights) (60007) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Exodus Transitional Community (39727) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities Program
(20258) ... 44,000 ................................... (re. $44,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (20996) ... 26,000 ............................ (re. $26,000)

178 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of NYPD Law Enforcement Explorers-Bronx
(60008) ... 80,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Glendale Civilian Patrol (60009) ...
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence
or aid victims of domestic violence:
Legal Services for New York City - Queens (20337) ....................
45,722 ............................................... (re. $45,722)
My Sisters' Place (20340) ... 45,722 .................... (re. $2,000)
Nassau Coalition Against Domestic Violence, Inc. (20341) .............
45,722 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
Volunteer Legal Services Project of Monroe County (21043) ............
45,722 ............................................... (re. $45,722)
For services and expenses of 100 Suits for 100 Men (60067) ...........
15,667 ............................................... (re. $15,667)
For services and expenses of 100 Suits for 100 Men (60068) ...........
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities, Inc
(60069) ... 156,666 ................................. (re. $156,666)
For services and expenses of Father's Alive In The Hood (F.A.I.T.H)
Inc. (60070) ... 10,000 ............................... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of Father's Alive In The Hood (F.A.I.T.H)
Inc (60071) ... 20,000 ............................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of It's A Process Inc (60072) ..............
16,667 ............................................... (re. $16,667)
For services and expenses of King of Kings Foundation Inc (60073) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of King of Kings Foundation Inc. (60074) ...
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Rockaway Youth Task Force, Inc. (60078)
... 30,000 ........................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Sheltering Arms Children and Family
Services (60079) ... 11,000 .......................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of Brownsville Think Tank Matters (60081)
... 5,000 ............................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of [Center for Court Innovation (Brownsville
Community Justice Center)] Justice Innovation Inc. (Brownsville
Community Justice Center) (60082) ..................................
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Save Our Streets (S.O.S) (60084) ........
45,000 ............................................... (re. $45,000)
For services and expenses of Central Family Life Center Inc (60026)
... 250,000 ......................................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Community Center of Greater Coney
Island Inc (39779) ... 250,000 ........................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Good Shepherd Services (60087) ..........
4,000 ................................................. (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Ujamaa Community Development Corporation
(60088) ... 9,000 ..................................... (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses of Neighborhood Defender Service of Harlem
Inc (20392) ... 24,000 ............................... (re. $24,000)

179 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Treatment Alternatives for Safer Communi-
ties of the Capital District (60058) ... 200,000 ..... (re. $41,000)
For services and expenses of Huntington Youth Bureau Youth Development
Research Institute Inc. (60048) ... 135,000 ........... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Jacob A Riis Neighborhood Settlement 696
Building Queensbridge (60043) ... 25,000 ............. (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of New York County Defender Services (39755)
... 175,000 .......................................... (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses of Washington Heights CORNER Project, Inc
(60091) ... 4,000 ..................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Northern Manhattan Improvement Corp
(20324) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of The Safe Center LI Inc. (60051) .........
160,000 .............................................. (re. $57,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Legal Services (60093) .........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Touro Law School (60095) ................
24,000 ............................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Black Vets for Social Justice (60098) ...
24,000 ............................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of [Center for Court Innovation - Redhook
Community Justice Center] Justice Innovation Inc. (Redhook Community
Justice Center) (60044) ............................................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Girl Vow Inc (60057) ....................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses of Southside United Housing Development Fund
Corp (60099) ... 24,000 .............................. (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Make the Road NY (20389) ................
90,000 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Queens Law Associates Not-For-Profit
Corporation (60100) ... 24,000 ....................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Prisoner Legal Services of NY (60038) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $39,000)
For services and expenses of Mohawk Consortium - Hamilton College
(60060) ... 90,000 ................................... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services NYC (20385) ..............
24,000 ............................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services for New York City (LSNY)
(20312) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Regional Economic Community Action
Program Inc (60102) ... 70,000 ....................... (re. $70,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies including law enforcement agencies, and/or not-
for-profit providers or their employees providing programs designed
to reduce crime and prevent gang violence through community engage-
ment. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan approved by the temporary
president of the Senate and the director of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be

180 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
received by each or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation (60106) ... 600,000 ........................... (re. $403,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan approved by the temporary president of the Senate
and the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized
list of grantees with the amount to be received by each or the meth-
odology for allocating such appropriation (20982) ..................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $38,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the Gun Violence Research Insti-
tute to be disbursed in collaboration with higher education insti-
tutions or other gun violence programs. Notwithstanding section 24
of the state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60033) ........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of Cure Violence (SNUG) or gun violence
programs within Kings County. Notwithstanding section 24 of the
state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the direc-
tor of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of gran-
tees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for
allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included
in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60036) ................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $127,000)
For services and expenses of the establishment of S.N.U.G. programs or
gun violence programs within Queens County. Notwithstanding section
24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such

181 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60037) ........
470,000 ............................................. (re. $370,000)
For services and expenses related to the gun violence research insti-
tute to be disbursed in collaboration with higher education insti-
tutions or other gun violence programs. Notwithstanding section 24
of the state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60033) ........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Crime Identification and Technology Account - 25475
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to identification technology grants
including, but not limited to, crime lab improvement and DNA
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20204) ...
2,250,000 ......................................... (re. $2,250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to identification technology grants
including, but not limited to, crime lab improvement and DNA
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20204) ...
2,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,974,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to identification technology grants
including, but not limited to, crime lab improvement and DNA
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20204) ...
2,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,355,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to identification technology grants
including, but not limited to, crime lab improvement and DNA
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20204) ...
2,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,413,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to identification technology grants
including, but not limited to, crime lab improvement and DNA

182 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20204) ...
2,250,000 ........................................... (re. $408,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to identification technology grants
including, but not limited to, crime lab improvement and DNA
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20204) ...
2,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,044,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
DCJS Miscellaneous Discretionary Account - 25470
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder-
al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime,
support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and
assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20202)
... 26,500,000 ................................... (re. $26,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder-
al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime,
support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and
assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20202)
... 13,000,000 ................................... (re. $12,915,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder-
al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime,
support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and
assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20202)
... 13,000,000 ................................... (re. $10,785,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder-
al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime,
support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and
assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20202)
... 13,000,000 ................................... (re. $11,953,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder-
al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime,
support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and
assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state

183 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20202)
... 13,000,000 ................................... (re. $11,939,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder-
al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime,
support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and
assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state
operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20202)
... 13,000,000 ................................... (re. $11,597,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Edward Byrne Memorial Grant Account - 25540
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial
justice assistance formula program, including enhanced prosecution,
enhanced defense, local law enforcement programs, youth violence
and/or crime reduction programs, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, and judicial diversion and alternative to incarceration
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209) .........
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $5,400,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the
Assembly and the director of the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in an assembly resolution calling for the
expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to the assembly upon a roll
call vote (60032) ... 300,000 ....................... (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing drug, anti-violence, crime control, and prevention
programs, including but not limited to; youth violence and/or crime
reduction programs, enhanced defense, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, judicial diversion, alternative to incarceration programs,
support for survivors of domestic violence, gun violence prevention,
community supervision, gang and crime reduction strategies, and
local law enforcement programs. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated
or transferred between any state department, agency or authority
including but not limited to the office of victim services, the
office for the prevention of domestic violence, the division of
homeland security and emergency services, and the office of indigent
legal services, to effectuate the intent of this appropriation with

184 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the approval of the temporary president of senate and the director
of the division of the budget. Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the division
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (20997) ................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial
justice assistance formula program, including enhanced prosecution,
enhanced defense, local law enforcement programs, youth violence
and/or crime reduction programs, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, and judicial diversion and alternative to incarceration
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209) .........
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $4,580,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the speaker of the Assembly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call vote (60032) ... 300,000 .. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing drug, violence, crime control, and prevention programs,
including but not limited to; youth violence and/or crime reduction
programs, enhanced defense, crime laboratories, re-entry services,
judicial diversion, alternative to incarceration programs, support
for survivors of domestic violence, gun violence prevention, commu-
nity supervision, gang and crime reduction strategies, and local law
enforcement programs. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amount appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other state agencies, including but not limited
to the office of victim services, the office for the prevention of
domestic violence, the division of homeland security and emergency
services, and the office of indigent legal services, with the
approval of the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget. Provided further, notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary presi-

185 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
dent of the senate and the director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and
(ii) which is thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for
the expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by
a majority vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll
call vote (20997) ... 300,000 ....................... (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial
justice assistance formula program, including enhanced prosecution,
enhanced defense, local law enforcement programs, youth violence
and/or crime reduction programs, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, and judicial diversion and alternative to incarceration
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209) .........
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $3,312,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the speaker of the Assembly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call vote (60032) .............................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, crime control and
prevention programs, including but are not limited to, youth
violence and/or crime reduction programs, enhanced defense, crime
laboratories, re-entry services, judicial diversion, alternative to
incarceration program, support for survivors of sexual assault,
domestic violence, gun violence prevention, alternatives to incar-
ceration, community supervision, re-entry initiatives, gang, crime
reduction strategies, and local law enforcement programs, managed by
local governments and/or community-based not-for-profits service
providers. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
amount appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred
between other state agencies, including but not limited to the
department of corrections and community supervision, the office of
indigent legal services, the office of victim services, and the
office for the prevention of domestic violence, with the approval of
the temporary president of the senate and the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the state finance law or
any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate

186 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the Senate upon a roll call vote (20997) ...........................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial
justice assistance formula program, including enhanced prosecution,
enhanced defense, local law enforcement programs, youth violence
and/or crime reduction programs, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, and judicial diversion and alternative to incarceration
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209) .........
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $4,743,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the speaker of the Assembly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call vote (60032) .............................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $127,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs, law enforcement and alternatives to incarcera-
tion programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law
or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote (20997) ...........................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial
justice assistance formula program, including enhanced prosecution,
enhanced defense, local law enforcement programs, youth violence
and/or crime reduction programs, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, and judicial diversion and alternative to incarceration
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209) .........
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $2,405,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the
state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds

187 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and the director of the
budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation (60032) ... 300,000 ............... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs, law enforcement and alternatives to incarcera-
tion programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law
or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the Senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each or the methodology for allocating such appro-
priation (20997) ... 300,000 ........................ (re. $176,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial
justice assistance formula program, including enhanced prosecution,
enhanced defense, local law enforcement programs, youth violence
and/or crime reduction programs, crime laboratories, re-entry
services, and judicial diversion and alternative to incarceration
programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209) .........
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $2,610,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the
state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
approved by the speaker of the assembly and the director of the
budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation (60032) ... 300,000 ............... (re. $74,000)
For services and expenses of drug, violence, and crime control and
prevention programs, law enforcement and alternatives to incarcera-
tion programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law
or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan approved by the
temporary president of the Senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each or the methodology for allocating such appro-
priation (20997) ... 300,000 ......................... (re. $82,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Formula Account - 25436
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act in
accordance with a distribution plan determined by the juvenile
justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services. A portion of these funds may be

188 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20213) ... 2,050,000 .............. (re. $2,050,000)
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
title V of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of
1974, as amended for local delinquency prevention programs, includ-
ing sub-allocation to state operations for the administration of
this grant in accordance with a distribution plan determined by the
juvenile justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services.
For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and
delinquency prevention formula account. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20215) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act in
accordance with a distribution plan determined by the juvenile
justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20213) ... 2,050,000 .............. (re. $2,050,000)
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
title V of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of
1974, as amended for local delinquency prevention programs, includ-
ing sub-allocation to state operations for the administration of
this grant in accordance with a distribution plan determined by the
juvenile justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services.
For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and
delinquency prevention formula account. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20215) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act in
accordance with a distribution plan determined by the juvenile
justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20213) ... 2,050,000 .............. (re. $2,050,000)
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
title V of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of
1974, as amended for local delinquency prevention programs, includ-
ing sub-allocation to state operations for the administration of
this grant in accordance with a distribution plan determined by the
juvenile justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services.
For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and
delinquency prevention formula account. A portion of these funds may

189 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20215) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act in
accordance with a distribution plan determined by the juvenile
justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20213) ... 2,050,000 .............. (re. $2,050,000)
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
title V of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of
1974, as amended for local delinquency prevention programs, includ-
ing sub-allocation to state operations for the administration of
this grant in accordance with a distribution plan determined by the
juvenile justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services.
For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and
delinquency prevention formula account. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20215) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act in
accordance with a distribution plan determined by the juvenile
justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20213) ... 2,050,000 .............. (re. $2,050,000)
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
title V of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of
1974, as amended for local delinquency prevention programs, includ-
ing sub-allocation to state operations for the administration of
this grant in accordance with a distribution plan determined by the
juvenile justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services.
For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and
delinquency prevention formula account. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20215) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
the federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act in
accordance with a distribution plan determined by the juvenile
justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of criminal justice services. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20213) ... 2,050,000 ................ (re. $872,000)

190 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to the provisions of
title V of the juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of
1974, as amended for local delinquency prevention programs, includ-
ing sub-allocation to state operations for the administration of
this grant in accordance with a distribution plan determined by the
juvenile justice advisory group and affirmed by the commissioner of
the division of criminal justice services.
For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and
delinquency prevention formula account. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20215) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Violence Against Women Account - 25477
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to an expenditure
plan developed by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, provided however that up to 10 percent of the
amount herein appropriated may be used for program administration. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20216) ................
7,400,000 ......................................... (re. $7,400,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to an expenditure
plan developed by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, provided however that up to 10 percent of the
amount herein appropriated may be used for program administration. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20216) ................
7,400,000 ......................................... (re. $6,284,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to an expenditure
plan developed by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, provided however that up to 10 percent of the
amount herein appropriated may be used for program administration. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20216) ................
6,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,166,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to an expenditure
plan developed by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, provided however that up to 10 percent of the
amount herein appropriated may be used for program administration. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20216) ................
6,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,716,000)

191 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to an expenditure
plan developed by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, provided however that up to 10 percent of the
amount herein appropriated may be used for program administration. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20216) ................
6,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,163,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payment of federal aid to localities pursuant to an expenditure
plan developed by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, provided however that up to 10 percent of the
amount herein appropriated may be used for program administration. A
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (20216) ................
6,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,193,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment to New York state defenders association for services and
expenses related to the provision of training and other assistance.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20247) ........
1,030,000 ......................................... (re. $1,030,000)
For payment to prisoner's legal services for services and expenses
related to legal representation and assistance to indigent incarcer-
ated individuals. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(20979) ... 3,200,000 ............................. (re. $3,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment to New York state defenders association for services and
expenses related to the provision of training and other assistance.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20247) ........
1,030,000 ............................................ (re. $84,000)
For payment to prisoner's legal services for services and expenses
related to legal representation and assistance to indigent incarcer-
ated individuals. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(20979) ... 2,200,000 ............................... (re. $879,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment to New York state defenders association for services and
expenses related to the provision of training and other assistance.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20247) ........
1,030,000 ............................................ (re. $88,000)

192 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment to prisoner's legal services for services and expenses
related to legal representation and assistance to indigent incarcer-
ated individuals. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(20979) ... 2,200,000 ............................... (re. $191,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment to prisoner's legal services for services and expenses
related to legal representation and assistance to indigent incarcer-
ated individuals. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(20979) ... 2,200,000 ................................ (re. $77,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment to New York state defenders association for services and
expenses related to the provision of training and other assistance.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20247) ........
1,030,000 ............................................. (re. $5,000)
For defense services to be distributed in the same manner as the prior
year or through a competitive process. The funds hereby appropriated
are to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (20246) ... 7,658,000 ............. (re. $139,000)
For payment to prisoner's legal services for services and expenses
related to legal representation and assistance to indigent inmates.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20979) ........
2,200,000 ........................................... (re. $182,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payment to New York state defenders association for services and
expenses related to the provision of training and other assistance.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20247) ........
1,030,000 ............................................ (re. $25,000)
For defense services to be distributed in the same manner as the prior
year or through a competitive process. The funds hereby appropriated
are to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (20246) ... 7,658,000 ............. (re. $133,000)
For payment to prisoner's legal services for services and expenses
related to legal representation and assistance to indigent inmates.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20979) ........
2,200,000 ........................................... (re. $599,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Medical Cannabis Fund
Medical Cannabis Law Enforcement Account - 23753
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For a program of discretionary grants to state and local law enforce-
ment agencies that demonstrate a need relating to title 5-A of arti-

193 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
cle 33 of the public health law. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20235) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $2,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For a program of discretionary grants to state and local law enforce-
ment agencies that demonstrate a need relating to title 5-A of arti-
cle 33 of the public health law. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20235) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $2,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For a program of discretionary grants to state and local law enforce-
ment agencies that demonstrate a need relating to title 5-A of arti-
cle 33 of the public health law. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20235) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For a program of discretionary grants to state and local law enforce-
ment agencies that demonstrate a need relating to title 5-A of arti-
cle 33 of the public health law. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (20235) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $200,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Criminal Justice Improvement Account - 21945
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For grants to rape crisis centers for services to rape victims and
programs to prevent rape. A portion of these funds maybe transferred
or suballocated to other state agencies, and distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner or director of the recipient
agency and approved by the director of the budget (39718) ..........
2,788,000 ......................................... (re. $1,048,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For grants to rape crisis centers for services to rape victims and
programs to prevent rape. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies, and distributed
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner or director of the
recipient agency and approved by the director of the budget (39718)
... 2,788,000 ....................................... (re. $436,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For grants to rape crisis centers for services to rape victims and
programs to prevent rape. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies, and distributed
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner or director of the
recipient agency and approved by the director of the budget (39718)
... 2,788,000 ....................................... (re. $433,000)

194 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For grants to rape crisis centers for services to rape victims and
programs to prevent rape. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies, and distributed
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner or director of the
recipient agency and approved by the director of the budget (39718)
... 2,788,000 ....................................... (re. $402,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Criminal Justice Discovery Compensation Account - 22248
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, litigation readiness, and pretrial services.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be limited to counties,
cities with populations less than one million, and law enforcement
and prosecutorial entities within towns and villages. These funds
shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commission-
er of the division of criminal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (39799) .....................................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, litigation readiness, and pretrial services.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be limited to counties,
cities with populations less than one million, and law enforcement
and prosecutorial entities within towns and villages. These funds
shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commission-
er of the division of criminal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (39799) .....................................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, litigation readiness, and pretrial services.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be limited to counties,
cities with populations less than one million, and law enforcement
and prosecutorial entities within towns and villages. These funds
shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commission-
er of the division of criminal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget.

195 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, of the amounts appropriated herein, $10,000,000 may be
made available for services and expenses related to state and local
crime reduction, youth justice and gang prevention programs, includ-
ing but not limited to street outreach, crime analysis, research,
and shooting/violence reduction programs (39799) ...................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $23,891,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to discovery implementation, includ-
ing but not limited to digital evidence transmission technology,
administrative support, computers, hardware and operating software,
data connectivity, development of training materials, staff train-
ing, overtime costs, litigation readiness, and pretrial services.
Eligible entities shall include, but not be limited to counties,
cities with populations less than one million, and law enforcement
and prosecutorial entities within towns and villages. These funds
shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the commission-
er of the division of criminal justice services and approved by the
director of the budget (39799) .....................................
40,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,956,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Legal Services Assistance Account - 22096
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of the district attorney and indigent legal
services attorney loan forgiveness program pursuant to section 679-e
of the education law. These funds may be suballocated to the higher
education services corporation (20220) .............................
2,430,000 ......................................... (re. $2,430,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Action Center (20376) .........
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services in accordance with
the following schedule:
Access Justice Brooklyn, Inc. (20294) ... 49,574 ....... (re. $49,574)
CAPITAL DISTRICT WOMEN'S BAR ASSOCIATION LEGAL PROJECT, INC. (20311)
... 85,782 ........................................... (re. $85,782)
Caribbean Women's Health Association (20296) .........................
22,574 ............................................... (re. $22,574)
Center for Family Representation (20297) .............................
112,872 ............................................. (re. $112,872)
Day One New York (20300) ... 34,313 .................... (re. $34,313)
Empire Justice Center (20301) ... 174,725 ............. (re. $174,725)
Family and Children's Association (20302) ............................
39,496 ............................................... (re. $39,496)
Family Legal Care (LIFT) (20310) ... 39,496 ............ (re. $39,496)

196 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Frank H. Hiscock Legal Aid Society (20303) ...........................
21,942 ............................................... (re. $21,942)
Goddard Riverside Community Center (20373) ...........................
53,605 ............................................... (re. $53,605)
[Harlem Legal Services] Manhattan Legal Services (Harlem) (20305) ...
133,344 ............................................. (re. $133,344)
Her Justice (39769) ... 75,000 ......................... (re. $75,000)
Legal Aid Bureau of Buffalo (20306) ... 54,548 ......... (re. $54,548)
Legal Aid Society of Mid New York (20307) ... 65,827 ... (re. $65,827)
Legal Aid Society of Northeastern New York (20308) ...................
48,272 ............................................... (re. $48,272)
The Legal Aid Society (NYC) (20321) ... 25,000 ......... (re. $25,000)
The Legal Aid Society (NYC) (20322) ... 263,307 ....... (re. $263,307)
Legal Aid Society of Rochester (20335) ... 89,425 ...... (re. $89,425)
Legal Aid Society of Rockland County (20309) .........................
21,942 ............................................... (re. $21,942)
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc. (Monroe County) (20318) ...
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc. (Chemung County) (20298)
... 40,000 ........................................... (re. $40,000)
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc. (Southern Tier Legal
Services) (20328) ... 61,438 ......................... (re. $61,438)
Legal Services for New York City (LSNY) (20312) ......................
118,488 ............................................. (re. $118,488)
Legal Services of Central New York (20313) ... 13,364 ... (re. $9,000)
Legal Services of Long Island (60228) ... 48,272 ....... (re. $48,272)
Legal Services of the Hudson Valley (20314) ..........................
151,667 ............................................. (re. $151,667)
Mobilization for Justice, Inc. (60023) ... 43,885 ...... (re. $43,885)
Neighborhood Legal Services (20393) ... 80,000 ......... (re. $80,000)
New York Legal Assistance Group (NYLAG) (60030) ......................
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
New York Legal Assistance Group (NYLAG) - Tenants' Right Unit (60031)
... 120,000 ......................................... (re. $120,000)
Northern Manhattan Improvement Corp (20324) ..........................
89,425 ............................................... (re. $89,425)
Osborne Association El Rio Program (20325) ...........................
35,985 ............................................... (re. $35,985)
Project Guardianship (60185) ... 138,208 .............. (re. $138,208)
Rural Law Center of New York (20326) ... 21,942 ........ (re. $21,942)
Sanctuary for Families (20327) ... 163,994 ............ (re. $163,994)
[Transgender Legal Defense and Education Fund] Advocates for Trans
Equality (39766) ...................................................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
Volunteers of Legal Service (VOLS) (20330) ...........................
39,496 ............................................... (re. $39,496)
Volunteer Legal Services Project of Monroe County (21098) ............
21,942 ............................................... (re. $21,942)
Western New York Law Center (20331) ... 60,634 ......... (re. $60,634)
Worker's Justice Law Center of New York, Inc. (20332) ................
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)

197 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing civil or criminal legal services, which include but are
not limited to, legal services for survivors of domestic violence
and legal assistance and representation to indigent individuals on
parole.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or transferred between any state
department, agency or authority including but not limited to the
office of victim services, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence, and the office of indigent legal services to effectuate
the intent of this appropriation, with the approval of the temporary
president of the senate and the director of the division of the
budget. Provided further, notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the
senate and the director of the division of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be
approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the senate
upon a roll call vote (20982) ......................................
1,370,000 ......................................... (re. $1,370,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of the district attorney and indigent legal
services attorney loan forgiveness program pursuant to section 679-e
of the education law. These funds may be suballocated to the higher
education services corporation (20220) .............................
2,430,000 ......................................... (re. $2,430,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services in accordance with
the following schedule:
Access Justice Brooklyn, Inc (20294) ... 49,574 ........ (re. $25,000)
CAPITAL DISTRICT WOMEN'S BAR ASSOCIATION LEGAL PROJECT, INC (20311)
... 85,782 ........................................... (re. $68,000)
Caribbean Women's Health Association (20296) .........................
22,574 ............................................... (re. $22,574)
Center for Family Representation (20297) .............................
112,872 .............................................. (re. $30,000)
Day One New York (20300) ... 34,313 .................... (re. $34,313)
Family and Children's Association (20302) ... 39,496 ... (re. $22,000)
Frank H. Hiscock Legal Aid Society (20303) ...........................
21,942 ............................................... (re. $21,942)
Goddard Riverside Community Center (20373) ...........................
53,605 ............................................... (re. $53,605)
[Harlem Legal Services] Manhattan Legal Services (Harlem) (20305) ...
133,344 ............................................. (re. $133,344)

198 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Her Justice (39769) ... 75,000 ......................... (re. $20,000)
Legal Aid Bureau of Buffalo (20306) ... 54,548 ......... (re. $54,548)
Legal Aid Society of Mid New York (20307) ... 65,827 ... (re. $34,000)
Legal Aid Society of Northeastern New York (20308) ...................
48,272 ............................................... (re. $48,272)
The Legal Aid Society (NYC) (20322) ... 263,307 ......... (re. $4,000)
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc (Monroe County) (20318) ...
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc. (Chemung County) (20298)
... 40,000 ........................................... (re. $40,000)
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc. (Southern Tier Legal
Services) (20328) ... 61,438 ......................... (re. $47,000)
Legal Services for New York City (LSNY) (20312) ......................
118,488 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
Legal Services of the Hudson Valley (20314) ..........................
151,667 ............................................. (re. $116,000)
Nassau/Suffolk Law Services Committee, Inc. (20319) ..................
48,272 ............................................... (re. $37,000)
Neighborhood Legal Services (20393) ... 80,000 ......... (re. $80,000)
Northern Manhattan Improvement Corp (20324) ..........................
89,425 ............................................... (re. $89,425)
Osborne Association El Rio Program (20325) ...........................
35,985 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
Sanctuary for Families (20327) ... 163,994 ............ (re. $163,994)
Western New York Law Center (20331) ... 60,634 ......... (re. $60,634)
Worker's Justice Law Center of New York, Inc. (20332) ................
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing civil or criminal legal services, which include but are
not limited to, legal services for survivors of domestic violence
and legal assistance and representation to indigent individuals on
parole.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred between other
state agencies, including but not limited to the office of victim
services, the office for the prevention of domestic violence, the
division of homeland security and emergency services, and the office
of indigent legal services, with the approval of the temporary pres-
ident of the senate and the director of the budget. Provided
further, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the direc-
tor of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of gran-
tees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for
allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included
in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (20982) ................
1,370,000 ......................................... (re. $1,049,000)

199 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the district attorney and indigent legal
services attorney loan forgiveness program pursuant to section 679-e
of the education law. These funds may be suballocated to the higher
education services corporation (20220) .............................
2,430,000 ......................................... (re. $2,430,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services in accordance with
the following schedule:
Caribbean Women's Health Association (20296) .........................
22,574 ............................................... (re. $22,574)
Empire Justice Center (20301) ... 174,725 ............... (re. $3,000)
Family and Children's Association (20302) ............................
39,496 ................................................ (re. $6,000)
Frank H. Hiscock Legal Aid Society (20303) ...........................
21,942 ............................................... (re. $16,000)
Goddard Riverside Community Center (20373) ...........................
53,605 ............................................... (re. $53,605)
Greenhope Services for Women (20304) ... 33,352 ........ (re. $33,352)
Legal Aid Bureau of Buffalo (20306) ... 54,548 ......... (re. $23,000)
Legal Aid Society of Northeastern New York (20308) ...................
48,272 ............................................... (re. $48,272)
Capital District Women's Bar Association Legal Project, Inc. (20311)
... 85,782 ........................................... (re. $56,000)
Northern Manhattan Improvement Corp (20324) ..........................
89,425 ............................................... (re. $89,425)
Osborne Association El Rio Program (20325) ...........................
35,985 ............................................... (re. $35,985)
Western New York Law Center (20331) ... 60,634 ......... (re. $60,634)
Worker's Justice Law Center of New York, Inc. (20332) ................
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)
Legal Assistance of Western New York, Inc. (20298) ...................
40,000 ................................................ (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or not-for-profit service providers or
their employees providing civil or criminal legal services, which
include but are not limited to, legal services for survivors of
domestic violence and legal assistance and representation to indi-
gent individuals on parole. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other state agencies, including but not limited
to the department of corrections and community supervision, the
office of indigent legal services, the office of victim services,
and the office for the prevention of domestic violence, with the
approval of the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees

200 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the Senate upon a roll call vote (20982) ................
1,370,000 ........................................... (re. $829,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For prosecutorial services of counties, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20241) ..............
12,549,000 ........................................... (re. $15,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services in accordance with
the following schedule:
Caribbean Women's Health Association (20296) .........................
22,574 ............................................... (re. $22,574)
Empire Justice Center (20301) ... 174,725 ............... (re. $4,000)
Family and Children's Association (20302) ... 39,496 .... (re. $5,000)
Goddard Riverside Community Center (20373) ... 53,605 .. (re. $53,605)
Greenhope Services for Women (20304) ... 33,352 ........ (re. $33,352)
Legal Aid Bureau of Buffalo (20306) ... 54,548 ......... (re. $54,548)
Legal Aid Society of Northeastern New York (20308) ...................
48,272 ............................................... (re. $48,272)
Western New York Law Center (20331) ... 60,634 ......... (re. $60,634)
Worker's Justice Law Center of New York, Inc. (20332) ................
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)
Chemung County Neighborhood Legal Services (20298) ...................
40,000 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or not-for-profit service providers or
their employees providing civil or criminal legal services, which
include but are not limited to, legal services for survivors of
domestic violence and legal assistance and representation to indi-
gent individuals on parole. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (20982) ................
1,370,000 ........................................... (re. $670,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For prosecutorial services of counties, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal

201 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20241) ..............
12,549,000 .......................................... (re. $203,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services in accordance with
the following schedule:
Caribbean Women's Health Association (20296) .........................
22,574 ............................................... (re. $22,574)
Day One New York (20300) ... 34,313 ..................... (re. $5,000)
Empire Justice Center (20301) ... 174,725 ............... (re. $7,000)
Family and Children's Association (20302) ... 39,496 .... (re. $5,000)
Greenhope Services for Women (20304) ... 33,352 ........ (re. $33,352)
Legal Aid Bureau of Buffalo (20306) ... 54,548 ......... (re. $54,548)
Legal Aid Society of Northeastern New York (20308) ...................
48,272 ............................................... (re. $48,272)
Legal Project of the Cap. Dist. Women's Bar (20311) ..................
85,782 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
Nassau/Suffolk Law Services Committee, Inc. (20319) ..................
48,272 ................................................ (re. $5,000)
New York Legal Assistance Group (NYLAG) - Tenants' Right Unit (60031)
... 120,000 ........................................... (re. $8,000)
New York City Legal Aid (20322) ... 263,307 ............ (re. $17,000)
Worker's Justice Law Center of New York, Inc. (20332) ................
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)
For payment to counties other than the city of New York for costs
associated with the provision of legal assistance and representation
to indigent parolees, thirty-one percent of this amount may be used
for costs associated with the provision of legal assistance and
representation to indigent parolees in Wyoming county, not less than
six percent of the remaining amount may be used for legal assistance
and representation to indigent parolees related to the willard drug
and alcohol treatment program (21014) ... 600,000 ..... (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or not-for-profit service providers or
their employees providing civil or criminal legal services, which
include but are not limited to, legal services for survivors of
domestic violence. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the Senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each or the methodology for allocating such appro-
priation (20982) ... 770,000 ........................ (re. $304,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For prosecutorial services of counties, to be distributed pursuant to
a plan prepared by the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services and approved by the director of the budget. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of liabil-

202 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued (20241) ..............
12,549,000 .......................................... (re. $161,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services in accordance with
the following schedule:
Caribbean Women's Health Association (20296) .........................
22,574 ............................................... (re. $22,574)
Empire Justice Center (20301) ... 174,725 .............. (re. $67,000)
Family and Children's Association (20302) ... 39,496 .... (re. $4,000)
Legal Project of the Cap. Dist. Women's Bar (20311) ..................
85,782 ................................................ (re. $7,000)
New York Legal Assistance Group (NYLAG) - Tenants' Right Unit (60031)
... 120,000 .......................................... (re. $28,000)
Osborne Association El Rio Program (20325) ... 35,985 ... (re. $6,000)
Volunteer Legal Services Project of Monroe County (21098) ............
21,942 ............................................... (re. $21,942)
Western New York Law Center (20331) ... 60,634 ......... (re. $10,000)
Worker's Justice Law Center of New York, Inc. (20332) ................
35,108 ............................................... (re. $35,108)
Chemung County Neighborhood Legal Services (20298) ...................
40,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)
For payment to counties other than the city of New York for costs
associated with the provision of legal assistance and representation
to indigent parolees, thirty-one percent of this amount may be used
for costs associated with the provision of legal assistance and
representation to indigent parolees in Wyoming county, not less than
six percent of the remaining amount may be used for legal assistance
and representation to indigent parolees related to the Willard drug
and alcohol treatment program (21014) ... 600,000 .... (re. $30,000)
For services, expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by local
government agencies and/or not-for-profit providers or their employ-
ees providing civil or criminal legal services, including but not
limited to legal services for victims of domestic violence, or
veterans. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan approved by the temporary
president of the Senate and the director of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation (20982) ... 770,000 ........................... (re. $223,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
State Police Motor Vehicle Law Enforcement and Motor Vehicle Theft and
Insurance Fraud Prevention Fund
Motor Vehicle Theft and Insurance Fraud Account - 22801
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses associated with local anti-auto theft
programs, in accordance with section 89-d of the state finance law,
distributed through a competitive process. (20235) .................
3,749,000 ......................................... (re. $3,749,000)

203 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses associated with local anti-auto theft
programs, in accordance with section 89-d of the state finance law,
distributed through a competitive process (20235) ..................
3,749,000 ......................................... (re. $2,278,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses associated with local anti-auto theft
programs, in accordance with section 89-d of the state finance law,
distributed through a competitive process (20235) ..................
3,749,000 ........................................... (re. $243,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses associated with local anti-auto theft
programs, in accordance with section 89-d of the state finance law,
distributed through a competitive process (20235) ..................
3,749,000 ........................................... (re. $494,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses associated with local anti-auto theft
programs, in accordance with section 89-d of the state finance law,
distributed through a competitive process (20235) ..................
3,749,000 ........................................... (re. $409,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses associated with local anti-auto theft
programs, in accordance with section 89-d of the state finance law,
distributed through a competitive process (20235) ..................
3,749,000 ........................................... (re. $337,000)

204 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 63,822,000 190,810,000
Special Revenue funds - Federal .... 14,000,000 321,626,000
Special Revenue funds - Other ...... 0 1,381,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 77,822,000 513,817,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
HIGH TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM ..................................... 58,059,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to the
operation of the centers of excellence
pursuant to a plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. All or portions of the
funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department,
agency, or public authority (21427) ......... 12,025,005
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of

205 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 800,000
For services and expenses
related to New York Medical
College to create and oper-
ate a Center of Excellence
in precision Responses to
Bioterrorism and Disaster ...... 1,000,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in

206 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 375,000
--------------
Total ......................... 12,025,005
==============
For additional services and expenses related
to the operation of the centers of excel-
lence pursuant to a plan approved by the
director of the budget ....................... 2,724,995
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of

207 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 200,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
The Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Health Water Solutions ........... 625,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Eastern NY Satellite for
Cornell Ag Center of Excel-
lence ............................ 250,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the University of Rochester
and University at Albany
Center of excellence in RNA
research and therapeutics ........ 250,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the State University of New
York Orange County Community
College Center of Excellence ..... 250,000
--------------
Total .......................... 2,724,995
==============

208 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the
following: centers for advanced technolo-
gy, for matching grants to designated
centers for advanced technology, pursuant
to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of the
public authorities law. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary,
funds may also be used for initiatives
related to the operation and development
of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be
expended from this appropriation until the
director of the budget has approved a
spending plan (21426) ....................... 13,559,320
For additional services and expenses related
to the operation of the centers for
advanced technology pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget ....... 1,440,680
Technology development organization matching
grants, to be awarded on a competitive
basis in accordance with the provisions of
section 3102-d of the public authorities
law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full
amount of this appropriation to any
department, agency or authority. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21441) ............. 1,382,000
Industrial technology extension service.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the director of the budget may
suballocate up to the full amount of this
appropriation to any department, agency or
authority. No funds shall be expended from
this appropriation until the director of
the budget has approved a spending plan
(21435) ........................................ 921,000
For services and expenses, loans, and grants
related to the manufacturing modernization
program. All or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or
public authority ............................. 5,000,000
For services and expenses related to the
operation of the SUNY Polytechnic Insti-
tute Colleges of Nanoscale Science and
Engineering focus center in an amount not
to exceed $1,503,000, Rensselaer Polytech-
nic Institute focus center in an amount
not to exceed $1,503,000, and the Univer-

209 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
sity of Rochester laser energetics program
in an amount not to exceed $1,000,000. No
funds shall be expended from this appro-
priation until the director of the budget
has approved a spending plan (21434) ......... 4,006,000
High technology matching grants programs,
including the security through advanced
research and technology (START) initi-
ative, the Small Business Innovation
Research (SBIR) program, and the Small
Business Technology Transfer (STTR)
program to leverage resources from federal
or private sources including but not
limited to the national science founda-
tion, businesses, industry consortiums,
foundations, and other organizations for
efforts associated with high technology
economic development, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to
April 1, 2026. All or portions of the
funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department,
agency, or public authority. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21438) ............ 12,000,000
For services and expenses, loans, and
grants, related to the operation of New
York state innovation hot spots and New
York state incubators. All or portions of
the funds appropriated hereby may be
suballocated or transferred to any depart-
ment, agency, or public authority (21685) .... 5,000,000
--------------
MARKETING AND ADVERTISING PROGRAM ............................ 3,950,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For a local tourism promotion matching
grants program pursuant to article 5-A of
the economic development law (21417) ......... 2,450,000
For services and expenses of the Broome
County Community Charities related to the
professional golf tournament in Broome
County. Funds from this appropriation
shall be made available on an annual basis
pursuant to a multi-year plan subject to
annual approval by the director of the

210 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
division of the budget. Funds appropriated
herein shall not be subject to section 112
of the state finance law and section 163
of the state finance law ....................... 500,000
For additional grants of a local tourism
promotion matching grants program pursuant
to article 5-A of the economic development
law .......................................... 1,000,000
--------------
RESEARCH DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ................................... 343,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For the science and technology law center
program (81027) ................................ 343,000
--------------
TRAINING AND BUSINESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM .................... 15,470,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of state matching
funds for the federal manufacturing exten-
sion partnership program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the director of the budget may
suballocate up to the full amount of this
appropriation to any department, agency or
authority. No funds shall be expended from
this appropriation until the director of
the budget has approved a spending plan
(81053) ...................................... 1,470,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,470,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Manufacturing Extension Partnership Program Account -
25517
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the director of the budget may
suballocate up to the full amount of this
appropriation to any department, agency or
authority (81052) ........................... 14,000,000
--------------

211 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Program account subtotal .................. 14,000,000
--------------

212 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
HIGH TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(21427) ... 12,025,005 ........................... (re. $12,025,005)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of

213 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 800,000
For services and expenses
related to New York Medical
College to create and oper-
ate a Center of Excellence
in precision Responses to
Bioterrorism and Disaster ...... 1,000,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 375,000
--------------
Total ......................... 12,025,005
==============
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers of excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget (21677) ... 2,474,995 .................. (re. $2,474,995)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-

214 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's

215 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 200,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
The Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Health Water Solutions ........... 625,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Eastern NY Satellite for
Cornell Ag Center of Excel-
lence ............................ 250,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the University of Rochester
and University at Albany
Center of excellence in RNA
research and therapeutics ........ 250,000
--------------
Total .......................... 2,474,995
==============
For services and expenses related to the following: centers for
advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers for
advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of
the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to the
operation and development of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21426) ... 13,559,320 ........................... (re. $13,559,320)
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers for advanced technology pursuant to a plan approved by the
director of the budget(21678) ... 1,440,680 ....... (re. $1,440,680)
Technology development organization matching grants, to be awarded on
a competitive basis in accordance with the provisions of section
3102-d of the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate up
to the full amount of this appropriation to any department, agency
or authority. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21441) ... 1,382,000 ............................... (re. $554,000)
Industrial technology extension service. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate
up to the full amount of this appropriation to any department, agen-

216 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
cy or authority. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21435) ... 921,000 ................................. (re. $921,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of the SUNY Poly-
technic Institute Colleges of Nanoscale Science and Engineering
focus center in an amount not to exceed $1,503,000, Rensselaer Poly-
technic Institute focus center in an amount not to exceed
$1,503,000, and the University of Rochester laser energetics program
in an amount not to exceed $1,000,000. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21434) ... 4,006,000 .... (re. $4,006,000)
High technology matching grants programs, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative, the
Small Business Innovation Research (SBIR) program, and the Small
Business Technology Transfer (STTR) program to leverage resources
from federal or private sources including but not limited to the
national science foundation, businesses, industry consortiums, foun-
dations, and other organizations for efforts associated with high
technology economic development, including the payment of liabil-
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. All or portions of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21438) ...................................
12,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,000,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the operation
of New York state innovation hot spots and New York state incuba-
tors. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be subal-
located or transferred to any department, agency, or public authori-
ty (21685) ... 5,000,000 .......................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of SUNY Orange County Community College
(21603) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(21427) ... 12,025,005 ............................ (re. $7,818,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental

217 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and energy systems ............... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence

218 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 800,000
For services and expenses
related to New York Medical
College to create and oper-
ate a Center of Excellence
in precision Responses to
Bioterrorism and Disaster ...... 1,000,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 375,000
--------------
Total ......................... 12,025,005
==============
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers of excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget (21677) ... 2,474,995 .................. (re. $1,030,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operations of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of

219 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 200,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
The Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Health Water Solutions ........... 625,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Eastern NY Satellite for
Cornell Ag Center of Excel-
lence ............................ 250,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the University of Rochester
and University at Albany
center of excellence in RNA

220 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Research and Therapeutics ........ 250,000
--------------
Total .......................... 2,474,995
==============
For services and expenses related to the following: centers for
advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers for
advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of
the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to the
operation and development of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21426) ... 13,559,320 ............................ (re. $8,059,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers for advanced technology pursuant to a plan approved by the
director of the budget (21678) ... 1,470,340 ...... (re. $1,373,000)
Industrial technology extension service. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate
up to the full amount of this appropriation to any department, agen-
cy or authority. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21435) ... 921,000 ................................. (re. $921,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of the SUNY Poly-
technic Institute Colleges of Nanoscale Science and Engineering
focus center in an amount not to exceed $1,503,000, Rensselaer Poly-
technic Institute focus center in an amount not to exceed
$1,503,000, and the University of Rochester laser energetics program
in an amount not to exceed $1,000,000. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21434) ... 4,006,000 .... (re. $4,006,000)
High technology matching grants programs, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative, the
Small Business Innovation Research (SBIR) program, and the Small
Business Technology Transfer (STTR) program to leverage resources
from federal or private sources including but not limited to the
national science foundation, businesses, industry consortiums, foun-
dations, and other organizations for efforts associated with high
technology economic development, including the payment of liabil-
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. All or portions of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21438) ...................................
12,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,000,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the operation
of New York state innovation hot spots and New York state incuba-
tors. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be subal-
located or transferred to any department, agency, or public authori-
ty (21685) ... 5,000,000 .......................... (re. $4,414,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:

221 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(21427) ... 12,025,005 ............................ (re. $3,692,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of

222 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
excellence in data science ....... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 800,000
For services and expenses
related to New York Medical
College to create and oper-
ate a Center of Excellence
in precision Responses to
Bioterrorism and Disaster ...... 1,000,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 375,000
--------------
Total ......................... 12,025,005
==============
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers of excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget (21677) ... 1,974,995 .................... (re. $389,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operations of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental

223 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and energy systems ............... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence

224 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 200,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 625,000
--------------
Total .......................... 1,974,995
==============
For services and expenses related to the following: centers for
advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers for
advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of
the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to the
operation and development of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21426) ... 13,559,320 ............................ (re. $7,050,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the following: centers
for advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers
for advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b
of the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to
the operation and development of the centers of excellence or other
high technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appro-
priation until the director of the budget has approved a spending
plan (21678) ... 1,470,340 ........................ (re. $1,177,000)
Industrial technology extension service. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate
up to the full amount of this appropriation to any department, agen-
cy or authority. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21435) ... 921,000 ................................. (re. $330,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of the SUNY Poly-
technic Institute Colleges of Nanoscale Science and Engineering
focus center in an amount not to exceed $1,503,000, Rensselaer Poly-
technic Institute focus center in an amount not to exceed
$1,503,000, and the University of Rochester laser energetics program
in an amount not to exceed $1,000,000. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21434) ... 4,006,000 .... (re. $4,006,000)
High technology matching grants programs, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative, the
Small Business Innovation Research (SBIR) program, and the Small
Business Technology Transfer (STTR) program to leverage resources
from federal or private sources including but not limited to the
national science foundation, businesses, industry consortiums, foun-
dations, and other organizations for efforts associated with high
technology economic development, including the payment of liabil-

225 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. All or portions of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21438) ...................................
12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,874,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the operation
of New York state innovation hot spots and New York state incuba-
tors. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be subal-
located or transferred to any department, agency, or public authori-
ty (21685) ... 5,000,000 .......................... (re. $4,938,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(21427) ... 12,025,005 ............................ (re. $1,958,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-

226 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
gy research ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 895,455
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 800,000
For services and expenses
related to New York Medical
College to create and oper-
ate a Center of Excellence
in precision Responses to
Bioterrorism and Disaster ...... 1,000,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 375,000
--------------
Total ......................... 12,025,005
==============

227 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers of excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget (21677) ... 1,974,995 .................... (re. $316,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operations of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 104,545
For services and expenses

228 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 104,545
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 200,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 625,000
--------------
Total .......................... 1,974,995
==============
For services and expenses related to the following: centers for
advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers for
advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of
the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to the
operation and development of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21426) ... 13,559,320 ............................ (re. $5,430,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the following: centers
for advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers
for advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b
of the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to
the operation and development of the centers of excellence or other
high technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appro-
priation until the director of the budget has approved a spending
plan (21678) ... 1,440,680 ........................ (re. $1,043,000)
Industrial technology extension service. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate
up to the full amount of this appropriation to any department, agen-
cy or authority. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21435) ... 921,000 ................................... (re. $6,000)

229 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the operation of the SUNY Poly-
technic Institute Colleges of Nanoscale Science and Engineering
focus center and Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute focus center. No
funds shall be expended from this appropriation until the director
of the budget has approved a spending plan (21434) .................
3,006,000 ........................................... (re. $900,000)
High technology matching grants program, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative to
leverage resources from federal or private sources including but not
limited to the national science foundation, businesses, industry
consortiums, foundations, and other organizations for efforts asso-
ciated with high technology economic development, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. All or
portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a spending plan (21438) ........................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the operation
of New York state innovation hot spots and New York state incuba-
tors. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be subal-
located or transferred to any department, agency, or public authori-
ty (21685) ... 5,000,000 ............................ (re. $421,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(21427) ... 8,629,621 ............................... (re. $558,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and

230 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
information technology ........... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics ............................. 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 784,511
--------------
Total .......................... 8,629,621
==============
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers of excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget (21677) ... 3,395,384 .................. (re. $1,003,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses

231 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 110,944
For services and expenses

232 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 110,944
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Albany center of excellence
in data science in atmo-
spheric and environmental
prediction and innovation ........ 800,000
For services and expenses
related to New York Medical
College to create and oper-
ate a Center of Excellence
in precision Responses to
Bioterrorism and Disaster ...... 1,000,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Clarkson - SUNY ESF
center of excellence in
Healthy Water Solutions .......... 375,000
--------------
Total .......................... 3,395,384
==============
For services and expenses related to the following: centers for
advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers for
advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of
the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to the
operation and development of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21426) ... 12,370,380 ............................ (re. $2,197,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the following: centers
for advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers
for advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b
of the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to
the operation and development of the centers of excellence or other
high technology centers (21678) ... 1,188,940 ....... (re. $620,000)
High technology matching grants program, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative to
leverage resources from federal or private sources including but not
limited to the national science foundation, businesses, industry
consortiums, foundations, and other organizations for efforts asso-
ciated with high technology economic development, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021. All or
portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the

233 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
budget has approved a spending plan (21438) ........................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,883,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the operation
of New York state innovation hot spots and New York state incuba-
tors. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be subal-
located or transferred to any department, agency, or public authori-
ty (21685) ... 5,000,000 ............................ (re. $372,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(21427) ... 8,629,621 ............................... (re. $369,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-

234 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ics .............................. 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rensselaer Polytechnic
Institute, Rochester Insti-
tute of Technology, and New
York University centers of
excellence in Digital Game
Development ...................... 784,511
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Cornell University's
center of excellence in Food
and Agriculture Innovation
in Geneva, New York .............. 784,511
--------------
Total .......................... 8,629,621
==============
For services and expenses related to the following: centers for
advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers for
advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of
the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to the
operation and development of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21426) ... 12,370,380 ............................ (re. $1,266,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the following: centers
for advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers
for advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b
of the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to
the operation and development of the centers of excellence or other
high technology centers (21678) ... 591,000 ......... (re. $105,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of the SUNY Poly-
technic Institute Colleges of Nanoscale Science and Engineering
focus center and Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute focus center. No
funds shall be expended from this appropriation until the director
of the budget has approved a spending plan (21434) .................
3,006,000 ........................................... (re. $158,000)
High technology matching grants program, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative to

235 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
leverage resources from federal or private sources including but not
limited to the national science foundation, businesses, industry
consortiums, foundations, and other organizations for efforts asso-
ciated with high technology economic development, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. All or
portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a spending plan (21438) ........................
6,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,041,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses related to the following: centers for
advanced technology, for matching grants to designated centers for
advanced technology, pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 3102-b of
the public authorities law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds may also be used for initiatives related to the
operation and development of the centers of excellence or other high
technology centers. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
(21426) ... 13,818,000 ............................ (re. $2,721,000)
High technology matching grants program, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative to
leverage resources from federal or private sources including but not
limited to the national science foundation, businesses, industry
consortiums, foundations, and other organizations for efforts asso-
ciated with high technology economic development, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018. All or
portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a spending plan (21438) ........................
6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $696,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For additional services and expenses related to the operation of the
centers of excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget (21677) ... 2,276,670 ..................... (re. $48,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
Cornell University's center
of excellence in Food and
Agriculture Innovation in

236 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Geneva, New York ................. 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ........... 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton center of
excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in advanced ener-
gy research ...................... 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in materials informat-
ics .............................. 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in sustainable
manufacturing .................... 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Rochester center of
excellence in data science ....... 127,667
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in data science in
atmospheric and environ-
mental prediction and inno-
vation ........................... 250,000
For services and expenses
related to New York Medical
College to operate a Center
of Excellence in Precision
Responses to Bioterrorism

237 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and Disaster ..................... 750,000
--------------
Total ........................ 2,276,670
==============
High technology matching grants program, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative to
leverage resources from federal or private sources including but not
limited to the national science foundation, businesses, industry
consortiums, foundations, and other organizations for efforts asso-
ciated with high technology economic development, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018. All or
portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a spending plan (21438) ........................
6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $179,000)
For services and expenses of the Small Business Innovation Research
(SBIR)/Small Business Technology Transfer (STTR) Technical Assist-
ance Program (21651) ... 500,000 ..................... (re. $21,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the Merrick Chamber of Commerce (21662)
... 40,000 ........................................... (re. $40,000)
For three digital gaming hubs to be designated pursuant to proposals
submitted to the department from higher education institutions
offering degree programs in game design or game programming (21400)
... 1,000,000 ....................................... (re. $232,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For additional services and expenses, loans and grants for New York
state incubators (21679) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $400,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
High technology matching grants program, including the security
through advanced research and technology (START) initiative to
leverage resources from federal or private sources including but not
limited to the national science foundation, businesses, industry
consortiums, foundations, and other organizations for efforts asso-
ciated with high technology economic development, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2014. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation until the director of the
budget has approved a spending plan (21438) ........................
4,606,000 ......................................... (re. $4,606,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the Stony Brook
center of excellence in advanced energy research (21687) ...........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of the Buffalo
center of excellence in materials informatics (21691) ..............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)

238 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
Columbia university/NSF materials research science and engineering
center. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation until the
director of the budget has approved a spending plan (21428) ........
245,000 ............................................. (re. $245,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011: Cornell university/NSF
nanoscale science and engineering center. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (21431) ...................................
490,000 .............................................. (re. $34,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
University at Albany Institute for Nanoelectronics Discovery and
Exploration (INDEX). No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the foundation for science, technology and innovation
in such detail as the director of the budget may require (21425) ...
750,000 ............................................. (re. $520,000)
MARKETING AND ADVERTISING PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For a local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to
article 5-A of the economic development law (21417) ................
2,450,000 ......................................... (re. $2,450,000)
For services and expenses of the Broome County Community Charities
related to the professional golf tournament in Broome County. Funds
from this appropriation shall be made available on an annual basis
pursuant to a multi-year plan subject to annual approval by the
director of the division of the budget (21652) .....................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For additional grants of a local tourism promotion matching grants
program pursuant to article 5-A of the economic development law
(21282) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For a local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to
article 5-A of the economic development law (21417) ................
2,450,000 ......................................... (re. $2,450,000)
For additional grants of a local tourism promotion matching grants
program pursuant to article 5-A of the economic development law
(21282) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For a local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to
article 5-A of the economic development law (21417) ................
2,450,000 ......................................... (re. $2,450,000)

239 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional grants of a local tourism promotion matching grants
program pursuant to article 5-A of the economic development law
(21282) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For a local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to
article 5-A of the economic development law (21417) ................
2,450,000 ......................................... (re. $2,450,000)
For additional grants of a local tourism promotion matching grants
program pursuant to article 5-A of the economic development law
(21282) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For a local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to
article 5-A of the economic development law (21417) ................
2,450,000 ......................................... (re. $1,518,000)
For marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local
agritourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and
products, including but not limited to up to $350,000 for Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Broome County, up to $350,000 for the Mont-
gomery County Chapter of NYARC, Inc., up to $475,000 for Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Erie County, up to $350,000 for the Lake
George Regional Chamber of Commerce, up to $450,000 for the Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Columbia and Greene Counties, up to
$850,000 for the Thousand Islands Bridge Authority, up to $450,000
for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Sullivan County, up to
$485,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Nassau County, and up
to $160,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Tompkins County. At
the direction of the director of the budget, all or a portion of
this appropriation may be suballocated to any department, agency, or
public authority or transferred to state operations (21672) ........
3,971,000 ............................................ (re. $51,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For a local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to
article 5-A of the economic development law (21417) ................
3,815,000 ............................................. (re. $4,000)
For marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local
agritourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and
products, including but not limited to up to $375,000 for Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Broome County, up to $350,000 for the Mont-
gomery County Chapter of NYARC, Inc., up to $500,000 for Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Erie County, up to $350,000 for the Lake
George Regional Chamber of Commerce, up to $450,000 for the Cornell
Cooperative Extension of Columbia and Greene Counties, up to
$300,000 for the Thousand Islands Bridge Authority, up to $450,000
for the Cornell Cooperative Extension of Sullivan County, up to
$485,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Nassau County, up to
$400,000 for the Thousand Islands Bridge Authority, and up to
$190,000 for Cornell Cooperative Extension of Tompkins County. At
the direction of the director of the budget, all or a portion of
this appropriation may be suballocated to any department, agency, or

240 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
public authority or transferred to state operations (21672) ........
3,971,000 ........................................... (re. $121,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For a local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to
article 5-A of the economic development law (21417) ................
3,815,000 ............................................ (re. $53,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses related to Lake Ontario and Thousand Island
tourism promotion efforts (21653) ... 100,000 ........ (re. $70,000)
For additional local tourism promotion matching grants program pursu-
ant to article 5-A of the economic development law (21654) .........
500,000 .............................................. (re. $82,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For services and expenses of the Long Island Regional Planning Council
related to Fiber Optic Robotic Feasibility Study on Long Island
(21675) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce (21659) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the Long Island Farm Bureau for tourism
promotion (21684) ... 50,000 ......................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses of the Long Island Farm Bureau for tourism
promotion (21684) ... 50,000 ......................... (re. $50,000)
RESEARCH DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the science and technology law center program (81027) ............
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the science and technology law center program (81027) ............
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the science and technology law center program (81027) ............
343,000 .............................................. (re. $66,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For the science and technology law center program (81027) ............
343,000 .............................................. (re. $27,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:

241 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the science and technology law center program (81027) ............
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For the science and technology law center program (81027) ............
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For services and expenses of the faculty development program and the
incentive program (21407) ... 650,000 ............... (re. $504,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
Incentive program in accordance with the following:
For expenses related to the incentive program (81047) ................
2,920,000 ......................................... (re. $2,920,000)
Faculty development program (81046) ... 2,685,000 ... (re. $2,450,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
Incentive program in accordance with the following:
Faculty development program, provided, however, that the amount of
this appropriation available for expenditure and disbursement on and
after September 1, 2008 shall be reduced by six percent of the
amount that was undisbursed as of August 15, 2008 (81046) ..........
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,884,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2004, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
Incentive program in accordance with the following:
For additional expenses related to the incentive program (81047)
4,650,000 ........................................... (re. $741,000)
SMALL BUSINESS CREDIT INITIATIVE PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Small Business Credit Initiative Account - 22202
By chapter 103, section 3, of the laws of 2011:
For programs and activities authorized pursuant to section sixteen-f
of the new york state urban development corporation act, including
any services and costs associated with administration of such
programs and activities, subject to the limitations imposed by
federal funding requirements. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, such moneys shall be paid by the department of
economic development to the new york state urban development corpo-
ration from federal operating grant moneys deposited in the state
treasury for the federal state small business credit initiative.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, funds
appropriated herein may be interchanged with any other item of

242 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriation to be funded from the small business credit initiative
account (21694) ... 10,405,173 ...................... (re. $214,000)
For programs and activities authorized pursuant to section sixteen-u
of the new york state urban development corporation act, including
any services and costs associated with administration of such
programs and activities, subject to the limitations imposed by
federal funding requirements. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, such moneys shall be paid by the department of
economic development to the new york state urban development corpo-
ration from federal operating grant moneys deposited in the state
treasury for the federal state small business credit initiative.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, funds
appropriated herein may be inter changed with any other item of
appropriation to be funded from the small business credit initiative
account (21692) ... 25,952,157 ...................... (re. $432,000)
By chapter 103, section 3, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For programs and activities (i) authorized pursuant to section
sixteen-k of the new york state urban development corporation act,
including any services and costs associated with administration of
such programs and activities, subject to the limitations imposed by
federal funding requirements, or (ii) that provide small businesses
loans, loan guarantees, grants, including interest subsidy grants,
and equity investments to small businesses. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, such moneys shall be paid by the
department of economic development to the new york state urban
development corporation from federal operating grant moneys deposit-
ed in the state treasury for the federal state small business credit
initiative. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein may be interchanged with any other
item of appropriation to be funded from the small business credit
initiative account (21693) ... 18,994,204 ........... (re. $735,000)
STATE SMALL BUSINESS CREDIT INITIATIVE PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grant Fund
State Small Business Credit Initiative Account - 25301
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021,as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For programs and activities authorized pursuant to the New York state
urban development corporation act, economic development law, or
public authorities law including any services and costs associated
with administration of such programs and activities, subject to the
limitations imposed by federal funding requirements for program
funding, contract expenditures, services, expenses, grants, sponsor-
ships, administrative costs, and investments to support the U.S.
Department of Treasury State Small Business Credit Initiative

243 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(SSBCI). Program funding may include but shall not be limited to
loan loss reserves, collateral, loan guarantees, insurance, equity
investments & debt, and technical assistance. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, such moneys shall be paid by the
department of economic development to the New York state urban
development corporation from federal operating grant moneys deposit-
ed in the state treasury for the federal state small business credit
initiative. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be
suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public
authority. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein may be interchanged with any other
item of appropriation to be funded from the state small business
credit initiative account (21657) ..................................
600,000,000 ..................................... (re. $272,278,000)
TRAINING AND BUSINESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of state matching funds for the federal
manufacturing extension partnership program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (81053) ...................................
1,470,000 ......................................... (re. $1,470,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of state matching funds for the federal
manufacturing extension partnership program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (81053) ... 1,470,000 .... (re. $1,258,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of state matching funds for the federal
manufacturing extension partnership program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (81053) ... 1,470,000 .... (re. $1,470,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of state matching funds for the federal
manufacturing extension partnership program.

244 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (81053) ... 1,470,000 .... (re. $1,470,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of state matching funds for the federal
manufacturing extension partnership program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan (81053) ... 1,470,000 ........ (re. $8,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Manufacturing Extension Partnership Program Account - 25517
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
14,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,843,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,590,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,729,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,111,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation

245 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $3,778,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
12,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,259,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget may suballocate up to the full amount of this appropriation
to any department, agency or authority (81052) .....................
6,000,000 ............................................ (re. $38,000)

246 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule, net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements and credits:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 37,168,812,850 3,145,346,850
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 5,843,666,000 9,626,411,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 6,459,845,000 57,203,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 49,472,323,850 12,828,960,850
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADULT CAREER AND CONTINUING EDUCATION SERVICES PROGRAM ..... 229,925,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For case services provided on or after Octo-
ber 1, 2024 to disabled individuals in
accordance with economic eligibility
criteria developed by the department
(21713) ..................................... 54,000,000
For services and expenses of independent
living centers (21856) ...................... 16,000,000
For additional services and expenses of
independent living centers (23462) ............. 750,000
For college readers aid payments (21854) ....... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of supported
employment and integrated employment
opportunities provided on or after October
1, 2024:
For services and expenses of programs
providing or leading to the provision of
time-limited services or long-term support
services (21741) ............................ 15,160,000
For grants to schools for programs involving
literacy and basic education for public
assistance recipients for the 2026-27
school year for those programs adminis-
tered by the state education department
(23411) ...................................... 1,843,000
For competitive grants for adult
literacy/education aid to public and
private not-for-profit agencies, including
but not limited to, 2 and 4 year colleges,
community based organizations, libraries,
and volunteer literacy organizations and
institutions which meet quality standards
promulgated by the commissioner of educa-

247 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
tion to provide programs of basic litera-
cy, high school equivalency, and English
as a second language to persons 16 years
of age or older (23410) ...................... 9,293,000
For additional competitive grants for adult
literacy/education aid (56145) ................. 500,000
For services and expenses of the Rockland
Independent Living Center Inc. d/b/a
BRIDGES (57043) ................................. 50,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 98,596,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Federal Department of Education Account - 25210
For case services provided to individuals
with disabilities (21713) ................... 72,100,000
For the independent living program (21856) ..... 2,572,000
For the supported employment program (21741) ... 2,500,000
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for adult basic education, liter-
acy, and civics education pursuant to the
workforce investment act (21734) ............ 48,704,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 125,876,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
VESID Social Security Account - 22001
For the rehabilitation of social security
disability beneficiaries (21852) ............. 4,755,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 4,755,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Vocational Rehabilitation Fund
Vocational Rehabilitation Account - 23051
For services and expenses of the special
workers' compensation program (21852) .......... 698,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 698,000
--------------
CULTURAL EDUCATION PROGRAM ................................. 140,436,500
--------------

248 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Aid to public libraries including aid to New
York public library (NYPL) and NYPL's
science industry and business library.
Provided that, notwithstanding any
provision of law, rule or regulation to
the contrary, such aid, and the state's
liability therefor, shall represent
fulfillment of the state's obligation for
this program (21846) ....................... 104,670,000
For additional aid to public libraries
(21847) ...................................... 1,725,000
For services and expenses of the Schomburg
Center for Research in Black Culture
(55912) ........................................ 500,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Schomburg Center for Research in Black
Culture (57010) ................................ 125,000
For services and expenses of the Langston
Hughes Community Library and Cultural
Center of Queens Library (55942) ............... 222,500
For additional services and expenses of the
Langston Hughes Community Library and
Cultural Center of Queens Library (57013) ...... 110,000
Aid to educational television and radio.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule
or regulation to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein shall represent
fulfillment of the state's obligation for
this program (21848) ........................ 14,027,000
For services and expenses of public radio
stations chartered pursuant to section 236
of the education law, provided that the
funds appropriated herein shall be
distributed evenly among such stations and
shall be in addition to the annual state
aid for public broadcasting received by
each such station pursuant to such section
(57044) ...................................... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of public tele-
vision stations chartered pursuant to
section 236 of the education law, provided
that the funds appropriated herein shall
be distributed evenly among such stations
and shall be in addition to the annual
state aid for public television received
by each station pursuant to such section ..... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn
Public Library Center for Brooklyn History
(57045) ........................................ 100,000

249 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of a grant program
to expand social work services in public
libraries. The purpose of this program is
to make professional social work services
available to the public at library facili-
ties, in order to address social and
economic needs of library patrons and to
support libraries as trusted community
hubs. Grants shall be available on a
competitive basis to public and associ-
ation libraries and public library systems
located in economically disadvantaged
communities, as defined herein, to support
the establishment, expansion, or continua-
tion of social work services at library
locations. Eligible uses of grant funds
shall include, but not be limited to, the
employment of licensed social workers by
libraries or library systems; contracts or
agreements with nonprofit organizations,
local departments of social services,
institutions of higher education, or other
qualified entities to make social work
services available in libraries; partner-
ships with institutions of higher educa-
tion to place social work interns at
libraries; shared service or regional
service models; and other innovative or
collaborative approaches that make social
work services available at public and
association libraries.
For purposes of this program, "economically
disadvantaged communities" shall mean
communities that have high poverty rates
(57047) ........................................ 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 125,979,500
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456
For aid to public libraries pursuant to
various federal laws including the library
services technology act (21851) .............. 5,400,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,400,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund

250 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Love Your Library Account - 22119
For services and expenses of the statewide
summer reading program pursuant to subdi-
vision 9 of section 273 of the education
law and section 99-l of the state finance
law, as added by chapter 303 of the laws
of 2004, pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of education and approved
by the director of the budget (23373) .......... 250,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 250,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
New York State Local Government Records Management
Improvement Fund
Local Government Records Management Account - 20501
Grants to individual local governments or
groups of cooperating local governments as
provided in section 57.35 of the arts and
cultural affairs law (21849) ................. 8,346,000
Aid for documentary heritage grants and aid
to eligible archives, libraries, histor-
ical societies, museums, and to certain
organizations including the state educa-
tion department that provide services to
such programs (21850) .......................... 461,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 8,807,000
--------------
OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND THE PROFESSIONS PROGRAM ..... 155,197,850
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For liberty partnerships program awards as
prescribed by section 612 of the education
law. Notwithstanding any other section of
law to the contrary, funding for such
programs in the 2026-27 fiscal year shall
be limited to the amount appropriated
herein (21830) .............................. 24,238,360
For additional liberty partnerships program
awards (21842) ............................... 1,862,000
Unrestricted aid to independent colleges and
universities, notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, aid
otherwise due and payable in the 2026-27

251 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
fiscal year shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein; provided that no
college or university shall be eligible
for a payment in the 2026-27 academic year
from this appropriation if the college or
university has not submitted to the state
education department a plan to improve
faculty diversity, which shall include
measurable goals and a schedule of report-
ing on progress toward meeting such goals.
Provided further, notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, no
college or university shall be eligible
for a payment in the 2026-27 academic year
from this appropriation if the college or
university has total endowment assets in
excess of $750,000,000, based on the most
recent academic year data collected in the
Integrated Postsecondary Education Data
System, as required under Title IV of the
Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended,
and reported by the Department of
Education's National Center for Education
Statistics (21831) .......................... 16,103,000
For higher education opportunity program
awards. Funds appropriated herein shall be
used by independent colleges to expand
opportunities for the educationally and
economically disadvantaged at independent
institutions of higher learning, and may
be used to support currently enrolled HEOP
students in projects that phase out
(21832) ..................................... 46,896,420
For additional higher education opportunity
program awards (21843) ....................... 3,602,000
For science and technology entry program
(STEP) awards (21834) ....................... 20,871,680
For additional science and technology entry
program (STEP) awards (23437) ................ 2,742,000
For collegiate science and technology entry
program (CSTEP) awards (21835) .............. 15,816,390
For additional collegiate science and tech-
nology entry program (CSTEP) awards;
notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, such funds shall be used to
increase funding for existing CSTEP
programs (21836) ............................. 2,078,000
For teacher opportunity corps program awards
(21837) ........................................ 450,000
For services and expenses of a foster youth
initiative, to provide additional services
and expenses to expand opportunities

252 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
through existing postsecondary opportunity
programs at the State University of New
York, City University of New York, and
other degree-granting institutions for
foster youth; and to provide any necessary
supplemental financial aid for foster
youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation,
housing and other expenses as determined
by the commissioner to be necessary for
such foster youth to attend college;
financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to
help foster youth transition to college,
prepare them to navigate on-campus
systems, and provide preparation in read-
ing, writing, and mathematics for foster
youth who need it; advisement, counseling,
tutoring, and academic assistance for
foster youth; and supplemental housing and
meals for foster youth. A portion of these
funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State Universi-
ty of New York, and the City University of
New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule,
or regulation to the contrary, funds
provided to the State University of New
York may be utilized to support state-op-
erated campuses, statutory colleges, or
community colleges as appropriate (55913) .... 7,920,000
For additional services and expenses of a
foster youth initiative (55941) ................ 609,000
For state financial assistance to expand
high needs nursing programs at private
colleges and universities in accordance
with section 6401-a of the education law
(21838) ........................................ 941,000
For services and expenses of the national
board for professional teaching standards
certification grant program (21785) ............ 368,000
For enhancing supports and services for
students with disabilities enrolled in New
York State degree granting colleges and
universities (23344) ......................... 2,000,000
For additional support for enhancing
supports and services for students with
disabilities enrolled in New York State
degree granting colleges and universities
(23394) ...................................... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of Latino U
College Access (LUCA)(23379) ................... 350,000

253 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Associated
Medical Schools of New York for the Dental
Grants Program. Funds appropriated herein
shall be available for teaching students
to work with individuals with disabilities
(23380) ........................................ 750,000
For services and expenses of On Point for
College, Inc (23382) ........................... 200,000
For the services and expenses of the Syra-
cuse University D'Aniello Institute for
Veterans and Military Families (IVMF) .......... 400,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 150,197,850
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Federal Department of Education Account - 25210
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for programs pursuant to various
federal laws including, but not limited
to: title II supporting effective instruc-
tion.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to any state
agency or department, and interchanged to
other accounts, to accomplish the purpose
of this appropriation. A portion of this
appropriation may be interchanged to other
accounts, as needed to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation (23419) ......... 5,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000
--------------
OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES PROGRAM ........................ 5,214,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Grants Account - 20191
For services and expenses related to the
administration of funds, including grants
to local recipients, paid to the education
department from private foundations,
corporations and individuals and from
public or private funds received as
payment in lieu of honorarium for services

254 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
rendered by employees which are related to
such employees' official duties or respon-
sibilities.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, funds
appropriated herein may be transferred to
any other combined expendable trust fund,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation (21744) ......... 5,214,000
--------------
OFFICE OF PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE TWELVE EDUCATION
PROGRAM ............................................... 47,646,639,500
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, for general support for public
schools for the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
including aid payable pursuant to section
3609-d of the education law, as provided
herein.
Provided that notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, for the 2026-27
school year, foundation aid shall equal
the greater of total foundation aid or the
product of 1.02 multiplied by the total
foundation aid base as such terms are
defined pursuant to section 3602 of the
education law, as set forth on the comput-
er listing produced by the commissioner of
education in support of the enacted budget
for the 2026-27 school year entitled
"SA262-7".
Provided further that, for the 2026-27
school year, the extraordinary needs count
calculated pursuant to paragraph s of
subdivision 1 of section 3602 of the
education law shall include but not be
limited to: (1) the product of the
English language learner count multiplied
by 0.60 in lieu of any other factor; (2)
the product of the average annual number
of students experiencing homelessness in
the 2024-25, 2023-24, and 2022-23 school
years multiplied by 0.12; and (3) the
product of the average annual number of
foster students in the 2024-25, 2023-24,

255 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
and 2022-23 school years multiplied by
0.12.
For purposes of this appropriation, students
experiencing homelessness shall be those
who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate
nighttime residence, including a student
who is sharing the housing of other
persons due to a loss of housing, economic
hardship, or similar reason; living in
motels, hotels, trailer parks or camping
grounds due to the lack of alternative
adequate accommodations; abandoned in
hospitals; or a migratory child, as
defined by the commissioner, who qualifies
as homeless under any of the above
provisions; or has a primary nighttime
location that is a supervised publicly or
privately operated shelter designed to
provide temporary living accommodations
including, but not limited to, shelters
operated or approved by the State or local
department of social services, and resi-
dential programs for runaway and homeless
youth established pursuant to article 19-H
of the executive law or a public or
private place not designed for, or ordi-
narily used as, a regular sleeping accom-
modation for human beings, including a
car, park, public space, abandoned build-
ing, substandard housing, bus, train
station, or similar setting. Homeless
students does not include children in
foster care placements or who are receiv-
ing educational services pursuant to
subdivision four, five, six, six-a, or
seven of section 3202 of the education law
or pursuant to article 81, 85, 87, or 88
of the education law.
For purposes of this appropriation, foster
students shall be students in 24-hour
substitute care for children placed away
from their parents and for whom the agency
under title IV-E of the Social Security
Act has placement and care responsibility.
This shall include, but is not limited to,
placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of relatives, group homes, emergency
shelters, residential facilities, child
care institutions, and pre-adoptive homes.
A child is in foster care in accordance
with this definition regardless of whether
or not the foster care facility is

256 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
licensed and payments are made by the
State, tribal, or local agency for the
care of the child, whether adoption subsi-
dy payments are being made prior to the
finalization of an adoption, or whether
there is federal matching of any payments
that are made.
Provided further that notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for the
2026-27 school year, the universal prekin-
dergarten apportionment shall equal the
sum of the UPK 4-year-old apportionment
and the UPK 3-year-old apportionment.
School districts shall receive up to 50
percent of the universal prekindergarten
apportionment defined in this appropri-
ation prior to April 1, 2027, upon
approval of the application submitted
pursuant to subdivision 5 of section
3602-e of the education law, but not
earlier than September 1, 2026.
For purposes of this appropriation, the "UPK
4-year-old apportionment" shall equal the
lesser of (i) the product of aid per
4-year-old prekindergarten pupil multi-
plied by 4-year-old prekindergarten pupils
served, or (ii) total actual grant expend-
itures incurred by the school district as
approved by the commissioner of education;
"aid per 4-year-old prekindergarten pupil"
shall equal the greater of (A) the school
district's selected foundation aid for the
2026-27 school year as of the final elec-
tronic data file prepared by the commis-
sioner of education pursuant to paragraph
b of subdivision 21 of section 305 of the
education law prior to July 1, 2026, and
calculated pursuant to subdivision 4 of
section 3602 of the education law, (B)
$10,000, or (C) the quotient of the amount
set forth for such school district as
"2025-26 4YO MAX UPK AID" on the school
aid computer listing produced by the
commissioner of education in support of
the enacted budget for the 2026-27 fiscal
year and entitled "SA262-7" divided by the
amount set forth as "2025-26 4YO MAX FTE"
on such listing; "4-year-old prekindergar-
ten pupils served" shall mean the sum of
(i) the unduplicated count of all eligible
4-year-old children registered to receive
educational services in a full-day

257 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
program, as registered on the date prior
to November 1, 2026 that is specified by
the commissioner of education as the
enrollment reporting date for the school
district, as reported to the commissioner
of education, plus (ii) the product of 0.5
multiplied by the unduplicated count of
eligible 4-year-old children registered to
receive educational services in a half-day
program, as registered on such date and
reported to the commissioner of education.
For purposes of this appropriation, the
"3-year-old apportionment" shall equal the
lesser of (i) the product of the
3-year-old maximum apportionment and the
3-year-old maintenance of effort percent-
age or (ii) total actual grant expendi-
tures incurred by the school district as
approved by the commissioner of education;
the "3-year-old maximum apportionment"
shall equal the amount set forth for such
school district as "2025-26 3YO MAX UPK
AID" on the school aid computer listing
produced by the commissioner of education
in support of the enacted budget for the
2026-27 fiscal year and entitled
"SA262-7", provided further that for a
city school district in a city having a
population of 1,000,000 or more, the
3-year-old maximum apportionment shall
equal the product of the maximum eligible
3-year-old students multiplied by the
quotient of the amount set forth for such
school district as "2025-26 3YO MAX UPK
AID" on the school aid computer listing
produced by the commissioner of education
in support of the enacted budget for the
2026-27 fiscal year and entitled "SA262-7"
divided by the amount set forth as "2025-
26 3YO MAX FTE" on such listing; the
"3-year-old maintenance of effort percent-
age" shall equal the quotient of
3-year-old students served divided by the
maximum eligible 3-year-old students, but
shall not exceed 100 percent; "3-year-old
students served" shall equal the sum of
(i) the unduplicated count of eligible
3-year-old children registered to receive
educational services in a full-day program
as registered on the date prior to Novem-
ber 1, 2026 specified by the commissioner
of education as the enrollment reporting

258 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
date for the school district, as reported
to the commissioner of education, plus
(ii) the product of 0.5 multiplied by the
unduplicated count of eligible 3-year-old
children registered to receive educational
services in a half-day program, as regis-
tered on such date and reported to the
commissioner of education, (iii) less the
3-year-old overage penalty; the
"3-year-old overage penalty" shall equal,
for districts with 30 percent fewer
3-year-old students served in full-day
programs in the 2026-27 school year than
the maximum eligible 3-year-old full-day
students, due to the conversion of the
maximum eligible 3-year-old full-day
students to 3-year-old students served in
half-day programs in the 2026-27 school
year, the difference of the product of 0.7
multiplied by the maximum eligible
3-year-old full-day students, rounded down
to the nearest whole number, less the
number of 3-year-old students served in
full-day programs in the 2026-27 school
year, provided that school districts may
apply to the commissioner of education for
a hardship waiver that would allow a
district to convert more than 30 percent
of 3-year-old students served in full-day
programs to half-day programs without
incurring an overage penalty, upon a
demonstration by the school district that
due to a significant change in the
resources available to the school district
and absent this hardship waiver, the
school district would be unable to serve
such pupils in prekindergarten programs
without causing significant disruption to
other district programming; "maximum
eligible 3-year-old students" shall equal
the amount set forth for such school
district as "2025-26 3YO MAX UPK FTE" on
the school aid computer listing produced
by the commissioner of education in
support of the enacted budget for the
2026-27 fiscal year and entitled
"SA262-7", provided that for a city school
district in a city having a population of
1,000,000 or more, the maximum eligible
3-year-old students shall equal 31,561.
For purposes of this appropriation, "eligi-
ble 4-year-old children" shall mean resi-

259 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
dent children who are 4 years of age on or
before December 1, 2026, or who will
otherwise be first eligible to enter
public school kindergarten commencing with
the 2027-28 school year; "eligible
3-year-old children" shall mean resident
children who are 3 years of age on or
before December 1, 2026, or who will
otherwise be first eligible to enter
public school kindergarten commencing with
the 2028-29 school year; a "half-day
program" shall mean a program which serves
students for at least 2.5 hours but less
than 5 hours per day; and a "full-day
program" shall mean a program which serves
students for at least 5 hours per day.
Provided further that notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, for the
2026-27 school year, the apportionments
computed pursuant to subdivisions 12 and
16 of section 3602 of the education law
shall equal the amounts set forth, respec-
tively, for such school district as
"ACADEMIC ENHANCEMENT" and "HIGH TAX AID"
under the heading "2025-26 ESTIMATED AIDS"
in the school aid computer listing
produced by the commissioner of education
in support of the enacted budget for the
2025-26 school year and entitled
"SA252-6".
Provided further that to the extent required
by federal law, each board of cooperative
educational services receiving a payment
pursuant to section 3609-d of the educa-
tion law in the 2026-27 school year shall
be required to set aside from such payment
an amount not less than the amount of
state aid received pursuant to subdivision
5 of section 1950 of the education law in
the 2025-26 school year that was attribut-
able to cooperative services agreements
(CO-SERs) for career education, as deter-
mined by the commissioner of education,
and shall be required to use such amount
to support career education programs in
the 2026-27 school year.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, funds appropriated herein may be
interchanged with any other item of appro-
priation for general support for public

260 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade 12 education program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21701) .......................... 21,900,361,000
For remaining 2025-26 and prior school year
obligations, including aid for such school
years payable pursuant to section 3609-d
of the education law, provided that
notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, funds appro-
priated herein may be interchanged with
any other item of appropriation for gener-
al support for public schools within the
general fund local assistance account
office of prekindergarten through grade
twelve education program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21882) .......................... 11,305,741,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for reimbursement for the education of
homeless children and youth for the 2026-
27 school year pursuant to section 3209 of
the education law, including reimbursement
for expenditures for the transportation of
homeless children pursuant to paragraph b
of subdivision 4 of section 3209 of the

261 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
education law, up to the amount of the
approved costs of the most cost-effective
mode of transportation, in accordance with
a plan prepared by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of
the budget provided that in the 2026-27
state fiscal year the sum of $30,000 may
be transferred to the credit of the state
purposes account of the state education
department to carry out the purposes of
such section relating to reimbursement of
youth shelters transporting such pupils
and provided further that, notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, subject
to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein may be
interchanged with any other item of appro-
priation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21746) .............................. 26,058,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
during the 2026-27 school year for bilin-
gual education grants to school districts,
boards of cooperative educational
services, colleges and universities, and
an entity, chosen through a competitive
procurement process, to assist schools and
districts to conduct self-assessments to
identify areas that need to be strength-
ened and to ensure compliance with the
various federal, state and local laws that
govern limited English proficiency and
English language learning education,
provided, however, that the sum of such
grants shall not exceed $18,500,000 for
the 2026-27 school year, and provided

262 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
funds appropriated herein may be inter-
changed with any other item of appropri-
ation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21747) .............................. 12,950,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
in the 2026-27 school year for school
districts and boards of cooperative educa-
tional services applications for funding
of approved learning technology programs
approved by the commissioner of education,
including services benefiting nonpublic
school students, pursuant to regulations
promulgated by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the
budget. Provided, however, that the sum of
such grants shall not exceed $3,285,000
for the 2026-27 school year, and provided
further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
funds appropriated herein may be inter-
changed with any other item of appropri-
ation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,

263 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21748) ............................... 2,300,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for the voluntary interdistrict urban-su-
burban transfer program aid pursuant to
subdivision 15 of section 3602 of the
education law for the 2026-27 school year,
provided that notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
funds appropriated herein may be inter-
changed with any other item of appropri-
ation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21749) ............................... 6,729,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for additional apportionments of building
aid for school districts educating pupils
residing on Indian reservations calculated
pursuant to subdivision 6-a of section
3602 of the education law for the 2026-27
school year provided that, notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, subject
to the approval of the director of the
budget, funds appropriated herein may be
interchanged with any other item of appro-
priation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-

264 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21750) ............................... 3,500,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
during the 2026-27 school year for the
education of youth incarcerated in county
correctional facilities pursuant to subdi-
vision 13 of section 3602 of the education
law, provided that notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, funds appropriated herein may be
interchanged with any other item of appro-
priation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21751) ............................... 3,850,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for the 2026-27 school year for the educa-
tion of students who reside in a school
operated by the office of mental health or
the office for people with developmental
disabilities pursuant to subdivision 5 of
section 3202 of the education law,

265 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
provided that notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
funds appropriated herein may be inter-
changed with any other item of appropri-
ation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21752) .............................. 33,600,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for building aid payable in the 2026-27
school years to special act school
districts, provided that, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
such funds may be used for payments to the
dormitory authority on behalf of eligible
special act school districts pursuant to
chapter 737 of the laws of 1988 provided
that, notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, funds
appropriated herein may be interchanged
with any other item of appropriation for
general support for public schools within
the general fund local assistance account
office of prekindergarten through grade
twelve education program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law

266 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21753) ............................... 1,890,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for school bus driver training grants,
provided that for aid payable in the
2026-27 school year, the commissioner of
education shall allocate school bus driver
training grants, not to exceed $400,000 in
the 2026-27 school year, to school
districts and boards of cooperative educa-
tional services pursuant to sections
3650-a, 3650-b and 3650-c of the education
law, or for contracts directly with not-
for-profit educational organizations for
the purposes of this appropriation,
provided that notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
funds appropriated herein may be inter-
changed with any other item of appropri-
ation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21754) ................................. 280,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for services and expenses of a $2,000,000
teacher mentor intern program in the
2026-27 school year, provided that,
notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, funds appropriated
herein may be interchanged with any other
item of appropriation for general support
for public schools within the general fund
local assistance account office of prekin-

267 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
dergarten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (23485) ............................... 1,400,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for services and expenses of a $12,000,000
special academic improvement grants
program in the 2026-27 school year payable
pursuant to subdivision 11 of section 3641
of the education law, provided that
notwithstanding any provisions of law to
the contrary, such funds shall be paid in
accordance with a schedule developed by
the commissioner of education and approved
by the director of the budget provided
that, notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, funds
appropriated herein may be interchanged
with any other item of appropriation for
general support for public schools within
the general fund local assistance account
office of prekindergarten through grade
twelve education program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21755) ............................... 8,400,000
For the education of Native Americans in the
2026-27 or prior school years. Funds

268 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
appropriated herein shall be considered
general support for public schools and
shall be paid in accordance with a sched-
ule developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of
the budget. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
funds appropriated herein may be inter-
changed with any other item of appropri-
ation for general support for public
schools within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergar-
ten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21756) .............................. 51,329,000
For school health services grants to public
schools totaling $13,840,000 in the 2026-
27 school year; provided that, notwith-
standing any provisions of law to the
contrary, in addition to any other appor-
tionment, such grants shall only be paya-
ble to any city school district in a city
having a population in excess of 125,000,
and less than 1,000,000 inhabitants, and
such district shall be eligible to receive
the same amount it was eligible to receive
for the 2010-11 school year. Funds appro-
priated herein shall be considered general
support for public schools and shall be
paid in accordance with a schedule devel-
oped by the commissioner of education and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, funds appropriated
herein may be interchanged with any other
item of appropriation for general support
for public schools within the general fund

269 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
local assistance account office of prekin-
dergarten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21757) ............................... 9,688,000
For additional school health services grants
to the Buffalo City School District for
the 2026-27 school year (55905) .............. 1,200,000
For additional school health services grants
to the Rochester City School District for
the 2026-27 school year (56029) .............. 1,200,000
For the teachers of tomorrow awards to
school districts for the 2026-27 school
year in the amount of $25,000,000,
provided that $5,000,000 of this total
amount in such school year shall be made
available for a program to be developed by
the commissioner of education to attract
qualified teachers that have received or
will receive a transitional certificate
and agree to teach mathematics, science,
or bilingual education in a low performing
school, further provided that of this
$5,000,000, a total of up to $500,000 in
each such school year shall be made and
available for demonstration programs in
the Yonkers and Syracuse city school
districts to increase the number of teach-
ers in such districts who teach math,
science and related areas and who have
such transitional certificate, and
provided further that notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law of this
$5,000,000, a total of $1,000,000 shall be
made available as a matching grant to
colleges and universities to support
programs designed to recruit and train
math and science teachers based on a prov-
en national model that results in improved

270 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
student achievement and enhanced teacher
retention in the classroom.
Funds appropriated herein shall be consid-
ered general support for public schools.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
may be interchanged with any other item of
appropriation for general support for
public schools within the general fund
local assistance account office of prekin-
dergarten through grade twelve education
program.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
financial assistance net of any disallow-
ances, refunds, reimbursement and credits,
and may be suballocated to other depart-
ments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue (21759) .............................. 17,500,000
For payment of employment preparation educa-
tion aid for the 2026-27 school year
pursuant to paragraph e of subdivision 11
of section 3602 of the education law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to other
departments and agencies to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation and subject
to the approval of the director of the
budget, such funds shall be available to
the department net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements and credits.
Funds appropriated herein shall be consid-
ered general support for public schools.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
may be interchanged with any other item of
appropriation for general support for
public schools within the general fund
local assistance account office of prekin-
dergarten through grade twelve education
program. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of

271 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereaft-
er to accrue (21762) ........................ 96,000,000
For services and expenses of the Yonkers
City School District (56043) ................ 12,000,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Yonkers City School District ................ 14,000,000
For services and expenses of the Hempstead
Union Free School District (23328) ............. 175,000
For services and expenses of the Wyandanch
Union Free School District (56042) ............. 225,000
For services and expenses of the Rochester
City School District (23329) ................... 175,000
For services and expenses of the East Ramapo
Central School District (55949) ................ 225,000
For services and expenses of the Mount
Vernon City School District (57049) ............ 175,000
For continuation of awards to eligible agen-
cies for a statewide universal full-day
prekindergarten program pursuant to chap-
ter 53 of the laws of 2014 to reimburse
such eligible agencies for the cost of
awarded programs operating in the 2026-27
school year and prior school years;
provided that up to 25 percent of an
eligible agency's awarded funds shall be
made available in the final quarter of the
year in which services are provided as an
advance on subsequent school year liabil-
ities; provided further that funds appro-
priated herein shall only be awarded to
eligible agencies which meet requirements
provided for in section 3602-e of the
education law. A statewide universal full-
day pre-kindergarten provider shall be
inspected by the department, and its
respective licensing, permitting, regula-
tory, oversight, registration or enrolling
agency or entity no fewer than two times
per school year, at least one inspection
of which shall be performed by the eligi-
ble agency's respective licensing, permit-
ting, regulatory, oversight, registration
or enrolling agency, as applicable.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the funds appropriated here-
in shall only be available for a statewide
universal full-day prekindergarten
program. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, programs that provide
services for fewer than 180 days will be
subject to the provisions of subdivision

272 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
16 of section 3602-e of the education law
(56138) ...................................... 7,000,000
For reimbursement of supplemental basic
tuition payments to charter schools made
by school districts in the 2025-26 school
year, as defined by paragraph (a) of
subdivision 1 of section 2856 of the
education law (55907) ...................... 195,000,000
For charter schools facilities aid for the
2025-26 school year and prior school years
pursuant to subdivision 6-g of section
3602 of the education law (55971) .......... 177,000,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to
provide awards to school districts, boards
of cooperative educational services, and
other eligible entities based on a plan
developed by the commissioner of education
and approved by the director of the budg-
et. Provided that at least the following
amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $21,590,000 for the continuation of
school-wide extended learning grants to
school districts or school districts in
collaboration with not-for-profit communi-
ty-based organizations pursuant to the
guidelines set forth and the awards made
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2013.
(ii) $22,500,000 for the continuation of the
master teacher program, pursuant to chap-
ter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter 53 of
the laws of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws
of 2017, chapter 53 of the laws of 2018,
chapter 53 of the laws of 2019, and chap-
ter 53 of the laws of 2022; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary,
upon approval of the director of the budg-
et, the funds hereby made available for
master teacher program funding may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such
program.
(iii) $5,000,000 for the continuation of
QUALITYstarsNY, pursuant to chapter 53 of
the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the
laws of 2016; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available for QUALI-

273 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
TYstarsNY may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made
available to the office of children and
family services for the sole purpose of
administering such system.
(iv) $5,800,000 for services and expenses to
subsidize the remaining cost of advanced
placement and international baccalaureate
exam fees for low-income students, as
determined by free and reduced price lunch
eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed
by the commissioner of education and
approved by the director of the budget.
(v) $1,500,000 for grants for the advanced
courses access program pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2018 and chapter 53 of
the laws of 2019, provided that such
grants shall be awarded to school
districts and/or boards of cooperative
educational services in order to increase
advanced course offerings for students,
particularly in districts with no or very
limited advanced course offerings.
(vi) $400,000 for empire state excellence in
teaching awards pursuant to chapter 53 of
the laws of 2017; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(vii) $6,000,000 for grants for the smart
start computer science program pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(viii) $ 1,750,000 for services and expenses
of school mental health programs pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of
the budget, pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2019. Provided further, that of
the amount appropriated herein, up to
$750,000 may be used to support the School
Mental Health Resource and Training
Center.
(ix) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the
expanded mathematics access program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2019; notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby

274 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
made available for the expanded mathemat-
ics access program may be suballocated,
interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of
New York for the services and expenses of
administering such awards.
(x) $750,000 for the continuation of the
middle school expanded mathematics access
program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2023; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xi) $200,000 for the continuation of the
New York state youth council, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for the New York state youth council
may be suballocated, interchanged, trans-
ferred or otherwise made available to the
office of children and family services for
the services and expenses of administering
such council.
(xii) $10,000,000 for student mental health
support grants to school districts, pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2020;
notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, upon approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, the funds hereby made
available may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made
available to the office of mental health
for the sole purpose of administering such
grants (23306) .............................. 76,990,000
For the college in high school opportunity
fund for the 2026-27 school year pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of
the budget, provided that the following
amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $39,936,000 for the continuation of
existing pathways in technology early
college high school, smart scholars early
college high school, and smart transfer
early college high school grants awarded

275 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
based on responses to requests for
proposals previously issued by the educa-
tion department;
(ii) $2,000,000 for grants in support of
pathways in teaching early college high
school programs, provided that such
programs shall (a) provide students the
opportunity to earn college credit, (b)
include college courses relevant for the
teaching profession, and (c) have filed
with the department, on a form prescribed
by the commissioner, a current partnership
agreement entered into by the participat-
ing school districts, institutions of
higher education, and all other partic-
ipating entities; and
(iii) $9,100,000 for grants in support of
college in high school programs, provided
that such programs shall (a) provide
students the opportunity to earn at least
12 transferable college credits, (b) offer
courses in subject areas consistent with
guidelines prescribed by the commissioner
of education, (c) provide students with
high-quality counseling and academic
support in addition to the level of
support otherwise provided to students,
(d) provide outreach to underserved
students, (e) enroll students who reflect
the population of students served in the
school district, and (f) have filed with
the department, on a form prescribed by
the commissioner, a current partnership
agreement entered into by the participat-
ing school districts, institutions of
higher education, and all other partic-
ipating entities, including but not limit-
ed to businesses and community-based
organizations; provided further that such
grants shall include an initial payment
based on the program's enrollment and
shall thereafter provide programs with up
to $90 per college credit completed by
economically disadvantaged students in the
program.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, higher education partners
participating in a college in high school
program, or the entity/entities responsi-
ble for setting tuition at the institu-
tion, shall be authorized to set a reduced
rate of tuition and/or fees, or to waive

276 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
tuition and/or fees entirely, for students
enrolled in such a college in high school
program with no reduction in other state,
local, or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher
education partner would otherwise be
eligible to receive (57059) ................. 51,036,000
For services and expenses of community
school regional technical assistance
centers for the 2026-27 school year. Funds
appropriated herein shall be used to oper-
ate three regional centers that shall
provide technical assistance to school
districts establishing or operating commu-
nity school programs, pursuant to a plan
developed by the commissioner of education
and approved by the director of the budg-
et. Provided, further, that such plan
shall establish a process for selection of
nonprofit entities with expertise in
community school programs and technical
assistance to operate such centers (55962) ... 1,200,000
For services and expenses of the my broth-
er's keeper initiative. A portion of this
appropriation may be transferred to any
other program or fund within the state
education department for these purposes
(55928) ..................................... 28,000,000
For services and expenses of remaining obli-
gations for the 2025-26 school year for
support for the operation of targeted
pre-kindergarten for those providers not
eligible to receive funding pursuant to
section 3602-e of the education law and
for support for providers continuing to
operate such programs in the 2026-27
school year. Such funds shall be expended
pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by
the director of the budget (21763) ........... 1,303,000
For services and expenses of remaining obli-
gations of a $21,392,000 teacher resources
and computer training centers program for
the 2025-26 school year (55985) .............. 6,418,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for services and expenses of a $21,392,000
teacher resources and computer training
center program for the 2026-27 school year
(23445) ..................................... 14,974,000
For services and expenses to provide high-
impact, individualized literacy and math

277 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
tutoring to students in high-need school
districts, pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of education and approved
by the director of the budget ................ 9,000,000
For services and expenses of the NYSUT
education and learning trust to deliver
training to educators on instructional
best practices for numeracy and evidence-
based mathematics instruction, pursuant to
a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of
the budget ................................... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of regional hub
pilots operated by boards of cooperative
educational services to provide training
and support to educators in school
districts with low levels of math perform-
ance, pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by
the director of the budget ................... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of a three-year
pilot program to improve literacy instruc-
tion in the Rochester and Yonkers city
school districts through partnerships
between such districts and institutions of
higher education to provide training for
teachers aligned with evidence-based read-
ing instruction, pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of education and
approved by the director of the budget ....... 1,500,000
For services and expenses of accelerated
teacher preparation pathway programs,
pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by
the director of the budget ................... 1,882,000
For services and expenses of Teach.org ......... 1,500,000
For education of children of migrant workers
for the 2026-27 school year (21764) ............. 89,000
For the school lunch and breakfast program.
Funds for the school lunch and breakfast
program shall be expended subject to the
limitation of funds available and may be
used to reimburse sponsors of non-profit
school lunch, breakfast, or other school
child feeding programs based upon the
number of federally reimbursable break-
fasts and lunches served to students under
such program agreements entered into by
the state education department and such
sponsors, in accordance with an act of
Congress entitled the "National School
Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, the

278 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
provisions of the "Child Nutrition Act of
1966," P.L. 89-642, as amended, in the
case of school breakfast programs to reim-
burse sponsors in excess of the federal
rates of reimbursement, or for universal
free school meals pursuant to section
915-a of the education law in the 2026-27
school year. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby
appropriated, or so much thereof as may be
necessary, are to be available for the
purposes herein specified for obligations
heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue
for the school years beginning July 1,
2026 for purposes of universal free school
meals under section 915-a of the education
law and July 1, 2024, July 1, 2025 and
July 1, 2026 for other purposes estab-
lished by this appropriation. (21702) ...... 395,000,000
For additional support for universal free
school meals for the 2025-26 school year
pursuant to section 915-a of the education
law (57051) ................................. 43,000,000
For additional funds to reimburse sponsors
of school lunch programs that have
purchased at least 30 percent of their
total food products for their school lunch
service program from New York State farm-
ers, growers, producers, or processors,
based upon the number of federally reim-
bursable lunches served to students under
such program agreements entered into by
the state education department and such
sponsors, in accordance with the
provisions of the "National School Lunch
Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, to reim-
burse sponsors in excess of the federal
and State rates of reimbursement,
provided, that the total State subsidy
shall be equal to $0.1901 per free and
paid school lunch meal, and $0.0519 per
reduced-price school lunch meal, provided
further that funds appropriated herein
shall be made available on or after April
1, 2027 (55986) ............................. 10,000,000
For nonpublic school aid payable in the
2026-27 school year to reimburse 2025-26
and prior school year expenses. Provided
that nonpublic schools shall continue to
receive aid based on either a 5.0/5.5 hour
standard instructional day, or another
work day as certified by the nonpublic

279 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
school officials, in accordance with the
methodology for computing salary and bene-
fits applied by the department in paying
aid for the 2012-13 and prior school
years. Notwithstanding any provision of
law, rule or regulation to the contrary,
each nonpublic school which seeks aid
payable in the 2026-27 school year to
reimburse 2025-26 school year expenses
shall submit a claim for such aid to the
state education department no later than
April 1, 2027, and such claims shall be
paid by the Department no later than May
31, 2027.
Provided further that funds appropriated
herein shall be made available on or after
April 1, 2027 (21769) ...................... 143,830,000
For aid payable in the 2026-27 school year
for additional nonpublic school aid to
reimburse 2025-26 and prior school year
expenses.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule
or regulation to the contrary, each
nonpublic school which seeks aid payable
in the 2026-27 school year to reimburse
2025-26 school year expenses shall submit
a claim for such aid to the state educa-
tion department no later than April 1,
2027, and such claims shall be paid by the
Department no later than May 31, 2027.
Provided further that funds appropriated
herein shall be made available on or after
April 1, 2027 (21770) ....................... 96,353,000
For additional aid payable in the 2026-27
school year for additional nonpublic
school aid to reimburse 2025-26 school
year expenses (23384) ........................ 1,900,000
For academic intervention for nonpublic
schools based on a plan to be developed by
the commissioner of education and approved
by the director of the budget (21771) .......... 922,000
For additional academic intervention for
nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education
and approved by the director of the budget
(21771) ........................................ 500,000
For services and expenses related to nonpub-
lic school STEM programs (55964) ............ 85,500,000
For additional mandated services and
expenses of the costs of complying with
the State School Immunization Program
(SSIP) for the 2025-26 school year;

280 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
provided further that the department of
health in consultation with the state
education department shall create a proc-
ess to certify compliance with SSIP and
such process shall be in place July 1,
2026. Schools shall certify compliance
with such process prior to receiving the
funds appropriated herein (55965) ............ 1,000,000
For services and expenses related to nonpub-
lic school arts and music programs pursu-
ant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget (57017) ........................... 5,000,000
For costs associated with schools for the
blind and deaf and other students with
disabilities subject to article 85 of the
education law, including state aid for
blind and deaf pupils in certain insti-
tutions to be paid for the purposes
provided under section 4204-a of the
education law for the education of deaf
children under 3 years of age, including
transfers to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund Rome school for the deaf
account pursuant to a plan to be developed
by the commissioner and approved by the
director of the budget.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$84,700,000 shall be available for
reimbursement to school districts for the
tuition costs of students attending
schools for the blind and deaf during the
2025-26 school year pursuant to subdivi-
sion 2 of section 4204 of the education
law and subdivision 2 of section 4207 of
the education law, and up to $9,000,000
shall be available for remaining allowable
purposes.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, upon
disbursement of funds appropriated for
allowances to schools for the blind and
deaf in the individuals with disabilities
program special revenue funds-federal/aid
to localities for purposes of this appro-
priation, funds appropriated herein shall
be reduced in an amount equivalent to such
disbursement and the portion of this
appropriation so affected shall have no
further force or effect.
Notwithstanding any provision of the law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-

281 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue and, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, such funds shall
be available to the department net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements and
credits (21705) ............................. 93,700,000
For costs associated with schools for the
blind and deaf and other students with
disabilities subject to article 85 of the
education law for the 2026-27 school year.
Funds appropriated herein shall be
distributed directly to the schools for
the blind and deaf and other students with
disabilities subject to article 85 of the
education law based on a three year aver-
age of the schools' FTE enrollment (55909) .. 21,200,000
For additional costs associated with schools
for the blind and deaf and other students
with disabilities subject to article 85 of
the education law for the 2026-27 school
year. Funds appropriated herein shall be
distributed directly to the schools for
the blind and deaf and other students with
disabilities subject to article 85 of the
education law based on a three year aver-
age of the schools' FTE enrollment (55933)
.............................................. 1,500,000
For services and expenses of the New York
School for the Deaf for the 2026-27 school
year (55934) ................................... 903,000
For services and expenses of the Lexington
School for the Deaf for the 2026-27 school
year (55934) ................................... 903,000
For services and expenses of the Henry
Viscardi School for the 2026-27 school
year (55910) ................................. 1,001,500
For services and expenses of the Mill Neck
Manor School for the Deaf for the 2026-27
school year (55995) ............................ 500,000
For services and expenses of the Cleary
School for the Deaf for the 2026-27 school
year (23338) ................................... 500,000
For services and expenses of the Rochester
School for the Deaf for the 2026-27 school
year (57019) ................................... 300,000
For services and expenses of the St. Francis
de Sales School for the Deaf for the
2026-27 school year (23385) .................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the St. Mary's
School for the Deaf for the 2026-27 school
year (23395) ................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the St.

282 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Joseph's School for the Deaf for the
2026-27 school year ............................ 200,000
For services and expenses of the Lavelle
School for the Blind for the 2026-27
school year (57020) .......................... 1,000,000
For July and August programs for school-aged
children with handicapping conditions
pursuant to section 4408 of the education
law. Moneys appropriated herein shall be
used as follows: (i) for remaining base
year and prior school years obligations,
(ii) for the purposes of subdivision 4 of
section 3602 of the education law for
schools operated under articles 87 and 88
of the education law, and (iii) notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of
law, for payments made pursuant to this
appropriation for current school year
obligations, provided, however, that such
payments shall not exceed 70 percent of
the state aid due for the sum of the
approved tuition and maintenance rates and
transportation expense provided for here-
in; provided, however, that eligible
claims shall be payable in the order that
such claims have been approved for payment
by the commissioner of education, but in
no case shall a single payee draw down
more than 45 percent of this appropri-
ation, and provided further that no claim
shall be set aside for insufficiency of
funds to make a complete payment, but
shall be eligible for a partial payment in
one year and shall retain its priority
date status for subsequent appropriations
designated for such purposes. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of
law, funds appropriated herein shall only
be available for liabilities incurred
prior to July 1, 2027, shall be used to
pay 2025-26 school year claims in the
first instance, and represent the maximum
amount payable during the 2026-27 state
fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein shall
be available for payment of liabilities
heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue
and, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, such funds shall be
available to the department net of disal-

283 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
lowances, refunds, reimbursements and
credits (21707) ............................ 437,000,000
For the state's share of the costs of the
education of preschool children with disa-
bilities pursuant to section 4410 of the
education law. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law to the contrary,
the amount appropriated herein shall
support a state share of preschool hand-
icapped education costs for the 2025-26
school year limited to 59.5 percent of
such total approved expenditures, and
furthermore, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, local claims for
reimbursement of costs incurred prior to
the 2024-25 school year and during the
2024-25 school year that have been
approved for payment by the education
department as of March 31, 2026 shall be
the first claims paid from this appropri-
ation.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein shall
be available for payment of liabilities
heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue
and, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, such funds shall be
available to the department net of disal-
lowances, refunds, reimbursements and
credits (21706) .......................... 1,265,000,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funding made available by this
appropriation shall support direct salary
costs and related fringe benefits associ-
ated with any minimum wage increase that
takes effect on or after December 31,
2016, pursuant to section 652 of the labor
law. Organizations eligible for funding
made available by this appropriation shall
be limited to special act school districts
and those that are required to file a
consolidated fiscal report with the state
education department and provide preschool
and school-age special education services
under articles 81, 85 and 89 of the educa-
tion law. Each eligible organization in
receipt of funding made available by this
appropriation shall submit written certif-
ication, in such form and at such time as
the commissioner shall prescribe, attest-
ing to how such funding will be or was
used for purposes eligible under this

284 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
appropriation. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, the amounts appropriated herein may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer to any local assistance appropri-
ation of the state education department
(55938) ..................................... 17,180,000
For services and expenses of the New York
state center for school safety for the
2026-27 school year. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used to operate a state-
wide center and shall be subject to an
expenditure plan approved by the director
of the budget (21774) .......................... 466,000
For services and expenses of the health
education program for the 2026-27 school
year. Funds appropriated herein shall be
available for health-related programs
including, but not limited to, those
providing instruction and supportive
services in comprehensive health education
and/or acquired immune deficiency syndrome
(AIDS) education. Of the amounts appropri-
ated herein, $86,000 shall be available
for the program previously operated as the
school health demonstration program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
may be suballocated, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to
any state agency or department to accom-
plish the purpose of this appropriation
(21775) ........................................ 691,000
For competitive grants for the 2026-27
school year for extended day programs and
school violence prevention programs pursu-
ant to section 2814 of the education law
provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible
entities receiving funds for extended day
programs may include not-for-profit organ-
izations working in collaboration with a
public school or school district (21776) .... 24,344,000
For aid payable for the 2026-27 school year
for support of county vocational education
and extension boards pursuant to section
1104 of the education law, provided,
however, that notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, rule, or regu-
lation, any apportionment of aid shall be
based on a quota amounting to one-half of

285 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the salary paid each teacher, director,
assistant, and supervisor, where such
salary is attributable to a course of
study first submitted to the commissioner
for approval pursuant to section 1103 of
the education law on or before July 1,
2010, but not to exceed the amount
computed by the commissioner based upon an
assumed annualized salary equal to ten
thousand five hundred dollars per school
year on account of the employment of such
teacher, director, assistant or supervisor
and provided further that payment from
this appropriation shall first be made for
approved claims for salary expenses for
the 2026-27 school year, and any amount
remaining after payment of such claims
shall be available for payment of unpaid
claims for prior school years (21781) .......... 932,000
For services and expenses of the primary
mental health project at the children's
institute for the 2026-27 school year
(21778) ........................................ 894,000
For services and expenses associated with
the math and science high schools for the
2026-27 school year in the amount of
$1,382,000, provided that such funds shall
be allocated equally among those entities
that received program funding for the
2007-08 school year (21779) .................. 1,382,000
For additional services and expenses associ-
ated with the Bard High School Early
College Queens for the 2026-27 school year
(55939) ........................................ 461,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for educational services and expenses of
the Syracuse city school district for the
say yes to education program (21800) ........... 350,000
For services and expenses of the center for
autism and related disabilities at the
state university of New York at Albany
(21782) ...................................... 1,240,000
For additional services and expenses of the
center for autism and related disabilities
at the state university of New York at
Albany (21792) ................................. 500,000
For postsecondary aid to Native Americans to
fund awards to eligible students.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the amount herein made
available shall constitute the state's
entire obligation for all costs incurred

286 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
under section 4118 of the education law in
state fiscal year 2026-27 (21833) .............. 800,000
For services and expenses of the summer food
program for the 2026-27 school year
(21784) ...................................... 3,049,000
Work Force Education. For partial reimburse-
ment of services and expenses per contract
hour of work force education conducted by
the consortium for worker education (CWE),
a private not-for-profit corporation
program approved by the commissioner of
education that enable adults who are 21
years of age or older to obtain or retain
employment or improve their work skills
capacity to enhance their opportunities
for increased earnings and advancement
(21801) ..................................... 11,500,000
For additional reimbursement of services and
expenses for the consortium for worker
education (CWE)(21802) ....................... 1,500,000
For services and expenses of the Consortium
for Workers Education Credential Initi-
ative (55967) .................................. 250,000
For services and expenses related to the
development, implementation and operation
of charter schools for the 2026-27 school
year including an amount sufficient to
support administrative/technical support
services provided by the charter school
institute of the state university of New
York, pursuant to a plan submitted by the
charter school institute and approved by
the board of trustees of the state univer-
sity of New York. This appropriation shall
only be available for expenditure upon the
approval of an expenditure plan by the
director of the budget and funds appropri-
ated herein shall be transferred to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund - char-
ter schools stimulus account (21803) ......... 4,837,000
For services and expenses of the Executive
Leadership Institute (21733) ................. 1,000,000
For services and expenses of the Magellan
Foundation, Inc. (23319) ....................... 500,000
For services and expenses of the clinically
rich intensive teacher institute bilingual
extension and English to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ...................... 385,000
For services and expenses of a teacher
diversity pipeline pilot operated by the
State University College at Buffalo for
the Buffalo City School District to assist

287 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
teacher aides and teaching assistants in
attaining the necessary educational and
professional credentials to obtain teacher
certification (55997) .......................... 500,000
For services and expenses of a $490,000
2026-27 school year program for mentoring
and tutoring operated by the Hillside
Children's Center, which is based on model
programs proven to be effective in produc-
ing outcomes that include, but are not
limited to, improved graduation rates,
provided that such services shall be
provided to students in one or more city
school districts located in a city having
a population in excess of 125,000 and less
than 1,000,000 inhabitants (21804) ............. 490,000
For services and expenses of the Hillside
Children's Center (57021) ...................... 100,000
For payment of small government assistance
to school districts pursuant to subdivi-
sion 7 of section 3641 of the education
law on or before March 31, 2027 upon audit
and warrant of the comptroller in the
amount that small government assistance
was paid to school districts in state
fiscal year 2010-11 (23449) .................. 1,868,000
For purposes of the Just for Kids program at
the State University of New York at Albany
(56005) ........................................ 235,000
For educational services and expenses for
out-of-school immigrant youth and young
adults (56045) ............................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of the New York
State United Teacher's Many Threads, One
Fabric implicit bias training for public
school educators (23347) ..................... 1,125,000
For services and expenses of the Fund for
the City of New York - Promise Project
(23348) ........................................ 300,000
For services and expenses of United Communi-
ty Schools, Incorporated (56150) ............... 500,000
For services and expenses of the Long Island
Pre-K Initiative operated by Nassau BOCES
(23323) ........................................ 750,000
For services and expenses of the Mind Build-
ers Creative Arts Center (23349) ............. 1,685,000
For services and expenses of the Queens
College Townsend Harris High School
(23350) ........................................ 250,000
For services and expenses of the BioBus,
Inc. (23351) ................................... 400,000

288 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Long Island
Latino Teachers Association (23320) ............. 50,000
For services and expenses of NYC Kids RISE,
Inc (23356) .................................... 650,000
For services and expenses of the Universal
Hip Hop Museum (23386) ....................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of the Cultural
Museum of African Art, Inc (23396) ............. 100,000
For services and expenses of the Storm King
Arts Center (57003) ............................. 75,000
For services and expenses of the Center for
Educational Innovation (23330) ................. 650,000
For services and expenses of the Underground
Railroad Education Center (57004) .............. 150,000
For services and expenses of BRIC Arts Media
BKLYN, Inc (57007) ............................. 200,000
For services and expenses of the New York
Medical College Center of Excellence in
Disaster Medicine (57023) ...................... 250,000
For additional grants in aid to certain
school districts, public libraries, public
colleges and universities, and education
and arts not-for-profit institutions.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the amounts appropriated
herein may be suballocated or transferred
between other agencies, including the
state education department, city universi-
ty of New York, state university of New
York, and New York state council on the
arts with the approval of the temporary
president of the senate and the director
of the budget. Notwithstanding section 24
of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with
the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling
for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate
upon a roll call vote (23483) ................ 7,500,000
For additional grants in aid to certain
school districts, public libraries, not-
for-profit institutions and public
colleges and universities. Notwithstand-

289 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ing any provision of law to the contrary,
the amounts appropriated herein may be
suballocated or transferred between other
agencies, including the city university of
New York, state university of New York,
and New York state council on the arts,
with the approval of the speaker of the
assembly and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the speaker of the assem-
bly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by
each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved
by a majority vote of all members elected
to the assembly upon a roll call vote
(23482) ...................................... 9,000,000
For additional grants in aid to certain
school districts, public libraries, not-
for-profit institutions, and public
colleges and universities. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred, or otherwise made available
to the city university of New York, the
state university of New York, the higher
education services corporation, or the New
York state council on the arts. Notwith-
standing any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
developed by the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation. Notwithstanding
section 40 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, this
appropriation shall remain in full force
and effect to the maximum extent allowed
by law (23318) .............................. 10,000,000
For services and expenses of the Holocaust
and Human Rights Education Center (57024) ...... 200,000

290 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Profes-
sional Performing Arts School NYC (57025) ...... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Organiza-
cion Latino Americana of Eastern Long
Island (57026) .................................. 50,000
For services and expenses of the Bronx
Bethany Community Corporation (57028) .......... 120,000
For services and expenses of the Auschwitz
Jewish Center Foundation (57031) ................ 50,000
For services and expenses of the Vocational
Education and Extension Board of Suffolk
County (57053) ................................. 150,000
For services and expenses of Literacy, Inc
(57054) ......................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Literacy Part-
ners, Inc ....................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Read to Succeed
Buffalo, Inc. ................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Renaissance
Youth Center .................................... 75,000
For services and expenses of Yaffed .............. 200,000
Less expenditure savings due to the with-
holding of a portion of employment prepa-
ration education aid due to the city of
New York equal to the reimbursement costs
of the work force education program from
aid payable to such city school district
payable on or after April 1, 2026; such
moneys shall be credited to the office of
pre-kindergarten through grade twelve
education general fund-local assistance
account and which shall not exceed the
amount appropriated herein (21701) ........ (11,500,000)
For additional expenditure savings due to
the additional withholding of a portion of
employment preparation education aid due
to the city of New York equal to the
reimbursement costs of the work force
education program from aid payable to such
city school district payable on or after
April 1, 2026; such additional moneys
shall be credited to the office of pre-
kindergarten through grade twelve educa-
tion general fund-local assistance account
which shall not exceed the additional
amount appropriated herein ................. (1,500,000)
--------------
Program account subtotal .............. 36,794,039,500
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund

291 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Federal Department of Education Account - 25210
For grants to schools for specific programs
including, but not limited to, grants for
purposes under title I of the elementary
and secondary education act. Provided
further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the commissioner
of education shall provide to the director
of the budget, the chairperson of the
senate finance committee and the chair-
person of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans
and/or budgets submitted to the federal
government with respect to the use of any
funds appropriated by the federal govern-
ment including state grants administered
by the department. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, a portion
of this appropriation may be suballocated
to other state departments and agencies,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation (21740) ..... 1,771,819,000
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for specific programs including,
but not limited to, state grants for
supporting effective instruction pursuant
to title II of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the commissioner of education
shall provide to the director of the budg-
et, the chairperson of the senate finance
committee and the chairperson of the
assembly ways and means committee copies
of any spending plans and/or budgets
submitted to the federal government with
respect to the use of any funds appropri-
ated by the federal government including
state grants administered by the Depart-
ment. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, a portion of this appro-
priation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, as needed to accomplish the intent of
this appropriation (23418) ................. 256,841,000
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for specific programs including,
but not limited to, the English language
acquisition program pursuant to title III

292 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of the elementary and secondary education
act. Provided further that, notwithstand-
ing any inconsistent provision of law, the
commissioner of education shall provide to
the director of the budget, the chair-
person of the senate finance committee and
the chairperson of the assembly ways and
means committee copies of any spending
plans and/or budgets submitted to the
federal government with respect to the use
of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants adminis-
tered by the department. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, a
portion of this appropriation may be
suballocated to other state departments
and agencies, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, as needed to
accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation (23417) ............................... 65,331,000
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for specific programs including,
but not limited to, the 21st century
community learning centers, and student
support and academic enrichment pursuant
to title IV of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the commissioner of education
shall provide to the director of the budg-
et, the chairperson of the senate finance
committee and the chairperson of the
assembly ways and means committee copies
of any spending plans and/or budgets
submitted to the federal government with
respect to the use of any funds appropri-
ated by the federal government including
state grants administered by the Depart-
ment. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, a portion of this appro-
priation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, as needed to accomplish the intent of
this appropriation (23416) ................. 253,326,000
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for specific programs including,
but not limited to, the charter schools
program pursuant to title IV of the
elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, the commis-

293 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
sioner of education shall provide to the
director of the budget, the chairperson of
the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans
and/or budgets submitted to the federal
government with respect to the use of any
funds appropriated by the federal govern-
ment including state grants administered
by the department. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, a portion
of this appropriation may be suballocated
to other state departments and agencies,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation (23415) ........ 50,000,000
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for specific programs including,
but not limited to, the rural education
initiative pursuant to title V of the
elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, the commis-
sioner of education shall provide to the
director of the budget, the chairperson of
the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans
and/or budgets submitted to the federal
government with respect to the use of any
funds appropriated by the federal govern-
ment including state grants administered
by the department. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, a portion
of this appropriation may be suballocated
to other state departments and agencies,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation (23414) ......... 5,000,000
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for specific programs including,
but not limited to, the homeless education
program pursuant to title VII of the
McKinney Vento homeless assistance act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation
may be suballocated to other state depart-
ments and agencies, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (23413) ....................... 10,500,000

294 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for specific programs including,
but not limited to, the Carl D. Perkins
vocational and applied technology educa-
tion act (VTEA).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation
may be suballocated to other state depart-
ments and agencies, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (23477) ....................... 68,578,000
For various grants to schools and other
eligible entities. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, a portion
of this appropriation may be suballocated
to other state departments and agencies,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the
intent of this appropriation (23407) ........ 34,425,000
For the education of individuals with disa-
bilities including up to $3,000,000 for
services and expenses of early childhood
family and community engagement centers
and $500,000 for services and expenses of
the center for autism and related disabil-
ities at the state university of New York
at Albany. Notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein shall be avail-
able, subject to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by
the director of the budget, for grants to
ensure appropriately certified teachers in
schools providing special services or
programs as defined in paragraphs e, g, i
and l of subdivision 2 of section 4401 of
the education law to children placed by
school districts and in approved preschool
programs that provide full and half-day
educational programs in accordance with
section 4410 of the education law for
children placed by school district.
Provided further that, in the allocation
of funds, priority shall be given to those
programs with a demonstrated need to
increase the number of certified teachers
to comply with state and federal require-
ments. Such funds shall be made available
for such activities as certification prep-
aration, training, assisting schools with
personnel shortages and supporting activ-

295 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ities that improve the delivery of
services to improve results for children
with disabilities. Provided further that
notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, of the funds appropriated herein:
up to $10,000,000 shall be available for
costs associated with schools operated
under article 85 of the education law
which otherwise would be payable through
the department's general fund aid to
localities appropriation, provided further
that notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, any disbursements
against this $10,000,000 shall immediately
reduce the amounts appropriated in the
education department's general fund aid to
localities for costs associated with
schools operated under article 85 of the
education law by an equivalent amount, and
the portion of such general fund appropri-
ation so affected shall have no further
force or effect.
Notwithstanding any provision of the law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payment of liabil-
ities heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue and subject to the approval of the
director of budget, such funds shall be
available to the department net of disal-
lowances, refunds, reimbursements and
credits. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, a portion of this appro-
priation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, as needed,
to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation (21737) .............................. 987,970,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 3,503,790,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25122
For grants to schools for specific programs
(21742) ...................................... 5,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund

296 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456
For grants to schools for specific programs
(21826) ...................................... 5,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25026
For grants to schools and other eligible
entities for programs funded through the
national school lunch act (21703) ........ 2,193,600,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 2,193,600,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Charter School Stimulus Fund
Charter School Stimulus Account - 20601
For services and expenses related to devel-
opment, implementation and operation of
charter schools, including facility costs
and loans to authorized schools, and
including funds available for transfer for
the administrative/technical support
services provided by the charter school
institute of the state university of New
York. This appropriation shall only be
available for expenditure upon the
approval of an expenditure plan by the
director of the budget (21700) .............. 20,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 20,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
New York State Teen Health Education Account - 20200
For teen health education, pursuant to
section 99-u of the state finance law
(55926) ........................................ 120,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 120,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Mobile Sports Wagering Fund

297 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Mobile Sports Wagering Account - 24955
For general support for public schools for
the 2026-27 school year pursuant to
section 1367 of the racing, pari-mutuel
wagering and breeding law and section 92-c
of the state finance law (23367) ......... 1,455,798,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 1,455,798,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
NYS Commercial Gaming Fund
Commercial Gaming Revenue Account - 23701
For general support for public schools for
the 2026-27 school year pursuant to para-
graph b of subdivision 5 of section
97-nnnn of the state finance law (56140) ... 142,222,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 142,222,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
State Lottery Fund
State Lottery Account - 20901
For general support for public schools for
the 2026-27 school year, provided that,
notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, in computing the addi-
tional lottery grant pursuant to subpara-
graph (4) of paragraph b of subdivision 4
of section 92-c of the state finance law
for the 2026-27 school year, the base
grant shall not exceed the amount hereby
appropriated (21735) ..................... 2,218,050,000
For allowances to private schools for the
blind and deaf for the 2026-27 school year
(23460) ......................................... 20,000
For general support for public schools, for
the June 2025-26 school year payment
(23495) .................................... 240,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 2,458,070,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
State Lottery Fund
VLT Education Account - 20904

298 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For general support for public schools for
the 2026-27 school year pursuant to
subparagraph (2-a) of paragraph b of
subdivision 4 of section 92-c of the state
finance law (23494) ...................... 1,069,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 1,069,000,000
--------------
SCHOOL TAX RELIEF PROGRAM ................................ 1,294,911,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
School Tax Relief Fund
School Tax Relief Account - 20551
For payments to local governments relating
to the school tax relief (STAR) program
including state aid pursuant to section
1306-a of the real property tax law. Up to
$5,000,000 of the funds appropriated here-
by may be suballocated or transferred to
the department of taxation and finance for
the purpose of making direct payments to
certain property owners from the account
established pursuant to subparagraph (iii)
of paragraph (a) of subdivision 14 of
section 425 of the real property tax law
(21709) .................................. 1,294,911,000
--------------

299 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ADULT CAREER AND CONTINUING EDUCATION SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For case services provided on or after October 1, 2023 to disabled
individuals in accordance with economic eligibility criteria devel-
oped by the department (21713) .....................................
54,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,663,000)
For services and expenses of independent living centers (21856) ......
16,000,000 ....................................... (re. $13,194,000)
For college readers aid payments (21854) .............................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of supported employment and integrated
employment opportunities provided on or after October 1, 2023:
For services and expenses of programs providing or leading to the
provision of time-limited services or long-term support services
(21741) ... 15,160,000 ........................... (re. $15,160,000)
For grants to schools for programs involving literacy and basic educa-
tion for public assistance recipients for the 2025-26 school year
for those programs administered by the state education department
(23411) ... 1,843,000 ............................. (re. $1,400,000)
For competitive grants for adult literacy/education aid to public and
private not-for-profit agencies, including but not limited to, 2 and
4 year colleges, community based organizations, libraries, and
volunteer literacy organizations and institutions which meet quality
standards promulgated by the commissioner of education to provide
programs of basic literacy, high school equivalency, and English as
a second language to persons 16 years of age or older (23410) ......
9,293,000 ......................................... (re. $9,293,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For case services provided on or after October 1, 2022 to disabled
individuals in accordance with economic eligibility criteria devel-
oped by the department (21713) .....................................
54,000,000 ....................................... (re. $39,966,000)
For services and expenses of independent living centers (21856) ......
16,000,000 .......................................... (re. $703,000)
For college readers aid payments (21854) .............................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of supported employment and integrated
employment opportunities provided on or after October 1, 2022:
For services and expenses of programs providing or leading to the
provision of time-limited services or long-term support services
(21741) ... 15,160,000 ........................... (re. $15,160,000)
For grants to schools for programs involving literacy and basic educa-
tion for public assistance recipients for the 2024-25 school year
for those programs administered by the state education department
(23411) ... 1,843,000 ............................... (re. $238,000)
For competitive grants for adult literacy/education aid to public and
private not-for-profit agencies, including but not limited to, 2 and

300 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
4 year colleges, community based organizations, libraries, and
volunteer literacy organizations and institutions which meet quality
standards promulgated by the commissioner of education to provide
programs of basic literacy, high school equivalency, and English as
a second language to persons 16 years of age or older (23410) ......
9,293,000 ......................................... (re. $5,741,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For case services provided on or after October 1, 2021 to disabled
individuals in accordance with economic eligibility criteria devel-
oped by the department (21713) .....................................
54,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,397,000)
For college readers aid payments (21854) .............................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $117,000)
For services and expenses of supported employment and integrated
employment opportunities provided on or after October 1, 2021:
For services and expenses of programs providing or leading to the
provision of time-limited services or long-term support services
(21741) ... 15,160,000 ........................... (re. $10,665,000)
For grants to schools for programs involving literacy and basic educa-
tion for public assistance recipients for the 2023-24 school year
for those programs administered by the state education department
(23411) ... 1,843,000 ............................. (re. $1,464,000)
For competitive grants for adult literacy/education aid to public and
private not-for-profit agencies, including but not limited to, 2 and
4 year colleges, community based organizations, libraries, and
volunteer literacy organizations and institutions which meet quality
standards promulgated by the commissioner of education to provide
programs of basic literacy, high school equivalency, and English as
a second language to persons 16 years of age or older (23410) ...
7,793,000 ........................................... (re. $293,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For case services provided on or after October 1, 2020 to disabled
individuals in accordance with economic eligibility criteria devel-
oped by the department (21713) .....................................
54,000,000 ........................................... (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of supported employment and integrated
employment opportunities provided on or after October 1, 2020:
For services and expenses of programs providing or leading to the
provision of time-limited services or long-term support services
(21741) ... 15,160,000 ................................ (re. $5,000)
For grants to schools for programs involving literacy and basic educa-
tion for public assistance recipients for the 2022-23 school year
for those programs administered by the state education department
(23411) ... 1,843,000 ................................ (re. $16,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:

301 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For grants to schools for programs involving literacy and basic educa-
tion for public assistance recipients for the 2021-22 school year
for those programs administered by the state education department
(23411) ... 1,843,000 ................................. (re. $4,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Federal Department of Education Account - 25210
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For case services provided to individuals with disabilities (21713)
... 72,100,000 ................................... (re. $72,100,000)
For the independent living program (21856) ...........................
2,572,000 ......................................... (re. $2,572,000)
For the supported employment program (21741) .........................
2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for adult basic
education, literacy, and civics education pursuant to the workforce
investment act (21734) ... 48,704,000 ............ (re. $48,704,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For case services provided to individuals with disabilities (21713) ..
70,000,000 ....................................... (re. $43,781,000)
For the independent living program (21856) ...........................
2,572,000 ......................................... (re. $2,396,000)
For the supported employment program (21741) .........................
2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,686,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for adult basic
education, literacy, and civics education pursuant to the workforce
investment act (21734) ... 48,704,000 ............ (re. $34,917,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for adult basic
education, literacy, and civics education pursuant to the workforce
investment act (21734) ... 48,704,000 ............. (re. $8,354,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
VESID Social Security Account - 22001
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the rehabilitation of social security disability beneficiaries
(21852) ... 4,755,000 ............................. (re. $4,755,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the rehabilitation of social security disability beneficiaries
(21852) ... 4,755,000 ............................. (re. $4,755,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the rehabilitation of social security disability beneficiaries
(21852) ... 6,871,000 ............................. (re. $6,871,000)

302 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For the rehabilitation of social security disability beneficiaries
(21852) ... 6,871,000 ............................. (re. $6,099,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For the rehabilitation of social security disability beneficiaries
(21852) ... 11,760,000 ............................ (re. $5,737,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Vocational Rehabilitation Fund
Vocational Rehabilitation Account - 23051
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the special workers' compensation program
(21852) ... 698,000 ................................. (re. $698,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the special workers' compensation program
(21852) ... 698,000 ................................. (re. $698,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the special workers' compensation program
(21852) ... 698,000 ................................. (re. $698,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the special workers' compensation program
(21852) ... 698,000 ................................. (re. $652,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the special workers' compensation program
(21852) ... 698,000 ................................. (re. $672,000)
CULTURAL EDUCATION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Aid to public libraries including aid to New York public library
(NYPL) and NYPL's science industry and business library. Provided
that, notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to
the contrary, such aid, and the state's liability therefor, shall
represent fulfillment of the state's obligation for this program
(21846) ... 104,600,000 ........................... (re. $9,196,000)
For services and expenses of the Schomburg Center for Research in
Black Culture (55912) ... 375,000 ................... (re. $375,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Schomburg Center for
Research in Black Culture (57010) ... 125,000 ....... (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Langston Hughes Community Library and
Cultural Center of Queens Library (55942) ..........................
112,500 ............................................. (re. $112,500)

303 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional services and expenses of the Langston Hughes Community
Library and Cultural Center of Queens Library (57013) ..............
110,000 ............................................. (re. $110,000)
Aid to educational television and radio. Notwithstanding any provision
of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the amount appropriated
herein shall represent fulfillment of the state's obligation for
this program (21848) ... 14,027,000 ............... (re. $1,403,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Aid to public libraries including aid to New York public library
(NYPL) and NYPL's science industry and business library. Provided
that, notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to
the contrary, such aid, and the state's liability therefor, shall
represent fulfillment of the state's obligation for this program
(21846) ... 102,127,000 ............................. (re. $127,000)
For services and expenses of the Schomburg Center for Research in
Black Culture (55912) ... 375,000 ................... (re. $375,000)
For services and expenses of the Langston Hughes Community Library and
Cultural Center of Queens Library (55942) ..........................
112,500 ............................................. (re. $112,500)
For services and expenses of a grant program to incentivize partic-
ipation in the Dolly Parton Imagination Library Program. Grants
shall be available on competitive basis based on need and children
served. Grants shall be awarded in amounts not to exceed $50,000, to
provide up to fifty percent of an eligible entity's required match-
ing funds to participate in the Dolly Parton Imagination Library
Program. Funding shall be available to libraries, library systems,
non-profits, school districts and board of cooperative educational
services to participate in the Dolly Parton Imagination Library
Program (57014) ....................................................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as added by chapter 50,
section 2, of the laws of 2017:
For services and expenses of the Langston Hughes Community Library and
Cultural Center of Queens Library (55942) ..........................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For aid to public libraries pursuant to various federal laws including
the library services technology act (21851) ........................
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $5,400,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For aid to public libraries pursuant to various federal laws including
the library services technology act (21851) ........................
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $5,400,000)

304 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For aid to public libraries pursuant to various federal laws including
the library services technology act (21851) ........................
5,400,000 ......................................... (re. $5,400,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
New York State Local Government Records Management Improvement Fund
Local Government Records Management Account - 20501
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Grants to individual local governments or groups of cooperating local
governments as provided in section 57.35 of the arts and cultural
affairs law (21849) ... 8,346,000 ................. (re. $8,346,000)
Aid for documentary heritage grants and aid to eligible archives,
libraries, historical societies, museums, and to certain organiza-
tions including the state education department that provide services
to such programs (21850) ... 461,000 ................ (re. $446,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Grants to individual local governments or groups of cooperating local
governments as provided in section 57.35 of the arts and cultural
affairs law (21849) ... 8,346,000 ................. (re. $4,060,000)
Aid for documentary heritage grants and aid to eligible archives,
libraries, historical societies, museums, and to certain organiza-
tions including the state education department that provide services
to such programs (21850) ... 461,000 ................ (re. $393,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Grants to individual local governments or groups of cooperating local
governments as provided in section 57.35 of the arts and cultural
affairs law (21849) ... 8,346,000 ................. (re. $8,077,000)
Aid for documentary heritage grants and aid to eligible archives,
libraries, historical societies, museums, and to certain organiza-
tions including the state education department that provide services
to such programs (21850) ... 461,000 ................ (re. $154,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Grants to individual local governments or groups of cooperating local
governments as provided in section 57.35 of the arts and cultural
affairs law (21849) ... 8,346,000 ..................... (re. $8,000)
Aid for documentary heritage grants and aid to eligible archives,
libraries, historical societies, museums, and to certain organiza-
tions including the state education department that provide services
to such programs (21850) ... 461,000 ................ (re. $209,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
Grants to individual local governments or groups of cooperating local
governments as provided in section 57.35 of the arts and cultural
affairs law (21849) ... 8,346,000 ................. (re. $3,611,000)
Aid for documentary heritage grants and aid to eligible archives,
libraries, historical societies, museums, and to certain organiza-

305 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tions including the state education department that provide services
to such programs (21850) ... 461,000 ................ (re. $176,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
Aid for documentary heritage grants and aid to eligible archives,
libraries, historical societies, museums, and to certain organiza-
tions including the state education department that provide services
to such programs (21850) ... 461,000 ................. (re. $88,000)
OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND THE PROFESSIONS PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law. Notwithstanding any other section of law to
the contrary, funding for such programs in the 2025-26 fiscal year
shall be limited to the amount appropriated herein (21830) .........
24,238,360 ....................................... (re. $24,238,360)
For higher education opportunity program awards. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used by independent colleges to expand opportunities
for the educationally and economically disadvantaged at independent
institutions of higher learning, and may be used to support current-
ly enrolled HEOP students in projects that phase out (21832) .......
46,896,420 ....................................... (re. $46,896,420)
For services and expenses of St. Bonaventure University to fund a
higher education opportunity program for the remainder of the higher
education opportunity program cycle ending in the 2028-29 academic
year (57048) ... 2,493,000 ........................ (re. $2,493,000)
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
20,871,680 ....................................... (re. $20,871,680)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 15,816,390 ........................... (re. $15,816,390)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative, to provide
additional services and expenses to expand opportunities through
existing postsecondary opportunity programs at the State University
of New York, City University of New York, and other degree-granting
institutions for foster youth; and to provide any necessary supple-
mental financial aid for foster youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation, housing and other expenses
as determined by the commissioner to be necessary for such foster
youth to attend college; financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to help foster youth transition
to college, prepare them to navigate on-campus systems, and provide
preparation in reading, writing, and mathematics for foster youth
who need it; advisement, counseling, tutoring, and academic assist-
ance for foster youth; and supplemental housing and meals for foster
youth. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the
City University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of

306 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
New York may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statu-
tory colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) ........
7,920,000 ......................................... (re. $7,920,000)
For state financial assistance to expand high needs nursing programs
at private colleges and universities in accordance with section
6401-a of the education law (21838) ... 941,000 ..... (re. $941,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2025-26
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $368,000)
For enhancing supports and services for students with disabilities
enrolled in New York State degree granting colleges and universities
(23344) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law. Notwithstanding any other section of law to
the contrary, funding for such programs in the 2024-25 fiscal year
shall be limited to the amount appropriated herein (21830) .........
24,238,360 ........................................ (re. $7,834,000)
For higher education opportunity program awards. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used by independent colleges to expand opportunities
for the educationally and economically disadvantaged at independent
institutions of higher learning, and may be used to support current-
ly enrolled HEOP students in projects that phase out (21832) .......
46,896,420 ....................................... (re. $27,612,000)
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
20,871,680 ....................................... (re. $15,237,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 15,816,390 ........................... (re. $11,057,000)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative, to provide
additional services and expenses to expand opportunities through
existing postsecondary opportunity programs at the State University
of New York, City University of New York, and other degree-granting
institutions for foster youth; and to provide any necessary supple-
mental financial aid for foster youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation, housing and other expenses
as determined by the commissioner to be necessary for such foster
youth to attend college; financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to help foster youth transition
to college, prepare them to navigate on-campus systems, and provide
preparation in reading, writing, and mathematics for foster youth
who need it; advisement, counseling, tutoring, and academic assist-
ance for foster youth; and supplemental housing and meals for foster
youth. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the
City University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of
New York may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statu-
tory colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) ........
7,920,000 ......................................... (re. $3,633,000)

307 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2024-25
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $368,000)
For enhancing supports and services for students with disabilities
enrolled in New York State degree granting colleges and universities
(23344) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,428,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law. Notwithstanding any other section of law to
the contrary, funding for such programs in the 2023-24 fiscal year
shall be limited to the amount appropriated herein (21830) .........
24,238,360 ....................................... (re. $14,907,000)
For higher education opportunity program awards. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used by independent colleges to expand opportunities
for the educationally and economically disadvantaged at independent
institutions of higher learning, and may be used to support current-
ly enrolled HEOP students in projects that phase out (21832) .......
46,896,420 ....................................... (re. $13,605,000)
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
20,871,680 ........................................ (re. $3,626,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 15,816,390 ............................ (re. $2,579,000)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative, to provide
additional services and expenses to expand opportunities through
existing postsecondary opportunity programs at the State University
of New York, City University of New York, and other degree-granting
institutions for foster youth; and to provide any necessary supple-
mental financial aid for foster youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation, housing and other expenses
as determined by the commissioner to be necessary for such foster
youth to attend college; financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to help foster youth transition
to college, prepare them to navigate on-campus systems, and provide
preparation in reading, writing, and mathematics for foster youth
who need it; advisement, counseling, tutoring, and academic assist-
ance for foster youth; and supplemental housing and meals for foster
youth. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the
City University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of
New York may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statu-
tory colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) ........
7,920,000 ........................................... (re. $113,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2023-24
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $253,000)
For enhancing supports and services for students with disabilities
enrolled in New York State degree granting colleges and universities
(23344) ... 2,000,000 ............................... (re. $215,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:

308 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law as added by chapter 425 of the laws of 1988.
Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, funding for
such programs in the 2022-23 fiscal year shall be limited to the
amount appropriated herein (21830) .................................
24,238,360 .......................................... (re. $544,000)
For higher education opportunity program awards. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used by independent colleges to expand opportunities
for the educationally and economically disadvantaged at independent
institutions of higher learning, and may be used to support current-
ly enrolled HEOP students in projects that phase out (21832) .......
46,896,420 .......................................... (re. $438,000)
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
20,871,680 .......................................... (re. $355,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 15,816,390 .............................. (re. $381,000)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative, to provide
additional services and expenses to expand opportunities through
existing postsecondary opportunity programs at the State University
of New York, City University of New York, and other degree-granting
institutions for foster youth; and to provide any necessary supple-
mental financial aid for foster youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation, housing and other expenses
as determined by the commissioner to be necessary for such foster
youth to attend college; financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to help foster youth transition
to college, prepare them to navigate on-campus systems, and provide
preparation in reading, writing, and mathematics for foster youth
who need it; advisement, counseling, tutoring, and academic assist-
ance for foster youth; and supplemental housing and meals for foster
youth. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the
City University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of
New York may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statu-
tory colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) ........
7,920,000 ........................................... (re. $395,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2022-23
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $278,000)
For enhancing supports and services for students with disabilities
enrolled in New York State degree granting colleges and universities
(23344) ... 2,000,000 ................................ (re. $20,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law as added by chapter 425 of the laws of 1988.
Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, funding for
such programs in the 2021-22 fiscal year shall be limited to the
amount appropriated herein (21830) .................................
18,361,860 ........................................ (re. $1,801,000)

309 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative, to provide
additional services and expenses to expand opportunities through
existing postsecondary opportunity programs at the State University
of New York, City University of New York, and other degree-granting
institutions for foster youth; and to provide any necessary supple-
mental financial aid for foster youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation, housing and other expenses
as determined by the commissioner to be necessary for such foster
youth to attend college; financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to help foster youth transition
to college, prepare them to navigate on-campus systems, and provide
preparation in reading, writing, and mathematics for foster youth
who need it; advisement, counseling, tutoring, and academic assist-
ance for foster youth; and supplemental housing and meals for foster
youth. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the
City University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of
New York may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statu-
tory colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) ........
6,000,000 ............................................ (re. $38,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2021-22
school year (21785) ... 184,000 ...................... (re. $44,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law as added by chapter 425 of the laws of 1988.
Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, funding for
such programs in the 2020-21 fiscal year shall be limited to the
amount appropriated herein (21830) .................................
18,361,860 .......................................... (re. $858,000)
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
15,811,180 .......................................... (re. $550,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 11,981,890 .............................. (re. $654,000)
For teacher opportunity corps program awards (21837) .................
450,000 ............................................. (re. $450,000)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative, to provide
additional services and expenses to expand opportunities through
existing postsecondary opportunity programs at the State University
of New York, City University of New York, and other degree-granting
institutions for foster youth; and to provide any necessary supple-
mental financial aid for foster youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation, housing and other expenses
as determined by the commissioner to be necessary for such foster
youth to attend college; financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to help foster youth transition
to college, prepare them to navigate on-campus systems, and provide
preparation in reading, writing, and mathematics for foster youth
who need it; advisement, counseling, tutoring, and academic assist-

310 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ance for foster youth; and supplemental housing and meals for foster
youth. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the
City University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of
New York may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statu-
tory colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) ........
6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $445,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2020-21
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $251,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law as added by chapter 425 of the laws of 1988.
Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, funding for
such programs in the 2019-20 fiscal year shall be limited to the
amount appropriated herein (21830) .................................
15,301,860 ........................................ (re. $2,248,000)
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
13,176,180 ........................................ (re. $1,002,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 9,984,890 ............................. (re. $1,154,000)
For teacher opportunity corps program awards (21837) .................
450,000 ............................................. (re. $450,000)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative, to provide
additional services and expenses to expand opportunities through
existing postsecondary opportunity programs at the State University
of New York, City University of New York, and other degree-granting
institutions for foster youth; and to provide any necessary supple-
mental financial aid for foster youth, which may include the cost of
tuition and fees, books, transportation, housing and other expenses
as determined by the commissioner to be necessary for such foster
youth to attend college; financial aid outreach to foster youth;
summer college preparation programs to help foster youth transition
to college, prepare them to navigate on-campus systems, and provide
preparation in reading, writing, and mathematics for foster youth
who need it; advisement, counseling, tutoring, and academic assist-
ance for foster youth; and supplemental housing and meals for foster
youth. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the
City University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of
New York may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statu-
tory colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) ........
1,500,000 ............................................ (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2019-20
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $174,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:

311 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For higher education opportunity program awards. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used by independent colleges to expand opportunities
for the educationally and economically disadvantaged at independent
institutions of higher learning, and may be used to support current-
ly enrolled HEOP students in projects that phase out (21832) .......
29,605,920 ........................................ (re. $2,360,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as added by chapter 54,
section 2, of the laws of 2018:
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
13,176,180 .......................................... (re. $610,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 9,984,890 ............................... (re. $266,000)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative to ensure
support is available through current post-secondary opportunity
programs at public and independent institutions for foster youth
including summer transition programs, and to provide foster youth
with financial aid outreach, counseling services, and direct finan-
cial support. Provided however, a portion of these funds may be used
to provide supplemental housing and meals for foster youth not
currently enrolled in a post-secondary opportunity program at SUNY.
A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state depart-
ments, agencies, the State University of New York, and the City
University of New York. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation
to the contrary, funds provided to the State University of New York
may be utilized to support state-operated campuses, statutory
colleges, or community colleges as appropriate (55913) .............
1,500,000 ............................................ (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2018-19
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $101,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as added by chapter 50,
section 2, of the laws of 2017:
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
13,176,180 .......................................... (re. $224,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 9,984,890 ............................... (re. $302,000)
For teacher opportunity corps program awards (21837) .................
450,000 ............................................. (re. $402,000)
For services and expenses of a foster youth initiative to ensure
support is available through current post-secondary opportunity
programs at public and independent institutions for foster youth
including summer transition programs, and to provide foster youth
with financial aid outreach, counseling services, and direct finan-
cial support. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other
state departments, agencies, the State University of New York, and
the City University of New York (55913) ............................
1,500,000 ........................................... (re. $102,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:

312 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law as added by chapter 425 of the laws of 1988.
Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, funding for
such programs in the 2016-17 fiscal year shall be limited to the
amount appropriated herein (21830) .................................
15,301,860 .......................................... (re. $211,000)
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
13,176,180 ........................................... (re. $72,000)
For collegiate science and technology entry program (CSTEP) awards
(21835) ... 9,984,890 ............................... (re. $421,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2016-17
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $128,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as added by chapter 61,
section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For science and technology entry program (STEP) awards (21834) .......
11,845,180 .......................................... (re. $161,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2015-16
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $165,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For liberty partnerships program awards as prescribed by section 612
of the education law as added by chapter 425 of the laws of 1988.
Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, funding for
such programs in the 2014-15 fiscal year shall be limited to the
amount appropriated herein (21830) ... 12,918,260 .... (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of the national board for professional
teaching standards certification grant program for the 2014-15
school year (21785) ... 368,000 ..................... (re. $111,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Federal Department of Education Account - 25210
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for programs pursu-
ant to various federal laws including, but not limited to: title II
supporting effective instruction.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, to any state agency or department, and
interchanged to other accounts, to accomplish the purpose of this
appropriation. A portion of this appropriation may be interchanged
to other accounts, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appro-
priation (23419) ... 5,000,000 .................... (re. $5,000,000)
OFFICE OF PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE TWELVE EDUCATION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

313 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For [continuation of] a statewide universal full-day prekindergarten
program in accordance with section 3602-ee of the education law, as
such section existed on July 1, 2025, to reimburse school districts
and/or eligible entities for the cost of awarded programs operating
in the 2025-26 school year and prior school years[; provided that up
to 25 percent of a school district's and/or eligible entity's
awarded funds shall be made available in the final quarter of the
year in which services are provided as an advance on subsequent
school year liabilities; provided further that funds appropriated
herein shall only be awarded to school districts and/or eligible
entities which meet requirements provided for in section 3602-ee of
the education law.
Provided further that funds appropriated herein shall only be used to
supplement and not supplant current local expenditures of federal,
state or local funds on prekindergarten programs and the number of
placements in such programs from such sources and that current local
expenditures shall include any local expenditures of federal, state
or local funds used to supplement or extend services provided
directly or via contract to eligible children enrolled in a
universal prekindergarten program in accordance with section 3602-e
of the education law. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the funds appropriated herein shall only be available for
a statewide universal full-day prekindergarten program and, as of
July 1, 2026, may be suballocated or transferred to any other appro-
priation for the sole purpose of administering such program.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, programs that
provide services for fewer than 180 days will be subject to the
provisions of subdivision 16 of section 3602-e of the education law]
(56138) ... 340,000,000 ......................... (re. $340,000,000)
For continuation in the 2025-26 school year of universal prekindergar-
ten expansion grants[awarded, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, (1) based on responses to the 2021-22 universal
prekindergarten expansion grant for new full-day placements for
four-year-old students request for proposals pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2021, (2) based on responses to the 2022-23 and
2023-24 universal prekindergarten expansion grant for new full-day
placements and the conversion of half-day to full-day placements for
four-year-old students request for proposals pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2022, and (3) based on responses to the 2023-24
universal prekindergarten expansion grant for new full-day place-
ments and the conversion of half-day to full-day placements for
four-year-old students request for proposals pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2023.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds provided
herein shall be treated as one program], subject to the requirements
of section 3602-ee of the education law, as such section existed on
July 1, 2025.
[Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, programs that
provide services for fewer than 180 days will be subject to the

314 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provisions of subdivision 16 of section 3602-e of the education law]
(23387) ... 88,360,000 ........................... (re. $88,360,000)
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities based on a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided that
at least the following amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $21,590,000 for the continuation of school-wide extended learning
grants to school districts or school districts in collaboration with
not-for-profit community-based organizations pursuant to the guide-
lines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2013.
(ii) $22,500,000 for the continuation of the master teacher program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter 53 of the laws
of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, chapter 53 of the laws of
2018, chapter 53 of the laws of 2019, and chapter 53 of the laws of
2022; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for master teacher program funding may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such program.
(iii) $5,000,000 for the continuation of QUALITYstarsNY, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the laws of 2016;
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval
of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for
QUALITYstarsNY may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the sole purpose of administering such system.
(iv) $3,000,000 for the continuation of New York state masters-in-edu-
cation teacher incentive scholarship program, pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2015; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available for the masters-in-education teacher incentive
scholarship program may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the higher education services corpo-
ration for the sole purpose of administering such program.
(v) $5,800,000 for services and expenses to subsidize the remaining
cost of advanced placement and international baccalaureate exam fees
for low-income students, as determined by free and reduced price
lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner
of education and approved by the director of the budget.
(vi) $1,500,000 for grants for the advanced courses access program
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018 and chapter 53 of the
laws of 2019, provided that such grants shall be awarded to school
districts and/or boards of cooperative educational services in order
to increase advanced course offerings for students, particularly in
districts with no or very limited advanced course offerings.
(vii) $400,000 for empire state excellence in teaching awards pursuant
to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget,

315 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the funds hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the state university of
New York for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(viii) $6,000,000 for grants for the smart start computer science
program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(ix) $250,000 for grants to school districts to allow community
schools to expand mental health services and capacity of community
school programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(x) $3,000,000 for grants to school districts to allow districts to
increase the use of alternative approaches to student discipline,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019.
(xi) $1,500,000 for services and expenses of school mental health
programs pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2019. Provided further, that of the amount appro-
priated herein, up to $500,000 may be used to support the School
Mental Health Resource and Training Center.
(xii) $3,000,000 for the continuation of the we teach NY grant
program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the we teach NY
grant may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xiii) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the expanded mathematics
access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the
expanded mathematics access program may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such awards.
(xiv) $750,000 for the continuation of the middle school expanded
mathematics access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2023; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xv) $200,000 for the continuation of the New York state youth coun-
cil, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made available for the New York state
youth council may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the services and expenses of administering such coun-
cil.
(xvi) $10,000,000 for student mental health support grants to school
districts, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2020; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available

316 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to the office of mental health for the sole purpose of administering
such grants (23306) ................................................
85,990,000 ....................................... (re. $85,958,000)
For the college in high school opportunity fund for the 2025-26 school
year pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of education
and approved by the director of the budget, provided that the
following amounts of the funds appropriated herein shall be made
available as follows:
(i) $38,375,000 for the continuation of existing pathways in technolo-
gy early college high school, smart scholars early college high
school, and smart transfer early college high school grants awarded
based on responses to requests for proposals previously issued by
the education department;
(ii) $10,000,000 for grants in support of pathways in technology early
college high school programs;
(iii) $4,000,000 for grants in support of smart scholars early college
high school programs and/or smart transfer early college high school
programs; and
(iv) $9,100,000 for grants in support of college in high school
programs, provided that such programs shall (a) provide students the
opportunity to earn at least 12 transferable college credits, (b)
offer courses in subject areas consistent with guidelines prescribed
by the commissioner of education, (c) provide students with high-
quality counseling and academic support in addition to the level of
support otherwise provided to students, (d) provide outreach to
underserved students, (e) enroll students who reflect the population
of students served in the school district, and (f) have filed with
the department, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, a current
partnership agreement entered into by the participating school
districts, institutions of higher education, and all other partic-
ipating entities, including but not limited to businesses and commu-
nity-based organizations; provided further that such grants shall
include an initial payment based on the program's enrollment and
shall thereafter provide programs with up to $90 per college credit
completed by economically disadvantaged students in the program.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher education
partners participating in a college in high school program, or the
entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at the institution,
shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of tuition and/or fees, or
to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for students enrolled in such
a college in high school program with no reduction in other state,
local, or other support for such students earning college credit
that such higher education partner would otherwise be eligible to
receive (57059) ... 61,475,000 ................... (re. $60,335,000)
For services and expenses of community school regional technical
assistance centers for the 2025-26 school year. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used to operate three regional centers that shall
provide technical assistance to school districts establishing or
operating community school programs, pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of education and approved by the director of the
budget. Provided, further, that such plan shall establish a process
for selection of nonprofit entities with expertise in community

317 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
school programs and technical assistance to operate such centers
(55962) ... 1,200,000 ............................. (re. $1,200,000)
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 28,000,000 .................. (re. $27,815,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations for the 2024-25
school year for support for the operation of targeted pre-kindergar-
ten for those providers not eligible to receive funding pursuant to
section 3602-e of the education law and for support for providers
continuing to operate such programs in the 2025-26 school year. Such
funds shall be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
(21763) ... 1,303,000 ............................. (re. $1,303,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations of a $21,392,000
teacher resources and computer training centers program for the
2024-25 school year (55985) ... 6,418,000 ......... (re. $4,821,000)
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for services and expenses
of a $21,392,000 teacher resources and computer training center
program for the 2025-26 school year (23445) ........................
14,974,000 ........................................ (re. $9,807,000)
For services and expenses of the implementation of distraction-free
school policies prohibiting students' use of internet-enabled
devices during the school day on school grounds, provided that the
funds appropriated herein shall be allocated pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget (57074) .....................
13,500,000 .......................................... (re. $636,000)
For education of children of migrant workers for the 2025-26 school
year (21764) ... 89,000 .............................. (re. $89,000)
For the school lunch and breakfast program.
Funds for the school lunch and breakfast program shall be expended
subject to the limitation of funds available and may be used to
reimburse sponsors of non-profit school lunch, breakfast, or other
school child feeding programs based upon the number of federally
reimbursable breakfasts and lunches served to students under such
program agreements entered into by the state education department
and such sponsors, in accordance with an act of Congress entitled
the "National School Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, the
provisions of the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," P.L. 89-642, as
amended, in the case of school breakfast programs to reimburse spon-
sors in excess of the federal rates of reimbursement, or for
universal free school meals pursuant to section 915-a of the educa-
tion law in the 2025-26 school year. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby appropriated, or so much
thereof as may be necessary, are to be available for the purposes
herein specified for obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue for the school years beginning July 1, 2025 for purposes of
universal free school meals under section 915-a of the education law
and July 1, 2023, July 1, 2024 and July 1, 2025 for other purposes
established by this appropriation. (21702) .........................
340,000,000 ..................................... (re. $264,177,000)

318 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional support for the community eligibility provision state
subsidy for the 2024-25 school year pursuant to section 925 of the
education law (57051) ... 36,000,000 ............. (re. $36,000,000)
For additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school lunch programs
that have purchased at least 30 percent of their total food products
for their school lunch service program from New York State farmers,
growers, producers, or processors, based upon the number of feder-
ally reimbursable lunches served to students under such program
agreements entered into by the state education department and such
sponsors, in accordance with the provisions of the "National School
Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, to reimburse sponsors in excess
of the federal and State rates of reimbursement, provided, that the
total State subsidy shall be equal to $0.1901 per free and paid
school lunch meal, and $0.0519 per reduced-price school lunch meal,
provided further that funds appropriated herein shall be made avail-
able on or after April 1, 2026 (55986) .............................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For nonpublic school aid payable in the 2025-26 school year to reim-
burse 2024-25 and prior school year expenses. Provided that nonpub-
lic schools shall continue to receive aid based on either a 5.0/5.5
hour standard instructional day, or another work day as certified by
the nonpublic school officials, in accordance with the methodology
for computing salary and benefits applied by the department in
paying aid for the 2012-13 and prior school years. Notwithstanding
any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, each
nonpublic school which seeks aid payable in the 2025-26 school year
to reimburse 2024-25 school year expenses shall submit a claim for
such aid to the state education department no later than April 1,
2026, and such claims shall be paid by the Department no later than
May 31, 2026.
Provided further that funds appropriated herein shall be made avail-
able on or after April 1, 2026 (21769) .............................
136,762,000 ..................................... (re. $136,762,000)
For aid payable in the 2025-26 school year for additional nonpublic
school aid to reimburse 2024-25 and prior school year expenses.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, each nonpublic school which seeks aid payable in the
2025-26 school year to reimburse 2024-25 school year expenses shall
submit a claim for such aid to the state education department no
later than April 1, 2026, and such claims shall be paid by the
Department no later than May 31, 2026.
Provided further that funds appropriated herein shall be made avail-
able on or after April 1, 2026 (21770) .............................
91,618,000 ....................................... (re. $91,618,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For services and expenses related to nonpublic school STEM programs
(55964) ... 85,500,000 ........................... (re. $85,500,000)
For services and expenses related to nonpublic school arts and music
programs pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget
(57017) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000)

319 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the New York state center for school
safety for the 2025-26 school year. Funds appropriated herein shall
be used to operate a statewide center and shall be subject to an
expenditure plan approved by the director of the budget (21774) ....
466,000 ............................................. (re. $466,000)
For services and expenses of the health education program for the
2025-26 school year. Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for health-related programs including, but not limited to, those
providing instruction and supportive services in comprehensive
health education and/or acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS)
education. Of the amounts appropriated herein, $86,000 shall be
available for the program previously operated as the school health
demonstration program. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, to any state agency
or department to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation
(21775) ... 691,000 ................................. (re. $691,000)
For competitive grants for the 2025-26 school year for extended day
programs and school violence prevention programs pursuant to section
2814 of the education law provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible entities receiving funds
for extended day programs may include not-for-profit organizations
working in collaboration with a public school or school district
(21776) ... 24,344,000 ........................... (re. $20,334,000)
For aid payable for the 2025-26 school year for support of county
vocational education and extension boards pursuant to section 1104
of the education law, provided, however, that notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, rule, or regulation, any apportion-
ment of aid shall be based on a quota amounting to one-half of the
salary paid each teacher, director, assistant, and supervisor, where
such salary is attributable to a course of study first submitted to
the commissioner for approval pursuant to section 1103 of the educa-
tion law on or before July 1, 2010, but not to exceed the amount
computed by the commissioner based upon an assumed annualized salary
equal to ten thousand five hundred dollars per school year on
account of the employment of such teacher, director, assistant or
supervisor and provided further that payment from this appropriation
shall first be made for approved claims for salary expenses for the
2025-26 school year, and any amount remaining after payment of such
claims shall be available for payment of unpaid claims for prior
school years (21781) ... 932,000 .................... (re. $834,000)
For services and expenses of the primary mental health project at the
children's institute for the 2025-26 school year (21778) ...........
894,000 ............................................. (re. $894,000)
For services and expenses associated with the math and science high
schools for the 2025-26 school year in the amount of $1,382,000,
provided that such funds shall be allocated equally among those
entities that received program funding for the 2007-08 school year
(21779) ... 1,382,000 ............................. (re. $1,037,000)
For additional services and expenses associated with the Bard High
School Early College Queens for the 2025-26 school year (55939) ....
461,000 ............................................. (re. $461,000)

320 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for educational services
and expenses of the Syracuse city school district for the say yes to
education program (21800) ... 350,000 ............... (re. $263,000)
For services and expenses of the center for autism and related disa-
bilities at the state university of New York at Albany (21782) ...
1,240,000 ......................................... (re. $1,240,000)
For postsecondary aid to Native Americans to fund awards to eligible
students. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, the amount herein made available shall constitute the state's
entire obligation for all costs incurred under section 4118 of the
education law in state fiscal year 2025-26 (21833) .................
800,000 ............................................. (re. $800,000)
For services and expenses of the summer food program for the 2025-26
school year (21784) ... 3,049,000 ................... (re. $755,000)
Work Force Education. For partial reimbursement of services and
expenses per contract hour of work force education conducted by the
consortium for worker education (CWE), a private not-for-profit
corporation program approved by the commissioner of education that
enable adults who are 21 years of age or older to obtain or retain
employment or improve their work skills capacity to enhance their
opportunities for increased earnings and advancement (21801) .......
11,500,000 ........................................ (re. $5,310,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Workers Education
Credential Initiative (55967) ... 250,000 ........... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the clinically rich intensive teacher
institute bilingual extension and English to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ... 385,000 ............... (re. $385,000)
For services and expenses of a teacher diversity pipeline pilot oper-
ated by the State University College at Buffalo for the Buffalo City
School District to assist teacher aides and teaching assistants in
attaining the necessary educational and professional credentials to
obtain teacher certification (55997) ...............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of a $490,000 2025-26 school year program
for mentoring and tutoring operated by the Hillside Children's
Center, which is based on model programs proven to be effective in
producing outcomes that include, but are not limited to, improved
graduation rates, provided that such services shall be provided to
students in one or more city school districts located in a city
having a population in excess of 125,000 and less than 1,000,000
inhabitants (21804) ... 490,000 ..................... (re. $490,000)
For purposes of the Just for Kids program at the State University of
New York at Albany (56005) ... 235,000 .............. (re. $235,000)
For educational services and expenses for out-of-school immigrant
youth and young adults (56045) ... 1,000,000 ...... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State United Teacher's Many
Threads, One Fabric implicit bias training for public school educa-
tors (23347) ... 1,125,000 ........................ (re. $1,125,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain school districts, public
libraries, not-for-profit institutions, and public colleges and
universities. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, the funds

321 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged, trans-
ferred, or otherwise made available to the city university of New
York, the state university of New York, the higher education
services corporation, or the New York state council on the arts.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from
this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the director of the budget which sets forth either an item-
ized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropriation. Notwithstanding
section 40 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, this appropriation shall remain in full force and effect
to the maximum extent allowed by law (23318) .......................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities based on a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided that
at least the following amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $21,590,000 for the continuation of school-wide extended learning
grants to school districts or school districts in collaboration with
not-for-profit community-based organizations pursuant to the guide-
lines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2013.
(ii) $7,100,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2013-20
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(iii) $3,248,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2014-21
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2014.
(iv) $3,005,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2015-22
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015.
(v) $3,750,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2018-24
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017.
(vi) $2,879,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2019-25
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(vii) $4,058,000 for the continuation of early college high school
awards made based on responses to the New York state early college
high school ECHS program request for proposals pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2017.
(viii) $3,123,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2023-30
NYS pathways in technology early college high school program request
for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2022.
(ix) $1,364,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2013.

322 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(x) $2,415,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2018.
(xi) $4,500,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2024-28
smart scholars early college high school program request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2022.
(xii) $1,798,000 for the continuation of smart transfer early college
high school program grants awarded based on responses to the New
York state smart transfer ECHS program request for proposals pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2016.
(xiii) $20,000,000 for the continuation of early college high school
and pathways in technology early college high school grants,
provided that funds shall be used pursuant to the guidelines set
forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2023.
(xiv) $22,500,000 for the continuation of the master teacher program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter 53 of the laws
of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, chapter 53 of the laws of
2018, chapter 53 of the laws of 2019, and chapter 53 of the laws of
2022; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for master teacher program funding may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such program.
(xv) $5,000,000 for the continuation of QUALITYstarsNY, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the laws of 2016;
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval
of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for
QUALITYstarsNY may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the sole purpose of administering such system.
(xvi) $3,000,000 for the continuation of New York state masters-in-e-
ducation teacher incentive scholarship program, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2015; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available for the masters-in-education teacher incentive
scholarship program may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the higher education services corpo-
ration for the sole purpose of administering such program.
(xvii) $5,800,000 for services and expenses to subsidize the remaining
cost of advanced placement and international baccalaureate exam fees
for low-income students, as determined by free and reduced price
lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner
of education and approved by the director of the budget.
(xviii) $1,500,000 for grants for the advanced courses access program
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018 and chapter 53 of the
laws of 2019, provided that such grants shall be awarded to school
districts and/or boards of cooperative educational services in order
to increase advanced course offerings for students, particularly in
districts with no or very limited advanced course offerings.

323 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(xix) $400,000 for empire state excellence in teaching awards pursuant
to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the state university of
New York for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xx) $6,000,000 for grants for the smart start computer science
program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxi) $5,000,000 for additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school
breakfast programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxii) $250,000 for grants to school districts to allow community
schools to expand mental health services and capacity of community
school programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxiii) $3,000,000 for grants to school districts to allow districts
to increase the use of alternative approaches to student discipline,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019.
(xxiv) $1,500,000 for services and expenses of school mental health
programs pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2019. Provided further, that of the amount appro-
priated herein, up to $500,000 may be used to support the School
Mental Health Resource and Training Center.
(xxv) $3,000,000 for the continuation of the we teach NY grant
program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the we teach NY
grant may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxvi) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the expanded mathematics
access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the
expanded mathematics access program may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such awards.
(xxvii) $750,000 for the continuation of the middle school expanded
mathematics access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2023; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxviii) $200,000 for the continuation of the New York state youth
council, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the New York
state youth council may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the services and expenses of administering such coun-
cil.

324 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(xxix) $10,000,000 for student mental health support grants to school
districts, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2020; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of mental health for the sole purpose of administering
such grants (23306) ................................................
195,613,000 ..................................... (re. $188,267,000)
For services and expenses of community school regional technical
assistance centers for the 2024-25 school year. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used to operate three regional centers that shall
provide technical assistance to school districts establishing or
operating community school programs, pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of education and approved by the director of the
budget. Provided, further, that such plan shall establish a process
for selection of nonprofit entities with expertise in community
school programs and technical assistance to operate such centers
(55962) ... 1,200,000 ............................. (re. $1,200,000)
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 .................. (re. $10,134,000)
For additional services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initi-
ative. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any
other program or fund within the state education department for
these purposes (57015) ... 10,000,000 ............ (re. $10,000,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations for the 2023-24
school year for support for the operation of targeted pre-kindergar-
ten for those providers not eligible to receive funding pursuant to
section 3602-e of the education law and for support for providers
continuing to operate such programs in the 2024-25 school year. Such
funds shall be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
(21763) ... 1,303,000 ................................. (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations of a $21,392,000
teacher resources and computer training centers program for the
2023-24 school year (55985) ... 6,418,000 ........... (re. $560,000)
For services and expenses of the NYSUT education and learning trust to
deliver training to educators on evidence-based and scientifically
based instructional practices for the teaching of reading pursuant
to a plan approved by the director of the budget (57011) ...........
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For the school lunch and breakfast program.
Funds for the school lunch and breakfast program shall be expended
subject to the limitation of funds available and may be used to
reimburse sponsors of non-profit school lunch, breakfast, or other
school child feeding programs based upon the number of federally
reimbursable breakfasts and lunches served to students under such
program agreements entered into by the state education department
and such sponsors, in accordance with an act of Congress entitled
the "National School Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, the
provisions of the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," P.L. 89-642, as

325 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
amended, in the case of school breakfast programs to reimburse spon-
sors in excess of the federal rates of reimbursement, or for the
community eligibility provision state subsidy pursuant to section
925 of the education law in the 2024-25 school year. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby appropri-
ated, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are to be available
for the purposes herein specified for obligations heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue for the school years beginning July 1, 2024
for purposes of the state subsidy under section 925 of the education
law and July 1, 2022, July 1, 2023 and July 1, 2024 for other
purposes established by this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
amount appropriated herein represents the maximum amount payable
during the 2024-25 state fiscal year for state reimbursement for
school lunch and breakfast programs (21702) ........................
180,000,000 .......................................... (re. $23,000)
For additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school lunch programs
that have purchased at least 30 percent of their total food products
for their school lunch service program from New York State farmers,
growers, producers, or processors, based upon the number of feder-
ally reimbursable lunches served to students under such program
agreements entered into by the state education department and such
sponsors, in accordance with the provisions of the "National School
Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, to reimburse sponsors in excess
of the federal and State rates of reimbursement, provided, that the
total State subsidy shall be equal to $0.1901 per free and paid
school lunch meal, and $0.0519 per reduced-price school lunch meal,
provided further that funds appropriated herein shall be made avail-
able on or after April 1, 2025 (55986) .............................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For additional services of the school lunch and breakfast program to
pay the student cost of reduced price meals effective July 1, 2024
(23316) ... 2,300,000 ............................. (re. $2,300,000)
For additional nonpublic school aid to reimburse 2021-22 and 2022-23
school year expenses (57012) ... 23,000,000 ....... (re. $1,103,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For services and expenses related to nonpublic school STEM programs
(55964) ... 73,000,000 ........................... (re. $73,000,000)
For services and expenses related to nonpublic school arts and music
programs pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget
(57017) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state center for school
safety for the 2024-25 school year. Funds appropriated herein shall
be used to operate a statewide center and shall be subject to an
expenditure plan approved by the director of the budget (21774) ....
466,000 ............................................. (re. $466,000)
For services and expenses of the health education program for the
2024-25 school year. Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for health-related programs including, but not limited to, those
providing instruction and supportive services in comprehensive

326 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
health education and/or acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS)
education. Of the amounts appropriated herein, $86,000 shall be
available for the program previously operated as the school health
demonstration program. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, to any state agency
or department to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation
(21775) ... 691,000 ................................. (re. $620,000)
For competitive grants for the 2024-25 school year for extended day
programs and school violence prevention programs pursuant to section
2814 of the education law provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible entities receiving funds
for extended day programs may include not-for-profit organizations
working in collaboration with a public school or school district
(21776) ... 24,344,000 ............................ (re. $5,530,000)
For services and expenses associated with the math and science high
schools for the 2024-25 school year in the amount of $1,382,000,
provided that such funds shall be allocated equally among those
entities that received program funding for the 2007-08 school year
(21779) ... 1,382,000 ............................... (re. $234,000)
For additional services and expenses associated with the Bard High
School Early College Queens for the 2024-25 school year (55939) ....
461,000 ............................................. (re. $461,000)
For services and expenses of the center for autism and related disa-
bilities at the state university of New York at Albany (21782) .....
1,240,000 ......................................... (re. $1,240,000)
For postsecondary aid to Native Americans to fund awards to eligible
students. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, the amount herein made available shall constitute the state's
entire obligation for all costs incurred under section 4118 of the
education law in state fiscal year 2024-25 (21833) .................
800,000 ............................................. (re. $800,000)
For services and expenses of the summer food program for the 2024-25
school year (21784) ... 3,049,000 ................... (re. $587,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Workers Education
Credential Initiative (55967) ......................................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For the early college high schools program for the 2024-25 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
provided, further, that a portion of the payment to the early
college high schools program awarded from this appropriation shall
be available on a sliding scale based upon the number of college
credits earned annually by participating students consistent with
guidelines established by the commissioner. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher educa-
tion partners participating in an early college high schools
program, or the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at
the institution, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of
tuition and/or fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for

327 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
students enrolled in such early college high schools program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive (56139) ...........................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $580,000)
For services and expenses of the clinically rich intensive teacher
institute bilingual extension and English to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ... 385,000 ............... (re. $166,000)
For services and expenses of a teacher diversity pipeline pilot oper-
ated by the State University College at Buffalo for the Buffalo City
School District to assist teacher aides and teaching assistants in
attaining the necessary educational and professional credentials to
obtain teacher certification (55997) ...............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of a $490,000 2024-25 school year program
for mentoring and tutoring operated by the Hillside Children's
Center, which is based on model programs proven to be effective in
producing outcomes that include, but are not limited to, improved
graduation rates, provided that such services shall be provided to
students in one or more city school districts located in a city
having a population in excess of 125,000 and less than 1,000,000
inhabitants (21804) ... 490,000 ..................... (re. $490,000)
For purposes of the Just for Kids program at the State University of
New York at Albany (56005) .........................................
235,000 .............................................. (re. $67,000)
For educational services and expenses for out-of-school immigrant
youth and young adults (56045) ... 1,000,000 ...... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State United Teacher's Many
Threads, One Fabric implicit bias training for public school educa-
tors (23347) ... 1,125,000 ........................ (re. $1,125,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain school districts, public
libraries, not-for-profit institutions, and public colleges and
universities. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged, trans-
ferred, or otherwise made available to the city university of New
York, the state university of New York, the higher education
services corporation, or the New York state council on the arts.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan developed
by the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized
list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropriation. Notwithstanding
section 40 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, this appropriation shall remain in full force and effect
to the maximum extent allowed by law (23318) .......................
15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1 of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For nonpublic school aid payable in the 2024-25 school year to reim-
burse 2023-24 and prior school year expenses. Provided that nonpub-

328 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
lic schools shall continue to receive aid based on either a 5.0/5.5
hour standard instructional day, or another work day as certified by
the nonpublic school officials, in accordance with the methodology
for computing salary and benefits applied by the department in
paying aid for the 2012-13 and prior school years. Notwithstanding
any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, each
nonpublic school which seeks aid payable in the 2024-25 school year
to reimburse 2023-24 school year expenses shall submit a claim for
such aid to the state education department no later than April 1,
2025, and such claims shall be paid by the Department no later than
May 31, 2025.
Provided further that funds appropriated herein shall be made avail-
able on or after April 1, 2025 (21769) .............................
129,485,000 ....................................... (re. $2,200,000)
For aid payable in the 2024-25 school year for additional nonpublic
school aid to reimburse 2023-24 and prior school year expenses.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, each nonpublic school which seeks aid payable in the
2024-25 school year to reimburse 2023-24 school year expenses shall
submit a claim for such aid to the state education department no
later than April 1, 2025, and such claims shall be paid by the
Department no later than May 31, 2025.
Provided further that funds appropriated herein shall be made avail-
able on or after April 1, 2025 (21770) .............................
86,743,000 ........................................ (re. $2,601,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities based on a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided that
at least the following amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $21,590,000 for the continuation of school-wide extended learning
grants to school districts or school districts in collaboration with
not-for-profit community-based organizations pursuant to the guide-
lines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2013.
(ii) $7,383,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2013-20
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(iii) $3,407,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2014-21
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2014.
(iv) $3,021,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2015-22
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015.
(v) $3,751,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2018-24
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017.

329 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(vi) $2,533,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2019-25
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(vii) $4,058,000 for the continuation of early college high school
awards made based on responses to the New York state early college
high school ECHS program request for proposals pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2017.
(viii) $9,000,000 for expansion of programs, provided $4,500,000 shall
be made available for new pathways in technology early college high
school grants and $4,500,000 shall be made available for new smart
scholars early college high school grants, pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of education and approved by the director
of the budget.
Provided that such requests for proposal shall contain contingent
requirements to meet program goals and metrics.
(ix) $1,364,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2013.
(x) $2,083,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2018.
(xi) $1,798,000 for the continuation of smart transfer early college
high school program grants awarded based on responses to the New
York state smart transfer ECHS program request for proposals pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2016.
(xii) $22,500,000 for the continuation of the master teacher program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter 53 of the laws
of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, chapter 53 of the laws of
2018, chapter 53 of the laws of 2019, and chapter 53 of the laws of
2022; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for master teacher program funding may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such program.
(xiii) $5,000,000 for the continuation of QUALITYstarsNY, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the laws of 2016;
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval
of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for
QUALITYstarsNY may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the sole purpose of administering such system.
(xiv) $3,000,000 for the continuation of New York state masters-in-e-
ducation teacher incentive scholarship program, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2015; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available for the masters-in-education teacher incentive
scholarship program may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the higher education services corpo-
ration for the sole purpose of administering such program.

330 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(xv) $5,800,000 for services and expenses to subsidize the remaining
cost of advanced placement and international baccalaureate exam fees
for low-income students, as determined by free and reduced price
lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner
of education and approved by the director of the budget.
(xvi) $1,500,000 for grants for the advanced courses access program
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018 and chapter 53 of the
laws of 2019, provided that such grants shall be awarded to school
districts and/or boards of cooperative educational services in order
to increase advanced course offerings for students, particularly in
districts with no or very limited advanced course offerings.
(xvii) $400,000 for empire state excellence in teaching awards pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the state university of
New York for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xviii) $6,000,000 for grants for the smart start computer science
program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xix) $5,000,000 for additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school
breakfast programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xx) $250,000 for grants to school districts to allow community
schools to expand mental health services and capacity of community
school programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxi) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the refugee and immigrant
student welcome grants program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws
of 2019; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for the refugee and immigrant student welcome grants program
may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made
available to the office of temporary and disability assistance for
the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxii) $3,000,000 for grants to school districts to allow districts to
increase the use of alternative approaches to student discipline,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019.
(xxiii) $1,500,000 for services and expenses of school mental health
programs pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2019. Provided further, that of the amount appro-
priated herein, up to $500,000 may be used to support the School
Mental Health Resource and Training Center.
(xxiv) $3,000,000 for the continuation of the we teach NY grant
program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the we teach NY
grant may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxv) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the expanded mathematics
access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the

331 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
expanded mathematics access program may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such awards.
(xxvi) $200,000 for the continuation of the New York state youth coun-
cil, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made available for the New York state
youth council may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the services and expenses of administering such coun-
cil.
(xxvii) $10,000,000 for student mental health support grants to school
districts, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2020; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of mental health for the sole purpose of administering
such grants.
(xxviii) $750,000 for the middle school expanded mathematics access
program, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget. Provided further
that the funds hereby made available shall be awarded to a qualified
organization to provide additional math instruction through the use
of internet accessible learning games to build basic math fluency
for middle school students in grades six through eight. Provided
further that such an organization shall have been independently
evaluated for its efficacy in improving intermediate math skills.
Provided further that up to $250,000 of the amount hereby made
available shall be allocated for the services and expenses of a
state-wide math tournament for students in grades six through eight.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the state university of New York for the services and expenses of
administering such awards.
(xxix) $20,000,000 for early college high school and pathways in tech-
nology early college high school grants, pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of education and approved by the director
of the budget, provided that such plan shall prioritize (a) programs
focused on computer science, computer hardware and software engi-
neering, nursing and/or teaching, and (b) programs serving high
rates of economically disadvantaged students.
Provided further that school districts or boards of cooperative educa-
tional services awarded such grants shall agree to offer opportu-
nities for every student in the school to graduate with at least one
college credit, through programs including but not limited to an
early college high school, dual enrollment, or advanced placement
courses.
Provided further that a portion of the payments to early college high
school programs awarded funding from this appropriation shall be
made on a sliding scale based upon the number of college credits

332 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
earned annually by participating students, consistent with guide-
lines established by the commissioner of education.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher education
partners participating in an early college high school program, or
the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at the institu-
tion, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of tuition and/or
fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for students
enrolled in such an early college high school program with no
reduction in other state, local, or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive.
Provided further that such requests for proposal shall contain contin-
gent requirements to meet program goals and metrics.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the $20,750,000
made available in items (xxviii) and (xxix) herein shall constitute
the competitive awards amount authorized for the 2023-24 school year
(23306) ... 197,113,000 ......................... (re. $128,391,000)
For New York state high school-college-work-force transformation
grants, pursuant to a plan developed jointly by the commissioner of
education, the commissioner of labor, and the president of the New
York state urban development corporation, and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget, to local collaboratives consisting of (i) a
school district or board of cooperative educational services or any
combination of school districts and/or boards of cooperative educa-
tional services working together and (ii) a community college or
community colleges, working in partnership with local industry to
implement strategic workforce plans that promote job readiness in
their local economies.
Provided further that such grants shall be awarded based on factors
including, but not limited to, the following: (i) the
collaborative's proposal to build successful high school, community
college, and industry relationships, (ii) the extent to which the
collaborative will partner with local industry to tailor high school
and community college programming to regional business or future
employer needs, (iii) the extent to which the applicant's proposal
includes age-appropriate work-force preparedness and job training
for high school and community college students based on the needs of
local industry, (iv) measures of the need of students to be served
in the school district or board of cooperative educational services,
and (v) proposal quality.
Provided further that applications shall be reviewed and scored by
regional economic development councils and that a minimum of one
award shall be made available in each regional economic development
council region in the State.
Provided further that such funds shall be used to support the imple-
mentation of the strategic workforce plans of the applicants receiv-
ing such grants for two school years.
Provided further that such funds shall only be used to supplement, and
not supplant, current local expenditures of federal, state or local
funds for similar purposes.
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, this appropriation shall remain in full

333 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
force and effect to the maximum extent allowed by law (23389) ......
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For services and expenses of community school regional technical
assistance centers for the 2023-24 school year. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used to operate three regional centers that shall
provide technical assistance to school districts establishing or
operating community school programs, pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of education and approved by the director of the
budget. Provided, further, that such plan shall establish a process
for selection of nonprofit entities with expertise in community
school programs and technical assistance to operate such centers
(55962) ... 1,200,000 ............................... (re. $408,000)
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 ................... (re. $4,339,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations for the 2022-23
school year for support for the operation of targeted prekindergar-
ten for those providers not eligible to receive funding pursuant to
section 3602-e of the education law and for support for providers
continuing to operate such programs in the 2023-24 school year. Such
funds shall be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
(21763) ... 1,303,000 ................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations of a $21,392,000
teacher resources and computer training centers program for the
2022-23 school year (55985) ... 6,418,000 ........... (re. $712,000)
For the school lunch and breakfast program.
Funds for the school lunch and breakfast program shall be expended
subject to the limitation of funds available and may be used to
reimburse sponsors of non-profit school lunch, breakfast, or other
school child feeding programs based upon the number of federally
reimbursable breakfasts and lunches served to students under such
program agreements entered into by the state education department
and such sponsors, in accordance with an act of Congress entitled
the "National School Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, the
provisions of the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," P.L. 89-642, as
amended, in the case of school breakfast programs to reimburse spon-
sors in excess of the federal rates of reimbursement, or for the
community eligibility provision state subsidy pursuant to section
925 of the education law in the 2023-24 school year. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby appropri-
ated, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are to be available
for the purposes herein specified for obligations heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue for the school years beginning July 1, 2023
for purposes of the state subsidy under section 925 of the education
law and July 1, 2021, July 1, 2022 and July 1, 2023 for other
purposes established by this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
amount appropriated herein represents the maximum amount payable
during the 2023-24 state fiscal year for state reimbursement for

334 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
school lunch and breakfast programs (21702) ........................
169,000,000 ......................................... (re. $163,000)
For additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school lunch programs
that have purchased at least 30 percent of their total food products
for their school lunch service program from New York State farmers,
growers, producers, or processors, based upon the number of feder-
ally reimbursable lunches served to students under such program
agreements entered into by the state education department and such
sponsors, in accordance with the provisions of the "National School
Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, to reimburse sponsors in excess
of the federal and State rates of reimbursement, provided, that the
total State subsidy shall not exceed twenty-five cents per school
lunch meal, which shall include any annual state subsidy received by
such sponsor under any other provision of State law, provided
further that funds appropriated herein shall be made available on or
after April 1, 2024 (55986) ... 10,000,000 ....... (re. $10,000,000)
For additional services of the school lunch and breakfast program to
pay the student cost of reduced price meals effective July 1, 2023
(23316) ... 2,300,000 ............................. (re. $2,300,000)
For nonpublic school aid payable in the 2023-24 school year to reim-
burse 2022-23 school year expenses. Provided that nonpublic schools
shall continue to receive aid based on either a 5.0/5.5 hour stand-
ard instructional day, or another work day as certified by the
nonpublic school officials, in accordance with the methodology for
computing salary and benefits applied by the department in paying
aid for the 2012-13 and prior school years. Notwithstanding any
provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, each nonpublic
school which seeks aid payable in the 2023-24 school year shall
submit a claim for such aid to the state education department no
later than April 1, 2024, and such claims shall be paid by the
Department no later than May 31, 2024. Provided further that funds
appropriated herein shall be made available on or after April 1,
2024 (21769) ... 115,652,000 ......................... (re. $29,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For services and expenses related to nonpublic school STEM programs
(55964) ... 70,000,000 ........................... (re. $70,000,000)
For additional services and expenses related to nonpublic school STEM
programs [(55964)] (23317) ... 3,000,000 .......... (re. $3,000,000)
For services and expenses of the New York state center for school
safety for the 2023-24 school year. Funds appropriated herein shall
be used to operate a state-wide center and shall be subject to an
expenditure plan approved by the director of the budget (21774)
466,000 .............................................. (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of the health education program for the
2023-24 school year. Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for health-related programs including, but not limited to, those
providing instruction and supportive services in comprehensive
health education and/or acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS)
education. Of the amounts appropriated herein, $86,000 shall be
available for the program previously operated as the school health

335 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
demonstration program. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, to any state agency
or department to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation
(21775) ... 691,000 ................................. (re. $607,000)
For competitive grants for the 2023-24 school year for extended day
programs and school violence prevention programs pursuant to section
2814 of the education law provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible entities receiving funds
for extended day programs may include not-for-profit organizations
working in collaboration with a public school or school district
(21776) ... 24,344,000 ........................... (re. $16,520,000)
For aid payable for the 2023-24 school year for support of county
vocational education and extension boards pursuant to section 1104
of the education law, provided, however, that notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, rule, or regulation, any apportion-
ment of aid shall be based on a quota amounting to one-half of the
salary paid each teacher, director, assistant, and supervisor, where
such salary is attributable to a course of study first submitted to
the commissioner for approval pursuant to section 1103 of the educa-
tion law on or before July 1, 2010, but not to exceed the amount
computed by the commissioner based upon an assumed annualized salary
equal to ten thousand five hundred dollars per school year on
account of the employment of such teacher, director, assistant or
supervisor and provided further that payment from this appropriation
shall first be made for approved claims for salary expenses for the
2023-24 school year, and any amount remaining after payment of such
claims shall be available for payment of unpaid claims for prior
school years (21781) ...............................................
932,000 ............................................. (re. $145,000)
For services and expenses associated with the math and science high
schools for the 2023-24 school year in the amount of $1,382,000,
provided that such funds shall be allocated equally among those
entities that received program funding for the 2007-08 school year
(21779) ... 1,382,000 ............................... (re. $380,000)
For additional services and expenses associated with the Bard High
School Early College Queens for the 2023-24 school year (55939) ....
461,000 ............................................. (re. $461,000)
For services and expenses of the center for autism and related disa-
bilities at the state university of New York at Albany (21782) .....
1,240,000 ......................................... (re. $1,240,000)
For postsecondary aid to Native Americans to fund awards to eligible
students. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, the amount herein made available shall constitute the state's
entire obligation for all costs incurred under section 4118 of the
education law in state fiscal year 2023-24 (21833) .................
800,000 ............................................. (re. $251,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Workers Education
Credential Initiative (55967) ... 250,000 ........... (re. $250,000)
For the early college high schools program for the 2023-24 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early

336 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
provided, further, that a portion of the payment to the early
college high schools program awarded from this appropriation shall
be available on a sliding scale based upon the number of college
credits earned annually by participating students consistent with
guidelines established by the commissioner. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher educa-
tion partners participating in an early college high schools
program, or the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at
the institution, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of
tuition and/or fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for
students enrolled in such early college high schools program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive (56139) ...........................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $924,000)
For services and expenses of the clinically rich intensive teacher
institute bilingual extension and English to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ... 385,000 ................ (re. $77,000)
For services and expenses of a teacher diversity pipeline pilot oper-
ated by the State University College at Buffalo for the Buffalo City
School District to assist teacher aides and teaching assistants in
attaining the necessary educational and professional credentials to
obtain teacher certification (55997) ...............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For purposes of the Just for Kids program at the State University of
New York at Albany (56005) ... 235,000 ................ (re. $8,000)
For educational services and expenses for out-of-school immigrant
youth and young adults (56045) ... 1,000,000 ........ (re. $160,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State United Teacher's Many
Threads, One Fabric implicit bias training for public school educa-
tors (23347) ... 1,125,000 ........................ (re. $1,125,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain school districts, public
libraries, and not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan developed by the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation. Notwithstanding section 40 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, this appropri-
ation shall remain in full force and effect to the maximum extent
allowed by law (23318) ... 20,000,000 ............ (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities based on a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided that
at least the following amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:

337 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(i) $21,590,000 for the continuation of school-wide extended learning
grants to school districts or school districts in collaboration with
not-for-profit community-based organizations pursuant to the guide-
lines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2013.
(ii) $8,495,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2013-20
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(iii) $3,545,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2014-21
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2014.
(iv) $3,465,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2015-2022
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015.
(v) $3,750,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2018-2024
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017.
(vi) $2,437,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2019-2025
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(vii) $4,058,000 for the continuation of early college high school
awards made based on responses to the New York state early college
high school ECHS program request for proposals pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2017.
(viii) $9,000,000 for expansion of programs, provided $4,500,000 shall
be made available for new pathways in technology early college high
school grants and $4,500,000 shall be made available for new smart
scholars early college high school grants, pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of education and approved by the director
of the budget.
Provided that such requests for proposal shall contain contingent
requirements to meet program goals and metrics. Provided further
that such grants shall be made available after the issuance of a
report by the commissioner in a form prescribed by the director of
the budget including analysis of college credits granted to program
graduates. Such report shall be completed no later than June 30,
2022 and such funds shall be released promptly thereafter.
(ix) $1,364,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2013.
(x) $1,883,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2018.
(xi) $1,798,000 for the continuation of smart transfer early college
high school program grants awarded based on responses to the New
York state smart transfer ECHS program request for proposals pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2016.
(xii) $20,500,000 for the continuation of the master teacher program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter 53 of the laws
of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, chapter 53 of the laws of

338 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
2018, and chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made available for master teacher
program funding may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the state university of New York for the
services and expenses of administering such program.
(xiii) $5,000,000 for the continuation of QUALITYstarsNY, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the laws of 2016;
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval
of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for
QUALITYstarsNY may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the sole purpose of administering such system.
(xiv) $3,000,000 for the continuation of New York state masters-in-e-
ducation teacher incentive scholarship program, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2015; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available for the masters-in-education teacher incentive
scholarship program may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the higher education services corpo-
ration for the sole purpose of administering such program.
(xv) $35,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xvi) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xvii) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xviii) $5,800,000 for services and expenses to subsidize the remain-
ing cost of advanced placement and international baccalaureate exam
fees for low-income students, as determined by free and reduced
price lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget.
(xix) $1,500,000 for grants for the advanced courses access program
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018 and chapter 53 of the

339 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
laws of 2019, provided that such grants shall be awarded to school
districts and/or boards of cooperative educational services in order
to increase advanced course offerings for students, particularly in
districts with no or very limited advanced course offerings.
(xx) $400,000 for empire state excellence in teaching awards pursuant
to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the state university of
New York for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxi) $6,000,000 for grants for the smart start computer science
program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxii) $5,000,000 for additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school
breakfast programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxiii) $250,000 for grants to school districts to allow community
schools to expand mental health services and capacity of community
school programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxiv) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the refugee and immigrant
student welcome grants program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws
of 2019; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for the refugee and immigrant student welcome grants program
may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made
available to the office of temporary and disability assistance for
the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxv) $3,000,000 for grants to school districts to allow districts to
increase the use of alternative approaches to student discipline,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019.
(xxvi) $1,500,000 for services and expenses of school mental health
programs pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2019. Provided further, that of the amount appro-
priated herein, up to $500,000 may be used to support the School
Mental Health Resource and Training Center.
(xxvii) $3,000,000 for the continuation of the we teach NY grant
program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the we teach NY
grant may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxviii) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the expanded mathematics
access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the
expanded mathematics access program may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such awards.
(xxix) $200,000 for the continuation of the New York state youth coun-
cil, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of

340 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the budget, the funds hereby made available for the New York state
youth council may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the services and expenses of administering such coun-
cil.
(xxx) $10,000,000 for student mental health support grants to school
districts, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2020;
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of mental health for the sole purpose of administering
such grants.
(xxxi) $2,000,000 for additional master teacher and school counselor
awards to support individual high-performing teachers and school
counselors; provided that awards shall prioritize support of teach-
ers of color, career and technical education teachers, and guidance
counselors.
Provided further that the funds hereby made available shall support
the award of stipends of $15,000 per annum over four years to such
individual teachers or school counselors, and of related costs,
administered by the state university of New York pursuant to a plan
developed in consultation with the commissioner of education, who
shall consult with appropriate state organizations representing K-12
public school teachers and school counselors, and approved by the
director of the budget, to build a corps of outstanding teachers and
counselors in order to improve the quality of instruction and coun-
seling at public schools. Such plan for use of funding hereby made
available shall: (i) establish an application process; (ii) include
guidelines by which applications from eligible teachers and school
counselors shall be evaluated, which shall include, but not be
limited to, evidence of professional achievement and effectiveness;
and (iii) provide periodic opportunities for professional develop-
ment for successful applicants.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the state university of New York for the services and expenses of
administering such awards. Nothing herein shall be construed to
limit the rights of labor organizations representing teachers and
school counselors to collectively bargain terms and conditions
pursuant to article 14 of the civil service law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the $2,000,000
made available in item (xxxi) herein shall constitute the compet-
itive awards amount authorized for the 2022-23 school year (23306)
... 231,363,000 ................................. (re. $144,766,000)
For grants to school districts to support programs designed to improve
school climate; provided that funds appropriated herein shall be
awarded to districts to implement programs focused on meeting the
holistic needs of students using proven models or innovative
approaches, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget; and provided

341 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
further that such plan shall prioritize schools with high levels of
suspensions (23365) ... 2,000,000 ................. (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 ................... (re. $7,061,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations for the 2021-22
school year for support for the operation of targeted prekindergar-
ten for those providers not eligible to receive funding pursuant to
section 3602-e of the education law and for support for providers
continuing to operate such programs in the 2022-23 school year. Such
funds shall be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
(21763) ... 1,303,000 ................................. (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations of a $14,260,000
teacher resources and computer training centers program for the
2021-22 school year (55985) ... 4,278,000 ........... (re. $384,000)
For additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school lunch programs
that have purchased at least 30 percent of their total food products
for their school lunch service program from New York State farmers,
growers, producers, or processors, based upon the number of feder-
ally reimbursable lunches served to students under such program
agreements entered into by the state education department and such
sponsors, in accordance with the provisions of the "National School
Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, to reimburse sponsors in excess
of the federal and State rates of reimbursement, provided, that the
total State subsidy shall not exceed twenty-five cents per school
lunch meal, which shall include any annual state subsidy received by
such sponsor under any other provision of State law, provided
further that funds appropriated herein shall be made available on or
after April 1, 2023 (55986) ... 10,000,000 ....... (re. $10,000,000)
For additional services of the school lunch and breakfast program to
pay the student cost of reduced price meals effective July 1, 2022
(23316) ... 2,300,000 ............................. (re. $2,300,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For competitive grants for the 2022-23 school year for extended day
programs and school violence prevention programs pursuant to section
2814 of the education law provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible entities receiving funds
for extended day programs may include not-for-profit organizations
working in collaboration with a public school or school district
(21776) ... 24,344,000 .............................. (re. $843,000)
For aid payable for the 2022-23 school year for support of county
vocational education and extension boards pursuant to section 1104
of the education law, provided, however, that notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, rule, or regulation, any apportion-
ment of aid shall be based on a quota amounting to one-half of the
salary paid each teacher, director, assistant, and supervisor, where
such salary is attributable to a course of study first submitted to
the commissioner for approval pursuant to section 1103 of the educa-

342 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tion law on or before July 1, 2010, but not to exceed the amount
computed by the commissioner based upon an assumed annualized salary
equal to ten thousand five hundred dollars per school year on
account of the employment of such teacher, director, assistant or
supervisor and provided further that payment from this appropriation
shall first be made for approved claims for salary expenses for the
2022-23 school year, and any amount remaining after payment of such
claims shall be available for payment of unpaid claims for prior
school years (21781) ... 932,000 .................... (re. $437,000)
For services and expenses of the center for autism and related disa-
bilities at the state university of New York at Albany (21782)
1,240,000 ........................................... (re. $446,000)
For services and expenses of the summer food program for the 2022-23
school year (21784) ... 3,049,000 ..................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Workers Education
Credential Initiative (55967) ... 250,000 ........... (re. $250,000)
For the early college high schools program for the 2022-23 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
provided, further, that a portion of the payment to the early
college high schools program awarded from this appropriation shall
be available on a sliding scale based upon the number of college
credits earned annually by participating students consistent with
guidelines established by the commissioner. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher educa-
tion partners participating in an early college high schools
program, or the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at
the institution, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of
tuition and/or fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for
students enrolled in such early college high schools program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive (56139) ...........................
1,465,000 ........................................... (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of the clinically rich intensive teacher
institute bilingual extension and English to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ... 385,000 ............... (re. $114,000)
For services and expenses of a teacher diversity pipeline pilot oper-
ated by the State University College at Buffalo for the Buffalo City
School District to assist teacher aides and teaching assistants in
attaining the necessary educational and professional credentials to
obtain teacher certification (55997) ...............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For purposes of the Just for Kids program at the State University of
New York at Albany (56005) ... 235,000 ............... (re. $48,000)
For services and expenses of Many Threads, One Fabric union led
implicit bias training for public school educators (23347) .........
1,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,250,000)

343 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For New York state recover from COVID school program grants for the
2023-24, 2024-25, and 2025-26 school years, pursuant to a plan
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget, to school districts and boards of cooper-
ative educational services to address student well-being and learn-
ing loss in response to the trauma brought about by the COVID-19
pandemic through the following: (i) the employment of mental health
professionals, the expansion of school-based mental health services,
or other evidence-based mental health supports for students and
school staff or (ii) the creation or expansion of summer learning,
after-school, or extended day and year programs for students.
Provided further that such grants shall be awarded based on factors
including, but not limited to, the following: (i) measures of the
need of students to be served by the school district or board of
cooperative educational services, (ii) the school district's
proposal to target the highest-need schools and students, or board
of cooperative educational services' proposal to target the
highest-need students, (iii) the extent to which the district's or
board of cooperative educational services' proposal would address
student learning loss or well-being in response to the trauma
brought about by the COVID-19 pandemic, (iv) the extent to which the
proposal would provide for delivery of services directly in school
buildings, (v) the extent to which the proposal maximizes the number
of students served, and (vi) proposal quality.
Provided further that a school district or board of cooperative educa-
tional services shall be eligible for a grant in an amount not to
exceed the amount of local, state, and federal funds that it commits
to expend on the same allowable purpose or purposes for which it
seeks a grant.
Provided further that no school district or board of cooperative
educational services shall receive more than 40 percent of the total
New York state recover from COVID school program grant allocation.
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, this appropriation shall remain in full
force and effect to the maximum extent allowed by law (23364) ......
100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $59,863,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 ................... (re. $9,799,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations of a $14,260,000
teacher resources and computer training centers program for the
2020-21 school year (55985) ... 4,278,000 ........... (re. $781,000)
For additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school lunch programs
that have purchased at least 30 percent of their total food products
for its school lunch service program from New York State farmers,
growers, producers, or processors, based upon the number of feder-
ally reimbursable lunches served to students under such program

344 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
agreements entered into by the state education department and such
sponsors, in accordance with the provisions of the "National School
Lunch Act," P.L. 79-396, as amended, to reimburse sponsors in excess
of the federal and State rates of reimbursement, provided, that the
total State subsidy shall not exceed twenty-five cents per school
lunch meal, which shall include any annual state subsidy received by
such sponsor under any other provision of State law, provided
further that funds appropriated herein shall be made available on or
after April 1, 2022 (55986) ... 10,000,000 ....... (re. $10,000,000)
For additional services of the school lunch and breakfast program to
pay the student cost of reduced price meals effective July 1, 2021
(23316) ... 2,300,000 ............................. (re. $2,300,000)
For aid payable in the 2021-22 school year for additional nonpublic
school aid to reimburse 2020-21 school year expenses.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, each nonpublic school which seeks aid payable in the
2021-22 school year shall submit a claim for such aid to the state
education department no later than April 1, 2022, and such claims
shall be paid by the Department no later than May 31, 2022. Provided
further that funds appropriated herein shall be made available on or
after April 1, 2022 (21770) ... 77,476,000 ............ (re. $8,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For services and expenses related to nonpublic school STEM programs
(55964) ... 40,000,000 .............................. (re. $120,000)
For competitive grants for the 2021-22 school year for extended day
programs and school violence prevention programs pursuant to section
2814 of the education law provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible entities receiving funds
for extended day programs may include not-for-profit organizations
working in collaboration with a public school or school district
(21776) ... 24,344,000 .............................. (re. $860,000)
For aid payable for the 2021-22 school year for support of county
vocational education and extension boards pursuant to section 1104
of the education law, provided, however, that notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, rule, or regulation, any apportion-
ment of aid shall be based on a quota amounting to one-half of the
salary paid each teacher, director, assistant, and supervisor, where
such salary is attributable to a course of study first submitted to
the commissioner for approval pursuant to section 1103 of the educa-
tion law on or before July 1, 2010, but not to exceed the amount
computed by the commissioner based upon an assumed annualized salary
equal to ten thousand five hundred dollars per school year on
account of the employment of such teacher, director, assistant or
supervisor and provided further that payment from this appropriation
shall first be made for approved claims for salary expenses for the
2021-22 school year, and any amount remaining after payment of such
claims shall be available for payment of unpaid claims for prior
school years (21781) ... 932,000 .................... (re. $142,000)
For services and expenses associated with the math and science high
schools for the 2021-22 school year in the amount of $1,382,000,

345 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provided that such funds shall be allocated equally among those
entities that received program funding for the 2007-08 school year
(21779) ... 1,382,000 ................................ (re. $58,000)
For services and expenses of the center for autism and related disa-
bilities at the state university of New York at Albany (21782)
740,000 ............................................. (re. $416,000)
For services and expenses of the summer food program for the 2021-22
school year (21784) ... 3,049,000 .................... (re. $77,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Workers Education
Credential Initiative (55967) ... 500,000 ............ (re. $17,000)
For the early college high schools program for the 2021-22 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
provided, further, that a portion of the payment to the early
college high schools program awarded from this appropriation shall
be available on a sliding scale based upon the number of college
credits earned annually by participating students consistent with
guidelines established by the commissioner. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher educa-
tion partners participating in an early college high schools
program, or the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at
the institution, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of
tuition and/or fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for
students enrolled in such early college high schools program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive (56139) ...........................
1,465,000 ........................................... (re. $376,000)
For services and expenses of a teacher diversity pipeline pilot oper-
ated by the State University College at Buffalo for the Buffalo City
School District to assist teacher aides and teaching assistants in
attaining the necessary educational and professional credentials to
obtain teacher certification (55997) ...............................
500,000 .............................................. (re. $93,000)
For purposes of the Just for Kids program at the State University of
New York at Albany (56005) ... 235,000 ............... (re. $73,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain school districts, public
libraries, and not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan developed by the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation (23318) ..................................
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,986,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities based on a plan developed by the commissioner of

346 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided that
at least the following amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $21,590,000 for the continuation of school-wide extended learning
grants to school districts or school districts in collaboration with
not-for-profit community-based organizations pursuant to the guide-
lines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2013.
(ii) $8,495,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2013-20
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(iii) $3,545,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2014-21
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2014.
(iv) $3,465,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2015-2022
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015.
(v) $3,300,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2018-2024
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017.
(vi) $1,651,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2019-2025
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(vii) $4,058,000 for the continuation of early college high school
awards made based on responses to the New York state early college
high school ECHS program request for proposals pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2017.
(viii) $9,000,000 for early college high school grants awarded based
on responses to a request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of
the laws of 2019.
(ix) $1,364,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2013.
(x) $1,150,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2018.
(xi) $1,798,000 for the continuation of smart transfer early college
high school program grants awarded based on responses to the New
York state smart transfer ECHS program request for proposals pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2016.
(xii) $20,500,000 for the continuation of the master teacher program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter 53 of the laws
of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, chapter 53 of the laws of
2018, and chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made available for master teacher
program funding may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the state university of New York for the
services and expenses of administering such program.

347 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(xiii) $5,000,000 for the continuation of QUALITYstarsNY, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the laws of 2016;
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval
of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for
QUALITYstarsNY may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the sole purpose of administering such system.
(xiv) $3,000,000 for the continuation of New York state masters-in-e-
ducation teacher incentive scholarship program, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2015; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available for the masters-in-education teacher incentive
scholarship program may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the higher education services corpo-
ration for the sole purpose of administering such program.
(xv) $35,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xvi) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xvii) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xviii) $5,800,000 for services and expenses to subsidize the remain-
ing cost of advanced placement and international baccalaureate exam
fees for low-income students, as determined by free and reduced
price lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget.
(xix) $1,500,000 for grants for the advanced courses access program
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018 and chapter 53 of the
laws of 2019, provided that such grants shall be awarded to school
districts and/or boards of cooperative educational services in order
to increase advanced course offerings for students, particularly in
districts with no or very limited advanced course offerings.
(xx) $400,000 for empire state excellence in teaching awards pursuant
to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstanding any provision of

348 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the state university of
New York for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxi) $6,000,000 for grants for the smart start computer science
program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxii) $5,000,000 for additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school
breakfast programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxiii) $750,000 for additional services and expenses of a program to
develop farm to school initiatives, pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2018; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made
available may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or other-
wise made available to the department of agriculture and markets for
the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxiv) $250,000 for grants to school districts to allow community
schools to expand mental health services and capacity of community
school programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxv) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the refugee and immigrant
student welcome grants program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws
of 2019; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for the refugee and immigrant student welcome grants program
may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made
available to the office of temporary and disability assistance for
the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxvi) $3,000,000 for grants to school districts to allow districts to
increase the use of alternative approaches to student discipline,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019.
(xxvii) $1,500,000 for services and expenses of school mental health
programs pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2019. Provided further, that of the amount appro-
priated herein, up to $500,000 may be used to support the School
Mental Health Resource and Training Center.
(xxviii) $3,000,000 for the continuation of the we teach NY grant
program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the we teach NY
grant may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxix) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the expanded mathematics
access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the
expanded mathematics access program may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such awards.
(xxx) $200,000 for the continuation of the New York state youth coun-
cil, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any

349 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made available for the New York state
youth council may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the services and expenses of administering such coun-
cil.
(xxxi) $10,000,000 for student mental health support grants to school
districts, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2020.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of mental health for the sole purpose of administering
such grants (23306) ... 230,113,000 ............. (re. $149,273,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of community school regional technical
assistance centers for the 2020-21 school year. Funds appropriated
herein shall be used to operate three regional centers that shall
provide technical assistance to school districts establishing or
operating community school programs, pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of education and approved by the director of the
budget. Provided, further, that such plan shall establish a process
for selection of nonprofit entities with expertise in community
school programs and technical assistance to operate such centers
(55962) ... 1,200,000 ............................... (re. $527,000)
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 ................... (re. $3,264,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations of a $14,260,000
teacher resources and computer training centers program for the
2019-20 school year (55985) ... 4,278,000 ......... (re. $1,682,000)
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for services and expenses
of a $14,260,000 teacher resources and computer training center
program for the 2020-21 school year (23445) ........................
9,982,000 ............................................ (re. $30,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For competitive grants for the 2020-21 school year for extended day
programs and school violence prevention programs pursuant to section
2814 of the education law provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible entities receiving funds
for extended day programs may include not-for-profit organizations
working in collaboration with a public school or school district
(21776) ... 24,344,000 ........................... (re. $12,560,000)
For services and expenses of the center for autism and related disa-
bilities at the state university of New York at Albany (21782) .....
740,000 .............................................. (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Worker Education
Credential Initiative (55967) ... 500,000 ............ (re. $65,000)

350 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the early college high schools program for the 2020-21 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
provided, further, that a portion of the payment to the early
college high schools program awarded from this appropriation shall
be available on a sliding scale based upon the number of college
credits earned annually by participating students consistent with
guidelines established by the commissioner. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher educa-
tion partners participating in an early college high schools
program, or the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at
the institution, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of
tuition and/or fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for
students enrolled in such early college high schools program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive (56139) ...........................
1,465,000 ......................................... (re. $1,045,000)
For services and expense of the clinically rich intensive teacher
institute bilingual extension and English to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ... 385,000 ............... (re. $385,000)
For services and expense of a teacher diversity pipeline pilot oper-
ated by the State University College at Buffalo for the Buffalo City
School District to assist teacher aides and teaching assistants in
attaining the necessary educational and professional credentials to
obtain teacher certification (55997) ...............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $165,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities based on a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided that
at least the following amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $21,590,000 for the continuation of school-wide extended learning
grants to school districts or school districts in collaboration with
not-for-profit community-based organizations pursuant to the guide-
lines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2013.
(ii) $6,095,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2013-20
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(iii) $4,598,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2014-21
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2014.
(iv) $3,437,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2015-2022
NYS pathways in technology early college high schools request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015.

351 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(v) $2,700,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2018-2024
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017.
(vi) $1,450,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the 2019-2025
NYS pathways in technology early college high school request for
proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(vii) $3,656,000 for the continuation of early college high school
awards made based on responses to the New York state early college
high school ECHS program request for proposals pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2017.
(viii) $9,000,000 for early college high school grants awarded based
on responses to a request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of
the laws of 2019.
(ix) $1,910,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college
high school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to
the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53
of the laws of 2013.
(x) $950,000 for the continuation of smart scholars early college high
school grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to the
guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of
the laws of 2018.
(xi) $1,798,000 for the continuation of smart transfer early college
high school program grants awarded based on responses to the New
York state smart transfer ECHS program request for proposals pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2016.
(xii) $20,500,000 for the continuation of the master teacher program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter 53 of the laws
of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, chapter 53 of the laws of
2018, and chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made available for master teacher
program funding may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the state university of New York for the
services and expenses of administering such program.
(xiii) $5,000,000 for the continuation of QUALITYstarsNY, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the laws of 2016;
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval
of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for
QUALITYstarsNY may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the sole purpose of administering such system.
(xiv) $3,000,000 for the continuation of New York state masters-in-e-
ducation teacher incentive scholarship program, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2015; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available for the masters-in-education teacher incentive
scholarship program may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the higher education services corpo-
ration for the sole purpose of administering such program.
(xv) $35,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstand-

352 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xvi) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xvii) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xviii) $5,800,000 for services and expenses to subsidize the remain-
ing cost of advanced placement and international baccalaureate exam
fees for low-income students, as determined by free and reduced
price lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget.
(xix) $1,500,000 for grants for the advanced courses access program
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018 and chapter 53 of the
laws of 2019, provided that such grants shall be awarded to school
districts and/or boards of cooperative educational services in order
to increase advanced course offerings for students, particularly in
districts with no or very limited advanced course offerings.
(xx) $400,000 for empire state excellence in teaching awards pursuant
to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the state university of
New York for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxi) $6,000,000 for grants for the smart start computer science
program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxii) $5,000,000 for additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school
breakfast programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xxiii) $750,000 for additional services and expenses of a program to
develop farm to school initiatives, pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2018; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made
available may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or other-
wise made available to the department of agriculture and markets for
the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxiv) $250,000 for grants to school districts to allow community
schools to expand mental health services and capacity of community
school programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.

353 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(xxv) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the refugee and immigrant
student welcome grants program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws
of 2019; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon
approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made avail-
able for the refugee and immigrant student welcome grants program
may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made
available to the office of temporary and disability assistance for
the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxvi) $3,000,000 for grants to school districts to allow districts to
increase the use of alternative approaches to student discipline,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019.
(xxvii) $1,500,000 for services and expenses of school mental health
programs pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2019. Provided further, that of the amount appro-
priated herein, up to $500,000 may be used to support the School
Mental Health Resource and Training Center.
(xxviii) $3,000,000 for the continuation of the we teach NY grant
program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the we teach NY
grant may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise
made available to the state university of New York for the services
and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxix) $1,500,000 for the continuation of the expanded mathematics
access program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available for the
expanded mathematics access program may be suballocated, inter-
changed, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such awards.
(xxx) $200,000 for the continuation of the New York state youth coun-
cil, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019; notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds hereby made available for the New York state
youth council may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or
otherwise made available to the office of children and family
services for the services and expenses of administering such coun-
cil.
(xxxi) $1,000,000 for services and expenses related to the development
of curriculum on civic education and values, the state's shared
history of diversity, and the role of religious tolerance in this
country, as well as the development of curricular guidance, educa-
tion materials, and resources to support teaching and learning of
the State's Culturally Responsive and Sustaining Education Frame-
work.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
transferred to the credit of the state purposes account of the state
education department to carry out such development.

354 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(xxxii) $10,000,000 for student mental health support grants to school
districts, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of the
office of mental health in consultation with the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided
further that no school district shall receive more than 40 percent
of the total grant allocation.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of mental health for the sole purpose of administering
such grants.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the $11,000,000
made available in items (xxxi) to (xxxii) herein appropriated herein
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2020-21 school year (23306) ... 245,113,000 ..... (re. $174,470,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as
amended by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, is hereby
amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of the National Association of Social Work-
ers - [NYC Chapter] New York to develop and distribute test prepara-
tion materials (23322) ... 150,000 .................. (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 ................... (re. $8,912,000)
For services and expenses of remaining obligations of a $14,260,000
teacher resources and computer training centers program for the
2018-19 school year (55985) ... 4,278,000 ......... (re. $1,214,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For services and expenses of the supportive schools grant program and
technical assistance to promote safe and supportive school environ-
ments free from bullying, harassment, and discrimination. Up to
$300,000 of this appropriation shall be available for the New York
center for school safety. A portion of this appropriation may be
transferred to any other account within the state education depart-
ment, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation,
provided further that up to five percent of the funds appropriated
herein may be transferred to the credit of the state purposes
account of the state education department to carry out the purposes
of this appropriation (55996) ... 2,000,000 ......... (re. $822,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain school districts, public
libraries, and not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan developed by the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation (23318) ... 5,000,000 ... (re. $3,129,000)

355 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Worker education
Credential Initiative (55967) ... 500,000 ........... (re. $214,000)
For the early college high schools program for the 2019-20 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budget
provided, further, that a portion of the payment to the early
college high schools program awarded from this appropriation shall
be available on a sliding scale based upon the number of college
credits earned annually by participating students consistent with
guidelines established by the commissioner. Provided further that,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher educa-
tion partners participating in an early college high schools
program, or the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at
the institution, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of
tuition and/or fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for
students enrolled in such early college high schools program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive (56139) ...........................
1,465,000 ........................................... (re. $368,000)
For services and expenses of the clinically rich intensive teacher
institute bilingual extension and English to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ... 770,000 ............... (re. $327,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities based on a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided that
at least the following amounts of the funds appropriated herein
shall be made available as follows:
(i) $21,590,000 shall be used for the continuation of school-wide
extended learning grants to school districts or school districts in
collaboration with not-for-profit community-based organizations
pursuant to the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(ii) $6,095,000 shall be used for grants awarded based on responses to
the 2013-20 NYS pathways in technology early college high schools
request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(iii) $4,505,000 shall be used for grants awarded based on responses
to the 2014-21 NYS pathways in technology early college high schools
request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2014.
(iv) $3,050,000 shall be used for grants awarded based on responses to
the 2015-2022 NYS pathways in technology early college high schools
request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015.
(v) $2,100,000 shall be used for grants awarded based on responses to
the 2018-2024 NYS pathways in technology early college high school
request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017.

356 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
(vi) $9,000,000 shall be used for early college high school grants
awarded based on responses to a request for proposals, pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(vii) $1,900,000 shall be used for the continuation of early college
high school awards made based on responses to the New York state
early college high school ECHS program request for proposals pursu-
ant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017.
(viii) $1,910,000 shall be used for the continuation of smart scholars
early college high school grants, provided that funds shall be used
pursuant to the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2013.
(ix) $1,350,000 shall be used for the continuation of smart transfer
early college high school program grants awarded based on responses
to the New York state smart transfer ECHS program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2016.
(x) $19,000,000 shall be used for the continuation of the master
teacher program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2013, chapter
53 of the laws of 2015, chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, and chapter
53 of the laws of 2018; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available for master teacher program funding may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the state university of New York for the services and expenses of
administering such program.
(xi) $5,000,000 shall be used for the continuation of QUALITYstarsNY,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015 and chapter 53 of the
laws of 2016; notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made
available for QUALITYstarsNY may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the office of children
and family services for the sole purpose of administering such
system.
(xii) $3,000,000 shall be used for the continuation of New York state
masters-in-education teacher incentive scholarship program, pursuant
to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015; notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget,
the funds hereby made available for the masters-in-education teacher
incentive scholarship program may be suballocated, interchanged,
transferred or otherwise made available to the higher education
services corporation for the sole purpose of administering such
program.
(xiii) $35,000,000 shall be used for the continuation of awards made
based on responses to the empire state after-school program request
for proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xiv) $10,000,000 shall be used for the continuation of awards made
based on responses to the empire state after-school program request
for proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018; notwith-

357 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
standing any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the
director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services for the sole purpose
of administering such grants.
(xv) $4,000,000 shall be used for services and expenses to subsidize
the remaining cost of advanced placement and international baccalau-
reate exam fees for low-income students, as determined by free and
reduced price lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budg-
et.
(xvi) $500,000 shall be used for grants for the advanced courses
access program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018, provided
that such grants shall be awarded to school districts and/or boards
of cooperative educational services in order to increase advanced
course offerings for students, particularly in districts with no or
very limited advanced course offerings.
(xvii) $400,000 shall be used for empire state excellence in teaching
awards pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017; notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director
of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be suballocated,
interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available to the state
university of New York for the services and expenses of administer-
ing such awards.
(xviii) $6,000,000 shall be used for grants for the smart start
computer science program pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018.
(xix) $5,000,000 shall be used for additional funds to reimburse spon-
sors of school breakfast programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws
of 2018.
(xx) $750,000 shall be used for additional services and expenses of a
program to develop farm to school initiatives, pursuant to chapter
53 of the laws of 2018; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the department of agriculture and
markets for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxi) $500,000 shall be used for services and expenses of locally run
gang prevention and education programs, pursuant to chapter 53 of
the laws of 2018; notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the department of criminal justice
services or the unified court system for the services and expenses
of administering such awards.
(xxii) $250,000 shall be used for grants to school districts to allow
community schools to expand mental health services and capacity of
community school programs pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2018.
(xxiii) $9,000,000 shall be used for early college high school grants,
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of education and
approved by the director of the budget, provided that such plan
shall prioritize (a) programs serving students in schools with grad-

358 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
uation rates below the state average which are not currently engaged
in a school-wide turnaround plan, and (b) programs that lead
students to a career in computer science. Provided further that
school districts or boards of cooperative educational services
awarded such grants shall agree to offer opportunities for every
student in the school to graduate with at least one college credit,
through programs including but not limited to an early college high
school, dual enrollment, or advanced placement courses.
Provided further that a portion of the payments to early college high
school programs awarded funding from this appropriation shall be
made on a sliding scale based upon the number of college credits
earned annually by participating students, consistent with guide-
lines established by the commissioner of education, provided that
the maximum annual grant award shall be $500,000.
Provided further that in connection with such guidelines, the commis-
sioner of education shall execute a memorandum of understanding with
the state university of New York and the city university of New York
to develop common data collection, sharing and reporting mechanisms
based on student-level data for students enrolled in early college
high school programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher education
partners participating in an early college high school program, or
the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at the institu-
tion, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of tuition and/or
fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for students
enrolled in such an early college high school program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive.
(xxiv) $1,500,000 shall be used for master teacher awards to support
awards to individual high-performing teachers in any grade teaching
in schools with high rates of teacher turnover or in schools with
high rates of teachers with fewer than three years of teaching expe-
rience.
Provided further that the funds hereby made available shall support
the award of stipends of $15,000 per annum over four years to such
individual teachers, and of related costs, administered by the state
university of New York pursuant to a plan developed in consultation
with the commissioner of education, who shall consult with appropri-
ate state organizations representing K-12 public school teachers,
and approved by the director of the budget, to build a corps of
outstanding teachers in order to improve the quality of instruction
at public schools. Such plan for use of funding hereby made avail-
able shall: (i) establish an application process; (ii) include
guidelines by which applications from eligible teachers shall be
evaluated, which shall include, but not be limited to, achievement
of a rating of highly effective on the annual professional perform-
ance review; and (iii) provide periodic opportunities for profes-
sional development for successful applicants. Provided, further,
that priority shall be given to applicants in regions where a simi-
lar program is not otherwise offered.

359 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the state university of New York for the services and expenses of
administering such awards. Nothing herein shall be construed to
limit the rights of labor organizations representing teachers to
collectively bargain terms and conditions pursuant to article 14 of
the civil service law.
(xxv) $10,000,000 shall be used for empire state after-school grants
pursuant to a plan developed by the office of children and family
services in consultation with the commissioner of education and
approved by the director of the budget, to support the establishment
and/or expansion of after-school programs by school districts or
not-for-profit community-based organizations which are (A) located
in a school district with high rates of student homelessness, or (B)
located in a school district in at-risk areas identified by the
office of children and family services, division of criminal justice
services, division of state police, county executive, or local law
enforcement.
Provided that such grants shall be awarded based on factors including,
but not limited to, the following: (i) measures of school district
need, (ii) measures of the need of students to be served, (iii) the
applicant's proposal to target the highest-need schools and
students, (iv) the applicant's program design to meet the specific
needs of students, including homeless students or students affected
by violence, and (v) proposal quality.
Provided, further, that an empire state after-school grant shall equal
the product of (i) the approved number of student placements multi-
plied by (ii) $1,600; provided, however, that no applicant shall
receive a grant in excess of the total actual grant expenditures
incurred by the applicant in the current school year as approved by
the office of children and family services.
Provided, further, that $2,000,000 of such funds shall be initially
made available to applicants located in high-need school districts
in Nassau County or Suffolk County.
Provided, further, an awardee shall agree to adopt approved quality
indicators including, but not limited to, valid and reliable meas-
ures of environmental quality, and the quality of staff-student
interactions and student outcomes. Provided further, that all
programs shall agree to offer gang-prevention programming. Provided,
further, that no school district shall receive more than 40 percent
of the total empire state after-school program grant allocation.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval
of the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may
be suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made avail-
able to the office of children and family services for the sole
purpose of administering such grants.
(xxvi) $1,800,000 shall be used for services and expenses to subsidize
the remaining cost of advanced placement and international baccalau-
reate exam fees for low-income students, as determined by free and
reduced price lunch eligibility, pursuant to a plan developed by the

360 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budg-
et.
(xxvii) $1,000,000 shall be used for grants for the advanced courses
access program, provided that such grants shall be awarded to school
districts with no or very limited advanced course offerings for
students or to boards of cooperative educational services containing
such school districts. Provided further, that such grants shall be
awarded, based on a plan developed by the commissioner of education
and approved by the director of the budget, to school districts and
boards of cooperative educational services to establish advanced
placement courses or other equally rigorous advanced courses in
subjects including but not limited to English, history, science,
mathematics, engineering, computer science, or world languages.
Provided further that, such grants may be used for teacher training
and development, materials and supplies, or equipment and services
for digital learning. Provided, further, that no awardee shall
receive a grant in excess of the total actual grant expenditures
incurred in the current school year as approved by the commissioner
and provided further that such grants shall only be used to supple-
ment, not supplant existing funding for advanced courses. Provided
further that no awardee shall receive more than 40 percent of the
total grant allocation.
(xxviii) $15,000,000 shall be used for additional grants for prekin-
dergarten; provided that grants shall be awarded pursuant to subdi-
vision 18 of section 3602-e of the education law, based on a request
for proposals developed by the commissioner of education and
approved by the director of the budget, to school districts to
establish new full-day and half-day prekindergarten placements for
three-year-olds and four-year-olds; provided, further, that such
grants shall only be used to supplement, not supplant existing prek-
indergarten programs; and provided, further, that any portion of the
funds hereby made available that is not awarded shall remain avail-
able for subsequent awards in the 2020-21 school year or for full-
day and half-day prekindergarten grants to be awarded in subsequent
school years.
Provided, further, that such grants from funds hereby made available
shall be awarded based on factors including, but not limited to, the
following: (i) measures of school district need, (ii) measures of
the need of students to be served by the school district, (iii) the
school district's proposal to target the highest-need schools and
students, (iv) the extent to which the district's proposal would
prioritize funds to maximize the total number of eligible children
in the district served in prekindergarten programs, (v) the school
district's proposal to include students of all learning and physical
abilities in integrated settings and (vi) proposal quality; provided
further that preference for the 2019-20 awards shall be given to
high-need school districts without a current state-funded prekinder-
garten program.
Provided, however, that full-day and half-day prekindergarten grants
funded hereby shall only be available to support programs (i) that
provide instruction for at least five hours per school day for full-
day prekindergarten programs and at least two and one-half hours per

361 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
school day for half-day prekindergarten programs; (ii) that agree to
offer instruction consistent with applicable New York state prekin-
dergarten early learning standards; and (iii) that otherwise comply
with all of the same rules and requirements as universal prekinder-
garten programs pursuant to section 3602-e of the education law
except as modified herein; provided that notwithstanding paragraph c
of subdivision 1 of section 3602-e of the education law notwith-
standing, for the purposes of this appropriation, an eligible child
shall be a resident child who is three years of age on or before
December first of the year in which he or she is enrolled.
Provided, further, that as a condition of eligibility for receipt of
such funding for three-year-olds, a school district must currently
offer a prekindergarten program for four-year-old children, or chil-
dren who would otherwise be eligible under paragraph c of subdivi-
sion 1 of section 3602-e of the education law; provided, further,
that a school district may apply for only as many full-day or half-
day placements for three-year-old children as it currently offers
for four-year-old children, or children who would otherwise be
eligible under paragraph c of subdivision 1 of section 3602-e of the
education law.
Provided, further, that a school district's grant shall equal the
product of (A) (i) two multiplied by the approved number of new
full-day prekindergarten placements plus (ii) the approved number of
half-day prekindergarten placement conversions and the approved
number of new half-day prekindergarten placements, and (B) the
district's selected aid per prekindergarten pupil pursuant to
subparagraph (i) of paragraph b of subdivision 10 of section 3602-e
of the education law; provided, however, that no district shall
receive a grant in excess of the total actual grant expenditures
incurred by the district in the current school year as approved by
the commissioner of education.
Provided, further, a school district shall agree to adopt approved
quality indicators within two years, including, but not limited to,
valid and reliable measures of environmental quality, the quality of
teacher-student interactions and child outcomes, and ensure that any
such assessment of child outcomes shall not be used to make highs-
takes educational decisions for individual children.
Provided, further, a school district shall agree to maximize partner-
ships with community-based organizations in developing new pre-kin-
dergarten slots, and shall agree to maximize the inclusion of
students with disabilities.
(xxix) $1,500,000 shall be used for the refugee and immigrant student
welcome grants program, pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget,
provided that such plan shall prioritize awards to school districts
with increased refugee and immigrant populations, including unaccom-
panied minor students.
Provided further that such funds shall be used for activities includ-
ing but not limited to expanded community school activities, the
provision of school supplies for incoming students, training oppor-
tunities for staff on trauma and cultural sensitivity, employment of

362 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
counselors and psychologists, and parental and family engagement and
support.
Provided further that such funds shall only be used to supplement, and
not supplant, current local expenditures of federal, state or local
funds.
Provided, further, that no district shall receive a grant in excess of
the total actual grant expenditures incurred by the district in the
current school year as approved by the commissioner of education.
Provided, further, that no school district shall receive more than 40
percent of the total grant allocation.
Provided, further, that $500,000 of such funds shall be initially made
available to applicants located in high-need school districts in
Nassau County or Suffolk County.
Provided further that school districts receiving such grants shall
agree to partner with state agencies to provide information on
English as a New Language (ENL) and naturalization services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of temporary and disability assistance for the
services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxx) $3,000,000 shall be used for alternative discipline grants
pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of education and
approved by the director of the budget, provided that such plan
shall prioritize awards to school districts identified by the
commissioner of education as being high need or identified as having
high numbers of student suspensions or exclusions. Provided further
that such funds shall be used to increase the use of alternative
approaches to student discipline through activities including but
not limited to restorative justice techniques, therapeutic crisis
intervention, staff training on alternative discipline, and trauma
informed education; provided, however, the commissioner of education
shall submit to the governor, the temporary president of the senate
and speaker of the assembly a report setting forth recommendations
for alternative discipline based on best practices from the use of
such funds provided that such report shall be developed with consul-
tation from stakeholders including but not limited to educators and
civil rights organizations.
Provided further that such funds shall only be used to supplement, and
not supplant, current local expenditures of federal, state or local
funds.
Provided, further, that no district shall receive a grant in excess of
the total actual grant expenditures incurred by the district in the
current school year as approved by the commissioner of education.
Provided, further, that no school district shall receive more than 40
percent of the total grant allocation.
(xxxi) $1,500,000 shall be used for services and expenses of school
mental health programs pursuant to a plan developed by the commis-
sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget,
provided that such plan shall provide grants to school districts for
middle or junior high schools for the purposes of supporting student
mental health or school climate through activities including but not

363 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
limited to school mental health centers, teacher training and
support, school-wide anti-bullying programs, school climate surveys
and tools, and school and family engagement resources. Provided
further, that of the amount appropriated herein, up to $500,000 may
be used to support the school mental health technical assistance
center.
Provided further that such funds shall only be used to supplement, and
not supplant, current local expenditures of federal, state or local
funds.
Provided, further, that no district shall receive a grant in excess of
the total actual grant expenditures incurred by the district in the
current school year as approved by the commissioner of education.
Provided, further, that no school district shall receive more than 40
percent of the total grant allocation.
(xxxii) $3,000,000 shall be used for services and expenses of the we
teach NY grant program to address the teacher shortage in identified
subject areas pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget in order to
recruit a corps of outstanding teacher candidates in high-need shor-
tage areas.
Provided that, such plan for use of funding hereby made available
shall: (i) prioritize recruiting teacher candidates as incoming
college freshmen in hard to staff subject areas, (ii) award funds to
school districts partnering with an institution of higher education,
(iii) require that awarded school districts provide mentors and paid
internship opportunities for teaching candidates, and (iv) require
that teachers will have a guaranteed job opportunity at the end of
the program if they meet all program requirements.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds hereby made available may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the state university of New York for the services and expenses of
administering such awards. Provided further that such funds shall
only be used to supplement, and not supplant, current local expendi-
tures of federal, state or local funds.
Provided, further, that no district shall receive a grant in excess of
the total actual grant expenditures incurred by the district in the
current school year as approved by the commissioner of education.
Provided, further, that no school district shall receive more than 40
percent of the total grant allocation.
(xxxiii) $1,000,000 shall be used for services and expenses of recov-
ery high schools, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner
of education in consultation with the office of addiction services
and supports and approved by the director of the budget. Provided
further that such grants shall be made to boards of cooperative
educational services in order to help facilitate the implementation
of a recovery high school. Provided further that such grants shall
only be made to such programs with a demonstrated partnership with a
program licensed pursuant to article thirty-two of the mental
hygiene law; that offer a safe and supportive learning environment
for students diagnosed with or at risk of substance use disorder;
incorporate recovery supports into the normal school day to facili-

364 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tate personal, academic, vocational and recovery success for the
student; and are recognized by the commissioner of education.
(xxxiv) $1,500,000 shall be used for the expanded mathematics access
program, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion and approved by the director of the budget. Provided further
that the funds hereby made available shall be awarded to a qualified
organization to provide additional math instruction through the use
of internet accessible learning games to build basic math fluency
for elementary school students. Provided further that such an organ-
ization shall have been independently evaluated for its efficacy in
improving early math skills. Provided further that up to $500,000 of
the amount hereby made available shall be allocated for the services
and expenses of a state-wide math tournament for students in grades
one through five. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to the state university of New York for
the services and expenses of administering such awards.
(xxxv) $200,000 shall be used for services and expenses of the New
York state youth council. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, upon approval of the director of the budget, the funds
hereby made available may be suballocated, interchanged, transferred
or otherwise made available to office of children and family
services for the services and expenses of administering such coun-
cil.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the $50,000,000
made available in items (xxiii) to (xxxv) herein appropriated herein
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2019-20 school year (23306) ... 234,113,000 ..... (re. $116,442,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of the National Association of Social Work-
ers - [NYC Chapter] New York to develop and distribute test prepara-
tion materials (23322) ... 150,000 .................. (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as added by chapter 54,
section 2, of the laws of 2018:
For additional empire state after-school grants; provided that
$35,000,000 of the amount appropriated herein shall support the
continuation of awards made based on responses to the empire state
after-school program request for proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of
the laws of 2017; and provided further that $10,000,000 of the
amount appropriated herein shall be awarded pursuant to a plan
developed by the office of children and family services in consulta-
tion with the commissioner of education and approved by the director
of the budget, to support the establishment and/or expansion of
after-school programs by school districts or not-for-profit communi-
ty-based organizations (A) located in school districts eligible to
participate in the empire state after-school program pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2017, or (B) located in a school district
with high rates of student homelessness, or (C) located in a school

365 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
district in at-risk areas in Nassau County or Suffolk County identi-
fied by the office of children and family services, division of
criminal justice services, division of state police, county execu-
tive, or local law enforcement, or (D) located in high-need school
districts in Nassau County or Suffolk County.
Provided that such grants shall be awarded based on factors including,
but not limited to, the following: (i) measures of school district
need, (ii) measures of the need of students to be served, (iii) the
applicant's proposal to target the highest-need schools and
students, (iv) the applicant's program design to meet the specific
needs of students, including homeless students or students displaced
by natural disasters, and (v) proposal quality.
Provided, further, that $2,000,000 of such funds shall be initially
made available to applicants (A) located in a school district in
at-risk areas in Nassau County or Suffolk County identified by the
office of children and family services, division of criminal justice
services, division of state police, county executive, or local law
enforcement, or (B) located in high-need school districts in Nassau
County or Suffolk County.
Provided, further, that an empire state after-school grant shall equal
the product of (i) the approved number of students served in such
program and (ii) $1,600; provided, however, that no applicant shall
receive a grant in excess of the total actual grant expenditures
incurred by the applicant in the current school year as approved by
the office of children and family services.
Provided, further, a school district shall agree to adopt approved
quality indicators including, but not limited to, valid and reliable
measures of environmental quality, and the quality of staff-student
interactions and student outcomes. Provided, further, that no school
district shall receive more than 40 percent of the total empire
state after-school program grant allocation. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated,
interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available to the office
of children and family services for the sole purpose of administer-
ing such grants.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, $10,000,000 of
the funds appropriated herein, plus any other amounts so designated
in other items of appropriation within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergarten through grade twelve
education program, shall constitute the competitive awards amount
authorized for the 2018-19 school year (55973) .....................
45,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,778,000)
For the smart start computer science program, pursuant to a plan
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget, provided that such plan shall prioritize
awards to high need school districts. Provided further that such
funds shall be used to provide professional development and support,
offered by qualified non-profit partners or institutions of higher
education, to increase expertise in computer science, engineering,
or educational technology among teachers in grades K-8 to allow such
teachers to become in-house experts in the school. Provided further

366 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
that such funds shall only be used to supplement, and not supplant,
current local expenditures of federal, state or local funds.
Provided, further, that no district shall receive a grant in excess
of the total actual grant expenditures incurred by the district in
the current school year as approved by the commissioner. Provided,
further, that no school district shall receive more than 40 percent
of the total grant allocation.
Provided further that school districts receiving such grants shall
agree to partner with their respective regional economic development
council to tailor the program to regional business or future employ-
er needs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2018-19 school year (55975) ... 6,000,000 ........... (re. $814,000)
For grants to school districts to allow community schools to expand
mental health services and capacity of community school programs.
Provided that such grants shall support inclusion of mental health
activities in wrap-around services, improving school climate,
combating bullying or school violence, and promotion of social-emo-
tional learning. Provided further that such grants shall be awarded
to school districts for community schools identified by the commis-
sioner of education as candidates for improving school climate or
mental health supports, subject to the approval of the director of
the budget.
Provided further that the maximum grant per community school shall be
$25,000, provided however, that no district shall receive a grant in
excess of the total actual grant expenditures incurred by the
district in the current school year as approved by the commissioner.
Provided further that no school district shall receive more than 40
percent of the total grant allocation.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2018-19 school year (55978) ... 250,000 .............. (re. $81,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to develop farm to
school initiatives that will help schools purchase more food from
local farmers and expand access to healthy local food for school
children. The funds shall be awarded through a competitive process.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the department of agriculture and markets for the services and
expenses of administering such awards.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,

367 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2018-19 school year (55979) ... 750,000 ............. (re. $221,000)
For additional funds to reimburse sponsors of school breakfast
programs, including those required to implement a breakfast after
the bell program beginning in the 2018-19 school year pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2018, based upon the number of federally
reimbursable breakfasts served to students under such program agree-
ments entered into by the state education department and such spon-
sors, in accordance with the provisions of the "Child Nutrition Act
of 1966," P.L. 89-642, as amended, in excess of the federal rates of
reimbursement. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
the funds appropriated herein, plus any other amounts so designated
in other items of appropriation within the general fund local
assistance account office of prekindergarten through grade twelve
education program, shall constitute the competitive awards amount
authorized for the 2018-19 school year (55980) .....................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For continuation of early college high school awards made based on
responses to the New York state early college high school ECHS
program request for proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2017 (55953) ... 1,900,000 .......................... (re. $907,000)
For the continuation of school-wide extended learning grants to school
districts or school districts in collaboration with not-for-profit
community-based organizations, provided that funds shall be used
pursuant to the guidelines set forth and the awards made pursuant to
chapter 53 of the laws of 2013 (55981) .............................
21,590,000 ........................................ (re. $1,417,000)
For the continuation of pathways in technology early college high
school (P-TECH) program grants. Provided that the funds appropriated
herein shall be made available as follows: $5,680,000 for grants
awarded based on responses to the 2013-20 NYS pathways in technology
early college high schools request for proposals, pursuant to chap-
ter 53 of the laws of 2013; $4,180,000 for grants awarded based on
responses to the 2014-21 NYS pathways in technology early college
high schools request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the
laws of 2014; $2,480,000 for grants awarded based on responses to
the 2015-2022 NYS pathways in technology early college high schools
request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2015;
and $1,750,000 for grants awarded based on responses to the
2018-2024 NYS pathways in technology early college high school
request for proposals, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017
(55982) ... 14,090,000 ............................ (re. $1,694,000)
For the continuation of smart scholars early college high school
grants, provided that funds shall be used pursuant to the guidelines
set forth and the awards made pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of
2013 (55983) ... 1,910,000 .......................... (re. $443,000)
For the continuation of smart transfer early college high school
program grants awarded based on responses to the New York state
smart transfer ECHS program request for proposals pursuant to chap-
ter 53 of the laws of 2016 (55984) ... 882,000 ...... (re. $202,000)

368 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For competitive grants for the 2018-19 school year for extended day
programs and school violence prevention programs pursuant to section
2814 of the education law provided, however, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provisions of law, eligible entities receiving funds
for extended day programs may include not-for-profit organizations
working in collaboration with a public school or school district
(21776) ... 24,344,000 ............................... (re. $38,000)
For services and expenses of the clinically rich intensive teacher
institute bilingual extension and english to speakers of other
languages program (55998) ... 770,000 ............... (re. $387,000)
For the early college high schools program for the 2018-19 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner and approved by the director of the budget provided,
further, that a portion of the payment to the early college high
schools program awarded from this appropriation shall be available
on a sliding scale based upon the number of college credits earned
annually by participating students consistent with guidelines estab-
lished by the commissioner. Provided further that, notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, higher education partners
participating in an early college high schools program, or the
entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at the institution,
shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of tuition and/or fees, or
to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for students enrolled in such
early college high schools program with no reduction in other state,
local or other support for such students earning college credit that
such higher education partner would otherwise be eligible to receive
(56139) ... 1,465,000 ............................... (re. $258,000)
For services and expenses of a teacher diversity pipeline pilot to
assist teacher aides and teaching assistants in attaining the neces-
sary educational and professional credentials to obtain teacher
certification (55997) ... 500,000 ................... (re. $183,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For educational services and expenses for out of school immigrant
youth and young adults (56045) ... 1,000,000 ........ (re. $252,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of locally run gang prevention and education
programs targeted to middle and high school students. Funds shall be
used to provide in-school training and support to help students
avoid gang recruitment, peer pressure, violence, and delinquent
behavior.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available

369 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to the department of criminal justice services or the unified court
system for the services and expenses of administering such awards.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2018-19 school year (55977) ... 500,000 ............. (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For grants for the advanced courses access program, provided that such
grants shall be awarded to school districts and/or boards of cooper-
ative educational services in order to increase advanced course
offerings for students, particularly in districts with no or very
limited advanced course offerings. Provided further, that such
grants shall be awarded, based on a request for proposals developed
by the commissioner of education and approved by the director of the
budget, to school districts and/or boards of cooperative educational
services to establish advanced placement courses or other equally
rigorous advanced courses in subjects including but not limited to
English, history, science, mathematics, engineering, computer
science, or world languages.
Provided, further, that such grants from funds appropriated herein
shall be awarded based on factors including, but not limited to, the
following: (i) measures of school district need; (ii) the unavail-
ability of current advanced course offerings; (iii) measures of the
need of students to be served by the school district and/or boards
of cooperative educational services; and (iv) proposal quality.
Provided further that, such grants may be used for teacher training
and development, materials and supplies, or equipment and services
for digital learning. Such grants shall only be used to supplement,
not supplant existing funding for advanced courses.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2018-19 school year (55976) ... 500,000 ............. (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as added by chapter 50,
section 2, of the laws of 2017:
For empire state after-school grants, pursuant to a plan developed by
the office of children and family services in consultation with the
commissioner of education and approved by the director of the budg-
et, to support the establishment and/or expansion of after-school
programs by school districts or school districts in collaboration
with not-for-profit community-based organizations (A) located in
municipalities participating in the empire state poverty reduction
initiative pursuant to chapter 55 of the laws of 2016 or (B) located
in counties or school districts with a child poverty rate in excess
of 30 percent, or located in a school district with a child poverty

370 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
count greater than 5,000 but less than 20,000, as determined by the
2015 small area income and poverty estimates produced by the United
States census bureau.
Provided that such grants shall be awarded based on factors including,
but not limited to, the following: (i) measures of school district
need, (ii) measures of the need of students to be served by each of
the school districts, (iii) the school district's proposal to target
the highest-need schools and students, and (iv) proposal quality.
Provided, further, that a school district's empire state after-school
grant shall equal the product of (i) the approved number of students
served in such program and (ii) $1,600; provided, however, that no
district shall receive a grant in excess of the total actual grant
expenditures incurred by the district in the current school year as
approved by the office of children and family services.
Provided, further, a school district shall agree to adopt approved
quality indicators including, but not limited to, valid and reliable
measures of environmental quality, and the quality of staff-student
interactions and student outcomes. Provided, further, that no school
district shall receive more than 40 percent of the total empire
state after school program grant allocation. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of the director of
the budget, the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated,
interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available to the office
of children and family services for the sole purpose of administer-
ing such grants.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2017-18 school year (55951) ... 35,000,000 ........ (re. $8,613,000)
For early college high school programs, pursuant to a plan developed
by the commissioner of education and approved by the director of the
budget, provided that such plan shall prioritize programs serving
students in high-need school districts and in high schools desig-
nated by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph a or b of subdivi-
sion 1 of section 211-f of the education law throughout the 2017-18
school year; provided further that such plan shall also prioritize
programs that lead students to a career in computer science.
Provided further that a portion of the payments to early college high
school programs awarded funding from this appropriation shall be
made on a sliding scale based upon the number of college credits
earned annually by participating students, consistent with guide-
lines established by the commissioner. Provided further that in
connection with such guidelines, the commissioner shall execute a
memorandum of understanding with the state university of New York
and the city university of New York to develop common data
collection, sharing and reporting mechanisms based on student level
data for students enrolled in early college high school programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, higher education
partners participating in an early college high school program, or
the entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at the institu-

371 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tion, shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of tuition and/or
fees, or to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for students
enrolled in such an early college high school program with no
reduction in other state, local or other support for such students
earning college credit that such higher education partner would
otherwise be eligible to receive.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2017-18 school year (55953) ... 5,300,000 ......... (re. $3,141,000)
For services and expenses of independent receivers appointed to manage
and operate a failing school or persistently failing school pursuant
to subdivision 2 of section 211-f of the education law, subject to
approval of the director of the budget (55961) .....................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 ..................... (re. $332,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
For the early college high schools program for the 2017-18 school
year, provided, however, that expenditure of funds appropriated
herein shall support the continuation and expansion of the early
college high schools program pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner and approved by the director of the budget provided,
further, that a portion of the payment to the early college high
schools program awarded from this appropriation shall be available
on a sliding scale based upon the number of college credits earned
annually by participating students consistent with guidelines estab-
lished by the commissioner. Provided further that, notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, higher education partners
participating in an early college high schools program, or the
entity/entities responsible for setting tuition at the institution,
shall be authorized to set a reduced rate of tuition and/or fees, or
to waive tuition and/or fees entirely, for students enrolled in such
early college high schools program with no reduction in other state,
local or other support for such students earning college credit that
such higher education partner would otherwise be eligible to receive
(56139) ... 1,465,000 ............................... (re. $958,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses to support the prevent cyberbullying initi-
ative, pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of educa-
tion, in consultation with the commissioner of children and family
services and the commissioner of mental health, and approved by the
director of the budget, provided that such plan shall support the
prevention of cyberbullying through activities including, but not

372 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
limited to, public awareness campaigns and school counselor train-
ing.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of
the director of the budget, the funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated, interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available
to the office of children and family services or the office of
mental health or the unified court system for the sole purpose of
administering such program.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the funds appro-
priated herein, plus any other amounts so designated in other items
of appropriation within the general fund local assistance account
office of pre-kindergarten through grade twelve education program,
shall constitute the competitive awards amount authorized for the
2017-18 school year (55956) ... 300,000 .............. (re. $77,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For community schools grants to school districts with schools desig-
nated by the commissioner of education pursuant to paragraphs a or b
of subdivision 1 of section 211-f of the education law throughout
the 2016-17 school year to support the operating and capital costs
associated with the transformation of such schools into community
hubs to deliver co-located or school-linked academic, health, mental
health, nutrition, counseling, legal and/or other services to
students and their families, including but not limited to providing
a community school site coordinator, improving parent engagement,
providing early childhood education programs, offering professional
development specific to the unique needs of students and their fami-
lies enrolled in a community school, conducting community-wide needs
assessments, creating a steering committee made up of various school
and community stakeholders to provide feedback and guidance, and
constructing or renovating spaces within such school buildings to
serve as health suites, adult education spaces, guidance suites,
resource rooms, remedial rooms, parent/community rooms, and career
and technical education classrooms. Provided that such grants shall
be awarded pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget. Provided
further the commissioner shall promulgate regulations that set forth
the requirements for use of such grants including, but not limited
to, requiring that such school districts demonstrate substantial
parent, teacher, and community engagement in the planning, implemen-
tation and operation of a community school. Provided further that of
the amount hereby appropriated, $50,000,000 shall support such oper-
ating costs and $25,000,000 shall support such capital costs.
Provided further that notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, any portion of the funds hereby appropriated may be transferred
or suballocated without limit by the director of the budget to any
other program or fund within the state education department to
accomplish the intent of this appropriation (55932) ................
75,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,003,000)
For services and expenses of the my brother's keeper initiative. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to any other

373 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
program or fund within the state education department for these
purposes (55928) ... 18,000,000 ................... (re. $1,902,000)
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as added by chapter 61,
section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 50,
section 2, of the laws of 2017:
For persistently failing schools transformation grants to school
districts pursuant to a spending plan developed by the commissioner
of education and approved by the director of the budget.
Eligibility for such grants shall be limited to school districts
containing a school or schools designated as persistently failing
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 211-f of the
education law, provided that separate applications shall be required
for each such school for which the school district requests a grant.
Such grants shall support activities including but not limited to the
following: (i) use of school buildings as community hubs to deliver
co-located or school-linked academic, health, mental health, nutri-
tion, counseling, legal and/or other services to students and their
families; (ii) expansion, alteration or replacement of the school's
curriculum and program offerings; (iii) extension of the school day
and/or school year; (iv) professional development of teachers and
administrators; (v) mentoring of at-risk students; and (vi) the
actual and necessary expenses of the external receiver of the
school. Provided that the commissioner shall confirm that any such
eligible activity is aligned with the school's approved intervention
model, comprehensive education plan or school intervention plan.
In determining the amount of such grants, the commissioner shall
consider factors including but not limited to the enrollment of the
school. Provided that for each of the persistently failing schools,
the maximum annual grant in the 2015-16 and 2016-17 school years
shall be established by the state education department in the spend-
ing plan for such grants. A portion of such grants shall be avail-
able by July 1 of each such school year. (55906) ...................
75,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,424,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as added by chapter 73,
section 1 of part D, of the laws of 2016:
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:

374 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $922,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 .......... (re. $430,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 ........... (re. $11,000)
For the smart scholars early college high school program, provided,
however that expenditure of funds herein shall be subject to a
payment schedule developed by the commissioner and approved by the
director of budget (23451) ... 6,000,000 .......... (re. $1,147,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 922,000 ............ (re. $2,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008:
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget, provided, however, that the amount of this
appropriation available for expenditure and disbursement on and
after September 1, 2008 shall be reduced by six percent of the
amount that was undisbursed as of August 15, 2008 (21771) ..........
980,000 .............................................. (re. $14,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2006:
For academic intervention for nonpublic schools based on a plan to be
developed by the commissioner of education and approved by the
director of the budget (21771) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Federal Department of Education Account - 25210
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For grants to schools for specific programs including, but not limited
to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-

375 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tered by the department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (21740) ..............................................
1,771,819,000 ................................. (re. $1,771,819,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, state grants for supporting
effective instruction pursuant to title II of the elementary and
secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-
tered by the Department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (23418) ..............................................
256,841,000 ..................................... (re. $256,841,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the English language acqui-
sition program pursuant to title III of the elementary and secondary
education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to
the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance
committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit-
tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the
federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated
by the federal government including state grants administered by the
department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a
portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation
(23417) ... 65,331,000 ........................... (re. $65,331,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the 21st century community
learning centers, and student support and academic enrichment pursu-
ant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the Department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as

376 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416) ......
253,326,000 ..................................... (re. $252,829,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the charter schools program
pursuant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23415) ......
50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the rural education initi-
ative pursuant to title V of the elementary and secondary education
act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the
director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance
committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit-
tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the
federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated
by the federal government including state grants administered by the
department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a
portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation
(23414) ............................................................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the homeless education
program pursuant to title VII of the McKinney Vento homeless assist-
ance act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23413) ......
10,500,000 ....................................... (re. $10,500,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the Carl D. Perkins voca-
tional and applied technology education act (VTEA).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23477) ......
68,578,000 ....................................... (re. $68,578,000)
For various grants to schools and other eligible entities. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this appro-

377 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
priation may be suballocated to other state departments and agen-
cies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23407) ......
34,425,000 ....................................... (re. $34,425,000)
For the education of individuals with disabilities including up to
$3,000,000 for services and expenses of early childhood family and
community engagement centers and $500,000 for services and expenses
of the center for autism and related disabilities at the state
university of New York at Albany. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, a portion of the funds appropriated herein shall
be available, subject to a plan developed by the commissioner of
education and approved by the director of the budget, for grants to
ensure appropriately certified teachers in schools providing special
services or programs as defined in paragraphs e, g, i and l of
subdivision 2 of section 4401 of the education law to children
placed by school districts and in approved preschool programs that
provide full and half-day educational programs in accordance with
section 4410 of the education law for children placed by school
district. Provided further that, in the allocation of funds, priori-
ty shall be given to those programs with a demonstrated need to
increase the number of certified teachers to comply with state and
federal requirements. Such funds shall be made available for such
activities as certification preparation, training, assisting schools
with personnel shortages and supporting activities that improve the
delivery of services to improve results for children with disabili-
ties. Provided further that notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, of the funds appropriated herein: up to
$10,000,000 shall be available for costs associated with schools
operated under article 85 of the education law which otherwise would
be payable through the department's general fund aid to localities
appropriation, provided further that notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, any disbursements against this $10,000,000
shall immediately reduce the amounts appropriated in the education
department's general fund aid to localities for costs associated
with schools operated under article 85 of the education law by an
equivalent amount, and the portion of such general fund appropri-
ation so affected shall have no further force or effect.
Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, funds appro-
priated herein shall be available for payment of liabilities hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue and subject to the approval of
the director of budget, such funds shall be available to the depart-
ment net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, as needed, to accomplish the intent of this appropriation
(21737) ... 987,970,000 ......................... (re. $977,924,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For grants to schools for specific programs including, but not limited
to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall

378 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-
tered by the department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (21740) ..............................................
1,771,819,000 ................................... (re. $958,559,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, state grants for supporting
effective instruction pursuant to title II of the elementary and
secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-
tered by the Department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (23418) ..............................................
256,841,000 ..................................... (re. $245,837,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the English language acqui-
sition program pursuant to title III of the elementary and secondary
education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to
the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance
committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit-
tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the
federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated
by the federal government including state grants administered by the
department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a
portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation
(23417) ... 65,331,000 ........................... (re. $64,886,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the 21st century community
learning centers, and student support and academic enrichment pursu-
ant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal

379 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
government including state grants administered by the Department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416) ......
253,326,000 ..................................... (re. $229,641,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the charter schools program
pursuant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23415) ......
28,000,000 ....................................... (re. $28,000,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the rural education initi-
ative pursuant to title V of the elementary and secondary education
act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the
director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance
committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit-
tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the
federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated
by the federal government including state grants administered by the
department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a
portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation
(23414) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,870,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the homeless education
program pursuant to title VII of the McKinney Vento homeless assist-
ance act. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a
portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation
(23413) ... 10,500,000 ........................... (re. $10,500,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the Carl D. Perkins voca-
tional and applied technology education act (VTEA).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23477) ......
68,578,000 ....................................... (re. $30,863,000)

380 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For various grants to schools and other eligible entities. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this appro-
priation may be suballocated to other state departments and agen-
cies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23407) ......
34,425,000 ....................................... (re. $34,425,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For grants to schools for specific programs including, but not limited
to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-
tered by the department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (21740) ... 1,771,819,000 ......... (re. $410,156,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the 21st century community
learning centers, and student support and academic enrichment pursu-
ant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the Department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416) ......
253,326,000 ...................................... (re. $88,819,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the charter schools program
pursuant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as

381 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23415) ......
28,000,000 ....................................... (re. $28,000,000)
For various grants to schools and other eligible entities. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this appro-
priation may be suballocated to other state departments and agen-
cies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23407) ......
34,425,000 ....................................... (re. $34,425,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For grants to schools for specific programs including, but not limited
to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-
tered by the department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (21740) ... 1,771,819,000 ......... (re. $459,290,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the 21st century community
learning centers, and student support and academic enrichment pursu-
ant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the Department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416) ......
178,326,000 ........................................... (re. $3,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For grants to schools for specific programs including, but not limited
to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-
tered by the department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision

382 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (21740) ..............................................
1,771,819,000 ................................... (re. $505,546,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the 21st century community
learning centers, and student support and academic enrichment pursu-
ant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the Department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416) ......
178,326,000 ....................................... (re. $9,072,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For grants to schools for specific programs including, but not limited
to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary and second-
ary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall
provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means
committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to
the federal government with respect to the use of any funds appro-
priated by the federal government including state grants adminis-
tered by the department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other
state departments and agencies, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (21740) ... 1,771,819,000 ......... (re. $583,985,000)
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for specific
programs including, but not limited to, the 21st century community
learning centers, and student support and academic enrichment pursu-
ant to title IV of the elementary and secondary education act.
Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the director of
the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any
spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government
with respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal
government including state grants administered by the Department.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and
agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as

383 12653-09-6
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416) ......
178,326,000 ....................................... (re. $2,059,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25122
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For grants to schools for specific programs (21742) ..................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For grants to schools for specific programs (21742) ..................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,900,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For grants to schools for specific programs (21826) ..................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25026
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for programs funded
through the national school lunch act (21703) ......................
2,089,100,000 ................................. (re. $2,089,100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for programs funded
through the national school lunch act (21703) ......................
1,899,190,000 ..................................... (re. $3,205,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for programs funded
through the national school lunch act (21703) ......................
1,716,536,000 .................................... (re. $51,779,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for programs funded
through the national school lunch act (21703) ......................
1,550,675,000 ..................................... (re. $6,906,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For grants to schools and other eligible entities for programs funded
through the national school lunch act (21703) ......................
1,419,690,000 ....................................... (re. $128,000)

384 12653-09-6
STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 8,000,000 11,655,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 0 15,154,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 100,000,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 108,000,000 26,809,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
PUBLIC CAMPAIGN FINANCE BOARD .............................. 100,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
New York State Campaign Finance Fund Account - 22211
For payment of matching funds to participat-
ing candidates of the New York state
campaign finance program as established in
chapter 58 of the laws of 2020. No funding
shall be disbursed without prior approval
from the New York state public campaign
finance board. Funds shall be made avail-
able beginning with elections held in 2024
and each year thereafter (23526) ........... 100,000,000
--------------
REGULATIONS OF ELECTIONS PROGRAM ............................. 8,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The amounts appropriated herein shall be
made available to local boards of
elections for reimbursement of costs
related to providing pre-paid return post-
age and outgoing postage on absentee
ballots and applications, and Early Mail
Voting ballots and applications as enacted
by chapter 481 of the laws of 2023, pursu-
ant to a plan by the state board of
elections. A copy of such plan shall be
sent to the director of the division of
budget, the senate finance committee, and
the assembly ways and means committee
(23504) ...................................... 5,000,000

385 12653-09-6
STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
The amounts appropriated herein shall be
made available to local boards of
elections, including the New York city
board of elections, for the reimbursement
of eligible operating costs related to
elections to be held in 2026.
The state board of elections shall develop a
plan for the distribution of such funds to
local boards of elections for reimburse-
ment of eligible operating costs, includ-
ing, but not limited to, the temporary
employment of personnel, technological
upgrades and public awareness campaigns,
provided that such reimbursement shall be
apportioned based on the number of regis-
tered voters in a county. Any funds
received by a county under this appropri-
ation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant current local expenditures of
federal, state or local funds that the
county currently spends for the adminis-
tration of elections or has budgeted for
costs related to elections to be held in
2026. A copy of such plan shall be sent to
the director of the division of the budg-
et, the senate finance committee, and the
assembly ways and means committee (23529) .... 3,000,000
--------------

386 12653-09-6
STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
REGULATION OF ELECTIONS PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections for reimbursement of costs related to providing
pre-paid return postage and outgoing postage on absentee ballots and
applications, and Early Mail Voting ballots and applications as
enacted by chapter 481 of the laws of 2023, pursuant to a plan by
the state board of elections. A copy of such plan shall be sent to
the director of the division of budget, the senate finance commit-
tee, and the assembly ways and means committee (23504) .............
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections, including the New York city board of elections,
for the reimbursement of eligible operating costs. The state board
of elections shall develop a plan for the distribution of such funds
to local boards of elections for reimbursement of eligible operating
costs, including, but not limited to, the temporary employment of
personnel, technological upgrades and public awareness campaigns,
provided that such reimbursement shall be apportioned based on the
number of registered voters in a county. Any funds received by a
county under this appropriation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant current local expenditures of federal, state or local funds
that the county currently spends for the administration of elections
or has budgeted for costs related to elections to be held in 2025. A
copy of such plan shall be sent to the director of the division of
the budget, the senate finance committee, and the assembly ways and
means committee (23529) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections for reimbursement of costs related to providing
pre-paid return postage and outgoing postage on absentee ballots and
applications, and Early Mail Voting ballots and applications as
enacted by chapter 481 of the laws of 2023, pursuant to a plan by
the state board of elections. A copy of such plan shall be sent to
the director of the division of budget, the senate finance commit-
tee, and the assembly ways and means committee (23504) .............
7,700,000 ......................................... (re. $2,368,000)
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections, including the New York city board of elections,
for the reimbursement of eligible operating costs related to the
general election to be held in November of 2024. The state board of
elections shall develop a plan for the distribution of such funds to
local boards of elections for reimbursement of eligible operating
costs, including, but not limited to, the temporary employment of
personnel and public awareness campaigns, provided that such
reimbursement shall be apportioned based on the number of registered
voters in a county. Any funds received by a county under this appro-

387 12653-09-6
STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
priation shall be used to supplement and not supplant current local
expenditures of federal, state or local funds that the county
currently spends for the administration of elections or has budgeted
for costs related to the general election to be held in November of
2024. A copy of such plan shall be sent to the director of the divi-
sion of the budget, the senate finance committee, and the assembly
ways and means committee (23529) ...................................
5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $295,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections for reimbursement of costs related to providing
pre-paid return postage on absentee ballots and applications pursu-
ant to a plan by the state board of elections. A copy of such plan
shall be sent to the director of the division of budget, the senate
finance committee, and the assembly ways and means committee (23504)
... 4,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,099,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections for reimbursement of costs related to providing
pre-paid return postage on absentee ballots and applications pursu-
ant to a plan by the state board of elections. A copy of such plan
shall be sent to the director of the division of budget, the senate
finance committee, and the assembly ways and means committee (23504)
... 4,000,000 ....................................... (re. $777,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections for reimbursement of costs related to the expan-
sion of early voting for eligible expenses pursuant to a plan by the
state board of elections. A copy of such plan shall be sent to the
director of the division of the budget, the senate finance commit-
tee, and the assembly ways and means committee (23521) .............
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $107,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
The amounts appropriated herein shall be made available to local
boards of elections for reimbursement of costs related to the imple-
mentation of early voting for eligible expenses pursuant to a plan
subject to the approval of the director of the division of the budg-
et (23521) ... 10,000,000 ............................ (re. $45,000)
By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter
496, section 1, of the laws of 2008:
The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated
for services and expenses related to the alteration of poll sites to
provide accessibility for disabled voters. Such funds shall be allo-
cated to local boards of elections in proportion to the percentage
of the state's registered voters residing in each local board's
jurisdiction on December 31, 2004. Local boards of elections shall
submit an alteration plan to improve handicap accessibility to the

388 12653-09-6
STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state board of elections. Such moneys shall be payable on the audit
and warrant of the state comptroller, on vouchers certified or
approved by the state board of elections pursuant to subdivision
four of section 3-100 of the election law, in the manner provided by
law, provided, however, that the amount of this appropriation avail-
able for expenditure and disbursement on and after September 1, 2008
shall be reduced by six percent of the amount that was undisbursed
as of August 15, 2008 (23504) ... 4,990,000 ......... (re. $964,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Help America Vote Act Implementation Account - 25496
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the help America vote act of
2002; provided however, expenditures shall be made from this appro-
priation only pursuant to a contract, or modified contract, approved
by a vote of the state board of elections pursuant to subdivision 4
of section 3-100 of the election law, or, absent a contract, pursu-
ant to a vote of the state board of elections for expenditure pursu-
ant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the election law. The
amounts hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased through
interchange with any other special revenue funds - federal, federal
operating grants fund - 290 appropriation in the board or trans-
ferred to any other eligible state agency for the purpose of imple-
menting the help America vote act of 2002, provided that any such
interchange or transfer shall be approved by the state board of
elections pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the election
law and, in addition, any such interchange or transfer shall be
approved by the director of the budget who shall file copies thereof
with the state comptroller and the chairman of the senate finance
and assembly ways and means committees (23508) .....................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,740,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Help America Vote Act Implementation Account - 25497
By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the help
America vote act of 2002, including the purchase of new voting
machines and disability accessible ballot marking devices for use by
the local boards of elections pursuant to the help America vote act
of 2002. Such moneys shall be allocated to local boards of elections
in proportion to the percentage of the state's registered voters
residing in each local board's jurisdiction on December 31, 2004
(23511) ... 1,500,000 ............................. (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:

389 12653-09-6
STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the help
America vote act of 2002, including the purchase of new voting
machines and disability accessible ballot marking devices for use by
the local boards of elections pursuant to the help America vote act
of 2002. Such moneys shall be allocated to local boards of elections
in proportion to the percentage of the state's registered voters
residing in each local board's jurisdiction on December 31, 2004
(23511) ... 9,300,000 ............................. (re. $7,206,000)
By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as added by chapter 62,
section 1, of the laws of 2005:
For services and expenses incurred for poll worker training and voter
education efforts pursuant to a chapter of the laws of 2005 (23510)
... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $1,017,000)
By chapter 181, section 20, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter
55, section 3, of the laws of 2006:
For services and expenses related to the purchase of new voting
machines and voting systems for use by local boards of elections
pursuant to the Help America Vote Act of 2002. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, such funds may only be expended in accord-
ance with the provisions of this act related to the allocation of
such funds and the procurement and purchase of voting systems and
voting machines, including section ten of this act entitled "Formula
for allocating Help America Vote Act money to local boards of
election" and section twelve of this act entitled "Help America Vote
Act voting machine and system implementation procurement process".
Such moneys shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the state
comptroller on vouchers certified or approved in the manner provided
by law (23511) ... 190,000,000 ...................... (re. $691,000)

390 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 13,236,923 8,362,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 13,236,923 8,362,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 13,236,923
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses including suballo-
cation to other state departments and
agencies:
Susquehanna River Basin Commission (62039) ....... 259,000
Delaware River Basin Commission (62040) .......... 359,500
Ohio River Basin Commission (62041) ............... 14,100
Interstate Environmental Commission (62042) ....... 41,600
For additional services and expenses to the
Interstate Environmental Commission ............. 54,723
New England Interstate Commission (62043) ......... 38,000
Friends of the Upper Delaware River Basin
(62044) ........................................ 450,000
Upper Delaware Council, Inc. ..................... 100,000
Great Lakes Commission (62045) .................... 60,000
To the Adirondack North Country Association
for the purposes of the Adirondack diver-
sity initiative (62046) ........................ 300,000
For additional services and expenses to the
Adirondack diversity initiative ................ 120,000
To Essex County for non-hazardous landfill
closure projects under agreement with the
department of environmental conservation
(62047) ........................................ 300,000
Catskill Mountainkeeper ........................... 50,000
Catskill Center for Conservation and Development .. 50,000
Save the Great South Bay, Inc. for the
restoration of the Great South Bay ............. 300,000
To Hamilton County for non-hazardous land-
landfill closure projects under agreement
with the department of environmental
conservation (62048) ........................... 150,000
Scenic Hudson, Inc (25620) ....................... 250,000
The Hope Program ................................. 140,000
Environmental Leaders of Color ................... 200,000
For services and expenses of the resilient
and adaptive communities competitive grant

391 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
program, which shall provide assistance to
disadvantaged and environmental justice
communities with the development of commu-
nity resiliency hubs, including but not
limited to equipment to strengthen local
severe weather event preparedness and
response capabilities. All or a part of
this appropriation may be transferred or
suballocated to any other state depart-
ment, agency, public authority, or public
benefit corporation ......................... 10,000,000
--------------

392 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses including suballocation to other state
departments and agencies:
Friends of the Upper Delaware River Basin (62044) ....................
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
To the Adirondack North Country Association for the purposes of the
Adirondack diversity initiative (62046) ............................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For additional services and expenses to the Adirondack North Country
Association for the purposes of the Adirondack Diversity Initiative
... 120,000 ........................................ (re. $120,000)
To Essex County for non-hazardous landfill closure projects under
agreement with the department of environmental conservation (62047)
... 300,000 ........................................ (re. $300,000)
To Hamilton County for non-hazardous land-landfill closure projects
under agreement with the department of environmental conservation
(62048) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
Scenic Hudson, Inc (25620) ... 250,000 ................ (re. $250,000)
Fund for the City of New York-Jamaica Bay Rockaway Parks Conservancy,
Inc. (25618) ... 150,000 ............................ (re. $150,000)
The Hope Program (25723) ... 140,000 .................. (re. $140,000)
Catskill Center for Conservation and Development (62008) .............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
Catskill Mountainkeeper (62009) ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000)
Save the Great South Bay, Inc. for the restoration of the Great South
Bay (25619) ... 300,000 ............................. (re. $300,000)
Long Island City Coalition (24699) ... 125,000 ........ (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses related to the establishment of the smart
irrigation device rebate pilot program in Nassau and Suffolk coun-
ties (62051) ... 150,000 ............................ (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses including suballocation to other state
departments and agencies:
Friends of the Upper Delaware River Basin (62044) ....................
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For additional services and expenses to the Great Lakes Commission ...
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
To the Adirondack North Country Association for the purposes of the
Adirondack diversity initiative (62046) ............................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For additional services and expenses to the Adirondack North Country
Association for the purposes of the Adirondack diversity initiative
... 120,000 ......................................... (re. $120,000)
To Essex County for non-hazardous landfill closure projects under
agreement with the department of environmental conservation (62047)
... 300,000 ......................................... (re. $300,000)

393 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
To Hamilton County for non-hazardous land-landfill closure projects
under agreement with the department of environmental conservation
(62048) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
Catskill Mountainkeeper (62009) ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000)
Long Island City Coalition (24699) ... 125,000 ........ (re. $125,000)
The Hope Program (25723) ... 140,000 .................. (re. $140,000)
Fund for the City of New York - Jamaica Bay Rockaway Parks Conservan-
cy, Inc. (25618) ... 350,000 ........................ (re. $350,000)
Save the Great South Bay, Inc. for the restoration of the Great South
Bay (25619) ... 300,000 ............................. (re. $300,000)
Buffalo Niagara Waterkeeper, Inc (25621) .............................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $163,000)
Environmental Leaders of Color, Inc (25622) ..........................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses including suballocation to other state
departments and agencies:
Friends of the Upper Delaware River Basin (62044) ....................
350,000 ............................................. (re. $102,000)
For additional services and expenses to the Great Lakes Commission ...
500,000 ............................................. (re. $363,000)
To Essex County for non-hazardous landfill closure projects under
agreement with the department of environmental conservation (62047)
... 300,000 ......................................... (re. $300,000)
To Hamilton County for non-hazardous land-landfill closure projects
under agreement with the department of environmental conservation
(62048) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
Catskill Mountainkeeper (62009) ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000)
The Hope Program (25723) ... 140,000 .................. (re. $140,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses including suballocation to other state
departments and agencies:
Water quality monitoring in Setauket Harbor (25608) ..................
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain environmental conservation
initiatives. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or
any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote (62027) ...........................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $193,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses including suballocation to other state
departments and agencies:

394 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Water quality monitoring in Setauket Harbor (25608) ..................
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For the City of Syracuse for water quality monitoring on Skaneateles
Lake (62004) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000)
East of Hudson Watershed Corporation (62006) .........................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $11,000)
The WaterFront Center (62011) ... 5,000 ................. (re. $5,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses including suballocation to other state
department and agencies:
Water quality monitoring in Setauket Harbor (25608) ..................
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
For the services and expenses of a study on the impacts of hydraulic
shell fishing in Oyster Bay (25735) ... 75,000 ....... (re. $75,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses including suballocation to other state
departments and agencies:
Magnolia Tree Earth Center (25605) ... 75,000 .......... (re. $75,000)
Water quality monitoring in Manhasset Bay, Hempstead Harbor, Oyster
Bay Harbor, and Cold Spring Harbor (25735) .........................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $12,000)
Water quality monitoring in Setauket Harbor (25608) ..................
20,000 ................................................ (re. $9,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
Long Island Commission for Aquifer Protection (25736) ................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $11,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
Douglas Manor Environmental Association (25725) ......................
120,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2021:
The Hope Program (25723) ... 140,000 ................... (re. $70,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
Conesus Lake Association (25712) ... 50,000 ............ (re. $14,000)
Jefferson County Soil and Water Conservation District (25713) ........
75,000 ............................................... (re. $11,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses related to a Long Island nitrogen management
and mitigation plan. Not less than $1,875,000 of this appropriation
shall be made available for services and expenses of the Long Island
regional planning council. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up

395 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to $3,125,000 of this appropriation to state operations (25758)
5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $784,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
Sewage-Right-to-Know program (25692) ... 500,000 ...... (re. $200,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 1,
section 4, of the laws of 2009:
Edgewood Oak Brush Plains Preserve Improvement (24766) ...............
376,000 ............................................. (re. $187,000)
SOLID AND HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010:
For community impact research grants. Such grants shall be in an
amount of up to $50,000 for community groups for projects that
address a community's exposure to multiple environmental harms and
risks. Such projects shall include studies to investigate the envi-
ronment, or related public health issues of the community. Projects
shall include research that will be used to expand the knowledge or
understanding of the affected community. The results of the investi-
gation shall be disseminated to members of the affected community.
Community groups eligible for funding shall be located in the same
area as the environmental and/or related public health issues to be
addressed by the project. Such groups shall be primarily focused on
addressing the environmental and/or related public health issues of
the residents of the affected community and shall be comprised
primarily of members of the affected community (24804) .............
490,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)

396 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 5,121,253,567 5,780,553,232
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 1,777,887,000 2,860,840,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 23,802,000 115,894,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 6,922,942,567 8,757,287,232
================ ================
SCHEDULE
CHILD CARE PROGRAM ....................................... 3,141,674,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The money hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of state aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements,
and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest-bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.

397 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated, in combina-
tion with the money appropriated in feder-
al block grant, federal day care account,
including any funds transferred or subal-
located by the office of temporary and
disability assistance special revenue
funds - federal / aid to localities feder-
al health and human services fund federal
temporary assistance to needy families
block grant funds at the request of local
social services districts and, upon
approval of the director of the budget,
transfer of federal temporary assistance
for needy families block grant funds made
available from the New York works compli-
ance fund program or otherwise specif-
ically appropriated therefor, shall
constitute the state block grant for child
care. The money hereby appropriated is to
be available to social services districts
for child care assistance pursuant to
title 5-C of article 6 of the social
services law and shall be apportioned
among the social services districts by the
office according to an allocation plan
developed by the office and submitted to
the director of the budget for approval
within 60 days of enactment of the budget.

398 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
A district's block grant allocation,
including any funds the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance transfers
from a district's flexible fund for family
services allocation to the state block
grant for child care at the district's
request, for a particular federal fiscal
year is available only for child care
assistance expenditures made during that
federal fiscal year and which are claimed
by March 31 of the year immediately
following the end of that federal fiscal
year. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, any claims for child care assist-
ance made by a social services district
for expenditures made during a particular
federal fiscal year, other than claims
made under title XX of the federal social
security act and under the food stamp
employment and training program, shall be
counted against the social services
district's block grant allocation for that
federal fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its
allocation from the block grant in accord-
ance with the applicable provisions in
federal law and regulations relating to
the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regu-
lations of the office of children and
family services. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, each district's claims
submitted under the state block grant for
child care will be processed in a manner
that maximizes the availability of federal
funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in
each applicable federal fiscal year.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to
$155,000,000 may be made available for
reimbursement of child care assistance
expenditures exceeding a social service
district's block grant allocation for
federal fiscal year 2025-2026 or federal
fiscal year 2026-27, subject to a plan
developed by the office and approved by
the director of the budget. Notwithstand-
ing any inconsistent provision of law,
this funding shall be available for social
service districts located outside of a

399 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
city having a population of one million or
more.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, local districts may receive up to
$250,000 or 22 percent of their federal
fiscal year 2025-2026 allocation, whichev-
er is greater, to reimburse 100 percent of
eligible expenditures exceeding such
district's block grant allocation. Such
expenditures must be claimed by March 31
of the year immediately following the end
of federal fiscal year 2025-2026.
Notwithstanding subdivision 3 of section
410-v of the social services law or any
inconsistent provision of law, any portion
of this funding that is not claimed by
such district by March 31 following the
end of federal fiscal year 2025-2026 shall
not be added to that social services
district's block grant allocation for the
next federal fiscal year and any funds not
claimed by a district under this paragraph
may be reallocated to another district for
additional eligible federal fiscal year
2025-2026 expenditures if another district
has demonstrated the need for supplemental
funding in excess of the maximum amount
otherwise set forth by this paragraph.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, local districts that claim this
funding in federal fiscal year 2025-2026
may receive funding up to an amount equal
to the amount claimed in federal fiscal
year 2025-2026 to reimburse 100 percent of
eligible expenditures in federal fiscal
year 2026-2027 exceeding such district's
block grant allocation, provided that the
sum of the amount claimed in federal
fiscal year 2025-2026 and the amount
provided in federal fiscal year 2026-2027
pursuant to this sentence shall not exceed
$250,000 or 22 percent of their federal
fiscal year 2025-2026 allocation, whichev-
er is greater. Such expenditures must be
claimed by March 31 of the year immediate-
ly following the end of federal fiscal
year 2026-2027. Notwithstanding subdivi-
sion 3 of section 410-v of the social
services law or any inconsistent provision
of law, any portion of this funding made
available for federal fiscal year

400 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
2026-2027 shall not be added to that
social service district's block grant
allocation for the next federal fiscal
year and any funds not claimed by a
district under this paragraph may be real-
located to another district for additional
eligible federal fiscal year 2026-2027
expenditures if another district has
demonstrated the need for supplemental
funding in excess of the maximum amount
otherwise set forth by this paragraph.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to
$475,000,000 may be made available for
reimbursement of child care assistance
expenditures exceeding a district's block
grant allocation and additional supple-
mental funds for federal fiscal years
2025-2026 and 2026-2027, subject to a plan
developed by the office and approved by
the director of the budget. Notwithstand-
ing any inconsistent provision of law,
funds shall be available to only a social
services district within a city having a
population of one million or more.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, this funding shall be made avail-
able to supplement a district's block
grant allocation as necessary to reimburse
no more than fifty percent of eligible
expenditures exceeding such district's
initial block grant allocation and addi-
tional supplemental funds for each federal
fiscal year, limited to the amount listed
in this paragraph.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds shall be made available
during federal fiscal year 2025-2026 and
must be claimed by March 31 of the year
immediately following the end of the
federal fiscal year. Notwithstanding
subdivision 3 of section 410-v of the
social services law or any inconsistent
provision of law, any portion of this
funding that is not claimed by districts
by March 31 following the end of federal
fiscal year 2025-2026 shall only be avail-
able to reimburse additional child care
assistance expenditures exceeding any
district block grant allocations require-
ments for federal fiscal year 2026-2027
(13907) .................................. 2,213,095,000

401 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of a program to
increase participation of afterschool,
daycare, or other out-of-school care
providers who are eligible to participate
in the child and adult care food program.
Methods of increasing participation shall
include but not be limited to outreach and
technical assistance provided that such
funds shall be awarded to nonprofit organ-
izations through a competitive process and
provided further that such funds may be
transferred or suballocated to any state
agency to accomplish the intent of this
appropriation (13926) .......................... 250,000
For services and expenses of the united
federation of teachers to provide profes-
sional development to child care providers
including but not necessarily limited to
licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legal-
ly-exempt providers located in the city of
New York, to meet existing training
requirements and to enhance the develop-
ment of such providers (14033) ............... 1,433,000
For services and expenses of the united
federation of teachers to establish and
operate a quality grant program for child
care providers which may include licensed
group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers
and legally-exempt providers located in
the city of New York (14052) ................. 1,266,000
For services and expenses of the civil
service employees association, Local 1000,
AFSCME, AFL-CIO to provide professional
development to child care providers which
shall include but not necessarily be
limited to, licensed group family day care
home, registered family day care home and
legally-exempt providers located outside
the city of New York, to meet existing
training requirements and to enhance the
development of such providers; provided
however, that, pursuant to a request by
the civil services association, the funds
may be made available to CSEA Workers'
Opportunity Resources and Knowledge Insti-
tute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other
administrator designated by the union to
administer and implement the program for
the union (14034) ............................ 1,750,000

402 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the civil
service employees association, Local 1000,
AFSCME, AFL-CIO to establish and operate a
quality grant program for licensed group
family day care home and registered family
day care home providers outside the city
of New York; provided however, that,
pursuant to a request by the civil
services association, the funds may be
made available to CSEA Workers' Opportu-
nity Resources and Knowledge Institute
(CSEA WORK Institute), or other adminis-
trator designated by the union to adminis-
ter and implement the program for the
union (14032) ................................ 2,750,000
For services and expenses of a business
navigator program in each of the ten
regional economic development council
regions. Funds shall be used for, but may
not be limited to, helping businesses
identify different child care supports for
their employees (60582) ...................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of an employer-
supported child care pilot program which
shall serve families with an income
between 85 percent and 100 percent of the
state median income in three regions of
the state. Funds may be allocated to
contractors for the purposes of adminis-
tering the program. Participating employ-
ers and families shall each contribute one
third of the cost of care for all families
enrolled into the pilot program (60583) ...... 4,800,000
For services and expenses of child care
support centers to administer substitute
pools for eligible child care providers.
The services of the child care support
centers shall be provided to child care
providers at no cost to the providers.
Funds may be allocated to contractors for
the purposes of administering the program
(60644) ...................................... 2,500,000
The services and expenses of the early care
and learning council to provide technical
assistance and platforms to support admin-
istration of substitute pools by child
care support centers. Funds may be allo-
cated to contractors for technology
services, applications, and software for
purposes including the administration,

403 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
coordination, and management of the
program (60647) ................................ 500,000
For services and expenses of a child care
zoning initiative. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, funds here-
by appropriated may be transferred to
state operations and/or suballocated to
any appropriation of any state department
or agency .................................... 1,000,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, for services and expenses of a
contractual-based child care program to
serve two year olds in a social services
district located within a city having a
population of one million or more pursuant
to a plan approved by the director of the
budget. The funds appropriated herein
shall be made available for reimbursement
of the operation of such contractual-based
child care program ......................... 73,000,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, for services and expenses of
Dutchess County, Monroe County, and Broome
County for pilot projects to provide child
care services to children aged zero to
three through contracts with licensed or
registered providers, pursuant to a plan
developed by the office and approved by
the director of the budget. Such plan
shall permit each participating county to
contract with a child care resource and
referral agency to administer the project
and shall require reimbursement of no more
than ninety percent of eligible expendi-
tures of each participating county. Of
the funds appropriated herein, up to ten
percent of allocated funds for each pilot
project may be used for the administration
of such projects ............................ 66,000,000
For services and expenses of the Consortium
for Worker Education to provide grants to
offset the cost of child care for working
families with incomes up to 400 percent of
the federal poverty level who are ineligi-
ble for child care assistance under title
5-C of the social services law.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be
available to the Consortium for Worker
Education to administer and implement such
grants in accordance with the terms of any
applicable contract between the Consortium

404 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
for Worker Education and the office of
children and family services. The Consor-
tium for Worker Education shall provide
such grants to eligible working families
who live or are employed in, Manhattan,
the Bronx, Brooklyn, Staten Island and
Queens. Funding for such grants shall be
limited to the amounts appropriated here
in.
Such grants shall be available to episodic
workers, provided the applicant meets all
other applicable eligibility criteria. An
"episodic worker" shall be defined as a
person who, in a calendar year, is
employed for at least 1,040 hours and has
gross annual earnings from the episodic
employment below 400 percent of the feder-
al poverty level. Such a worker shall not
be ineligible to receive a grant solely
because the worker is not employed at the
time of application.
The administrative cost, including the cost
of the development of the evaluation,
shall not exceed fifteen percent of the
funds available for the purpose.
The Consortium for Worker Education shall
prepare and submit a report to the office
of children and family services, the
chairs of the senate committee on social
services, the senate committee on children
and families, the senate committee on
labor, the chairs of the assembly commit-
tee on children and families, the assembly
committee on social services, and the
assembly committee on labor. Such report
shall include available information,
including but not limited to: the number
of income eligible children of working
parents with income up to 400 percent of
the federal poverty level who are not
eligible for child care under title 5-C of
the social services law, the ages of the
children served, the factors that parents
considered when searching for child care,
the number of families who receive a child
care grant who choose to use such grant
for regulated child care, and the number
of families who receive a child care grant
who choose to use such grant to receive
child care services provided by a legally
exempt provider. Such report shall be

405 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
submitted by the program administrator, on
or before January 1, 2027, provided that
if such report is not received by that
date, reimbursement for administrative
costs shall be either reduced or withheld,
and failure of an administrator to submit
a timely report may jeopardize such admin-
istrator's program from receiving funding
in future years. The administrator shall
submit quarterly reports to the office of
children and family services and the
legislature. Each quarterly report shall
provide without benefit of personal iden-
tifying information, an aggregate of
current enrollment and information and
data collected directly by the administra-
tor of those currently receiving grants.
The office of children and family services
and the department of labor shall provide
technical assistance to assist with admin-
istration and timely coordination of the
bi-monthly claiming process. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law, the
grant program established herein may be
terminated if the administrator for such
program mismanages such program by engag-
ing in actions including but not limited
to, improper use of funds and failure to
submit claims for reimbursement in a time-
ly fashion (60589) ........................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of the AFL-CIO
Workforce Development Institute to provide
grants to offset the cost of child care
for working families with incomes up to
400 percent of the federal poverty level
who are ineligible for child care assist-
ance under title 5-C of the social
services law. The amounts appropriated
herein shall be available to the AFL-CIO
Workforce Development Institute to admin-
ister and implement such grants in accord-
ance with the terms of any applicable
contract between the AFL-CIO Workforce
Development Institute and the office of
children and family services. The AFL-CIO
Workforce Development Institute shall
provide such grants to eligible working
families who live or are employed in Alba-
ny, Erie, Oneida, Onondaga, Monroe, Rens-
selaer, Schenectady, Saratoga, and Suffolk
counties, and may provide such grants to

406 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
eligible families who live or are employed
in any other region of the State of New
York, excluding the city of New York.
Funding for such grants shall be limited
to the amounts appropriated herein. Such
grants shall be available to episodic
workers, provided the applicant meets all
other applicable eligibility criteria. An
"episodic worker" shall be defined as a
person who, in a calendar year, is
employed for at least 1,040 hours and has
gross annual earnings from the episodic
employment below 400 percent of the feder-
al poverty level. Such a worker shall not
be ineligible to receive a grant solely
because the worker is not employed at the
time of application. The administrative
cost, including the cost of the develop-
ment of the evaluation shall not exceed
fifteen percent of the funds available for
the purpose.
The AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute
shall prepare and submit a report to the
office of children and family services,
the chairs of the senate committee on
social services, the senate committee on
children and families, the senate commit-
tee on labor, the chairs of the assembly
committee on children and families, the
assembly committee on social services, and
the assembly committee on labor.
Such report shall include available informa-
tion, including but not limited to: the
number of income eligible children of
working parents with income up to 400
percent of the federal poverty level who
are not eligible for child care under
title 5-C of the social services law, the
ages of the children served, the factors
that parents considered when searching for
child care, the number of families who
receive a child care grant who choose to
use such grant for regulated child care,
and the number of families who receive a
child care grant who choose to use such
grant to receive child care services
provided by a legally exempt provider.
Such report shall be submitted by the
program administrator, on or before Janu-
ary 1, 2027, provided that if such report
is not received by that date, reimburse-

407 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ment for administrative costs shall be
either reduced or withheld, and failure of
an administrator to submit a timely report
may jeopardize such administrator's
program from receiving funding in future
years. The administrator shall submit
quarterly reports to the office of chil-
dren and family services and the legisla-
ture. Each quarterly report shall provide
without benefit of personal identifying
information, an aggregate of current
enrollment and information and data
collected directly by the administrator of
those currently receiving grants. The
office of children and family services and
the department of labor shall provide
technical assistance to assist with admin-
istration and timely coordination of the
bi-monthly claiming process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the grant program established herein may
be terminated if the administrator for
such program mismanages such program by
engaging in actions including but not
limited to, improper use of funds and
failure to submit claims for reimbursement
in a timely fashion (60590) .................. 5,000,000
For services and expenses of the Consortium
for Worker Education to operate and
support a pilot program to facilitate
recruitment and enrollment of working
families living or employed in the city of
New York with incomes up to eighty-five
percent of state median income for child
care assistance provided under title 5-C
of the social services law. The Consorti-
um for Worker Education shall prepare and
submit to the office of children and fami-
ly services, the chairs of the senate
committee on children and families and the
senate committee on social services, the
chair of the assembly committee on chil-
dren and families, the chair of the assem-
bly committee on social services, the
chair of the senate commit tee on labor,
and the chair of the assembly committee on
labor, a report on the pilot supported by
appropriate documentation. Such report
shall include available information
regarding the pilot program or partic-
ipants in the pilot program absent identi-

408 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
fying information, including but not
limited to: the number of families
contacted, the number of families assisted
in signing up for child care assistance,
the number of events participated in, and
the number of staff supported by the
grant. Such report shall be submitted by
the project administrator, on or before
January 1, 2027, provided that if such
report is not received by such date
reimbursement shall be either reduced or
withheld, and failure of the administrator
to submit a timely report may jeopardize
such program's funding in future years.
The Consortium for Worker Education shall
submit quarterly reports to the office of
children and family services and the
legislature. Each quarterly report must
provide without benefit of personal iden-
tifying information, the number of fami-
lies contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care
assistance, the number of events partic-
ipated in, and the number of staff
supported by the grant. The office of
children and family services shall provide
technical assistance to the pilot program
to assist with project administration and
timely coordination of the quarterly
claiming process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the pilot program established herein may
be terminated if the administrator for
such program mismanages such program by
engaging in actions including but not
limited to, improper use of funds and
failure to submit claims for reimbursement
in a timely fashion (60591) .................. 1,250,000
For services and expenses of the AFL-CIO
Workforce Development Institute to operate
and support a pilot program to facilitate
recruitment and enrollment of working
families living or employed in the state
of New York, excluding the city of New
York with incomes up to eighty-five
percent of state median income for child
care assistance provided under title 5-C
of the social services law. The AFL-CIO
Workforce Development Institute shall
prepare and submit to the office of chil-
dren and family services, the chairs of

409 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the senate committee on children and fami-
lies and the senate committee on social
services, the chair of the assembly
committee on children and families, the
chair of the assembly committee on social
services, the chair of the senate commit-
tee on labor, and the chair of the assem-
bly committee on labor, a report on the
pilot supported by appropriate documenta-
tion. Such report shall include available
information regarding the pilot program or
participants in the pilot program absent
identifying information, including but not
limited to: the number of families
contacted, the number of families assisted
in signing up for child care assistance,
the number of events participated in, and
the number of staff supported by the
grant.
Such report shall be submitted by the
project administrator, on or before Janu-
ary 1, 2027, provided that if such report
is not received by such date reimbursement
shall be either reduced or withheld, and
failure of the administrator to submit a
timely report may jeopardize such
program's funding in future years. The
AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute
shall submit quarterly reports to the
office of children and family services and
the legislature. Each quarterly report
must provide without benefit of personal
identifying information, the number of
families contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care
assistance, the number of events partic-
ipated in, and the number of staff
supported by the grant. The office of
children and family services shall provide
technical assistance to the pilot program
to assist with project administration and
timely coordination of the quarterly
claiming process. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the pilot program
established herein may be terminated if
the administrator for such program misman-
ages such program by engaging in actions
including but not limited to, improper use
of funds and failure to submit claims for
reimbursement in a timely fashion (60592) ...... 600,000

410 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Child Care
Council of Westchester, Inc. to adminis-
ter a child care scholarship program in
Westchester County ........................... 1,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 2,382,694,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Day Care Account - 25175
For services and expenses related to the
child care block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest-bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for aid to municipalities, for services
and expenses under the child care block
grant which may include, but not be limit-
ed to, the activities necessary to meet
the federally required set-aside for
infant and toddler activities and to
support the health, safety and quality
requirements of the Child Care Development
Block Grant Reauthorization Act of 2014,
which may include, but not be limited to,
increased inspection, background check,
professional development and training

411 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
activities and associated systems and
administrative costs and for payments to
the federal government for expenditures
made pursuant to the social services law
and the state plan for individual and
family grant program under the disaster
relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid, services and expenses heretofore
accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, such funds shall
be available to the office net of disal-
lowances, refunds, reimbursements, and
credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account or special revenue
funds federal/state operations federal day
care account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated including
any funds transferred by the office of
temporary and disability assistance
special revenue funds - federal / aid to
localities federal health and human
services fund, federal temporary assist-
ance to needy families block grant funds
at the request of local social services
districts and, upon approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, transfer of federal
temporary assistance for needy families

412 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
block grant funds made available from the
New York works compliance fund program or
otherwise specifically appropriated there-
for, in combination with the money appro-
priated in the general fund / aid to
localities local assistance account,
appropriated for the state block grant for
child care shall constitute the state
block grant for child care.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$576,000,000 of the state block grant for
child care may be used for child care
assistance pursuant to title 5-C of arti-
cle 6 of the social services law. The
funds that are to be available to social
services districts for child care assist-
ance shall be apportioned among the social
services districts by the office according
to the allocation plan developed by the
office and submitted to the director of
the budget for approval within 60 days of
enactment of the budget. A district's
block grant allocation, including any
funds the office of temporary and disabil-
ity assistance transfers from a district's
flexible fund for family services allo-
cation to the state block grant for child
care at the district's request, for a
particular federal fiscal year is avail-
able only for child care assistance
expenditures made during that federal
fiscal year and which are claimed by March
31 of the year immediately following the
end of that federal fiscal year. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law, any
claims for child care assistance made by a
social services district for expenditures
made during a particular federal fiscal
year, other than claims made under title
XX of the federal social security act and
under the food stamp employment and train-
ing program, shall be counted against the
social services district's block grant
allocation for that federal fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its
allocation from the block grant in accord-
ance with the applicable provisions in
federal law and regulations relating to
the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regu-
lations of the office of children and

413 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
family services. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, each district's claims
submitted under the state block grant for
child care will be processed in a manner
that maximizes the availability of federal
funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in
each applicable federal fiscal year. Funds
appropriated herein shall be subject to
the amount awarded in federal grant fund-
ing.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$30,000,000 may be available for services
and expenses for the operation and coordi-
nation of child care resource and referral
agencies. Such funds are to be available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget to
continue existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of
children and family services, to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations
to continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of
children and family services and/or to
award new contracts to not-for-profit
organizations through a competitive proc-
ess.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$30,000,000 may be available for services
and expenses for the operation and coordi-
nation of legally exempt enrollment agen-
cies. Such funds are to be available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget to
continue existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of
children and family services, to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations
to continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of
children and family services and/or to
award new contracts to not-for-profit
organizations through a competitive proc-
ess.

414 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$10,700,000 may be available for services
and expenses for the operation of
infant/toddler resource centers. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a
plan prepared by the office of children
and family services and approved by the
director of the budget to continue exist-
ing programs with existing contractors
that are satisfactorily performing as
determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to
not-for-profit organizations to continue
programs where the existing contractors
are not satisfactorily performing as
determined by the office of children and
family services and/or to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations
through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$29,000,000 may be available for services
and expenses of child care provider train-
ing, child care scholarships education and
ongoing professional development.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$25,000,000 may be available for services
and expenses of the development and main-
tenance of automated systems in support of
licensing and oversight of child day care
providers.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$5,000,000 may be available for services
and expenses of family child care
networks, including recruitment and expan-
sion of providers located in child care
deserts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$586,000 may be available for services and
expenses to make awards through a compet-
itive grant process for start-up expenses
and for the promotion of child health and
safety, including equipment and minor
renovations.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$300,000 may be available for services and
expenses for the establishment and/or
operation of child care services in the
state's courts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$2,020,000 may be available for services
and expenses of subsidy for eligible state

415 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
university of New York students and quali-
ty activities at the state university of
New York including community colleges and
state operated campuses.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$2,020,000 may be available for services
and expenses of subsidy for eligible city
university of New York students and quali-
ty activities at the city university of
New York, including community colleges and
senior colleges.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$750,000 may be available for suballo-
cation to the department of agriculture
and markets for services and expenses of
child care services provided to children
of migrant workers in programs operated by
non-profit organizations under contract
with the department of agriculture and
markets to provide such care.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to
$130,000 may be available for services and
expenses of conducting a market rate
survey (13950) ............................. 753,637,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 753,637,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Environmental Protection Agency Grants Account -
25490
For services and expenses related to lead
testing and remediation of child day care
facilities in accordance with the require-
ments set forth in the federal water
infrastructure improvements for the nation
act (15017) .................................. 5,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Quality Child Care and Protection Account - 21900
For services and expenses related to admin-
istering the "quality child care and
protection act" specifically, the
provision of grants to child day care
providers for health and safety purposes,

416 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
for training of child day care provider
staff and other activities to increase the
availability and/or quality of child care
programs. No expenditure shall be made
from this account until an expenditure
plan has been approved by the director of
the budget (13950) ............................. 343,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 343,000
--------------
FAMILY AND CHILDREN'S SERVICES PROGRAM ................... 3,776,037,767
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount appropriated herein,
shall be available under a foster care
block grant for state reimbursement of
eligible social services district expendi-
tures for the provision and administration
of foster care services including care,
maintenance, supervision, and tuition; for
supervision of foster children placed in
federally funded job corps programs; for
care, maintenance, supervision, and
tuition for adjudicated juvenile delin-
quents placed in residential programs
operated by authorized agencies and in
out-of-state residential programs; for the
provision and administration of the
kinship guardian assistance program
including kinship guardianship assistance
payments and payments for non-recurring
guardianship expenses and eligible expend-
itures associated with local compliance
with the federal Family First Prevention
Services Act (P.L. 115-123); except that,
reimbursement from the amount appropriated
herein shall not be available for tuition
expenditures for foster children, includ-
ing persons in need of supervision and
adjudicated juvenile delinquents, made by
a social services district located within
a city having a population of one million
or more.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
a portion of the funds are available to
reimburse eligible social services

417 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
districts located outside of a city having
a population of one million or more for
eligible costs incurred to supply luggage
to children in foster care pursuant to
section 398-f of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
a portion of the funds are available to
reimburse social services districts for
the change in the maximum state aid rates
established by the office of children and
family services for the 2026-27 rate year
pursuant to section 398-a of the social
services law and sections 4003 and 4405 of
the education law to reflect the continua-
tion of the cost of living adjustments
that became effective April 1, 2008 for
payments made to foster parents and for
salary and fringe benefit costs and other
critical nonpersonal services costs for
foster care programs as determined by the
office. Social services districts must
adjust the amount of payments made for
care provided by congregate care and
foster boarding home programs and to
foster parents to reflect the cost of
living adjustments in the manner specified
by the office. Each authorized agency
operating a congregate care or foster
boarding home program in New York state
for which the office sets a maximum state
aid rate pursuant to section 398-a of the
social services law or section 4003 or
4405 of the education law shall submit, at
the time and in a manner to be determined
by the office, a written certification,
attesting that the funds received for the
continuation of the cost of living adjust-
ment to the maximum state aid rate that
became effective April 1, 2008 for that
program will be or were used solely in
accordance with the requirements of the
cost of living adjustment established by
the office.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law including, but not limited to, any
chapter of the laws of 2026 which enacts a
targeted inflationary increase for the
state fiscal year beginning on April 1,
2026, the commissioner shall continue to
apply any targeted inflationary increase
in effect on March 31, 2026 for the entire

418 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
rate year that began when such targeted
inflationary increase was in effect.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the commissioner shall apply a 2.7
percent targeted inflationary increase for
the rate year that begins on July 1, 2026
for the purposes of establishing rates of
payments, contracts, or any other form of
reimbursement, provided that this shall
not prevent the commissioner from applying
additional trend or staff retention
factors for this program.
Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement to each social
services district for services identified
herein that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state from April 1, 2026 through March
31, 2027 shall be limited to a district
allocation, hereinafter referred to as the
district's block grant allocation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, such block grant allocation shall be
based, in part, on each district's claims
for such costs, adjusted by the applicable
cost allocation methodology and net of any
retroactive payments for the 12 month
period ending June 30, 2025 that are
submitted on or before January 2, 2026
and, in part, on such other factors as
determined by the office of children and
family services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Any portion of a social
services district's allocation from funds
appropriated herein not claimed by such
district during the state fiscal year may
be used by such district for expenditures
on preventive services provided pursuant
to section 409-a of the social services
law, independent living services and
aftercare services provided pursuant to
regulations of the department of family
assistance, claimed by such district
during the next state fiscal year up to
the amount remaining from the district's
foster care block grant allocation,
provided however, that any claims for such
services during the next state fiscal year
in excess of such amount shall be subject
to 62 percent state reimbursement exclu-
sive of any federal funds made available
for such purposes, in accordance with

419 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
directives of the department of family
assistance and subject to the approval of
the director of the budget. Any claims
submitted by a social services district
for reimbursement for a particular state
fiscal year for which the social services
district does not receive state or federal
reimbursement during that state fiscal
year may not be claimed against that
district's block grant apportionment for
the next state fiscal year.
The office of children and family services,
with the approval of the director of the
budget, may reduce a district's block
grant allocation by the state share
decrease related to federal retroactive
reimbursement for such foster care
services identified herein. The office,
with the approval of the director of the
budget, may reduce a district's block
grant allocation by the state share of
disallowances or sanctions taken against
the district pursuant to the social
services law or federal law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the state shall not be responsible for
reimbursing a social services district and
a district shall not seek state reimburse-
ment for any portion of any state disal-
lowance or sanction taken against the
social services district, or any federal
disallowance attributable to final federal
agency decisions or to settlement made, on
or after July 1, 1995, when such disallow-
ance or sanction results from the failure
of the social services district to comply
with federal or state requirements,
including, but not limited to, failure to
document eligibility for federal or state
funds in the case record; provided, howev-
er, if the office determines that any
federal disallowance for services provided
between January 1, 1999 and May 31, 1999
results solely from the late enactment of
the state legislation implementing the
federal adoption and safe families act,
the state shall be solely responsible for
the full amount of the disallowance or
sanction; provided, further, however, this
provision shall be deemed to apply both
prospectively and retroactively regardless

420 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of whether such sanctions or disallowances
are for services provided or claims made
prior to or after April 1, 2026.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
any federal disallowance resulting from a
federal title IV-E eligibility review or
audit that uses extrapolated statistic
techniques shall be passed along by the
state to any and all social services
districts that the office of children and
family services has determined have not
complied with the title IV-E eligibility
requirements or have not taken the neces-
sary actions to ensure compliance with
such requirements including, but not
limited to, failing to: assess and fully
document all the criteria and have readily
available all the necessary documents to
establish and continue title IV-E eligi-
bility for all title IV-E eligible chil-
dren within the required time frames;
claim title IV-E funding only for cases
that meet all of the title IV-E eligibil-
ity criteria; and fully implement the
social services payment system on or
before April 1, 2005 for all direct and
voluntary agency foster care services.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services
shall impose on social services districts
any federal disallowance issued against
the state as a result of a federal title
IV-E secondary eligibility review regard-
less of the date the children may have
entered foster care, the date the eligi-
bility or payment errors occurred, or the
filing date of any federal claims for
reimbursement; provided, however, that the
state shall be responsible for the disal-
lowed costs and expenditures related to
the placement of children in a facility
operated by the office of children and
family services, which shall be determined
in the same manner as the disallowed costs
and expenditures for social services
districts other than the city of New York.
In order to reimburse the federal govern-
ment for the full amount of any disallow-
ance imposed on the state by the federal
administration for children and families
within the timeframes necessary to avoid

421 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
any potential interest payments on such
amount, the office of children and family
services is authorized to immediately
offset funds otherwise due to each
district for a pro rata share of the total
disallowed costs based on the percentage
of applicable federal title IV-E claims
made by that district for the relevant
time period as compared to the total
applicable statewide title IV-E claims.
The amount of the offset against each
district will be adjusted, if necessary,
upon completion of the disallowance allo-
cation process. The final allocation of
the amount of any federal disallowance
resulting from a title IV-E secondary
eligibility review shall be allocated
among the districts so that each district
shall be responsible for the amount
attributable to each of the district's
children or cases that are determined by
the federal review to be unallowable. Each
district shall also be responsible for a
portion of the federal extrapolated disal-
lowance amount based on the relative error
rate for the district. The city of New
York's error rate will be based on the
federal sample and federal statistics. For
all social services districts other than
the city of New York, the error rate will
be based on a review conducted by the
district of a sample of children and/or
cases determined by the office of children
and family services and a re-review of a
sub-sample by the office of those children
and/or cases determined by the office. The
office of children and family services
will determine what is reasonable in
establishing the size of the sample and
sub-sample for each district. The office
of children and family services shall
notify each social services district of
the sample of children and/or cases from
the federal audit period that the social
services district must review. Any child
or case from the social services district
that was included in the federal sample
will automatically be included in the
social services district's review sample
and the determination made at the federal
review regarding that child or case will

422 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
govern for the purposes of the social
services district's review. The social
services district must complete and submit
the results of its review to the office of
children and family services within 60
days of receipt of the sample. The error
rate for the district will be based on the
findings of the district's review and the
office of children and family services'
re-review. If a social services district
does not complete its review within 60
days of receiving the sample from the
office of children and family services,
the office of children and family services
shall assign an error rate to the social
services district based on the relative
percentage of the district's applicable
title IV-E claims for the relevant period
as compared to applicable statewide title
IV-E claims for that period and other
circumstances that the office of children
and family services may consider in order
to allocate 100 percent of the federal
disallowance. The office of children and
family services shall apply each social
services district's error rate to the
total amount of the district's applicable
title IV-E claims including associated
administrative expenses. The resulting
dollar amounts for all of the social
services districts will be summed to
derive the total amount of title IV-E
claims deemed to be in error statewide. To
establish a disallowance percentage for
each social services district, the amount
of the district's title IV-E claims deemed
to be in error will be divided by the
amount of statewide title IV-E claims
deemed to be in error. The resulting
disallowance percentage for each district
will be applied to the entire title IV-E
extrapolated disallowance calculated by
the federal review to determine the amount
of the extrapolated disallowance for which
the district is responsible. Each district
will be credited for the amount already
disallowed for any individual children or
cases found to be in error during the
federal review. The exclusive appeal
rights for the review of the amount of the
federal disallowance assigned to each

423 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
social services district shall be pursuant
to article 78 of the civil practice law
and rules; provided, however, that in any
such action all of the social services
districts shall be joined as necessary
parties and the venue of any such action
shall be in Rensselaer county. Any social
services district that fails to complete
its sample review in the required time
frames shall have no right to appeal and
shall not be a necessary party to any
action brought by another social services
district.
The money hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of state aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements,
and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified

424 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
by the state comptroller or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the office of chil-
dren and family services may, on behalf of
social services districts, make payments
to foster boarding homes paid directly by
social services districts by direct depos-
it or debit card. Local social services
districts shall reimburse the office for
the costs of administering such direct
deposit or debit card payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of the social services law or the state
finance law, the office of children and
family services shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance reimburse
the office of children and family services
for the non-federal share of the costs of
administering such direct deposit or debit
card payments to capture the local share
of such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, amounts due and owing to
a social services district under this
appropriation, may be reduced up to such
amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law (13997) ... 426,016,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount appropriated herein
shall be made available to reimburse 62
percent of eligible social services
district expenditures that are claimed by
March 31, 2028 for child welfare services
which shall include and be limited to
preventive services provided pursuant to

425 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
section 409-a of the social services law
other than community optional preventive
services, child protective services, inde-
pendent living services, after-care
services as defined in regulations of the
department of family assistance, and
adoption administration and services,
other than adoption subsidies provided
pursuant to title 9 of article 6 of the
social services law and regulations of the
department of family assistance incurred
on or after October 1, 2026 and before
October 1, 2027, or before October 1, 2026
with approval by the director of the budg-
et, and that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state on or after April 1, 2026, after
first deducting therefrom any federal
funds properly received or to be received
on account thereof upon certification by
the social services district that it will
not be using these funds to supplant other
state and local funds and that the
district will not submit claims for
reimbursement under this appropriation for
the same type and level of services that
the county previously provided and claimed
under any contract in existence on October
1, 2002 as other than child protective,
preventive, independent living, after care
or adoption services or adoption adminis-
tration.
The money hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of state aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements,
and credits; provided, however, that
notwithstanding any other provision of
law, for a district to receive reimburse-
ment for such services, the amount of
funds that the district expends on such
services from its flexible fund for family
services allocation and any flexible fund
for family services funds transferred at
the district's request to the title XX
social services block grant must, to the
extent that families are eligible there-
fore, be equal to or greater than the
district's portion of the $457,322,342

426 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
statewide child welfare threshold amount,
which shall be established pursuant to a
formula developed by the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance and the
office of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
selected social services districts may
authorize the office of temporary and
disability assistance to intercept a
portion of the funds on behalf of the
office of children and family services
otherwise due to the districts under this
appropriation and/or under any other
general fund - aid to localities appropri-
ation available to such districts to
suballocate to the office of mental health
and subsequently for suballocation from
the office of mental health to the depart-
ment of health to use for the 38.9 percent
of the non-federal share of the medical
assistance payments for home and community
based waiver services provided in accord-
ance with subdivision 9 of section 366 of
the social services law as authorized by
such selected social services districts
which choose to use preventive services
funds to support such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
social services districts may authorize
the office of temporary and disability
assistance to intercept a portion of the
funds on behalf of the office of children
and family services otherwise due to the
districts under this appropriation and/or
under any other general fund - aid to
localities appropriation available to such
districts to transfer to any miscellaneous
special revenue fund available to the
office of children and family services to
use for the local share of the federal
funds available for education and training
vouchers provided in accordance with
section 477 of title IV-E of the social
security act as authorized by such social
services districts which choose to use
funds to support such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family

427 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state comptroller or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the office of chil-
dren and family services may, on behalf of
local social services districts, make
payments for adoption subsidies by direct
deposit or debit card. Local social
services districts shall reimburse the
office for the costs of administering such
direct deposit or debit card payments.

428 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of the social services law or the state
finance law, the office of children and
family services shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance reimburse
the office of children and family services
in an amount equal to 38 percent of the
non-federal share of the costs of adminis-
tering such direct deposit or debit card
payments to capture the local share of
such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the office of children and family services
shall reissue per diem rates, required
pursuant to section 529 of the executive
law, for calendar years 2002 through 2009
to remove any adjustments to the costs
included in determining such rates to
reflect any changes in federal funding
made available to the office or to local
social services districts for such costs
and, provided further, the office shall
not include any such adjustments in per
diem rates established hereafter.
All reimbursement made by local social
services districts for care, maintenance
and supervision under this section shall
be paid directly to the state through the
office of children and family services for
deposit into a miscellaneous special
revenue fund known as the youth facility
per diem account.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, amounts due and owing to
a social services district under this
appropriation, may be reduced up to such
amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law (13998) ... 959,045,000
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the amount appropriated herein shall be
available to reimburse for 98 percent of
65 percent of eligible social services
district expenditures that are claimed by
March 31, 2027 for those community preven-
tive services provided from October 1,
2025 through September 30, 2026 at a cost
that does not exceed the cost that was in
effect on October 1, 2008 and that a
social services district can demonstrate
had been approved by the office of chil-

429 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
dren and family services on or before
October 1, 2008; provided, however, that
should insufficient funds be available to
provide state reimbursement for 98 percent
of 65 percent of such costs, reimbursement
shall be made proportionally to each
district based on the percentage of their
total eligible claims to the amount appro-
priated; and, provided further, however,
that if the amount appropriated exceeds
the amount of funds necessary to reimburse
98 percent of 65 percent of the eligible
social services district expenditures, the
office may, to the extent funds are avail-
able, provide reimbursement for 98 percent
of 65 percent of eligible social services
district expenditures for new community
preventive services programs approved by
the office and only up to the amounts
approved by the office. A local social
services district seeking federal and/or
state reimbursement for community preven-
tive services provided on or after October
1, 2025 must submit claims that separately
identify the costs of such services in a
form and manner and at such times as are
required by the department of family
assistance and that information regarding
outcome based measures that demonstrate
quality of services provided and program
effectiveness be submitted to the office
of children and family services in a form
and manner and at such times as required
by the office. Of the amount appropriated
herein, up to $1,000,000 may be used to
provide additional funding to an eligible
program or programs with evaluation
results that show program effectiveness
and demonstrate private monetary support
as determined by the office of children
and family services and approved by the
director of the budget (13999) .............. 12,124,750
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
for services provided prior to April 1,
2019 and suballocation to the office of
mental health and subsequently for subal-
location from the office of mental health
to the department of health for 94 percent
of 65 percent of the nonfederal share of
medical assistance payments for home and
community based waiver services provided

430 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
in accordance with subdivision 9 of
section 366 of the social services law as
authorized by selected social services
districts which choose to use preventive
services funds to support such costs and
to authorize the office of temporary and
disability assistance to intercept funds
otherwise due to the districts to provide
the 38.9 percent local share of such
preventive services expenditures (14001) ..... 6,213,000
For services and expenses of the office of
children and family services and local
social services districts for activities
necessary to comply with certain
provisions of the adoption and safe fami-
lies act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter
7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of
the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record
checks for foster care parents, prospec-
tive adoptive parents, and adult household
members. Funds appropriated herein shall
be made available in accordance with a
plan to be developed by the commissioner
of the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of
the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the following appropri-
ation shall be net of refunds, rebates,
reimbursements and credits. Funds appro-
priated herein shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of one-half of the
non-federal share of the national and
state fees for fingerprinting foster care
parents, prospective adoptive parents, and
other adult household members. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of
law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws
of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of
2006, local social services districts
shall reimburse the commissioner of the
office of children and family services for
an amount equal to 53.94 percent of the
non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the
laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws
of 2006, the commissioner of the office of
children and family services shall, on
behalf of local social services districts,

431 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state
and national criminal record checks and
any other related costs. The commissioner
shall ensure expenditures made pursuant to
this provision reflect appropriate federal
and local shares. The commissioner of the
office of children and family services
shall request that the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance reimburse the commissioner of the
office of children and family services in
an amount equal to 53.94 percent of the
nonfederal share of such payments provided
that such reimbursement in payments
reflects actual expenditures made on
behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of
such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of the social services law or the state
finance law, the commissioner shall, on a
quarterly basis, request that the commis-
sioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and
family services in an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of
such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur
on or before the one hundred and twentieth
day following the close of the preceding
quarter and shall be charged among
districts based on the number of children
currently placed in foster care in each
local social services district provided
that this methodology is revised quarterly
to reflect most current available data.
Amounts appropriated herein may, subject
to the director of the budget, be inter-
changed or transferred with any other
appropriation of the office of children
and family services or the office of
temporary and disability assistance as
necessary to reimburse the state share of
local social services district costs
appropriated herein (14002) .................. 1,857,000
For services and expenses for the adoption
subsidy program pursuant to title 9 of
article 6 of the social services law.

432 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the liability of the state to
social services districts and the amount
to be distributed or otherwise expended by
the state to reimburse social services
districts pursuant to section 456 of the
social services law shall be 62 percent of
eligible social services district expendi-
tures.
The amount hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of aid heretofore
accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, such funds shall
be available to the office net of disal-
lowances, refunds, reimbursements, and
credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to

433 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest-bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be
available for reimbursement of local
district claims only to the extent that
such claims are submitted within twenty-
four months of the last day of the state
fiscal year in which the expenditures were
incurred, unless waived for good cause by
the commissioner subject to the approval
of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law including, but not limited to, any
chapter of the laws of 2026 which enacts a
targeted inflationary increase for the
state fiscal year beginning on April 1,
2026, the commissioner shall continue to
apply any targeted inflationary increase
in effect on March 31, 2026 for the entire
rate year that began when such targeted
inflationary increase was in effect.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the commissioner shall apply a 2.7
percent targeted inflationary increase for
the rate year that begins on July 1, 2026
for the purposes of establishing rates of
payments, contracts, or any other form of
reimbursement, provided that this shall
not prevent the commissioner from applying
additional trend or staff retention
factors for this program. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law to the contra-
ry, amounts due and owing to a social
services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts
due and owing to the state undersection
529 of the executive law (13917) ........... 246,460,000
For services and expenditures to be made in
accordance with 42 U.S.C. 673(a)(8)(D).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated

434 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
shall be used to provide post-adoption
services, post-guardianship services, and
services to support and sustain positive
permanent outcomes for children who other-
wise might enter into foster care in
accordance with federal requirements.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be increased by transfer or by interchange
with any other appropriation or with any
other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children
and family services if needed to meet
federal requirements and with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall
file such approval with the department of
audit and control and copies thereof with
the chair of the senate finance committee
and the chair of the assembly ways and
means committee. Of the amount appropri-
ated herein, at least $11 million shall be
made available for the home visiting
program (13959) ............................. 30,656,000
For services and expenses for foster care,
adult and child protective services,
preventive and adoption services provided
by Indian tribes pursuant to subdivision 2
of section 39 of the social services law,
after deducting therefrom any federal
funds properly received or to be received.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the
state and the amount to be distributed or
otherwise expended by the state shall be
92 percent of eligible expenditures
(14003) ...................................... 6,000,000
For services and expenses of certain child
fatality review teams approved by the
office of children and family services for
the purposes of investigating and/or
reviewing the death of children (14004) ........ 909,000
For services and expenses of certain local
or regional multidisciplinary child abuse
investigation teams approved by the office
of children and family services for the
purpose of investigating reports of
suspected child abuse or maltreatment and
for new and established child advocacy
centers (14005) ............................. 14,460,000
The money hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of state aid hereto-

435 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements,
and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest-bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of

436 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount hereby appropriated
shall be available for the designated
purposes, less the amount, as certified by
the director of the budget, of any trans-
fers from the general fund to the tobacco
control and insurance initiatives pool
established pursuant to section 2807-v of
the public health law, to reflect the
state savings attributable to this program
resulting from an increase in the federal
medical assistance percentage available to
the state pursuant to the applicable
provisions of the federal social security
act.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be
available for reimbursement of local
district claims only to the extent that
such claims are submitted within twenty-
four months of the last day of the state
fiscal year in which the expenditures were
incurred, unless waived for good cause by
the commissioner subject to the approval
of the director of the budget.
For services and expenses of medical care
for foster children. The amount appropri-
ated herein shall be available for trans-
fer or suballocation to the department of
health for the medical assistance program
for such services and expenses incurred
prior to July 1, 2027 (14006) .............. 160,000,000
For services and expenses, including local
administrative costs, for providing medi-
caid home and community based waiver
services pursuant to subdivision 12 of
section 366 of the social services law.
The amount appropriated herein is subject
to a spending plan approved by the divi-
sion of the budget and may be available
for transfer or suballocation to the
department of health for the medical
assistance program for such services and
expenses incurred prior to July 1, 2021
(13919) ..................................... 73,289,000
The money hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of state aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds

437 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
shall be available to the office net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements,
and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest-bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social
services law or any other law to the

438 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
contrary, the amount appropriated herein,
or such other amount as may be approved by
the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of
50 percent reimbursement after deducting
any federal funds available therefor to
social services districts for amounts
attributable to dormitory authority bill-
ings or approved refinancing of such bill-
ings which result in local social services
districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allo-
cation. In addition, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, a
portion of funds appropriated herein, or
such other amount as may be approved by
the director of the budget, shall be
available for reimbursement related to
payments made by a social services
district to foster care providers subject
to the provisions of section 410-i of the
social services law for expenses directly
related to projects funded through the
housing finance agency for those foster
care providers which also received revised
or supplemental rates from the applicable
regulating agency to accommodate the hous-
ing finance agency payments or the refi-
nancing of previously approved dormitory
authority payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social
services law or any other law to the
contrary, such reimbursement shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of
50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds
available therefor, for those social
services districts' claims in excess of a
social services district's foster care
block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously
approved revised or supplemental rates. In
addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein may also be used for
payments to the dormitory authority of the
state of New York for advisory services
including, but not limited to, site visits
and review of applications, building plans
and cost estimates for voluntary agency
programs for which the office of children

439 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
and family services establishes maximum
state aid rates and for capital projects
for residential institutions for children
seeking financing under paragraph b of
subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the
public authorities law, as amended by
chapter 508 of the laws of 2006. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the
contrary, amounts due and owing to a
social services district under this appro-
priation may be reduced up to such amounts
due and owing to the dormitory authority
of the state of New York by such social
services district for expenses otherwise
reimbursable under this appropriation and
such amounts shall be available for
payment to the dormitory authority of the
state of New York for such amounts due and
owing by such social services district
(13921) ...................................... 6,620,000
For services and expenses of a statewide
youth sports activities and education
grant program for underserved youth under
the age of eighteen years pursuant to a
plan prepared by the office of children
and family services and approved by the
director of the budget (15080) .............. 12,500,000
For payment of state aid for services and
expenses for programs pursuant to section
530 of the executive law for secure and
non-secure detention services provided
from January 1, 2026 to December 31, 2026;
provided, however, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other law to the contra-
ry, the liability of the state and the
amount to be distributed or otherwise
expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be deter-
mined by first calculating the amount of
the expenditure or other liability pursu-
ant to such law after taking into consid-
eration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability
set forth in the state budget for such
year, and then reducing the amount so
calculated by two percent of such amount.
Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to
the amount of the municipality's distrib-
ution. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, allocations shall be based on a

440 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
plan developed by the office of children
and family services and approved by the
director of the budget and shall be based,
in part, on each municipality's history of
detention utilization, youth population
and other factors as determined by the
office. Any portion of a municipality's
distribution not claimed by the munici-
pality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period Janu-
ary 1, 2026 through December 31, 2026 may
be claimed by such municipality to reim-
burse 62 percent of expenditures during
such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not other-
wise reimbursable pursuant to chapter 58
of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the
amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the
cost of care, maintenance and supervision
for youth whose residence is outside the
county providing the services up to the
county's distribution; provided that upon
such reimbursement from this appropri-
ation, the office of children and family
services shall bill, and the home county
of such youth shall reimburse the office
of children and family services, for 51
percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision of such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may
require that such claims and data on
detention use be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format
required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office shall be authorized to promulgate
regulations permitting the office to
impose fiscal sanctions in the event that
the office finds non-compliance with regu-
lations governing secure and non-secure
detention facilities and to establish cost
standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state
finance law and any other provision of law
to the contrary, the director of the budg-
et may, upon the advice of the commission-
er of the office of children and family

441 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services, authorize the transfer or inter-
change of moneys appropriated herein with
any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of chil-
dren and family services except where
transfer or interchange of appropriation
is prohibited or otherwise restricted by
law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
if a social services district fails to
provide reimbursement to the office of
children and family services pursuant to
section 529 of the executive law within 60
days of receiving a bill for services
under such section, or by the date certain
set by such office for providing
reimbursement, whichever is later, the
offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the
state's set-off rights by withholding any
amounts due and owing to such district
under this appropriation, up to such
amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and
transferring such funds to the miscella-
neous special revenue fund youth facility
per diem account - 22186 (13922) ............ 76,160,000
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amount appropriated herein
shall be available to the office of chil-
dren and family services for payment of
the state share of a county's prior years
claim for reimbursement based upon a
subsequent review by the office of actual
expenditures for care, maintenance and
supervision provided to youth in
detention, to address any underpayment of
state aid to the county for services and
expenses for detention in a prior calendar
year (14067) ................................. 9,444,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount appropriated herein
shall be available under the supervision
and treatment services for juveniles
program for 62 percent state reimbursement
to counties and the city of New York for
eligible expenditures for the provision
and administration of eligible supervision
and treatment services for juveniles
programs during the period of October 1,
2026 through September 30, 2027 that have

442 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
been approved by the office of children
and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget;
provided, however, if a municipality is
unable to use all of its allocation for
such program period within the required
time frames, the municipality may apply to
the office of children and family services
for a waiver to permit the municipality to
continue to have the funds available to it
for an additional one-year program period
for eligible expenditures.
Of the amount appropriated herein $3,000,000
shall be directed by municipalities in
their annual supervision and treatment
services for juveniles plan to support
interventions or capacity for youth with
multiple detention admissions or arrests
in any 12-month period, youth alleged to
have engaged in violent behaviors or vehi-
cle-related crimes, youth who leave home
without permission, trafficked youth,
and/or youth at risk of gang recruitment.
Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to
the amount of such municipality's distrib-
ution. A portion of the funds appropriated
herein may be used by the office to enter
into contracts to provide statewide train-
ing and technical assistance and support
to assist programs and municipalities to
effectively implement the supervision and
treatment services for juveniles program
and assess impact. These funds, not to
exceed $500,000 in any program year, shall
be exempt from the required county match-
ing funds.
The office of children and family services
shall not reimburse any claims unless they
are submitted within 12 months of the
calendar quarter in which the claimed
services were delivered. These funds shall
not be used to supplant other state and
local funds (14068) ......................... 11,376,000
For services and expenses related to youth
diversion, prevention, and other youth
justice or support services.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds shall be available only to a
social services district within a city
having a population of one million or

443 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
more. Funds may be used for eligible
costs incurred on or after July 1, 2025.
Funds shall be allocated from this appro-
priation pursuant to a plan approved by
the director of the budget ................. 300,000,000
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive
law or any other law to the contrary, for
reimbursement of 49 percent of approved
capital expenditures for secure juvenile
detention. Such reimbursement shall be in
the form of depreciation of approved capi-
tal costs and interest on bonds, notes or
other indebtedness necessarily undertaken
to finance construction costs. Notwith-
standing any provision of laws to the
contrary, funding for such costs shall be
limited to the amount appropriated herein.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
the office of children and family services
may require that such claims for
reimbursement of capital expenditures be
submitted to the office electronically in
the manner and format required by the
office. Notwithstanding section 51 of the
state finance law and any other provision
of law to the contrary, the director of
the budget may, upon the advice of the
commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange
of moneys appropriated herein with any
other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of chil-
dren and family services (14008) ............ 10,000,000
For eligible services and expenses of youth
development programs as determined by the
office of children and family services.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, a youth development
program shall mean a program designed to
provide community-level services to
promote positive youth development but
shall not include approved runaway
programs or transitional independent
living support programs as such terms are
defined in section 532-a of the executive
law. Each county or a city with a popu-
lation of one million or more, which shall
be known as a municipality, operating a
youth development program approved by the
office of children and family services
shall be eligible for one hundred percent

444 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
state reimbursement of its qualified
expenditures, subject to the amount avail-
able under this appropriation and exclu-
sive of any federal funds made available
therefor, not to exceed the municipality's
distribution of state aid for youth devel-
opment programs. The amount appropriated
herein for youth development programs
shall be distributed by the office of
children and family services to eligible
municipalities that have a comprehensive
plan that has been developed in consulta-
tion with the applicable municipal youth
bureau and approved by the office of chil-
dren and family services. The distribution
of the amount appropriated herein to
eligible municipalities by the office of
children and family services shall be
based on factors as determined by the
office and subject to the approval of the
director of budget; such factors shall
include the number of youth under the age
of twenty-one residing in the municipality
as shown by the last published federal
census certified in the same manner as
provided by section 54 of the state
finance law and may include, but not be
limited to, the percentage of youth living
in poverty within the municipality or such
other factors as provided for in the regu-
lations of the office of children and
family services. Up to fifteen percent of
the youth development funds that a munici-
pality would allocate to an approved local
youth bureau pursuant to an approved
comprehensive plan may be used for admin-
istrative functions performed by such
local youth bureau. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, an
approved local youth bureau that is not
providing, operating, administering or
monitoring youth development programs
shall not receive funding under this
appropriation. The office shall not reim-
burse any claims for youth development
programs unless they are submitted within
twelve months of the calendar quarter in
which the expenditure was made. The office
may require that such claims be submitted
to the office electronically in the manner
and format required by the office. A muni-

445 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
cipality may enter into contracts to
effectuate its youth development program
as approved by the office of children and
family services. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation for youth
development programs until a plan has been
approved by the director of the budget and
a certificate of approval allocating these
funds has been issued by the director of
the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, provisions relating to youth
development programs and runaway and home-
less youth services pursuant to part G of
chapter 57 of laws of 2013, as amended by
part M of the chapter 56 of the laws of
2017, shall hereby remain in effect
(13925) ..................................... 21,621,700
For payment of state aid for programs for
the provision of eligible services to
runaway and homeless youth pursuant to a
plan, submitted by an eligible county, or
a city having a population of one million
or more, which shall be known as a munici-
pality, and approved by the office of
children and family services as part of
such municipality's comprehensive plan in
accordance with article 19-H of the execu-
tive law.
Of the amount appropriated herein, the
office of children and family services
shall not reimburse any claims unless they
are submitted within twelve months of the
calendar quarter in which the claimed
service or services were delivered.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may
require that such claims for provision of
services to runaway and homeless youth be
submitted to the office electronically in
the manner and format required by the
office, and the information regarding
outcome based measures that demonstrate
quality of services provided and program
effectiveness be submitted to the office
in a form and manner and at such times as
required by the office. Of the amount
appropriated herein up to $1,000,000 may
be used annually to establish contracts to
provide housing supports and programs to
address emerging needs. No expenditures

446 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
shall be made from this appropriation
until an annual expenditure plan is
approved by the director of the budget and
a certificate of approval allocating these
funds has been issued by the director of
the budget and copies of such certificate
or any amendment thereto filed with the
state comptroller, the chairperson of the
senate finance committee and the chair-
person of the assembly ways and means
committee (14009) ............................ 8,484,000
For services and expenses provided by local
probation departments, for the post-place-
ment care of youth leaving a youth resi-
dential facility and for services and
expenses of the office of children and
family services related to community-based
programs for youth in the care of the
office of children and family services
which may include but not be limited to
multi-systemic therapy, family functional
therapy and/or functional therapeutic
foster care, and electronic monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made
available subject to the approval of an
expenditure plan by the director of the
budget. Funded programs shall submit
information regarding outcome based meas-
ures that demonstrate quality of services
provided and program effectiveness to the
office in a form and manner and at such
times as required by the office (14010) ........ 311,700
Notwithstanding sections 131-u and 459-c of
the social services law or any other law
to the contrary, for reimbursement of 98
percent of 50 percent of eligible expendi-
tures to local social services districts
for the provision and administration of,
after first deducting therefrom any feder-
al funds properly received or to be
received on account thereof: adult protec-
tive services; residential services for
victims of domestic violence not in
receipt of public assistance during the
time the victims were residing in residen-
tial programs for victims of domestic
violence; and nonresidential services for
victims of domestic violence incurred on
or after October 1, 2026 and before Octo-
ber 1, 2027 that are claimed by March 1,
2028.

447 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
The money hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of state aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements,
and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest-bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the

448 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law (14012) ............. 85,500,000
For services and expenses related to a pilot
program, which shall be cost neutral to
participating providers, to provide flexi-
ble, survivor-centered services to indi-
viduals and families who have experienced
domestic violence (15065) .................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of kinship care to
be provided through Permanency Resource
Centers. Such funds shall be awarded
competitively and are available pursuant
to a plan prepared by the office of chil-
dren and family services and approved by
the director of the budget. Such contracts
shall provide for submission of informa-
tion regarding outcome based measures that
demonstrate quality of services provided
and program effectiveness to the office in
a form and manner and at such times as
required by the office (14077) ................. 338,750
For additional services and expenses of
not-for-profit and voluntary agencies
providing support services to the caretak-
er relative of a minor child when such
services are provided to eligible individ-
uals and families. Such funds are avail-
able pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget to
continue or expand existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services,
toward new contracts to continue programs
where the existing contractors are not
satisfactorily performing as determined by
the office of children and family services
and/or to award new contracts through a
competitive process (13947) .................. 1,900,000
For services and expenses related to the
home visiting program. Such funds are to
be available pursuant to a plan prepared
by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of
the budget to continue or expand existing
programs with existing contractors that
are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family

449 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of
children and family services and/or to
award new contracts through a competitive
process. Such contracts shall provide for
submission of information regarding
outcome based measures that demonstrate
quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and
manner and at such times as required by
the office (13928) .......................... 26,282,200
For services and expenses of the William B.
Hoyt memorial children and family trust
fund, for prevention and support service
programs for victims of family violence
pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that
notwithstanding paragraph (a) of subdivi-
sion 2 of section 481-e of the social
services law, such funds shall be awarded
through a competitive process and,
provided further, that notwithstanding
subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available, grants renewed
for subsequent years may be funded at
initial award level. Programs funded
through such trust shall submit informa-
tion regarding outcome based measures that
demonstrate quality of services provided
and program effectiveness to the office in
a form and manner and at such times as
required by the office. Funds appropriated
herein may be transferred to the office of
children and family services miscellaneous
special revenue fund, children and family
trust fund (14015) ............................. 788,000
For services and expenses for supportive
housing for young adults aged 25 years or
younger leaving or having recently left
foster care or who had been in foster care
for more than a year after their 16th
birthday and who are at-risk of street
homelessness or sheltered homelessness
provided under the joint project between
the state and the city of New York, known
as the New York New York III supportive
housing agreement. No expenditure shall be
made until a certificate of allocation has
been approved by the director of the budg-

450 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
et with copies to be filed with the chair-
persons of the senate finance committee
and the assembly ways and means committee.
The amount appropriated herein may be
transferred or otherwise made available to
the city of New York administration for
children's services for services and
expenses related to implementing the
project.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except a chapter of the laws of
2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent targeted
inflationary increase for the period
commencing on April 1, 2026 and ending
March 31, 2027, the commissioner shall not
apply any other inflationary increases,
cost of living type increase, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose
of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimburse-
ment (13929) ................................. 2,533,000
For services and expenses of after-school
programs and technical assistance to
after-school grant recipients. Such funds
are to be available pursuant to a plan
prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget to extend or expand
current advantage after-school or empire
state after-school or learning and enrich-
ment after-school program supports
contracts, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of
children and family services, to award new
contracts through a competitive process,
and/or award allocations to municipalities
to conduct a competitive bid for such
services.
Notwithstanding section 112 and section 163
of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein shall be avail-
able to continue previously awarded empire
state after-school contracts with school
districts pursuant to a plan prepared by
the office of children and family services
and approved by the director of the budget
(60642) .................................... 116,060,000

451 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses to assist foster
care congregate care programs licensed by
the office of children and family services
that meet the definition of an Institution
for Mental Disease under federal law.
Funds shall be made available for, but may
not be limited to, supporting medical
staffing needs, services provided to Medi-
caid-enrolled children placed in a foster
care congregate facility that qualifies as
an institution for mental disease, and
other necessary investments for such
foster care congregate programs. The
amount appropriated herein may be made
available for transfer or suballocation to
the department of health (60588) ............ 17,000,000
For services and expenses of the Catholic
Charities Family and Community Services to
establish, operate, and administrate a
statewide kinship information, education,
program services and referral network
(14013) ........................................ 220,500
For additional services and expenses of the
Catholic Charities Family and Community
Services to establish and operate a state-
wide kinship information and referral
network (15212) ................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Day One Learn-
ing (60616) .................................. 1,800,000
For services and expenses of Hispanic Feder-
ation (60617) ................................ 7,500,000
For services and expenses of TogetherNow
Solutions, Inc. (60608) ..................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of a statewide
youth sports grant program. Funding shall
be allocated to municipal youth bureaus to
operate a grant program for eligible not-
for-profit or community-based organiza-
tions that provide team sports programming
to underserved youth under the age of
eighteen years. Youth Bureaus shall under-
take efforts to provide notice to such
organizations of the availability of grant
funds. No grant awarded under this program
shall exceed $50,000. Allowable expenses
shall include, but not be limited to:
purchase of equipment or uniforms, acqui-
sition or rental of facility or field
space, staffing, referees and coaches, and
educational programming. OCFS shall
publish as part of its annual report: the

452 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
number of children and youth served by the
program by municipality, the identities of
the eligible organizations receiving
funds, and the sums awarded to each eligi-
ble organization (60648) .................... 10,000,000
For services and expenses related to the
settlement house program. Funded programs
shall submit information regarding
outcome-based measures that demonstrate
quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and
manner and at such times as required by
the office (14017) ........................... 4,000,000
For services and expenses of Afikim Founda-
tion (60549) ................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Auschwitz
Jewish Center Foundation ....................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Afro Latin Jazz
Alliance (60593) ............................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Astor Services
for Children and Families (60501) .............. 200,000
For services and expenses of Bangladeshi
Society ......................................... 20,000
For services and expenses of Beraca Communi-
ty Development Corporation (60619) ............. 100,000
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin
Community Development Corporation (60551) ...... 200,000
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls
Club of New York (60649) ....................... 500,000
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls
Club of Northern Westchester (60621) ........... 280,000
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls
Club of Western New York (60595) ............... 400,000
For services and expenses of BRAATA
Productions Corp. (60594) ...................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Brooklyn
Ballers Sports Youth and Educational
Corporation (60650) ............................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Commu-
nity Services (60622) .......................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Catholic Chari-
ties Community Services Archdiocese of New
York - Victory for Life (60651) ................. 35,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Advocacy Support and Transformation
(60596) ......................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Elder Law and Justice (15251) .................. 125,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Family Representation (15285) .................. 150,000

453 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Chazaq Organ-
ization USA .................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Citizens
Committee NYC (15234) .......................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Commonpoint
Queens (60553) ................................. 500,000
For services and expenses of Connect Center
For Youth (60597) ............................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Cornell ILR
Buffalo Co-Lab (60510) ......................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Council of
Peoples Organization, Inc. (60598) ............. 100,000
For services and expenses of Covenant House
(15116) ........................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Diaspora Commu-
nity Services (60623) .......................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Dominico Ameri-
can Society of Queens, Inc. (15291) ............ 90,000
For services and expenses of Discalced, Inc.
DBA Mark Morris Dance Group ..................... 40,000
For services and expenses of Drive Change ......... 75,000
For services and expenses of Eagle Academy
Foundation (60652) ............................. 300,000
For services and expenses of East Flatbush
Village (15031) ................................ 250,000
For services and expenses of East Flatbush
Village After School (60653) ................... 150,000
For services and expenses of El Centro
Hispano (15069) ................................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Family Justice
Center of Erie County (15032) .................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Fearless! (Safe
Homes of Orange County) (15051) ................. 65,000
For services and expenses of Federation of
Indigenous Nepalese in America .................. 20,000
For services and expenses of Federation of
Protestant Welfare Agencies (FPWA) (60600)
................................................. 75,000
For services and expenses of Fostering Youth
Success Alliance College Initiative
(60624) ......................................... 75,000
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund
(15034) ...................................... 1,600,000
For services and expenses of Fun in the Son
(60557) ......................................... 75,000
For services and expenses of Fund for the
City of New York - Jamaica Bay Rockaway
Conservancy Parks (60558) ....................... 75,000
For services and expenses of Fund for the
City of New York - The New Pride Agenda,
Inc. (15061) ................................... 100,000

454 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Generation
Acceleration .................................... 75,000
For services and expenses of Girls Inc. of
the Greater Capital Region ...................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Good+ Founda-
tion ............................................ 50,000
For services and expenses of Greater Ithaca
Activities Center (60629) ...................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Haitian Ameri-
can Community Center (60626) ................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Haitian Ameri-
can Family of Long Island, Inc (60654) ......... 100,000
For services and expenses of Haitian Ameri-
cans United for Progress (60627) ............... 250,000
For services and expenses of Heartshare St.
Vincent Services (60628) ....................... 500,000
For services and expenses of Help Me Grow
(60601) ........................................ 500,000
For services and expenses of Hidden Gem,
Inc. (60602) ................................... 10,000
For services and expenses of Hispanic Broth-
erhood .......................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Hispanic Feder-
ation (15226) .................................. 200,000
For services and expenses of Hispanic Herit-
age Cultural Institute (60562) ................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Hope Empower-
ment and Development Zone ...................... 200,000
For services and expenses of JCCA (15270) ........ 100,000
For services and expenses of JCC Rockland
(60564) ......................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Jewish Board
(15297) ........................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Juan Pablo
Duarte Foundation (60655) ....................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Junior Achieve-
ment of New York (15263) ....................... 800,000
For services and expenses of Kiryas Joel
Social Services Organization Connect, Inc
(60630) ........................................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Konbit Neg
LaKay Rockland County (60631) .................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Latina Moms
Connect, Inc (60603) ............................ 15,000
For services and expenses of Legacy Volley-
ball Club ...................................... 125,000
For services and expenses of Little Haiti
BK, Inc. (60604) ............................... 350,000
For services and expenses of Long Island
Cares (60566) ................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Metropolitan

455 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
New York Coordinating Council on Jewish
Poverty (60578) ................................ 500,000
For services and expenses of Minkwon Center
for Community Action, Inc. (60568) ............ 100,000
For services and expenses of New Rochelle
Boys and Girls Club (60569) .................... 100,000
For services and expenses of New York State
YMCA Foundation, Inc ......................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of One Stop Rich-
mond Hill Community Center (15269) .............. 20,000
For services and expenses of Pakistani Amer-
ican Society of New York (60514) ................ 10,000
For services and expenses of ParentChild+,
Inc. (60570) ................................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Pauline Walley
Evangelistic Ministries Youth Program
(60636) ......................................... 17,000
For services and expenses of Public School
151 Lyndon B. Johnson After School Program
(60658) ........................................ 250,000
For services and expenses of Public School
889 After School Program (60659) ............... 115,000
For services and expenses of Queens Communi-
ty House (60660) ............................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Rethink Food
USA, Inc ........................................ 50,000
For services and expenses of Riseboro
(60572) ........................................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Roads to
Success Inc .................................... 250,000
For services and expenses of Ruff Ryders to
the Rescue Foundation .......................... 250,000
For services and expenses of Sesame Flyers
(60607) ........................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of South End Chil-
dren's Cafe (60517) ............................. 75,000
For services and expenses of South Shore
Child Guidance Association, Inc. DBA South
Shore Guidance Center .......................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Southside
United HDFC / Los Sures (60518) ................ 100,000
For services and expenses of St. Luke's
Community Food Program (15266) .................. 30,000
For services and expenses of Tantzers ............ 150,000
For services and expenses of The Black
Institute (15280) ............................... 50,000
For services and expenses of The Committee
for Hispanic Children and Families, Inc
(60661) ........................................ 200,000
For services and expenses of The Flatbush
Development Corp (15295) ........................ 50,000

456 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Tri-Community
Youth Agency (60574) ............................ 50,000
For services and expenses of Tri-Community
Youth Agency (60633) ........................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Weeksville
Heritage Center (60662) ........................ 250,000
For services and expenses of West Indian Day
Carnival Association (15268) ................... 300,000
For services and expenses of Westchester
Jewish Community Services (15220) ............... 30,000
For services and expenses of Wiz Kids Books
B4 Basketball Program (60576) ................... 30,000
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater
New York (60500) ............................... 550,000
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater
New York (60609) ............................. 5,000,000
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater
New York - Baychester Health and Wellness ...... 350,000
For services and expenses of Women in Need
Inc. ........................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Young Men's and
Young Women's Hebrew Association (60663) ....... 200,000
For services and expenses of YWCA of Brook-
lyn ............................................ 500,000
For services and expenses associated with
sexually exploited children and youth up
to age 21. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the state's liability
under subdivision 5 of section 447-b of
the social services law shall be limited
to the amount appropriated herein (14055) .... 1,000,000
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or
for contracts with certain municipalities
and/or not-for-profit institutions.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the speaker of the assem-
bly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by
each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved
by a majority vote of all members elected
to the assembly upon a roll call vote
(15068) ..................................... 12,800,500

457 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of a grant program
to incentivize participation in the Dolly
Parton Imagination Library Program. Grants
shall be available on a competitive basis
based on need and children served. Grants
shall be awarded in amounts not to exceed
$50,000, to provide up to fifty percent of
an eligible entity's required matching
funds to participate in the Dolly Parton
Imagination Library Program. Funding shall
be available to libraries, library
systems, non-profits, school districts and
board of cooperative educational services
to participate in the Dolly Parton Imag-
ination Library Program ...................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of 2-1-1 New York,
including funding to qualified regional
collaborators (13931) ........................ 2,800,000
For services and expenses of Association of
New York State Youth Bureaus, Inc. (15021)
................................................ 225,000
For services and expenses of Astor Services
for Children and Families - Bronx (60664) ....... 75,000
For services and expenses of Astor Services
for Children and Families - Ulster and
Dutchess (60665) ............................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls
Club of Harlem (15022) ......................... 175,000
For services and expenses of Chinese-Ameri-
can Planning Council (15027) ................... 250,000
For services and expenses of Common Point
Queens (15029) ................................. 135,000
For services and expenses of Dunleavy
Milbank Community Center ........................ 40,000
For services and expenses of East River
Development Alliance (15055) ................... 500,000
For services and expenses of Empire Justice
Center for immigrant legal services. All
or a portion of this appropriation may be
suballocated to any department, agency, or
public authority ............................... 250,000
For services and expenses of Family Service
Society of Yonkers - Guardianship Program ...... 120,000
For services and expenses of Help Me Grow
New York (60612) ............................... 500,000
For services and expenses of Hispanic Feder-
ation (15131) .................................. 650,000
For services and expenses of Jericho Road
Vive Shelter (60666) ........................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Jewish Child
Care Association JCCA .......................... 100,000

458 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Jewish Communi-
ty Center of Staten Island - Lucille & Jay
Chazanoff Sunrise Day Camp (60667) ............. 500,000
For services and expenses of Legal Services
of the Hudson Valley - Housing and Kinship
Caregiver Services (15040) ..................... 500,000
For services and expenses of Legal Services
of the Hudson Valley - LGBTQ+ Services
(60614) ........................................ 151,667
For services and expenses of Make the Road -
Community Organizing Projects (15045) .......... 350,000
For services and expenses of New Alterna-
tives for Children (13978) ..................... 450,000
For services and expenses for New York State
Alliance of Boys and Girls Club, Inc.
(13983) ...................................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of New York State
YMCA Foundation, Inc. (13957) ............... 1,000,000
For services and expenses for NYPD Youth
Explorers Program (15049) ...................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Partnership
with Children .................................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Shalom Task
Force, Inc. (15143) ........................... 175,000
For services and expenses of Sunrise Day
Camps Association, Inc. ........................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Tri-Community
Youth Agency (15054) ........................... 100,000
For services and expenses of United Jewish
Organizations of Williamsburg (15015) .......... 125,000
For services and expenses of Westchester
County Youth Bureau (15057) .................... 260,000
For services and expenses of White Plains
Youth Bureau - Grandpas United (60611) ......... 200,000
For services and expenses of White Plains
Youth Bureau Grandpas United - Fatherhood
Initiative Pilot (60641) ........................ 50,000
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater
New York (13977) ............................... 250,000
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater
Rochester - Camp Gorham (60668) ................. 75,000
For services and expenses of human services
and veterans community services organiza-
tions. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or trans-
ferred between other agencies, including
the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the department of veterans'
services with the approval of the tempo-
rary president of the senate and the

459 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
director of the budget. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be
allocated only pursuant to an plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the
senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all member selected to
the senate upon a roll call vote (60579) ..... 6,650,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 2,733,678,767
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Social Services Block Grant Account - 25182
For services and expenses for supportive
social services provided pursuant to title
XX of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, the moneys hereby appropriated shall
be apportioned by the office of children
and family services to local social
services districts, to reimburse local
district expenditures for supportive
services and training subject to the
approval of the director of the budget;
provided, however, that reimbursement to
social services districts for eligible
expenditures for services incurred during
a particular federal fiscal year will be
limited to expenditures claimed by March
31 of the following year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
of the funds available herein, including
any funds transferred from the temporary
assistance to needy families block grant
to the title XX block grant, $66,000,000
shall be allocated to social services
districts, solely for reimbursement of
expenditures for the provision and admin-
istration of adult protective services,
residential services for victims of domes-
tic violence who are not in receipt of

460 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
public assistance during the time the
victims were residing in residential
programs for victims of domestic violence,
and nonresidential services for victims of
domestic violence, pursuant to an allo-
cation plan developed by the office and
submitted for approval by the division of
the budget no later than 60 days following
enactment of this chapter, based on each
district's claims for such costs and any
other factors as identified in the allo-
cation plan, adjusted by applicable cost
allocation methodology and net of any
retroactive payments for the 12 month
period ending June 30, 2025 that are
submitted on or before January 2, 2026;
provided, however, that if the office
determines that the total amount of a
social services district's claims for such
services which could be reimbursed from
these funds is less than the amount allo-
cated to the district for such claims, the
office may, subject to approval by the
director of the budget, reallocate the
unused funds to other social services
districts with eligible claims that exceed
their allocation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, of the available funds
appropriated herein, except for funds
transferred to Title XX by social services
districts from their allocation of the
flexible fund for family services, and
except for funds required by this appro-
priation to be expended on adult protec-
tive services, residential services for
victims of domestic violence and training,
shall be solely available for child
welfare services. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary,
funds allocated herein that are available
for child welfare services shall be allo-
cated to social services districts by the
office of children and family services
based on each district's claims for such
costs incurred and any other factor as
identified in the allocation plan.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, of the amount appropri-
ated herein a portion of funds may be set
aside by the office of children and family

461 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services to be utilized by local depart-
ments of social services for eligible
expenditures pursuant to Subtitle B of
Title XX of the Social Security Act,
otherwise known as the Elder Justice Act,
as authorized and funded through the Coro-
navirus Response and Relief Supplement
Appropriations Act of 2021; any such funds
shall be spent and claimed for in a manner
and at such time as directed by the office
of children and family services.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for aid to municipalities and for payments
to the federal government for expenditures
made pursuant to the social services law
and the state plan for individual and
family grant program under the disaster
relief act of 1974.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of state aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of
disallowances, refunds, reimbursements,
and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of

462 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state comptroller or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law (13985) ............ 150,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 150,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Title IV-a, IV-b, IV-e Account - 25175
For services and expenses for the foster
care and adoption assistance program, and
the kinship guardianship assistance
program, including related administrative
expenses, and for services and expenses
for child welfare and family preservation
and family support services provided
pursuant to title IV-a, subparts 1 and 2
of title IV-b and title IV-e of the feder-
al social security act including the
federal share of costs incurred implement-
ing the federal adoption and safe families
act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89); provided,
however, that reimbursement to social
services districts for eligible expendi-
tures for services other than the foster
care and adoption assistance program, and
the kinship guardianship assistance
program incurred during a particular
federal fiscal year will be limited to
expenditures claimed by March 31 of the
following year.

463 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, any adoption incentive
payments received pursuant to section 473A
of the federal social security act shall
be distributed by the office of children
and family services in a manner as deter-
mined by such office for eligible services
and expenditures.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the definition of "abused
child" contained in section 1012 of the
family court act shall be deemed to
include any child whose parent or person
legally responsible for their care permits
or encourages such child engage in any
act, or commits or allows to be committed
against such child any offense, that would
render such child either a victim of "sex
trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms
of trafficking in persons" pursuant to 22
U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L. 106-386, or
any successor federal statute.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner or the state
commissioner of health as due from local
social services districts each month as
their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller
in an interest-bearing account with such
interest accruing to the credit of the
locality in order to ensure the orderly
and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law
pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local
social services district's share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for aid to municipalities and for payments
to the federal government for expenditures
made pursuant to the social services law
and the state plan for individual and

464 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
family grant program under the disaster
relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities. Subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary
and disability assistance and/or suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts'
costs of the above program and may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation or with any other
item or items within the amounts appropri-
ated within the office of children and
family services general fund - local
assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file
such approval with the department of audit
and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred or suballocated to any aid
to localities or state operations appro-
priation of any state department, agency,
or the judiciary (13955) ................... 868,900,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 868,900,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Children and Family Trust Fund Account - 20128
For services and expenses related to the
administration and implementation of
contracts for prevention and support
service programs for victims of family
violence under the William B. Hoyt memori-
al children and family trust fund pursuant

465 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
to article 10-A of the social services
law. Provided, however, that notwithstand-
ing paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of
section 481-e of the social services law,
such funds shall be awarded through a
competitive process and, provided further,
that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such
section, to the extent funds are available
grants renewed for subsequent years may be
funded at initial award level. Funds
appropriated to the children and family
trust fund shall be available for expendi-
ture for such services and expenses herein
(14015) ...................................... 3,459,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 3,459,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Family Preservation and Federal Family Violence Services
Account - 22082
For services and expenses associated with
the home visiting program, the coordinated
children's services initiative, domestic
violence programs and related programs,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget (13911) .......................... 20,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 20,000,000
--------------
NEW YORK STATE COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND PROGRAM ................ 415,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of Helen Keller
Services for the Blind (15230) .................. 65,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ...................... 65,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Rehabilitation Services/Supported Employment Account -
25213

466 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the New
York state commission for the blind
including transfer or suballocation to the
state education department (13953) ............. 350,000
--------------
TRAINING AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ............................. 4,815,800
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For state reimbursement to local social
services districts for training expenses
associated with title IV-a, title IV-e,
title IV-d, title IV-f and title XIX of
the federal social security act or their
successor titles and programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for aid to municipalities and for payments
to the federal government for expenditures
made pursuant to the social services law
and the state plan for individual and
family grant program under the disaster
relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, such funds shall be available
to the office net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be transferred to any other appropriation
and/or suballocated to any other agency
for the purpose of paying local social
services district cost or may be increased
or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or
items within the amounts appropriated
within the office of children and family
services - local assistance account with
the approval of the director of the budget
who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies
thereof with the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee.
The amount appropriated herein, as may be
adjusted by transfer of general fund
moneys for administration of child

467 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
welfare, training and development, public
assistance, and food stamp programs appro-
priated in the office of children and
family services and the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance, shall
constitute total state reimbursement for
all local training programs in state
fiscal year 2026-27 (13984) .................. 4,815,800
--------------

468 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
CHILD CARE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a program to increase participation of
afterschool, daycare, or other out-of-school care providers who are
eligible to participate in the child and adult care food program.
Methods of increasing participation shall include but not be limited
to outreach and technical assistance provided that such funds shall
be awarded to nonprofit organizations through a competitive process
and provided further that such funds may be transferred or suballo-
cated to any state agency to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation (13926) ... 250,000 ........................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
provide professional development to child care providers including
but not necessarily limited to licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legally-exempt providers located
in the city of New York, to meet existing training requirements and
to enhance the development of such providers (14033) ...............
1,433,000 ......................................... (re. $1,433,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
establish and operate a quality grant program for child care provid-
ers which may include licensed group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers and legally-exempt provid-
ers located in the city of New York (14052) ........................
1,266,000 ......................................... (re. $1,266,000)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to provide professional development to
child care providers which shall include but not necessarily be
limited to, licensed group family day care home, registered family
day care home and legally-exempt providers located outside the city
of New York, to meet existing training requirements and to enhance
the development of such providers; provided however, that, pursuant
to a request by the civil services association, the funds may be
made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity Resources and Knowledge
Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other administrator designated
by the union to administer and implement the program for the union
(14034) ... 1,750,000 ............................. (re. $1,750,000)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to establish and operate a quality grant
program for licensed group family day care home and registered fami-
ly day care home providers outside the city of New York; provided
however, that, pursuant to a request by the civil services associ-
ation, the funds may be made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity
Resources and Knowledge Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other
administrator designated by the union to administer and implement
the program for the union (14032) ..................................
2,750,000 ......................................... (re. $2,750,000)

469 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of a business navigator program in each of
the ten regional economic development council regions. Funds shall
be used for, but may not be limited to, helping businesses identify
different child care supports for their employees (60582) ..........
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of an employer-supported child care pilot
program which shall serve families with an income between 85 percent
and 100 percent of the state median income in three regions of the
state. Funds may be allocated to contractors for the purposes of
administering the program. Participating employers and families
shall each contribute one third of the cost of care for all families
enrolled into the pilot program (60583) ............................
4,800,000 ......................................... (re. $4,800,000)
For services and expenses of child care support centers to administer
substitute pools for eligible child care providers. The services of
the child care support centers shall be provided to child care
providers at no cost to the providers. Funds may be allocated to
contractors for the purposes of administering the program (60644)
... 2,500,000 ..................................... (re. $2,500,000)
For services and expenses of the early care and learning council to
provide technical assistance and platforms to support administration
of substitute pools by child care support centers. Funds may be
allocated to contractors for technology services, applications, and
software for purposes including the administration, coordination,
and management of the program (60647) ..............................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Worker Education to
provide grants to offset the cost of child care for working families
with incomes up to 400 percent of the federal poverty level who are
ineligible for child care assistance under title 5-C of the social
services law.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be available to the Consortium
for Worker Education to administer and implement such grants in
accordance with the terms of any applicable contract between the
Consortium for Worker Education and the office of children and fami-
ly services. The Consortium for Worker Education shall provide such
grants to eligible working families who live or are employed in,
Manhattan, the Bronx, Brooklyn, Staten Island and Queens. Funding
for such grants shall be limited to the amounts appropriated herein.
Such grants shall be available to episodic workers, provided the
applicant meets all other applicable eligibility criteria. An
"episodic worker" shall be defined as a person who, in a calendar
year, is employed for at least 1,040 hours and has gross annual
earnings from the episodic employment below 400 percent of the
federal poverty level. Such a worker shall not be ineligible to
receive a grant solely because the worker is not employed at the
time of application.
The administrative cost, including the cost of the development of the
evaluation, shall not exceed fifteen percent of the funds available
for the purpose.

470 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The Consortium for Worker Education shall prepare and submit a report
to the office of children and family services, the chairs of the
senate committee on social services, the senate committee on chil-
dren and families, the senate committee on labor, the chairs of the
assembly committee on children and families, the assembly committee
on social services, and the assembly committee on labor. Such
report shall include available information, including but not limit-
ed to: the number of income eligible children of working parents
with income up to 400 percent of the federal poverty level who are
not eligible for child care under title 5-C of the social services
law, the ages of the children served, the factors that parents
considered when searching for child care, the number of families who
receive a child care grant who choose to use such grant for regu-
lated child care, and the number of families who receive a child
care grant who choose to use such grant to receive child care
services provided by a legally exempt provider. Such report shall be
submitted by the program administrator, on or before January 1,
2026, provided that if such report is not received by that date,
reimbursement for administrative costs shall be either reduced or
withheld, and failure of an administrator to submit a timely report
may jeopardize such administrator's program from receiving funding
in future years. The administrator shall submit quarterly reports to
the office of children and family services and the legislature. Each
quarterly report shall provide without benefit of personal identify-
ing information, an aggregate of current enrollment and information
and data collected directly by the administrator of those currently
receiving grants. The office of children and family services and the
department of labor shall provide technical assistance to assist
with administration and timely coordination of the bi-monthly claim-
ing process. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the grant
program established herein may be terminated if the administrator
for such program mismanages such program by engaging in actions
including but not limited to, improper use of funds and failure to
submit claims for reimbursement in a timely fashion (60589) ...
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,999,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law

471 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated, in combination with the money appropriated in federal block
grant, federal day care account, including any funds transferred or
suballocated by the office of temporary and disability assistance
special revenue funds - federal / aid to localities federal health
and human services fund federal temporary assistance to needy fami-
lies block grant funds at the request of local social services
districts and, upon approval of the director of the budget, transfer
of federal temporary assistance for needy families block grant funds
made available from the New York works compliance fund program or
otherwise specifically appropriated therefor, shall constitute the
state block grant for child care. The money hereby appropriated is
to be available to social services districts for child care assist-
ance pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law
and shall be apportioned among the social services districts by the
office according to an allocation plan developed by the office and
submitted to the director of the budget for approval within 60 days
of enactment of the budget. A district's block grant allocation,
including any funds the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance transfers from a district's flexible fund for family services
allocation to the state block grant for child care at the district's
request, for a particular federal fiscal year is available only for
child care assistance expenditures made during that federal fiscal
year and which are claimed by March 31 of the year immediately
following the end of that federal fiscal year. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, any claims for child care assistance made by
a social services district for expenditures made during a particular
federal fiscal year, other than claims made under title XX of the
federal social security act and under the food stamp employment and

472 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
training program, shall be counted against the social services
district's block grant allocation for that federal fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $50,000,000 may be made
available for reimbursement of child care assistance expenditures
exceeding a social service district's block grant allocation for
federal fiscal year 2024-2025 or federal fiscal year 2025-2026,
subject to a plan developed by the office and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, this funding shall be available for social service districts
located outside of a city having a population of one million or
more.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for federal fiscal
year 2024-2025 local districts may receive up to $250,000 or 6.5
percent of their federal fiscal year 2024-2025 allocation, whichever
is greater, to reimburse 100 percent of eligible expenditures
exceeding such district's block grant allocation. Such expenditures
must be claimed by March 31 of the year immediately following the
end of federal fiscal year 2024-2025.
Notwithstanding subdivision 3 of section 410-v of the social services
law or any inconsistent provision of law, any portion of this fund-
ing made available for federal fiscal year 2024-2025 that is not
claimed by such district by March 31 following the end of federal
fiscal year 2024-2025 shall not be added to that social services
district's block grant allocation for the next federal fiscal year
and any funds not claimed by a district under this paragraph may be
reallocated to another district for additional eligible federal
fiscal year 2024-2025 expenditures if another district has demon-
strated the need for supplemental funding in excess of the maximum
amount otherwise set forth by this paragraph.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for federal fiscal
year 2025-2026 any funds not claimed by a district by March 31
following the end of the federal fiscal year 2024-2025 may be allo-
cated pursuant to a plan developed by the office and approved by the
director of the budget to reimburse 100 percent of eligible expendi-
tures exceeding such district's block grant allocation. Such expend-
itures must be claimed by March 31 of the year immediately following
the end of federal fiscal year 2025-2026.
Notwithstanding subdivision 3 of section 410-v of the social services
law or any inconsistent provision of law, any portion of this fund-
ing made available for federal fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not be
added to that social service district's block grant allocation for

473 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the next federal fiscal year and any funds not claimed by a district
under this paragraph may be reallocated to another district for
additional eligible federal fiscal year 2025-2026 expenditures if
another district has demonstrated the need for supplemental funding
in excess of the maximum amount otherwise set forth by this para-
graph.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $350,000,000 may be made
available for reimbursement of child care assistance expenditures
exceeding a district's block grant allocation and additional supple-
mental funds for federal fiscal years 2024-2025 and 2025-2026,
subject to a plan developed by the office and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, priority shall be given to a social services district located
within a city having a population of one million or more.
Provided, however, and notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
a city having a population of one million or more may request up to
$100,000,000 of this appropriation to fund any other cost incurred
by such city in support of children. Such a request shall be made by
the budget director of the city of New York to the director of the
budget and shall include an allocation plan on the usage of these
funds. Upon approval by the director of the budget, a payment to
such city may be made up to the amount so requested. If such payment
is made, such city shall provide a report to the director of the
budget on the use of such funds on or before December 31, 2026. Such
payment shall commensurately reduce the amount available for child
care assistance expenditures pursuant to this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, up to
$100,000,000 or an amount approved by the director of the budget may
be transferred or suballocated to any state department or agency for
the purpose of processing such payment.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, this funding shall
be made available to supplement a district's block grant allocation
as necessary to reimburse no more than fifty percent of eligible
expenditures exceeding such district's initial block grant allo-
cation and additional supplemental funds for each federal fiscal
year, limited to the amount listed in this paragraph.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds shall be made
available during federal fiscal year 2024-2025 and must be claimed
by March 31 of the year immediately following the end of the federal
fiscal year. Notwithstanding subdivision 3 of section 410-v of the
social services law or any inconsistent provision of law, any
portion of this funding that is not claimed by districts by March 31
following the end of federal fiscal year 2024-2025 shall only be
available to reimburse additional child care assistance expenditures
exceeding any district block grant allocations requirements for
federal fiscal year 2025-2026 (13907) ..............................
1,410,740,000 ................................. (re. $1,410,740,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as amended by chapter
172, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

474 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Insti-
tute to provide grants to offset the cost of child care for working
families with incomes up to 400 percent of the federal poverty level
who are ineligible for child care assistance under title 5-C of the
social services law. The amounts appropriated herein shall be avail-
able to the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute to administer
and implement such grants in accordance with the terms of any appli-
cable contract between the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute
and the office of children and family services. The AFL-CIO Work-
force Development Institute shall provide such grants to eligible
working families who live or are employed in Albany, Erie, Oneida,
Onondaga, Monroe, Rensselaer, Schenectady, Saratoga, and Suffolk
counties, and may provide such grants to eligible families who live
or are employed in any other region of the State of New York,
excluding the city of New York. Funding for such grants shall be
limited to the amounts appropriated herein. Such grants shall be
available to episodic workers, provided the applicant meets all
other applicable eligibility criteria. An "episodic worker" shall be
defined as a person who, in a calendar year, is employed for at
least 1,040 hours and has gross annual earnings from the episodic
employment below 400 percent of the federal poverty level. Such a
worker shall not be ineligible to receive a grant solely because the
worker is not employed at the time of application. The administra-
tive cost, including the cost of the development of the evaluation
shall not exceed fifteen percent of the funds available for the
purpose.
The AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute shall prepare and submit a
report to the office of children and family services, the chairs of
the senate committee on social services, the senate committee on
children and families, the senate committee on labor, the chairs of
the assembly committee on children and families, the assembly
committee on social services, and the assembly committee on labor.
Such report shall include available information, including but not
limited to: the number of income eligible children of working
parents with income up to 400 percent of the federal poverty level
who are not eligible for child care under title 5-C of the social
services law, the ages of the children served, the factors that
parents considered when searching for child care, the number of
families who receive a child care grant who choose to use such grant
for regulated child care, and the number of families who receive a
child care grant who choose to use such grant to receive child care
services provided by a legally exempt provider. Such report shall be
submitted by the program administrator, on or before January 1,
2026, provided that if such report is not received by that date,
reimbursement for administrative costs shall be either reduced or
withheld, and failure of an administrator to submit a timely report
may jeopardize such administrator's program from receiving funding
in future years. The administrator shall submit quarterly reports to
the office of children and family services and the legislature. Each
quarterly report shall provide without benefit of personal identify-
ing information, an aggregate of current enrollment and information

475 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and data collected directly by the administrator of those currently
receiving grants. The office of children and family services and the
department of labor shall provide technical assistance to assist
with administration and timely coordination of the bi-monthly claim-
ing process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the grant program estab-
lished herein may be terminated if the administrator for such
program mismanages such program by engaging in actions including but
not limited to, improper use of funds and failure to submit claims
for reimbursement in a timely fashion (60590) ......................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Worker Education to
operate and support a pilot program to facilitate recruitment and
enrollment of working families living or employed in the city of New
York with incomes up to eighty-five percent of state median income
for child care assistance provided under title 5-C of the social
services law.
The Consortium for Worker Education shall prepare and submit to the
office of children and family services, the chairs of the senate
committee on children and families and the senate committee on
social services, the chair of the assembly committee on children and
families, the chair of the assembly committee on social services,
the chair of the senate committee on labor, and the chair of the
assembly committee on labor, a report on the pilot supported by
appropriate documentation. Such report shall include available
information regarding the pilot program or participants in the pilot
program absent identifying information, including but not limited
to: the number of families contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care assistance, the number of
events participated in, and the number of staff supported by the
grant. Such report shall be submitted by the project administrator,
on or before January 1, 2026, provided that if such report is not
received by such date reimbursement shall be either reduced or with-
held, and failure of the administrator to submit a timely report may
jeopardize such program's funding in future years. The Consortium
for Worker Education shall submit quarterly reports to the office of
children and family services and the legislature. Each quarterly
report must provide without benefit of personal identifying informa-
tion, the number of families contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care assistance, the number of
events participated in, and the number of staff supported by the
grant. The office of children and family services shall provide
technical assistance to the pilot program to assist with project
administration and timely coordination of the quarterly claiming
process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the pilot program estab-
lished herein may be terminated if the administrator for such
program mismanages such program by engaging in actions including but
not limited to, improper use of funds and failure to submit claims
for reimbursement in a timely fashion (60591) ......................
1,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,250,000)

476 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Insti-
tute to operate and support a pilot program to facilitate recruit-
ment and enrollment of working families living or employed in the
state of New York, excluding the city of New York with incomes up to
eighty-five percent of state median income for child care assistance
provided under title 5-C of the social services law. The AFL-CIO
Workforce Development Institute shall prepare and submit to the
office of children and family services, the chairs of the senate
committee on children and families and the senate committee on
social services, the chair of the assembly committee on children and
families, the chair of the assembly committee on social services,
the chair of the senate committee on labor, and the chair of the
assembly committee on labor, a report on the pilot supported by
appropriate documentation. Such report shall include available
information regarding the pilot program or participants in the pilot
program absent identifying information, including but not limited
to: the number of families contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care assistance, the number of
events participated in, and the number of staff supported by the
grant.
Such report shall be submitted by the project administrator, on or
before January 1, 2026, provided that if such report is not received
by such date reimbursement shall be either reduced or withheld, and
failure of the administrator to submit a timely report may jeopard-
ize such program's funding in future years. The AFL-CIO Workforce
Development Institute shall submit quarterly reports to the office
of children and family services and the legislature. Each quarterly
report must provide without benefit of personal identifying informa-
tion, the number of families contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care assistance, the number of
events participated in, and the number of staff supported by the
grant. The office of children and family services shall provide
technical assistance to the pilot program to assist with project
administration and timely coordination of the quarterly claiming
process. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the pilot
program established herein may be terminated if the administrator
for such program mismanages such program by engaging in actions
including but not limited to, improper use of funds and failure to
submit claims for reimbursement in a timely fashion (60592) ...
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food

477 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated, in combination with the money appropriated in federal block
grant, federal day care account, including any funds transferred or
suballocated by the office of temporary and disability assistance
special revenue funds - federal / aid to localities federal health
and human services fund federal temporary assistance to needy fami-
lies block grant funds at the request of local social services
districts and, upon approval of the director of the budget, transfer
of federal temporary assistance for needy families block grant funds
made available from the New York works compliance fund program or
otherwise specifically appropriated therefor, shall constitute the
state block grant for child care. The money hereby appropriated is
to be available to social services districts for child care assist-
ance pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law
and shall be apportioned among the social services districts by the
office according to an allocation plan developed by the office and
submitted to the director of the budget for approval within 60 days
of enactment of the budget. A district's block grant allocation,
including any funds the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance transfers from a district's flexible fund for family services
allocation to the state block grant for child care at the district's
request, for a particular federal fiscal year is available only for
child care assistance expenditures made during that federal fiscal
year and which are claimed by March 31 of the year immediately
following the end of that federal fiscal year. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, any claims for child care assistance made by

478 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
a social services district for expenditures made during a particular
federal fiscal year, other than claims made under title XX of the
federal social security act and under the food stamp employment and
training program, shall be counted against the social services
district's block grant allocation for that federal fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. (13907) ... 997,170,000 ............ (re. $309,592,000)
For services and expenses of a program to increase participation of
afterschool, daycare, or other out-of-school care providers who are
eligible to participate in the child and adult care food program.
Methods of increasing participation shall include but not be limited
to outreach and technical assistance provided that such funds shall
be awarded to nonprofit organizations through a competitive process
and provided further that such funds may be transferred or suballo-
cated to any state agency to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation (13926) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $68,000)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to provide professional development to
child care providers which shall include but not necessarily be
limited to, licensed group family day care home, registered family
day care home and legally-exempt providers located outside the city
of New York, to meet existing training requirements and to enhance
the development of such providers; provided however, that, pursuant
to a request by the civil services association, the funds may be
made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity Resources and Knowledge
Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other administrator designated
by the union to administer and implement the program for the union
(14034) ... 1,750,000 ............................. (re. $1,750,000)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to establish and operate a quality grant
program for licensed group family day care home and registered fami-
ly day care home providers outside the city of New York; provided
however, that, pursuant to a request by the civil services associ-
ation, the funds may be made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity
Resources and Knowledge Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other
administrator designated by the union to administer and implement
the program for the union (14032) ..................................
2,750,000 ......................................... (re. $2,750,000)
For services and expenses of a business navigator program in each of
the ten regional economic development council regions. Funds shall
be used for, but may not be limited to, helping businesses identify
different child care supports for their employees (60582) ..........
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)

479 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of an employer-supported child care pilot
program which shall serve families with an income between 85 percent
and 100 percent of the state median income in three regions of the
state. Funds may be allocated to contractors for the purposes of
administering the program. Participating employers and families
shall each contribute one third of the cost of care for all families
enrolled into the pilot program (60583) ............................
4,800,000 ......................................... (re. $4,800,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Worker Education to
provide grants to offset the cost of child care for working families
with incomes up to 400 percent of the federal poverty level who are
ineligible for child care assistance under Title 5-C of the social
services law. The amounts appropriated herein shall be available to
the Consortium for Worker Education to administer and implement such
grants in accordance with the terms of any applicable contract
between the Consortium for Worker Education and the office of chil-
dren and family services. The Consortium for Worker Education shall
provide such grants to eligible working families who live or are
employed in, Manhattan, the Bronx, Brooklyn, Staten Island and
Queens. Funding for such grants shall be limited to the amounts
appropriated herein.
Such grants shall be available to episodic workers, provided the
applicant meets all other applicable eligibility criteria. An
"episodic worker" shall be defined as a person who, in a calendar
year, is employed for at least 1,040 hours and has gross annual
earnings from the episodic employment below 400 percent of the
federal poverty level. Such a worker shall not be ineligible to
receive a grant solely because the worker is not employed at the
time of application.
The administrative cost, including the cost of the development of the
evaluation, shall not exceed fifteen percent of the funds available
for the purpose.
The Consortium of Worker Education shall prepare and submit a report
to the office of children and family services, the chairs of the
senate committee on social services, the senate committee on chil-
dren and families, the senate committee on labor, the chairs of the
assembly committee on children and families, the assembly committee
on social services, and the assembly committee on labor. Such report
shall include available information, including but not limited to:
the number of income eligible children of working parents with
income up to 400 percent of the state median income who are not
eligible for child care under Title 5-C of the social services law,
the ages of the children served, the factors that parents considered
when searching for child care, the number of families who receive a
child care grant who choose to use such grant for regulated child
care, and the number of families who receive a child care grant who
choose to use such grant to receive child care services provided by
a legally exempt provider. Such report shall be submitted by the
program administrator, on or before January 1, 2025, provided that
if such report is not received by that date, reimbursement for
administrative costs shall be either reduced or withheld, and fail-

480 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ure of an administrator to submit a timely report may jeopardize
such administrator's program from receiving funding in future years.
The administrator shall submit quarterly reports to the office of
children and family services and the legislature. Each quarterly
report shall provide without benefit of personal identifying infor-
mation, an aggregate of current enrollment and information and data
collected directly by the administrator of those currently receiving
grants.
The office of children and family services and the department of labor
shall provide technical assistance to assist with administration and
timely coordination of the bi-monthly claiming process. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law, the grant program established
herein may be terminated if the administrator for such program
mismanages such program by engaging in actions including but not
limited to, improper use of funds and failure to submit claims for
reimbursement in a timely fashion (60589) ..........................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,157,000)
For services and expenses of the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Insti-
tute to provide grants to offset the cost of child care for working
families with incomes up to 400 percent of the federal poverty level
who are ineligible for child care assistance under Title 5-C of the
social services law.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be available to the AFL-CIO
Workforce Development Institute to administer and implement such
grants in accordance with the terms of any applicable contract
between the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute and the office
of children and family services. The AFL-CIO Workforce Development
Institute shall provide such grants to eligible working families who
live or are employed in Albany, Erie, Oneida, Onondaga, Monroe,
Rensselaer, Schenectady, Saratoga, and Suffolk counties, and may
provide such grants to eligible families who live or are employed in
any other region of the State of New York, excluding the city of New
York. Funding for such grants shall be limited to the amounts appro-
priated herein. Such grants shall be available to episodic workers,
provided the applicant meets all other applicable eligibility crite-
ria. An "episodic worker" shall be defined as a person who, in a
calendar year, is employed for at least 1,040 hours and has gross
annual earnings from the episodic employment below 400 percent of
the federal poverty level. Such a worker shall not be ineligible to
receive a grant solely because the worker is not employed at the
time of application.
The administrative cost, including the cost of the development of the
evaluation shall not exceed fifteen percent of the funds available
for the purpose.
The AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute shall prepare and submit a
report to the office of children and family services, the chairs of
the senate committee on social services, the senate committee on
children and families, the senate committee on labor, the chairs of
the assembly committee on children and families, the assembly
committee on social services, and the assembly committee on labor.

481 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Such report shall include available information, including but not
limited to: the number of income eligible children of working
parents with income up to 400 percent of the state median income who
are not eligible for child care under Title 5-C of the social
services law, the ages of the children served, the factors that
parents considered when searching for child care, the number of
families who receive a child care grant who choose to use such grant
for regulated child care, and the number of families who receive a
child care grant who choose to use such grant to receive child care
services provided by a legally exempt provider. Such report shall be
submitted by the program administrator, on or before January 1,
2025, provided that if such report is not received by that date,
reimbursement for administrative costs shall be either reduced or
withheld, and failure of an administrator to submit a timely report
may jeopardize such administrator's program from receiving funding
in future years. The administrator shall submit quarterly reports to
the office of children and family services and the legislature. Each
quarterly report shall provide without benefit of personal identify-
ing information, an aggregate of current enrollment and information
and data collected directly by the administrator of those currently
receiving grants.
The office of children and family services and the department of labor
shall provide technical assistance to assist with administration and
timely coordination of the bi-monthly claiming process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the grant program estab-
lished herein may be terminated if the administrator for such
program mismanages such program by engaging in actions including but
not limited to, improper use of funds and failure to submit claims
for reimbursement in a timely fashion (60590) ......................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,615,000)
For services and expenses of the Consortium for Worker Education to
operate and support a pilot program to facilitate recruitment and
enrollment of working families living or employed in the city of New
York with incomes up to eighty-five percent of state median income
for child care assistance provided under Title 5-C of the social
services law.
The Consortium for Worker Education shall prepare and submit to the
office of children and family services, the chairs of the senate
committee on children and families and the senate committee on
social services, the chair of the assembly committee on children and
families, the chair of the assembly committee on social services,
the chair of the senate committee on labor, and the chair of the
assembly committee on labor, a report on the pilot supported by
appropriate documentation. Such report shall include available
information regarding the pilot program or participants in the pilot
program absent identifying information, including but not limited
to: the number of families contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care assistance, the number of
events participated in, and the number of staff supported by the
grant. Such report shall be submitted by the project administrator,
on or before January 1, 2025, provided that if such report is not

482 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
received by such date reimbursement shall be either reduced or with-
held, and failure of the administrator to submit a timely report may
jeopardize such program's funding in future years. The Consortium
for Worker Education shall submit quarterly reports to the office of
children and family services and the legislature. Each quarterly
report must provide without benefit of personal identifying informa-
tion, the number of families contacted, the number of families
assisted in signing up for child care assistance, the number of
events participated in, and the number of staff supported by the
grant.
The office of children and family services shall provide technical
assistance to the pilot program to assist with project adminis-
tration and timely coordination of the quarterly claiming process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the pilot program estab-
lished herein may be terminated if the administrator for such
program mismanages such program by engaging in actions including but
not limited to, improper use of funds and failure to submit claims
for reimbursement in a timely fashion (60591) ......................
1,250,000 ........................................... (re. $436,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
provide professional development to child care providers including
but not necessarily limited to licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legally-exempt providers located
in the city of New York, to meet existing training requirements and
to enhance the development of such providers (14033) ...............
1,433,000 ......................................... (re. $1,433,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
establish and operate a quality grant program for child care provid-
ers which may include licensed group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers and legally-exempt provid-
ers located in the city of New York (14052) ........................
1,266,000 ......................................... (re. $1,266,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing

483 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated, in combination with the money appropriated in federal block
grant, federal day care account, including any funds transferred or
suballocated by the office of temporary and disability assistance
special revenue funds - federal / aid to localities federal health
and human services fund federal temporary assistance to needy fami-
lies block grant funds at the request of local social services
districts and, upon approval of the director of the budget, transfer
of federal temporary assistance for needy families block grant funds
made available from the New York works compliance fund program or
otherwise specifically appropriated therefor, shall constitute the
state block grant for child care. The money hereby appropriated is
to be available to social services districts for child care assist-
ance pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law
and shall be apportioned among the social services districts by the
office according to an allocation plan developed by the office and
submitted to the director of the budget for approval within 60 days
of enactment of the budget. A district's block grant allocation,
including any funds the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance transfers from a district's flexible fund for family services
allocation to the state block grant for child care at the district's
request, for a particular federal fiscal year is available only for
child care assistance expenditures made during that federal fiscal
year and which are claimed by March 31 of the year immediately
following the end of that federal fiscal year. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, any claims for child care assistance made by
a social services district for expenditures made during a particular
federal fiscal year, other than claims made under title XX of the
federal social security act and under the food stamp employment and
training program, shall be counted against the social services
district's block grant allocation for that federal fiscal year.

484 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year.
Notwithstanding section 410-y of the social services law, the office
shall be authorized to defer, in whole or in part, the requirement
that social services districts shall not be required to maintain the
amount of local funds spent for child care assistance under the
child care block grant at a level equal to or greater than the
amount the district spent for child care assistance during federal
fiscal year nineteen hundred ninety-five under title IV-A of the
federal social security act, the federal child care development
block grant program and the state low income child care program for
FFY 22 and FFY 23; provided, however, if the office defers any
portion of the funds to be maintained for FFY 22 or FFY 23, the
office shall notify the social services district upon deferment of
the subsequent FFY to which the deferred amounts shall be added and
shall direct the district to set aside the deferred amount for such
FFY (13907) ... 459,557,000 ....................... (re. $8,041,000)
For services and expenses of a program to increase participation of
afterschool, daycare, or other out-of-school care providers who are
eligible to participate in the child and adult care food program.
Methods of increasing participation shall include but not be limited
to outreach and technical assistance provided that such funds shall
be awarded to nonprofit organizations through a competitive process
and provided further that such funds may be transferred or suballo-
cated to any state agency to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation (13926) ... 250,000 ........................... (re. $240,000)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to provide professional development to
child care providers which shall include but not necessarily be
limited to, licensed group family day care home, registered family
day care home and legally-exempt providers located outside the city
of New York, to meet existing training requirements and to enhance
the development of such providers; provided however, that, pursuant
to a request by the civil services association, the funds may be
made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity Resources and Knowledge
Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other administrator designated
by the union to administer and implement the program for the union
(14034) ... 1,500,000 ................................. (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to establish and operate a quality grant
program for licensed group family day care home and registered fami-
ly day care home providers outside the city of New York; provided
however, that, pursuant to a request by the civil services associ-

485 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ation, the funds may be made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity
Resources and Knowledge Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other
administrator designated by the union to administer and implement
the program for the union (14032) ..................................
2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $283,000)
For services and expenses of an employer-supported child care pilot
program which shall serve families with an income between 85 percent
and 100 percent of the state median income in three regions of the
state. Funds may be allocated to contractors for the purposes of
administering the program. Participating employers and families
shall each contribute one third of the cost of care for all families
enrolled into the pilot program (60583) ............................
4,800,000 ......................................... (re. $4,800,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
provide professional development to child care providers including
but not necessarily limited to licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legally-exempt providers located
in the city of New York, to meet existing training requirements and
to enhance the development of such providers (14033) ...............
1,312,000 ......................................... (re. $1,312,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
establish and operate a quality grant program for child care provid-
ers which may include licensed group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers and legally-exempt provid-
ers located in the city of New York (14052) ........................
1,090,000 ......................................... (re. $1,090,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of a program to increase participation of
afterschool, daycare, or other out-of-school care providers who are
eligible to participate in the child and adult care food program.
Methods of increasing participation shall include but not be limited
to outreach and technical assistance provided that such funds shall
be awarded to nonprofit organizations through a competitive process
and provided further that such funds may be transferred or suballo-
cated to any state agency to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation (13926) ... 250,000 ............................. (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
provide professional development to child care providers including
but not necessarily limited to licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legally-exempt providers located
in the city of New York, to meet existing training requirements and
to enhance the development of such providers (14033) ...............
1,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,250,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
establish and operate a quality grant program for child care provid-
ers which may include licensed group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers and legally-exempt provid-

486 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ers located in the city of New York (14052) ........................
1,000,200 ......................................... (re. $1,000,200)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to provide professional development to
child care providers which shall include but not necessarily be
limited to, licensed group family day care home, registered family
day care home and legally-exempt providers located outside the city
of New York, to meet existing training requirements and to enhance
the development of such providers; provided however, that, pursuant
to a request by the civil services association, the funds may be
made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity Resources and Knowledge
Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other administrator designated
by the union to administer and implement the program for the union
(14034) ... 750,000 ................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to establish and operate a quality grant
program for licensed group family day care home and registered fami-
ly day care home providers outside the city of New York; provided
however, that, pursuant to a request by the civil services associ-
ation, the funds may be made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity
Resources and Knowledge Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other
administrator designated by the union to administer and implement
the program for the union (14032) ..................................
1,250,000 ........................................... (re. $221,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter
360, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for transfer to the federal health
and human services fund, local assistance account, federal day care
account to operate and support enrollment in the child care facili-
tated enrollment pilot program which expand access to child care
subsidies for working families who live or are employed in Nassau
County with income up to 300 percent of the federal poverty level as
provided to the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute to adminis-
ter and to implement a plan approved by the office of children and
family services. The administrative cost, including the cost of the
development of the evaluation of the pilot program shall not exceed
ten percent of the funds available for the purpose. The remaining
portion of the funds shall be allocated to the office of children
and family services to the local social services district where the
recipient families reside as determined by the project administrator
based on projected need and cost of providing child care subsidies
payment to working families enrolled through the pilot initiative,
provided however the local social services district shall not reim-
burse subsidy payment in excess of the amount the subsidy funding
appropriated herein can support and the applicable local social
services district shall not be required to approve or pay for subsi-
dies not funded herein. Child care subsidies paid on behalf of
eligible families shall be reimbursed at the actual cost of care up
to the applicable market rate for the district in which the child

487 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
care is provided and in accordance with the fee schedule of the
local social services district making the subsidy payment. Up to ten
percent of funds available for this purpose shall be made available
to the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute, or other designated
administrator, to administer and to implement a plan approved by the
office of children and family services for this pilot program. This
administrator shall prepare and submit to the office of children and
family services, the chairs of the senate committee on social
services, the senate committee on children and families, the senate
committee on labor, the chairs of the assembly committee on children
and families, the assembly committee on social services, and the
assembly committee on labor a report on the pilot program with
recommendations. Such report shall include available information
regarding the pilot program or participants in the pilot program,
including but not limited to: the number of income eligible children
of working parents with income greater than 200 percent but at or
less than 300 percent of the federal poverty level, the ages of the
children served by the program, the number of families served by the
program who are in receipt of family assistance, the factors that
parents considered when searching for child care, the factors that
barred the families' access to child care assistance prior to their
enrollment in the facilitated enrollment program, the number of
families who receive a child care subsidy pursuant to this program
who choose to use such subsidy for regulated child care, and the
number of families who receive a child care subsidy pursuant to this
program who choose to use such subsidy to receive child care
services provided by a legally exempt provider. Such report shall be
submitted by the program administrator, on or before November 1,
2022, provided that if such report is not received by November 30,
2022, reimbursement for administrative costs shall be either reduced
or withheld, and failure of an administrator to submit a timely
report may jeopardize such administrator's program from receiving
funding in future years. The administrator for this pilot program
shall submit bimonthly reports to the office of children and family
services, the local social services district, the administration for
children's services, and the legislature. Each bi-monthly report
shall provide without benefit of personal identifying information,
the pilot program's current enrollment level, amount of the child's
subsidy, co-payment levels, and any other information as needed or
required by the office of children and family services. Further, the
office of children and family services shall provide technical
assistance to the pilot program to assist with program adminis-
tration and timely coordination of the bi-monthly claiming process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this pilot program main-
tained herein may be terminated if the administrator for such
program mismanages such program, by engaging in actions including
but not limited to, improper use of funds, providing for child care
subsidies in excess of the amount the subsidy funding appropriated
herein can support, and failing to submit claims for reimbursement
in a timely fashion (60547) ... 1,500,000 ......... (re. $1,500,000)

488 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for transfer to the federal health
and human services fund, local assistance account, federal day care
account to operate and support enrollment in the child care facili-
tated enrollment pilot program which expand access to child care
subsidies for working families who live or are employed in Suffolk
County with income up to 300 percent of the federal poverty level as
provided to the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute to adminis-
ter and to implement a plan approved by the office of children and
family services. The administrative cost, including the cost of the
development of the evaluation of the pilot program shall not exceed
ten percent of the funds available for the purpose. The remaining
portion of the funds shall be allocated to the office of children
and family services to the local social services district where the
recipient families reside as determined by the project administrator
based on projected need and cost of providing child care subsidies
payment to working families enrolled through the pilot initiative,
provided however the local social services district shall not reim-
burse subsidy payment in excess of the amount the subsidy funding
appropriated herein can support and the applicable local social
services district shall not be required to approve or pay for subsi-
dies not funded herein. Child care subsidies paid on behalf of
eligible families shall be reimbursed at the actual cost of care up
to the applicable market rate for the district in which the child
care is provided and in accordance with the fee schedule of the
local social services district making the subsidy payment. Up to ten
percent of funds available for this purpose shall be made available
to the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute, or other designated
administrator, to administer and to implement a plan approved by the
office of children and family services for this pilot program. This
administrator shall prepare and submit to the office of children and
family services, the chairs of the senate committee on social
services, the senate committee on children and families, the senate
committee on labor, the chairs of the assembly committee on children
and families, the assembly committee on social services, and the
assembly committee on labor a report on the pilot program with
recommendations. Such report shall include available information
regarding the pilot program or participants in the pilot program,
including but not limited to: the number of income eligible children
of working parents with income greater than 200 percent but at or
less than 300 percent of the federal poverty level, the ages of the
children served by the program, the number of families served by the
program who are in receipt of family assistance, the factors that
parents considered when searching for child care, the factors that
barred the families' access to child care assistance prior to their
enrollment in the facilitated enrollment program, the number of
families who receive a child care subsidy pursuant to this program
who choose to use such subsidy for regulated child care, and the
number of families who receive a child care subsidy pursuant to this
program who choose to use such subsidy to receive child care
services provided by a legally exempt provider. Such report shall be

489 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
submitted by the program administrator, on or before November 1,
2022, provided that if such report is not received by November 30,
2022, reimbursement for administrative costs shall be either reduced
or withheld, and failure of an administrator to submit a timely
report may jeopardize such administrator's program from receiving
funding in future years. The administrator for this pilot program
shall submit bimonthly reports to the office of children and family
services, the local social services district, the administration for
children's services, and the legislature. Each bi-monthly report
shall provide without benefit of personal identifying information,
the pilot program's current enrollment level, amount of the child's
subsidy, co-payment levels, and any other information as needed or
required by the office of children and family services. Further, the
office of children and family services shall provide technical
assistance to the pilot program to assist with program adminis-
tration and timely coordination of the bi-monthly claiming process.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this pilot program main-
tained herein may be terminated if the administrator for such
program mismanages such program, by engaging in actions including
but not limited to, improper use of funds, providing for child care
subsidies in excess of the amount the subsidy funding appropriated
herein can support, and failing to submit claims for reimbursement
in a timely fashion (60548) ... 1,500,000 ......... (re. $1,478,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
provide professional development to child care providers including
but not necessarily limited to licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legally-exempt providers located
in the city of New York, to meet existing training requirements and
to enhance the development of such providers (14033) ...............
1,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,250,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
establish and operate a quality grant program for child care provid-
ers which may include licensed group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers and legally-exempt provid-
ers located in the city of New York (14052) ........................
1,000,200 ......................................... (re. $1,000,200)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to provide professional development to
child care providers which shall include but not necessarily be
limited to, licensed group family day care home, registered family
day care home and legally-exempt providers located outside the city
of New York, to meet existing training requirements and to enhance
the development of such providers; provided however, that, pursuant
to a request by the civil services association, the funds may be
made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity Resources and Knowledge
Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other administrator designated
by the union to administer and implement the program for the union
(14034) ... 750,000 ................................. (re. $750,000)

490 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of a program to increase participation of
afterschool, daycare, or other out-of-school care providers who are
eligible to participate in the child and adult care food program.
Methods of increasing participation shall include but not be limited
to outreach and technical assistance provided that such funds shall
be awarded to nonprofit organizations through a competitive process
and provided further that such funds may be transferred or suballo-
cated to any state agency to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation (13926) ... 250,000 ............................ (re. $32,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
provide professional development to child care providers including
but not necessarily limited to licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legally-exempt providers located
in the city of New York, to meet existing training requirements and
to enhance the development of such providers (14033) ...............
1,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,250,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
establish and operate a quality grant program for child care provid-
ers which may include licensed group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers and legally-exempt provid-
ers located in the city of New York (14052) ........................
1,000,200 ......................................... (re. $1,000,200)
For services and expenses of the civil service employees association,
Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO to provide professional development to
child care providers which shall include but not necessarily be
limited to, licensed group family day care home, registered family
day care home and legally-exempt providers located outside the city
of New York, to meet existing training requirements and to enhance
the development of such providers; provided however, that, pursuant
to a request by the civil services association, the funds may be
made available to CSEA Workers' Opportunity Resources and Knowledge
Institute (CSEA WORK Institute), or other administrator designated
by the union to administer and implement the program for the union
(14034) ... 750,000 ................................. (re. $750,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
provide professional development to child care providers including
but not necessarily limited to licensed group family day care home,
registered family day care home and legally-exempt providers located
in the city of New York, to meet existing training requirements and
to enhance the development of such providers (14033) ...............
2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $540,000)
For services and expenses of the united federation of teachers to
establish and operate a quality grant program for child care provid-
ers which may include licensed group family day care home providers,
registered family day care home providers and legally-exempt provid-
ers located in the city of New York (14052) ........................
2,000,400 ......................................... (re. $1,622,000)

491 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For additional expenses for the expansion of child care assistance
programs. Funds shall be distributed to social services districts
that agree to use such funds to expand the availability of subsi-
dized child care. Any social services district that accepts such
funding shall certify that it will not use such funds to supplant
other state, federal or local funds for child care subsidies (13900)
... 3,481,000 ........................................ (re. $63,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Day Care Account - 25175
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the child care block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici-
palities, for services and expenses under the child care block grant
which may include, but not be limited to, the activities necessary
to meet the federally required set-aside for infant and toddler
activities and to support the health, safety and quality require-
ments of the Child Care Development Block Grant Reauthorization Act
of 2014, which may include, but not be limited to, increased
inspection, background check, professional development and training
activities and associated systems and administrative costs and for
payments to the federal government for expenditures made pursuant to
the social services law and the state plan for individual and family
grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and
expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the office net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the

492 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds
federal/state operations federal day care account with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and
disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to
localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary
assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of
local social services districts and, upon approval of the director
of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy
families block grant funds made available from the New York works
compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated
therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general
fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for
the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state
block grant for child care.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $576,000,000 of the state
block grant for child care may be used for child care assistance
pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law. The
funds that are to be available to social services districts for
child care assistance shall be apportioned among the social services
districts by the office according to the allocation plan developed
by the office and submitted to the director of the budget for
approval within 60 days of enactment of the budget. A district's
block grant allocation, including any funds the office of temporary
and disability assistance transfers from a district's flexible fund
for family services allocation to the state block grant for child
care at the district's request, for a particular federal fiscal year
is available only for child care assistance expenditures made during
that federal fiscal year and which are claimed by March 31 of the
year immediately following the end of that federal fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any claims for child
care assistance made by a social services district for expenditures
made during a particular federal fiscal year, other than claims made
under title XX of the federal social security act and under the food
stamp employment and training program, shall be counted against the
social services district's block grant allocation for that federal
fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of

493 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. Funds appropriated herein shall be subject to the
amount awarded in federal grant funding.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $25,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
child care resource and referral agencies. Such funds are to be
available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget to
continue existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to not-for-profit organiza-
tions to continue programs where the existing contractors are not
satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of children
and family services and/or to award new contracts to not-for-profit
organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $30,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
legally exempt enrollment agencies located in the city of New York.
Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget to continue existing programs with existing contrac-
tors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the office
of children and family services, to award new contracts to not-for-
profit organizations to continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services and/or to award new contracts
to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $10,700,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation of infant/toddler
resource centers. Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan
prepared by the office of children and family services and approved
by the director of the budget to continue existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services and/or to award
new contracts to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive
process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $29,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care provider training, child
care scholarships education and ongoing professional development.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $25,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of the development and maintenance of
automated systems in support of licensing and oversight of child day
care providers.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $5,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of family child care networks, including

494 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
recruitment and expansion of providers located in child care
deserts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $586,000 may be available
for services and expenses to make awards through a competitive grant
process for start-up expenses and for the promotion of child health
and safety, including equipment and minor renovations.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $300,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the establishment and/or operation of
child care services in the state's courts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible state university
of New York students and quality activities at the state university
of New York including community colleges and state operated campus-
es.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible city university of
New York students and quality activities at the city university of
New York, including community colleges and senior colleges.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $750,000 may be available
for suballocation to the department of agriculture and markets for
services and expenses of child care services provided to children of
migrant workers in programs operated by non-profit organizations
under contract with the department of agriculture and markets to
provide such care.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $130,000 may be available for
services and expenses of conducting a market rate survey (13950) ...
753,637,000 ..................................... (re. $529,214,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the child care block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici-
palities, for services and expenses under the child care block grant
which may include, but not be limited to, the activities necessary
to meet the federally required set-aside for infant and toddler
activities and to support the health, safety and quality require-
ments of the Child Care Development Block Grant Reauthorization Act

495 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of 2014, which may include, but not be limited to, increased
inspection, background check, professional development and training
activities and associated systems and administrative costs and for
payments to the federal government for expenditures made pursuant to
the social services law and the state plan for individual and family
grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and
expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the office net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds
federal/state operations federal day care account with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and
disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to
localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary
assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of
local social services districts and, upon approval of the director
of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy
families block grant funds made available from the New York works
compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated
therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general
fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for
the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state
block grant for child care.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $576,000,000 of the state
block grant for child care may be used for child care assistance
pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law. The
funds that are to be available to social services districts for
child care assistance shall be apportioned among the social services
districts by the office according to the allocation plan developed
by the office and submitted to the director of the budget for
approval within 60 days of enactment of the budget. A district's
block grant allocation, including any funds the office of temporary
and disability assistance transfers from a district's flexible fund
for family services allocation to the state block grant for child
care at the district's request, for a particular federal fiscal year

496 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
is available only for child care assistance expenditures made during
that federal fiscal year and which are claimed by March 31 of the
year immediately following the end of that federal fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any claims for child
care assistance made by a social services district for expenditures
made during a particular federal fiscal year, other than claims made
under title XX of the federal social security act and under the food
stamp employment and training program, shall be counted against the
social services district's block grant allocation for that federal
fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. Funds appropriated herein shall be subject to the
amount awarded in federal grant funding.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $25,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
child care resource and referral agencies. Such funds are to be
available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget to
continue existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to not-for-profit organiza-
tions to continue programs where the existing contractors are not
satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of children
and family services and/or to award new contracts to not-for-profit
organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $30,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
legally exempt enrollment agencies located in the city of New York.
Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget to continue existing programs with existing contrac-
tors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the office
of children and family services, to award new contracts to not-for-
profit organizations to continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services and/or to award new contracts
to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $10,700,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation of infant/toddler
resource centers. Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan
prepared by the office of children and family services and approved
by the director of the budget to continue existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-

497 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
mined by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services and/or to award
new contracts to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive
process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $9,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care provider training.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $20,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care scholarships education and
ongoing professional development.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $9,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of the development and maintenance of
automated systems in support of licensing and oversight of child day
care providers.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $5,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of family child care networks, including
recruitment and expansion of providers located in child care
deserts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $586,000 may be available
for services and expenses to make awards through a competitive grant
process for start-up expenses and for the promotion of child health
and safety, including equipment and minor renovations.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $300,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the establishment and/or operation of
child care services in the state's courts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible state university
of New York students and quality activities at the state university
of New York including community colleges and state operated campus-
es.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible city university of
New York students and quality activities at the city university of
New York, including community colleges and senior colleges.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $750,000 may be available
for suballocation to the department of agriculture and markets for
services and expenses of child care services provided to children of
migrant workers in programs operated by non-profit organizations
under contract with the department of agriculture and markets to
provide such care.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $130,000 may be available for
services and expenses of conducting a market rate survey (13950) ...
753,637,000 ..................................... (re. $249,255,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the child care block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food

498 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici-
palities, for services and expenses under the child care block grant
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and
expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the office net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds
federal/state operations federal day care account with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and
disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to
localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary
assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of
local social services districts and, upon approval of the director
of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy
families block grant funds made available from the New York works
compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated
therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general
fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for
the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state
block grant for child care.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $550,000,000 of the state
block grant for child care may be used for child care assistance

499 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law. The
funds that are to be available to social services districts for
child care assistance shall be apportioned among the social services
districts by the office according to the allocation plan developed
by the office and submitted to the director of the budget for
approval within 60 days of enactment of the budget. A district's
block grant allocation, including any funds the office of temporary
and disability assistance transfers from a district's flexible fund
for family services allocation to the state block grant for child
care at the district's request, for a particular federal fiscal year
is available only for child care assistance expenditures made during
that federal fiscal year and which are claimed by March 31 of the
year immediately following the end of that federal fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any claims for child
care assistance made by a social services district for expenditures
made during a particular federal fiscal year, other than claims made
under title XX of the federal social security act and under the food
stamp employment and training program, shall be counted against the
social services district's block grant allocation for that federal
fiscal year.
Notwithstanding section 410-y of the social services law, the office
shall be authorized to defer, in whole or in part, the requirement
that social services districts shall not be required to maintain the
amount of local funds spent for child care assistance under the
child care block grant at a level equal to or greater than the
amount the district spent for child care assistance during federal
fiscal year nineteen hundred ninety-five under title IV-A of the
federal social security act, the federal child care development
block grant program and the state low income child care program for
FFY 22 and FFY 23; provided, however, if the office defers any
portion of the funds to be maintained for FFY 22 or FFY 23, the
office shall notify the social services district upon deferment of
the subsequent FFY to which the deferred amounts shall be added and
shall direct the district to set aside the deferred amount for such
FFY.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. Funds appropriated herein shall be subject to the
amount awarded in federal grant funding.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $23,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
child care resource and referral agencies. Such funds are to be
available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget to

500 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
continue existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to not-for-profit organiza-
tions to continue programs where the existing contractors are not
satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of children
and family services and/or to award new contracts to not-for-profit
organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $28,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
legally exempt enrollment agencies located in the city of New York.
Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget to continue existing programs with existing contrac-
tors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the office
of children and family services, to award new contracts to not-for-
profit organizations to continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services and/or to award new contracts
to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $7,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation of infant/toddler
resource centers. Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan
prepared by the office of children and family services and approved
by the director of the budget to continue existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services and/or to award
new contracts to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive
process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $8,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care provider training.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $17,413,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care scholarships education and
ongoing professional development.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of the development and maintenance of
automated systems in support of licensing and oversight of child day
care providers.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $586,000 may be available
for services and expenses to make awards through a competitive grant
process for start-up expenses and for the promotion of child health
and safety, including equipment and minor renovations.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $300,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the establishment and/or operation of
child care services in the state's courts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible state university
of New York students and quality activities at the state university

501 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of New York including community colleges and state operated campus-
es.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible city university of
New York students and quality activities at the city university of
New York, including community colleges and senior colleges.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $750,000 may be available
for suballocation to the department of agriculture and markets for
services and expenses of child care services provided to children of
migrant workers in programs operated by non-profit organizations
under contract with the department of agriculture and markets to
provide such care.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $130,000 may be available for
services and expenses of conducting a market rate survey (13950) ...
621,699,000 ...................................... (re. $99,303,000)
To the extent additional federal funds are made available to the state
under the federal child care development fund, up to $80 million
shall be made available for the activities necessary to meet the
federally required set-aside for infant and toddler activities and
to implement the health, safety and quality requirements of the
Child Care Development Block Grant Reauthorization Act of 2014,
which may include, but not be limited to, increased inspection,
background check, professional development and training activities
and associated systems and administrative costs, and may also
include implementing the new market-related payment rates estab-
lished pursuant to a market rate survey that will be effective on or
about April 1, 2022 which may include an increase in the percentile
used to establish such rates; and notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the amount herein appropriated may be transferred
to any other appropriation within the office of children and family
services and/or the office of temporary and disability assistance
and/or suballocated to the office of temporary and disability
assistance for the purpose of paying local social services
districts' costs of the above program and may be increased or
decreased by interchange with any other appropriation or with any
other item or items within the amounts appropriated within the
office of children and family services general fund - local assist-
ance account with the approval of the director of the budget who
shall file such approval with the department of audit and control
and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee (15260)
... 105,938,000 ................................. (re. $105,494,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to the child care block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from

502 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici-
palities, for services and expenses under the child care block grant
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and
expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the office net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds
federal/state operations federal day care account with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and
disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to
localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary
assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of
local social services districts and, upon approval of the director
of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy
families block grant funds made available from the New York works
compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated
therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general
fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for
the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state
block grant for child care.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $450,000,000 of the state
block grant for child care may be used for child care assistance
pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law. The
funds that are to be available to social services districts for

503 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
child care assistance shall be apportioned among the social services
districts by the office according to the allocation plan developed
by the office and submitted to the director of the budget for
approval within 60 days of enactment of the budget. A district's
block grant allocation, including any funds the office of temporary
and disability assistance transfers from a district's flexible fund
for family services allocation to the state block grant for child
care at the district's request, for a particular federal fiscal year
is available only for child care assistance expenditures made during
that federal fiscal year and which are claimed by March 31 of the
year immediately following the end of that federal fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any claims for child care
assistance made by a social services district for expenditures made
during a particular federal fiscal year, other than claims made
under title XX of the federal social security act and under the food
stamp employment and training program, shall be counted against the
social services district's block grant allocation for that federal
fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. Funds appropriated herein shall be subject to the
amount awarded in federal grant funding.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $23,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
child care resource and referral agencies. Such funds are to be
available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget to
continue existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to not-for-profit organiza-
tions to continue programs where the existing contractors are not
satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of children
and family services and/or to award new contracts to not-for-profit
organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $28,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
legally exempt enrollment agencies located in the city of New York.
Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget to continue existing programs with existing contrac-
tors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the office
of children and family services, to award new contracts to not-for-
profit organizations to continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined by the

504 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
office of children and family services and/or to award new contracts
to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $7,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation of infant/toddler
resource centers. Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan
prepared by the office of children and family services and approved
by the director of the budget to continue existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services and/or to award
new contracts to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive
process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $8,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care provider training.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $17,413,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care scholarships education and
ongoing professional development.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of the development and maintenance of
automated systems in support of licensing and oversight of child day
care providers.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $586,000 may be available
for services and expenses to make awards through a competitive grant
process for start-up expenses and for the promotion of child health
and safety, including equipment and minor renovations.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $300,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the establishment and/or operation of
child care services in the state's courts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible state university
of New York students and quality activities at the state university
of New York including community colleges and state operated campus-
es.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible city university of
New York students and quality activities at the city university of
New York, including community colleges and senior colleges.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $750,000 may be available
for suballocation to the department of agriculture and markets for
services and expenses of child care services provided to children of
migrant workers in programs operated by non-profit organizations
under contract with the department of agriculture and markets to
provide such care.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $130,000 may be available for
services and expenses of conducting a market rate survey (13950) ...
521,699,000 ...................................... (re. $66,633,000)
To the extent additional federal funds are made available to the state
under the federal child care development fund, up to $80 million
shall be made available for the activities necessary to meet the

505 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
federally required set-aside for infant and toddler activities and
to implement the health, safety and quality requirements of the
Child Care Development Block Grant Reauthorization Act of 2014,
which may include, but not be limited to, increased inspection,
background check, professional development and training activities
and associated systems and administrative costs; of the amount
appropriated herein, the remainder shall be used to supplement
existing federal, state and local funding to increase access to
child care assistance by low income families which shall include at
least $10 million which shall be distributed to local social
services districts that agree to use such funds to expand the avail-
ability of subsidized child care; and may also include implementing
the new market-related payment rates established pursuant to a
market rate survey that will be effective on or about April 1, 2019
which may include an increase in the percentile used to establish
such rates; and notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
the amount herein appropriated may be transferred to any other
appropriation within the office of children and family services
and/or the office of temporary and disability assistance and/or
suballocated to the office of temporary and disability assistance
for the purpose of paying local social services districts' costs of
the above program and may be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation or with any other item or items within
the amounts appropriated within the office of children and family
services general fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee (15260) ...................................
105,938,000 ..................................... (re. $104,825,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the child care block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici-
palities, for services and expenses under the child care block grant
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made

506 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and
expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the office net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds
federal/state operations federal day care account with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and
disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to
localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary
assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of
local social services districts and, upon approval of the director
of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy
families block grant funds made available from the New York works
compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated
therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general
fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for
the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state
block grant for child care.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $400,000,000 of the state
block grant for child care may be used for child care assistance
pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of the social services law. The
funds that are to be available to social services districts for
child care assistance shall be apportioned among the social services
districts by the office according to the allocation plan developed
by the office and submitted to the director of the budget for
approval within 60 days of enactment of the budget. A district's
block grant allocation, including any funds the office of temporary
and disability assistance transfers from a district's flexible fund
for family services allocation to the state block grant for child
care at the district's request, for a particular federal fiscal year
is available only for child care assistance expenditures made during
that federal fiscal year and which are claimed by March 31 of the
year immediately following the end of that federal fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any claims for child

507 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
care assistance made by a social services district for expenditures
made during a particular federal fiscal year, other than claims made
under title XX of the federal social security act and under the food
stamp employment and training program, shall be counted against the
social services district's block grant allocation for that federal
fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provisions in federal law
and regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. Funds appropriated herein shall be subject to the
amount awarded in federal grant funding.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $23,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
child care resource and referral agencies. Such funds are to be
available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget to
continue existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to not-for-profit organiza-
tions to continue programs where the existing contractors are not
satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of children
and family services and/or to award new contracts to not-for-profit
organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $28,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation and coordination of
legally exempt enrollment agencies located in the city of New York.
Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget to continue existing programs with existing contrac-
tors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the office
of children and family services, to award new contracts to not-for-
profit organizations to continue programs where the existing
contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services and/or to award new contracts
to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $7,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the operation of infant/toddler
resource centers. Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan
prepared by the office of children and family services and approved
by the director of the budget to continue existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts to not-for-profit organizations to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services and/or to award

508 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
new contracts to not-for-profit organizations through a competitive
process.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $8,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care provider training.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $17,413,000 may be available
for services and expenses of child care scholarships education and
ongoing professional development.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,000,000 may be available
for services and expenses of the development and maintenance of
automated systems in support of licensing and oversight of child day
care providers.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $586,000 may be available
for services and expenses to make awards through a competitive grant
process for start-up expenses and for the promotion of child health
and safety, including equipment and minor renovations.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $300,000 may be available
for services and expenses for the establishment and/or operation of
child care services in the state's courts.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible state university
of New York students and quality activities at the state university
of New York including community colleges and state operated campus-
es.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $2,020,000 may be available
for services and expenses of subsidy for eligible city university of
New York students and quality activities at the city university of
New York, including community colleges and senior colleges.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to $750,000 may be available
for suballocation to the department of agriculture and markets for
services and expenses of child care services provided to children of
migrant workers in programs operated by non-profit organizations
under contract with the department of agriculture and markets to
provide such care.
Of the amount appropriated herein, up to $130,000 may be available for
services and expenses of conducting a market rate survey. Provided
however, of the amounts appropriated herein, $200,000,000 shall be
reserved for the expenditure of additional federal funding made
available to recover from public health emergencies (13950) ........
521,699,000 ..................................... (re. $118,600,000)
To the extent additional federal funds are made available to the state
under the federal child care development fund, up to $80 million
shall be made available for the activities necessary to meet the
federally required set-aside for infant and toddler activities and
to implement the health, safety and quality requirements of the
Child Care Development Block Grant Reauthorization Act of 2014,
which may include, but not be limited to, increased inspection,
background check, professional development and training activities
and associated systems and administrative costs; of the amount
appropriated herein, the remainder shall be used to supplement
existing federal, state and local funding to increase access to
child care assistance by low income families which shall include at

509 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
least $10 million which shall be distributed to local social
services districts that agree to use such funds to expand the avail-
ability of subsidized child care; and may also include implementing
the new market-related payment rates established pursuant to a
market rate survey that will be effective on or about April 1, 2019
which may include an increase in the percentile used to establish
such rates; and notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
the amount herein appropriated may be transferred to any other
appropriation within the office of children and family services
and/or the office of temporary and disability assistance and/or
suballocated to the office of temporary and disability assistance
for the purpose of paying local social services districts' costs of
the above program and may be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation or with any other item or items within
the amounts appropriated within the office of children and family
services general fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee (15260) ...................................
105,938,000 ...................................... (re. $74,223,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Environmental Protection Agency Grants Account - 25490
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to lead testing and remediation of
child day care facilities in accordance with the requirements set
forth in the federal water infrastructure improvements for the
nation act (15017) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to lead testing and remediation of
child day care facilities in accordance with the requirements set
forth in the federal water infrastructure improvements for the
nation act (15017) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to lead testing and remediation of
child day care facilities in accordance with the requirements set
forth in the federal water infrastructure improvements for the
nation act (15017) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to lead testing and remediation of
child day care facilities in accordance with the requirements set
forth in the federal water infrastructure improvements for the
nation act (15017) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:

510 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to lead testing and remediation of
child day care facilities in accordance with the requirements set
forth in the federal water infrastructure improvements for the
nation act (15017) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to lead testing and remediation of
child day care facilities in accordance with the requirements set
forth in the federal water infrastructure improvements for the
nation act (15017) ... 5,000,000 .................. (re. $5,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Quality Child Care and Protection Account - 21900
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to administering the "quality child
care and protection act" specifically, the provision of grants to
child day care providers for health and safety purposes, for train-
ing of child day care provider staff and other activities to
increase the availability and/or quality of child care programs. No
expenditure shall be made from this account until an expenditure
plan has been approved by the director of the budget (13950) .......
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to administering the "quality child
care and protection act" specifically, the provision of grants to
child day care providers for health and safety purposes, for train-
ing of child day care provider staff and other activities to
increase the availability and/or quality of child care programs. No
expenditure shall be made from this account until an expenditure
plan has been approved by the director of the budget (13950) .......
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to administering the "quality child
care and protection act" specifically, the provision of grants to
child day care providers for health and safety purposes, for train-
ing of child day care provider staff and other activities to
increase the availability and/or quality of child care programs. No
expenditure shall be made from this account until an expenditure
plan has been approved by the director of the budget (13950) .......
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to administering the "quality child
care and protection act" specifically, the provision of grants to
child day care providers for health and safety purposes, for train-
ing of child day care provider staff and other activities to
increase the availability and/or quality of child care programs. No

511 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
expenditure shall be made from this account until an expenditure
plan has been approved by the director of the budget (13950) .......
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to administering the "quality child
care and protection act" specifically, the provision of grants to
child day care providers for health and safety purposes, for train-
ing of child day care provider staff and other activities to
increase the availability and/or quality of child care programs. No
expenditure shall be made from this account until an expenditure
plan has been approved by the director of the budget (13950) .......
343,000 ............................................. (re. $343,000)
FAMILY AND CHILDREN'S SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein, shall be available under a foster care block grant
for state reimbursement of eligible social services district expend-
itures for the provision and administration of foster care services
including care, maintenance, supervision, and tuition; for super-
vision of foster children placed in federally funded job corps
programs; for care, maintenance, supervision, and tuition for adju-
dicated juvenile delinquents placed in residential programs operated
by authorized agencies and in out-of-state residential programs; for
the provision and administration of the kinship guardian assistance
program including kinship guardianship assistance payments and
payments for non-recurring guardianship expenses and eligible
expenditures associated with local compliance with the federal Fami-
ly First Prevention Services Act (P.L. 115-123); except that,
reimbursement from the amount appropriated herein shall not be
available for tuition expenditures for foster children, including
persons in need of supervision and adjudicated juvenile delinquents,
made by a social services district located within a city having a
population of one million or more.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a portion of the funds are
available to reimburse social services districts for the change in
the maximum state aid rates established by the office of children
and family services for the 2025-26 rate year pursuant to section
398-a of the social services law and sections 4003 and 4405 of the
education law to reflect the continuation of the cost of living
adjustments that became effective April 1, 2008 for payments made to
foster parents and for salary and fringe benefit costs and other
critical nonpersonal services costs for foster care programs as
determined by the office. Social services districts must adjust the
amount of payments made for care provided by congregate care and
foster boarding home programs and to foster parents to reflect the

512 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
cost of living adjustments in the manner specified by the office.
Each authorized agency operating a congregate care or foster board-
ing home program in New York state for which the office sets a maxi-
mum state aid rate pursuant to section 398-a of the social services
law or section 4003 or 4405 of the education law shall submit, at
the time and in a manner to be determined by the office, a written
certification, attesting that the funds received for the continua-
tion of the cost of living adjustment to the maximum state aid rate
that became effective April 1, 2008 for that program will be or were
used solely in accordance with the requirements of the cost of
living adjustment established by the office.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law including, but not
limited to, any chapter of the laws of 2025 which enacts a targeted
inflationary increase for the state fiscal year beginning on April
1, 2025, the commissioner shall continue to apply any cost of living
adjustment increase in effect on March 31, 2025 for the entire rate
year that began when such cost of living adjustment increase was in
effect. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
commissioner shall apply a 2.6 percent targeted inflationary
increase for the rate year that begins on July 1, 2025 for the
purposes of establishing rates of payments, contracts, or any other
form of reimbursement, provided that this shall not prevent the
commissioner from applying additional trend or staff retention
factors for this program.
Within the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement to each
social services district for services identified herein that are
otherwise reimbursable by the state from April 1, 2025 through March
31, 2026 shall be limited to a district allocation, hereinafter
referred to as the district's block grant allocation. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, such block grant allocation shall be
based, in part, on each district's claims for such costs, adjusted
by the applicable cost allocation methodology and net of any retro-
active payments for the 12 month period ending June 30, 2024 that
are submitted on or before January 2, 2025 and, in part, on such
other factors as determined by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget. Any portion of
a social services district's allocation from funds appropriated
herein not claimed by such district during the state fiscal year may
be used by such district for expenditures on preventive services
provided pursuant to section 409-a of the social services law, inde-
pendent living services and aftercare services provided pursuant to
regulations of the department of family assistance, claimed by such
district during the next state fiscal year up to the amount remain-
ing from the district's foster care block grant allocation, provided
however, that any claims for such services during the next state
fiscal year in excess of such amount shall be subject to 62 percent
state reimbursement exclusive of any federal funds made available
for such purposes, in accordance with directives of the department
of family assistance and subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Any claims submitted by a social services district for
reimbursement for a particular state fiscal year for which the

513 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
social services district does not receive state or federal
reimbursement during that state fiscal year may not be claimed
against that district's block grant apportionment for the next state
fiscal year.
The office of children and family services, with the approval of the
director of the budget, may reduce a district's block grant allo-
cation by the state share decrease related to federal retroactive
reimbursement for such foster care services identified herein. The
office, with the approval of the director of the budget, may reduce
a district's block grant allocation by the state share of disallow-
ances or sanctions taken against the district pursuant to the social
services law or federal law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state shall not be
responsible for reimbursing a social services district and a
district shall not seek state reimbursement for any portion of any
state disallowance or sanction taken against the social services
district, or any federal disallowance attributable to final federal
agency decisions or to settlement made, on or after July 1, 1995,
when such disallowance or sanction results from the failure of the
social services district to comply with federal or state require-
ments, including, but not limited to, failure to document eligibil-
ity for federal or state funds in the case record; provided, howev-
er, if the office determines that any federal disallowance for
services provided between January 1, 1999 and May 31, 1999 results
solely from the late enactment of the state legislation implementing
the federal adoption and safe families act, the state shall be sole-
ly responsible for the full amount of the disallowance or sanction;
provided, further, however, this provision shall be deemed to apply
both prospectively and retroactively regardless of whether such
sanctions or disallowances are for services provided or claims made
prior to or after April 1, 2025.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any federal disallowance
resulting from a federal title IV-E eligibility review or audit that
uses extrapolated statistic techniques shall be passed along by the
state to any and all social services districts that the office of
children and family services has determined have not complied with
the title IV-E eligibility requirements or have not taken the neces-
sary actions to ensure compliance with such requirements including,
but not limited to, failing to: assess and fully document all the
criteria and have readily available all the necessary documents to
establish and continue title IV-E eligibility for all title IV-E
eligible children within the required time frames; claim title IV-E
funding only for cases that meet all of the title IV-E eligibility
criteria; and fully implement the social services payment system on
or before April 1, 2005 for all direct and voluntary agency foster
care services.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services shall impose on social services districts any feder-
al disallowance issued against the state as a result of a federal
title IV-E secondary eligibility review regardless of the date the
children may have entered foster care, the date the eligibility or

514 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
payment errors occurred, or the filing date of any federal claims
for reimbursement; provided, however, that the state shall be
responsible for the disallowed costs and expenditures related to the
placement of children in a facility operated by the office of chil-
dren and family services, which shall be determined in the same
manner as the disallowed costs and expenditures for social services
districts other than the city of New York. In order to reimburse the
federal government for the full amount of any disallowance imposed
on the state by the federal administration for children and families
within the timeframes necessary to avoid any potential interest
payments on such amount, the office of children and family services
is authorized to immediately offset funds otherwise due to each
district for a pro rata share of the total disallowed costs based on
the percentage of applicable federal title IV-E claims made by that
district for the relevant time period as compared to the total
applicable statewide title IV-E claims. The amount of the offset
against each district will be adjusted, if necessary, upon
completion of the disallowance allocation process. The final allo-
cation of the amount of any federal disallowance resulting from a
title IV-E secondary eligibility review shall be allocated among the
districts so that each district shall be responsible for the amount
attributable to each of the district's children or cases that are
determined by the federal review to be unallowable. Each district
shall also be responsible for a portion of the federal extrapolated
disallowance amount based on the relative error rate for the
district. The city of New York's error rate will be based on the
federal sample and federal statistics. For all social services
districts other than the city of New York, the error rate will be
based on a review conducted by the district of a sample of children
and/or cases determined by the office of children and family
services and a re-review of a sub-sample by the office of those
children and/or cases determined by the office. The office of chil-
dren and family services will determine what is reasonable in estab-
lishing the size of the sample and sub-sample for each district. The
office of children and family services shall notify each social
services district of the sample of children and/or cases from the
federal audit period that the social services district must review.
Any child or case from the social services district that was
included in the federal sample will automatically be included in the
social services district's review sample and the determination made
at the federal review regarding that child or case will govern for
the purposes of the social services district's review. The social
services district must complete and submit the results of its review
to the office of children and family services within 60 days of
receipt of the sample. The error rate for the district will be based
on the findings of the district's review and the office of children
and family services' re-review. If a social services district does
not complete its review within 60 days of receiving the sample from
the office of children and family services, the office of children
and family services shall assign an error rate to the social
services district based on the relative percentage of the district's

515 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
applicable title IV-E claims for the relevant period as compared to
applicable statewide title IV-E claims for that period and other
circumstances that the office of children and family services may
consider in order to allocate 100 percent of the federal disallow-
ance. The office of children and family services shall apply each
social services district's error rate to the total amount of the
district's applicable title IV-E claims including associated admin-
istrative expenses. The resulting dollar amounts for all of the
social services districts will be summed to derive the total amount
of title IV-E claims deemed to be in error statewide. To establish a
disallowance percentage for each social services district, the
amount of the district's title IV-E claims deemed to be in error
will be divided by the amount of statewide title IV-E claims deemed
to be in error. The resulting disallowance percentage for each
district will be applied to the entire title IV-E extrapolated
disallowance calculated by the federal review to determine the
amount of the extrapolated disallowance for which the district is
responsible. Each district will be credited for the amount already
disallowed for any individual children or cases found to be in error
during the federal review. The exclusive appeal rights for the
review of the amount of the federal disallowance assigned to each
social services district shall be pursuant to article 78 of the
civil practice law and rules; provided, however, that in any such
action all of the social services districts shall be joined as
necessary parties and the venue of any such action shall be in Rens-
selaer county. Any social services district that fails to complete
its sample review in the required time frames shall have no right to
appeal and shall not be a necessary party to any action brought by
another social services district.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs

516 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may, on behalf of social
services districts, make payments to foster boarding homes paid
directly by social services districts by direct deposit or debit
card. Local social services districts shall reimburse the office for
the costs of administering such direct deposit or debit card
payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the office of children and family services
shall, on a quarterly basis, request that the office of temporary
and disability assistance reimburse the office of children and fami-
ly services for the non-federal share of the costs of administering
such direct deposit or debit card payments to capture the local
share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (13997) .....................
414,259,000 ..................................... (re. $207,130,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be made available to reimburse 62 percent of
eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed by
March 31, 2027 for child welfare services which shall include and be
limited to preventive services provided pursuant to section 409-a of
the social services law other than community optional preventive
services, child protective services, independent living services,
after-care services as defined in regulations of the department of
family assistance, and adoption administration and services, other
than adoption subsidies provided pursuant to title 9 of article 6 of
the social services law and regulations of the department of family
assistance incurred on or after October 1, 2025 and before October
1, 2026, or before October 1, 2025 with approval by the director of
the budget, and that are otherwise reimbursable by the state on or
after April 1, 2025, after first deducting therefrom any federal
funds properly received or to be received on account thereof upon
certification by the social services district that it will not be
using these funds to supplant other state and local funds and that
the district will not submit claims for reimbursement under this
appropriation for the same type and level of services that the coun-

517 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ty previously provided and claimed under any contract in existence
on October 1, 2002 as other than child protective, preventive, inde-
pendent living, after care or adoption services or adoption adminis-
tration.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits; provided, however, that notwithstanding
any other provision of law, for a district to receive reimbursement
for such services, the amount of funds that the district expends on
such services from its flexible fund for family services allocation
and any flexible fund for family services funds transferred at the
district's request to the title XX social services block grant must,
to the extent that families are eligible therefore, be equal to or
greater than the district's portion of the $457,322,341 statewide
child welfare threshold amount, which shall be established pursuant
to a formula developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the office of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, selected social services
districts may authorize the office of temporary and disability
assistance to intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the
office of children and family services otherwise due to the
districts under this appropriation and/or under any other general
fund - aid to localities appropriation available to such districts
to suballocate to the office of mental health and subsequently for
suballocation from the office of mental health to the department of
health to use for the 38.9 percent of the non-federal share of the
medical assistance payments for home and community based waiver
services provided in accordance with subdivision 9 of section 366 of
the social services law as authorized by such selected social
services districts which choose to use preventive services funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, social services districts
may authorize the office of temporary and disability assistance to
intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the office of children
and family services otherwise due to the districts under this appro-
priation and/or under any other general fund - aid to localities
appropriation available to such districts to transfer to any miscel-
laneous special revenue fund available to the office of children and
family services to use for the local share of the federal funds
available for education and training vouchers provided in accordance
with section 477 of title IV-E of the social security act as author-
ized by such social services districts which choose to use funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of

518 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments for adoption subsidies by
direct deposit or debit card. Local social services districts shall
reimburse the office for the costs of administering such direct
deposit or debit card payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the office of children and family services
shall, on a quarterly basis, request that the office of temporary
and disability assistance reimburse the office of children and fami-
ly services in an amount equal to 38 percent of the non-federal
share of the costs of administering such direct deposit or debit
card payments to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of children and
family services shall reissue per diem rates, required pursuant to
section 529 of the executive law, for calendar years 2002 through
2009 to remove any adjustments to the costs included in determining
such rates to reflect any changes in federal funding made available
to the office or to local social services districts for such costs
and, provided further, the office shall not include any such adjust-
ments in per diem rates established hereafter.
All reimbursement made by local social services districts for care,
maintenance and supervision under this section shall be paid direct-
ly to the state through the office of children and family services
for deposit into a miscellaneous special revenue fund known as the
youth facility per diem account.

519 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (13998) .....................
900,045,000 ..................................... (re. $826,938,000)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount appropriated
herein shall be available to reimburse for 98 percent of 65 percent
of eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed
by March 31, 2026 for those community preventive services provided
from October 1, 2024 through September 30, 2025 at a cost that does
not exceed the cost that was in effect on October 1, 2008 and that a
social services district can demonstrate had been approved by the
office of children and family services on or before October 1, 2008;
provided, however, that should insufficient funds be available to
provide state reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of such
costs, reimbursement shall be made proportionally to each district
based on the percentage of their total eligible claims to the amount
appropriated; and, provided further, however, that if the amount
appropriated exceeds the amount of funds necessary to reimburse 98
percent of 65 percent of the eligible social services district
expenditures, the office may, to the extent funds are available,
provide reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of eligible
social services district expenditures for new community preventive
services programs approved by the office and only up to the amounts
approved by the office. A local social services district seeking
federal and/or state reimbursement for community preventive services
provided on or after October 1, 2024 must submit claims that sepa-
rately identify the costs of such services in a form and manner and
at such times as are required by the department of family assistance
and that information regarding outcome based measures that demon-
strate quality of services provided and program effectiveness be
submitted to the office of children and family services in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office. Of the
amount appropriated herein, up to $1,000,000 may be used to provide
additional funding to an eligible program or programs with evalu-
ation results that show program effectiveness and demonstrate
private monetary support as determined by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget (13999)
... 12,124,750 ................................... (re. $12,124,750)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for services provided
prior to April 1, 2019 and suballocation to the office of mental
health and subsequently for suballocation from the office of mental
health to the department of health for 94 percent of 65 percent of
the nonfederal share of medical assistance payments for home and
community based waiver services provided in accordance with subdivi-
sion 9 of section 366 of the social services law as authorized by
selected social services districts which choose to use preventive
services funds to support such costs and to authorize the office of
temporary and disability assistance to intercept funds otherwise due
to the districts to provide the 38.9 percent local share of such

520 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
preventive services expenditures (14001) ...........................
6,213,000 ......................................... (re. $6,213,000)
For services and expenses of the office of children and family
services and local social services districts for activities neces-
sary to comply with certain provisions of the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter 7 of the laws of 1999
and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record checks
for foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and adult
household members. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available
in accordance with a plan to be developed by the commissioner of the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
following appropriation shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments and credits. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for
94 percent of 98 percent of one-half of the non-federal share of the
national and state fees for fingerprinting foster care parents,
prospective adoptive parents, and other adult household members.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
chapter 7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006,
local social services districts shall reimburse the commissioner of
the office of children and family services for an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws of
1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006, the commissioner of the
office of children and family services shall, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state and national criminal
record checks and any other related costs. The commissioner shall
ensure expenditures made pursuant to this provision reflect appro-
priate federal and local shares. The commissioner of the office of
children and family services shall request that the commissioner of
the office of temporary and disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and family services in an
amount equal to 53.94 percent of the nonfederal share of such
payments provided that such reimbursement in payments reflects actu-
al expenditures made on behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the commissioner shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the commissioner of the office of
children and family services in an amount equal to 53.94 percent of
the non-federal share of such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur on or before the one
hundred and twentieth day following the close of the preceding quar-
ter and shall be charged among districts based on the number of
children currently placed in foster care in each local social
services district provided that this methodology is revised quarter-
ly to reflect most current available data. Amounts appropriated

521 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
herein may, subject to the director of the budget, be interchanged
or transferred with any other appropriation of the office of chil-
dren and family services or the office of temporary and disability
assistance as necessary to reimburse the state share of local social
services district costs appropriated herein (14002) ................
1,857,000 ......................................... (re. $1,857,000)
For services and expenses for the adoption subsidy program pursuant to
title 9 of article 6 of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the liability of
the state to social services districts and the amount to be distrib-
uted or otherwise expended by the state to reimburse social services
districts pursuant to section 456 of the social services law shall
be 62 percent of eligible social services district expenditures.
The amount hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of aid
heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds shall be
available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, reimburse-
ments, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be available for reimbursement
of local district claims only to the extent that such claims are
submitted within twenty-four months of the last day of the state
fiscal year in which the expenditures were incurred, unless waived

522 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
for good cause by the commissioner subject to the approval of the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law including, but not
limited to, any chapter of the laws of 2025 which enacts a targeted
inflationary increase for the state fiscal year beginning on April
1, 2025, the commissioner shall continue to apply any cost of living
adjustment increase in effect on March 31, 2025 for the entire rate
year that began when such cost of living adjustment increase was in
effect. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
commissioner shall apply a 2.6 percent targeted inflationary
increase for the rate year that begins on July 1, 2025 for the
purposes of establishing rates of payments, contracts, or any other
form of reimbursement, provided that this shall not prevent the
commissioner from applying additional trend or staff retention
factors for this program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (13917) .....................
239,980,000 ..................................... (re. $239,980,000)
For services and expenses for foster care, adult and child protective
services, preventive and adoption services provided by Indian tribes
pursuant to subdivision 2 of section 39 of the social services law,
after deducting therefrom any federal funds properly received or to
be received.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the
liability of the state and the amount to be distributed or otherwise
expended by the state shall be 92 percent of eligible expenditures
(14003) ... 6,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,641,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 909,000 ................................. (re. $909,000)
For services and expenses of certain local or regional multidiscipli-
nary child abuse investigation teams approved by the office of chil-
dren and family services for the purpose of investigating reports of
suspected child abuse or maltreatment and for new and established
child advocacy centers (14005) .....................................
14,460,000 ....................................... (re. $14,460,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other

523 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount hereby
appropriated shall be available for the designated purposes, less
the amount, as certified by the director of the budget, of any
transfers from the general fund to the tobacco control and insurance
initiatives pool established pursuant to section 2807-v of the
public health law, to reflect the state savings attributable to this
program resulting from an increase in the federal medical assistance
percentage available to the state pursuant to the applicable
provisions of the federal social security act.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be available for reimbursement
of local district claims only to the extent that such claims are
submitted within twenty-four months of the last day of the state
fiscal year in which the expenditures were incurred, unless waived
for good cause by the commissioner subject to the approval of the
director of the budget.
For services and expenses of medical care for foster children. The
amount appropriated herein shall be available for transfer or subal-
location to the department of health for the medical assistance
program for such services and expenses incurred prior to July 1,
2026 (14006) ... 119,000,000 ..................... (re. $46,583,000)
For services and expenses, including local administrative costs, for
providing medicaid home and community based waiver services pursuant
to subdivision 12 of section 366 of the social services law. The
amount appropriated herein is subject to a spending plan approved by
the division of the budget and may be available for transfer or
suballocation to the department of health for the medical assistance
program for such services and expenses incurred prior to July 1,
2021 (13919) ... 73,289,000 ...................... (re. $73,289,000)

524 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-

525 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropriation
may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the dormitory
authority of the state of New York by such social services district
for expenses otherwise reimbursable under this appropriation and
such amounts shall be available for payment to the dormitory author-
ity of the state of New York for such amounts due and owing by such
social services district (13921) ...................................
6,620,000 ......................................... (re. $6,620,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports activities and
education grant program for underserved youth under the age of eigh-
teen years pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget (15080)
... 12,500,000 ................................... (re. $12,500,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2025 to December 31,
2025; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history

526 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2025 through December
31, 2025 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and non-secure detention facili-
ties and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account -
22186 (13922) ... 76,160,000 ..................... (re. $76,150,000)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein shall be available to the office of children and
family services for payment of the state share of a county's prior
years claim for reimbursement based upon a subsequent review by the

527 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
office of actual expenditures for care, maintenance and supervision
provided to youth in detention, to address any underpayment of state
aid to the county for services and expenses for detention in a prior
calendar year (14067) ... 9,444,000 ............... (re. $9,444,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of Octo-
ber 1, 2025 through September 30, 2026 that have been approved by
the office of children and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget; provided, however, if a
municipality is unable to use all of its allocation for such program
period within the required time frames, the municipality may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver to permit
the municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for
an additional one-year program period for eligible expenditures.
Of the amount appropriated herein $3,000,000 shall be directed by
municipalities in their annual supervision and treatment services
for juveniles plan to support interventions or capacity for youth
with multiple detention admissions or arrests in any 12-month peri-
od, youth alleged to have engaged in violent behaviors or vehicle-
related crimes, youth who leave home without permission, trafficked
youth, and/or youth at risk of gang recruitment. Within the amounts
appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be limited to the
amount of such municipality's distribution. A portion of the funds
appropriated herein may be used by the office to enter into
contracts to provide statewide training and technical assistance and
support to assist programs and municipalities to effectively imple-
ment the supervision and treatment services for juveniles program
and assess impact. These funds, not to exceed $500,000 in any
program year, shall be exempt from the required county matching
funds.
The office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of the calendar
quarter in which the claimed services were delivered. These funds
shall not be used to supplant other state and local funds (14068)
... 11,376,000 ................................... (re. $11,376,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other

528 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,953,000)
For eligible services and expenses of youth development programs as
determined by the office of children and family services. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the contrary, a youth devel-
opment program shall mean a program designed to provide community-
level services to promote positive youth development but shall not
include approved runaway programs or transitional independent living
support programs as such terms are defined in section 532-a of the
executive law. Each county or a city with a population of one
million or more, which shall be known as a municipality, operating a
youth development program approved by the office of children and
family services shall be eligible for one hundred percent state
reimbursement of its qualified expenditures, subject to the amount
available under this appropriation and exclusive of any federal
funds made available therefor, not to exceed the municipality's
distribution of state aid for youth development programs. The amount
appropriated herein for youth development programs shall be distrib-
uted by the office of children and family services to eligible muni-
cipalities that have a comprehensive plan that has been developed in
consultation with the applicable municipal youth bureau and approved
by the office of children and family services. The distribution of
the amount appropriated herein to eligible municipalities by the
office of children and family services shall be based on factors as
determined by the office and subject to the approval of the director
of budget; such factors shall include the number of youth under the
age of twenty-one residing in the municipality as shown by the last
published federal census certified in the same manner as provided by
section 54 of the state finance law and may include, but not be
limited to, the percentage of youth living in poverty within the
municipality or such other factors as provided for in the regu-
lations of the office of children and family services. Up to fifteen
percent of the youth development funds that a municipality would
allocate to an approved local youth bureau pursuant to an approved
comprehensive plan may be used for administrative functions
performed by such local youth bureau. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, an approved local youth bureau that is not
providing, operating, administering or monitoring youth development
programs shall not receive funding under this appropriation. The
office shall not reimburse any claims for youth development programs
unless they are submitted within twelve months of the calendar quar-
ter in which the expenditure was made. The office may require that
such claims be submitted to the office electronically in the manner
and format required by the office. A municipality may enter into
contracts to effectuate its youth development program as approved by
the office of children and family services. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation for youth development programs until a

529 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
plan has been approved by the director of the budget and a certif-
icate of approval allocating these funds has been issued by the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, provisions
relating to youth development programs and runaway and homeless
youth services pursuant to part G of chapter 57 of laws of 2013, as
amended by part M of the chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, shall here-
by remain in effect (13925) ... 21,621,700 ....... (re. $21,621,700)
For payment of state aid for programs for the provision of eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth pursuant to a plan, submitted
by an eligible county, or a city having a population of one million
or more, which shall be known as a municipality, and approved by the
office of children and family services as part of such munici-
pality's comprehensive plan in accordance with article 19-H of the
executive law.
Of the amount appropriated herein, the office of children and family
services shall not reimburse any claims unless they are submitted
within twelve months of the calendar quarter in which the claimed
service or services were delivered.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims for provision of
services to runaway and homeless youth be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office, and
the information regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate
quality of services provided and program effectiveness be submitted
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. Of the amount appropriated herein up to $1,000,000 may
be used annually to establish contracts to provide housing supports
and programs to address emerging needs. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation until an annual expenditure plan is
approved by the director of the budget and a certificate of approval
allocating these funds has been issued by the director of the budget
and copies of such certificate or any amendment thereto filed with
the state comptroller, the chairperson of the senate finance commit-
tee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee
(14009) ... 8,484,000 ............................. (re. $8,484,000)
For services and expenses provided by local probation departments, for
the post-placement care of youth leaving a youth residential facili-
ty and for services and expenses of the office of children and fami-
ly services related to community-based programs for youth in the
care of the office of children and family services which may include
but not be limited to multi-systemic therapy, family functional
therapy and/or functional therapeutic foster care, and electronic
monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available subject to the
approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14010) ... 311,700 ....... (re. $311,700)

530 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding sections 131-u and 459-c of the social services law or
any other law to the contrary, for reimbursement of 98 percent of 50
percent of eligible expenditures to local social services districts
for the provision and administration of, after first deducting ther-
efrom any federal funds properly received or to be received on
account thereof: adult protective services; residential services for
victims of domestic violence not in receipt of public assistance
during the time the victims were residing in residential programs
for victims of domestic violence; and nonresidential services for
victims of domestic violence incurred on or after October 1, 2025
and before October 1, 2026 that are claimed by March 1, 2027.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law (14012) ... 65,000,000 ....... (re. $65,000,000)
For services and expenses related to a pilot program, which shall be
cost neutral to participating providers, to provide flexible, survi-
vor-centered services to individuals and families who have experi-
enced domestic violence (15065) ....................................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)

531 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of kinship care to be provided through
Permanency Resource Centers. Such funds shall be awarded competi-
tively and are available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (14077) ...
338,750 ............................................. (re. $338,750)
For additional services and expenses of not-for-profit and voluntary
agencies providing support services to the caretaker relative of a
minor child when such services are provided to eligible individuals
and families. Such funds are available pursuant to a plan prepared
by the office of children and family services and approved by the
director of the budget to continue or expand existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, toward new
contracts to continue programs where the existing contractors are
not satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of chil-
dren and family services and/or to award new contracts through a
competitive process (13947) ... 1,900,000 ......... (re. $1,900,000)
For services and expenses of the William B. Hoyt memorial children and
family trust fund, for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph (a)
of subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available, grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Programs funded through such trust
shall submit information regarding outcome based measures that
demonstrate quality of services provided and program effectiveness
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to the
office of children and family services miscellaneous special revenue
fund, children and family trust fund (14015) .......................
788,000 ............................................. (re. $788,000)
For services and expenses for supportive housing for young adults aged
25 years or younger leaving or having recently left foster care or
who had been in foster care for more than a year after their 16th
birthday and who are at-risk of street homelessness or sheltered
homelessness provided under the joint project between the state and
the city of New York, known as the New York New York III supportive
housing agreement. No expenditure shall be made until a certificate
of allocation has been approved by the director of the budget with
copies to be filed with the chairpersons of the senate finance
committee and the assembly ways and means committee. The amount
appropriated herein may be transferred or otherwise made available
to the city of New York administration for children's services for
services and expenses related to implementing the project.

532 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except a chapter of
the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted inflationary
increase for the period commencing on April 1, 2025 and ending March
31, 2026, the commissioner shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increase, inflation factors, or trend
factors for the purpose of establishing rates of payments, contracts
or any other form of reimbursement (13929) .........................
2,466,000 ......................................... (re. $2,466,000)
For additional services and expenses of the after school programs.
Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget to extend or expand current contracts with community
based organizations, to award new contracts to continue programs
where the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as
determined by the office of children and family services and/or to
award new contracts through a competitive process to community based
organizations [(60543)] (60643) ... 2,500,000 ..... (re. $2,500,000)
For services and expenses to assist foster care congregate care
programs licensed by the office of children and family services that
meet the definition of an Institution for Mental Disease under
federal law.
Funds shall be made available for, but may not be limited to, support-
ing medical staffing needs, services provided to Medicaid-enrolled
children placed in a foster care congregate facility that qualifies
as an institution for mental disease, and other necessary invest-
ments for such foster care congregate programs. The amount appropri-
ated herein may be made available for transfer or suballocation to
the department of health (60588) ...................................
17,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Catholic Charities Family and Commu-
nity Services to establish, operate, and administrate a statewide
kinship information, education, program services and referral
network (14013) ... 220,500 ......................... (re. $220,500)
For additional services and expenses of the Catholic Charities Family
and Community Services to establish and operate a statewide kinship
information and referral network (15212) ...........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of a grant program to incentivize partic-
ipation in the Dolly Parton Imagination Library Program. Grants
shall be available on a competitive basis based on need and children
served. Grants shall be awarded in amounts not to exceed $50,000, to
provide up to fifty percent of an eligible entity's required match-
ing funds to participate in the Dolly Parton Imagination Library
Program. Funding shall be available to libraries, library systems,
non-profits, school districts and board of cooperative educational
services to participate in the Dolly Parton Imagination Library
Program (60645) ....................................................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of Day One Learning (60616) ................
1,800,000 ......................................... (re. $1,800,000)

533 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (60617) .............
7,500,000 ......................................... (re. $7,500,000)
For services and expenses of Simon Wiesenthal Center (60618) .........
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports grant program.
Funding shall be allocated to municipal youth bureaus to operate a
grant program for eligible not-for-profit or community-based organ-
izations that provide team sports programming to underserved youth
under the age of eighteen years. Youth Bureaus shall undertake
efforts to provide notice to such organizations of the availability
of grant funds. No grant awarded under this program shall exceed
$50,000. Allowable expenses shall include, but not be limited to:
purchase of equipment or uniforms, acquisition or rental of facility
or field space, staffing, referees and coaches, and educational
programming. OCFS shall publish as part of its annual report: the
number of children and youth served by the program by municipality,
the identities of the eligible organizations receiving funds, and
the sums awarded to each eligible organization (60648) .............
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the settlement house program.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome-based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14017) ..................................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000)
For services and expenses of Afikim Foundation (60549) ...............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Afro Latin Jazz Alliance (60593) ........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
(60501) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Beraca Community Development Corporation
(60619) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (60551) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls Club of New York (60649)
... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls Club of Northern Westches-
ter (60621) ... 140,000 ............................. (re. $140,000)
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls Club of Western New York
(60595) ... 400,000 ................................. (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses of BRAATA Productions Corp. (60594) ........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Ballers Sports Youth and Educa-
tional Corporation (60650) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Community Services (60622) .....
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Catholic Charities Community Services
Archdiocese of New York - Victory for Life (60651) .................
35,000 ............................................... (re. $35,000)

534 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Center for Advocacy Support and Transfor-
mation (60596) ... 50,000 ............................ (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Elder Law and Justice (15251)
... 125,000 ......................................... (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Family Representation (15285)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Children of Promise (60552) .............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee NYC (15234) ..........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Commonpoint Queens (60553) ..............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Connect Center For Youth (60597) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell ILR Buffalo Co-Lab (60510) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Council of Peoples Organization, Inc.
(60598) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Covenant House (15116) ..................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Diaspora Community Services (60623) .....
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Dominico American Society of Queens, Inc.
(15291) ... 90,000 ................................... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Eagle Academy Foundation (60652) ........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of East Flatbush Village (15031) ...........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of East Flatbush Village After School
(60653) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of El Centro Hispano (15069) ...............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Family Justice Center of Erie County
(15032) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Fearless! (Safe Homes of Orange County)
(15051) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $65,000)
For services and expenses of Federation of Protestant Welfare Agencies
(FPWA) (60600) ... 75,000 ............................ (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fostering Youth Success Alliance College
Initiative (60624) ... 75,000 ........................ (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund (15034) ..................
1,600,000 ......................................... (re. $1,600,000)
For services and expenses of Fun in the Son (60557) ..................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fund for the City of New York - Jamaica
Bay Rockaway Conservancy Parks (60558) .............................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fund for the City of New York - The New
Pride Agenda, Inc. (15061) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Greater Ithaca Activities Center (60629)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)

535 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Haitian American Community Center (60626)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Haitian American Family of Long Island,
Inc (60654) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Haitian Americans United for Progress
(60627) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Heartshare St. Vincent Services (60628)
... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Help Me Grow (60601) ....................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Hidden Gem, Inc. (60602) ................
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15226) .............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Heritage Cultural Institute
(60562) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of JCCA (15270) ............................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of JCC Rockland (60564) ....................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Board (15297) ....................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Juan Pablo Duarte Foundation (60655) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Junior Achievement of New York (15263)
... 800,000 ......................................... (re. $800,000)
For services and expenses of Kiryas Joel Social Services Organization
Connect, Inc (60630) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Konbit Neg LaKay Rockland County (60631)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Latina Moms Connect, Inc (60603) ........
15,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Lev Leyeled (60656) .....................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Little Haiti BK, Inc. (60604) ...........
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses of Long Island Cares (60566) ...............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Martin Luther King Multi Purpose Center
(15271) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (60578) ... 500,000 ........... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Minkwon Center for Community Action, Inc.
(60568) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New Rochelle Boys and Girls Club (60569)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New York Center for Afterschool Develop-
ment (60657) ... 280,000 ............................ (re. $280,000)
For services and expenses of One Stop Richmond Hill Community Center
(15269) ... 20,000 ................................... (re. $20,000)

536 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Open Buffalo (60606) ....................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Pakistani American Society of New York
(60514) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of ParentChild+, Inc. (60570) ..............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Pauline Walley Evangelistic Ministries
Youth Program (60636) ... 17,000 ..................... (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of Public School 151 Lyndon B. Johnson After
School Program (60658) ... 250,000 .................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Public School 889 After School Program
(60659) ... 115,000 ................................. (re. $115,000)
For services and expenses of Queens Community House (60660) ..........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of SCO Family Services Madonna Heights
School (60516) ... 50,000 ............................ (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Sesame Flyers (60607) ...................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of South End Children's Cafe (60517) .......
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Southside United HDFC / Los Sures (60518)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of St. Luke's Community Food Program (15266)
... 30,000 ........................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of St. Nicholas Chess 4 Kids, Inc. (15265)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of The Black Institute (15280) .............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of The Committee for Hispanic Children and
Families, Inc (60661) ... 200,000 ................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of The Community Foundation of Herkimer and
Oneida Counties, Inc. (60632) ... 200,000 ........... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of The Flatbush Development Corp (15295) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (60574) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (60633) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Weeksville Heritage Center (60662) ......
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of West Indian Day Carnival Association
(15268) ... 300,000 ................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of West Street Child Care Learning Center
(60669) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester Jewish Community Services
(15220) ... 30,000 ................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Wiz Kids Books B4 Basketball Program
(60576) ... 30,000 ................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater New York (60500) ........
550,000 ............................................. (re. $550,000)

537 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater New York (60609) ........
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of Young Men's and Young Women's Hebrew
Association (60663) ... 200,000 ..................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Young Parents United (60638) ............
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the
assembly and the director of the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in an assembly resolution calling for the
expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to the assembly upon a roll
call vote (15068) ... 6,816,500 ................... (re. $6,767,000)
For services and expenses associated with sexually exploited children
and youth up to age 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the state's liability under subdivision 5 of section 447-b of the
social services law shall be limited to the amount appropriated
herein (14055) ... 1,000,000 ...................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of 2-1-1 New York, including funding to
qualified regional collaborators (13931) ...........................
2,800,000 ......................................... (re. $2,800,000)
For services and expenses of Association of New York State Youth
Bureaus, Inc. (15021) ... 225,000 ................... (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
- Bronx (60664) ... 75,000 ........................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
- Ulster and Dutchess (60665) ... 100,000 ........... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls Club of Harlem (15022) ...
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Chinese-American Planning Council
[(15286)] (15027) ... 250,000 ....................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Common Point Queens (15029) .............
135,000 ............................................. (re. $135,000)
For services and expenses of East River Development Alliance (15055)
... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Help Me Grow New York (60612) ...........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15131) .............
650,000 ............................................. (re. $650,000)
For services and expenses of Jericho Road Vive Shelter (60666) .......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley -
Housing and Kinship Caregiver Services (15040) .....................
400,000 ............................................. (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley -
LGBTQ+ Services (60614) ... 151,667 ................. (re. $151,667)

538 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Lucille & Jay Chazanoff Sunrise Day Camp
(60667) ... 550,000 ................................. (re. $550,000)
For services and expenses of Make the Road - Community Organizing
Projects (15045) ... 250,000 ........................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (D/B/A Met Council) (15255) ..................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New Alternatives for Children (13978) ...
450,000 ............................................. (re. $450,000)
For services and expenses for New York State Alliance of Boys and
Girls Club, Inc. (13983) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of New York State YMCA Foundation, Inc.
(13957) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses for NYPD Youth Explorers Program (15049) ...
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses for Pa'Lante Harlem Inc. (60640) ...........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Shalom Task Force, Inc. (15143) .........
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (15054) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of United Jewish Organizations of Williams-
burg (15015) ... 125,000 ............................ (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Youth Bureau (15057)
260,000 ............................................. (re. $260,000)
For services and expenses of White Plains Youth Bureau - Grandpas
United (60611) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of White Plains Youth Bureau Grandpas United
- Fatherhood Initiative Pilot (60641) ... 50,000 ..... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater New York (13977) ........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of human services and veterans community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other agencies, including the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance and the department of veterans'
services with the approval of the temporary president of the senate
and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to an plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60579) ................
2,828,000 ......................................... (re. $2,828,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as amended by chapter
172, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

539 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater Rochester - Camp Gorham
(60668) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of [TogetherNow] TogetherNow Solutions, Inc.
(60608) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of [Simon Wiesenthal Center (60573)]
Auschwitz Jewish Center Foundation ... 150,000 ...... (re. $150,000)
The appropriations made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025,
as supplemented by interchanges in accordance with the state finance
law, are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenditures to be made in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
673(a)(8)(D).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated shall be used to provide post-adoption services, post-
guardianship services, and services to support and sustain positive
permanent outcomes for children who otherwise might enter into
foster care in accordance with federal requirements.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased by transfer or by interchange with any
other appropriation or with any other item or items within the
amounts appropriated within the office of children and family
services if needed to meet federal requirements and with the
approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly
ways and means committee. Of the amount appropriated herein, at
least $11 million shall be made available for the home visiting
program (13959) ... [30,619,000] 30,637,000 ...... (re. $29,880,000)
For services and expenses related to the home visiting program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to continue or expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing contractors are not satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive proc-
ess. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (13928) ...
[26,274,200] 26,279,000 .......................... (re. $25,851,000)
For services and expenses of after-school programs and technical
assistance to after-school grant recipients. Such funds are to be
available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget to extend
or expand current advantage after-school or empire state after-
school or learning and enrichment after-school program supports

540 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
contracts, to award new contracts to continue programs where the
existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined
by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts through a competitive process, and/or award allocations to
municipalities to conduct a competitive bid for such services.
Notwithstanding section 112 and section 163 of the state finance law
or any provision of law to the contrary, a portion of the funds
appropriated herein shall be available to continue previously
awarded empire state after-school contracts with school districts
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget (60642) ........
[109,740,000] 112,853,000 ....................... (re. $112,758,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be made available to reimburse 62 percent of
eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed by
March 31, 2026 for child welfare services which shall include and be
limited to preventive services provided pursuant to section 409-a of
the social services law other than community optional preventive
services, child protective services, independent living services,
after-care services as defined in regulations of the department of
family assistance, and adoption administration and services, other
than adoption subsidies provided pursuant to title 9 of article 6 of
the social services law and regulations of the department of family
assistance incurred on or after October 1, 2024 and before October
1, 2025 and that are otherwise reimbursable by the state on or after
April 1, 2024, after first deducting therefrom any federal funds
properly received or to be received on account thereof upon certif-
ication by the social services district that it will not be using
these funds to supplant other state and local funds and that the
district will not submit claims for reimbursement under this appro-
priation for the same type and level of services that the county
previously provided and claimed under any contract in existence on
October 1, 2002 as other than child protective, preventive, inde-
pendent living, after care or adoption services or adoption adminis-
tration.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits; provided, however, that notwithstanding
any other provision of law, for a district to receive reimbursement
for such services, the amount of funds that the district expends on
such services from its flexible fund for family services allocation
and any flexible fund for family services funds transferred at the
district's request to the title XX social services block grant must,
to the extent that families are eligible therefore, be equal to or
greater than the district's portion of the $457,322,341 statewide
child welfare threshold amount, which shall be established pursuant
to a formula developed by the office of temporary and disability

541 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
assistance and the office of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, selected social services
districts may authorize the office of temporary and disability
assistance to intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the
office of children and family services otherwise due to the
districts under this appropriation and/or under any other general
fund - aid to localities appropriation available to such districts
to suballocate to the office of mental health and subsequently for
suballocation from the office of mental health to the department of
health to use for the 38.9 percent of the non-federal share of the
medical assistance payments for home and community based waiver
services provided in accordance with subdivision 9 of section 366 of
the social services law as authorized by such selected social
services districts which choose to use preventive services funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, social services districts
may authorize the office of temporary and disability assistance to
intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the office of children
and family services otherwise due to the districts under this appro-
priation and/or under any other general fund - aid to localities
appropriation available to such districts to transfer to any miscel-
laneous special revenue fund available to the office of children and
family services to use for the local share of the federal funds
available for education and training vouchers provided in accordance
with section 477 of title IV-E of the social security act as author-
ized by such social services districts which choose to use funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing

542 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments for adoption subsidies by
direct deposit or debit card. Local social services districts shall
reimburse the office for the costs of administering such direct
deposit or debit card payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the office of children and family services
shall, on a quarterly basis, request that the office of temporary
and disability assistance reimburse the office of children and fami-
ly services in an amount equal to 38 percent of the non-federal
share of the costs of administering such direct deposit or debit
card payments to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of children and
family services shall reissue per diem rates, required pursuant to
section 529 of the executive law, for calendar years 2002 through
2009 to remove any adjustments to the costs included in determining
such rates to reflect any changes in federal funding made available
to the office or to local social services districts for such costs
and, provided further, the office shall not include any such adjust-
ments in per diem rates established hereafter.
All reimbursement made by local social services districts for care,
maintenance and supervision under this section shall be paid direct-
ly to the state through the office of children and family services
for deposit into a miscellaneous special revenue fund known as the
youth facility per diem account.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (13998) .....................
900,045,000 ..................................... (re. $899,998,000)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount appropriated
herein shall be available to reimburse for 98 percent of 65 percent
of eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed
by March 31, 2025 for those community preventive services provided
from October 1, 2023 through September 30, 2024 at a cost that does
not exceed the cost that was in effect on October 1, 2008 and that a
social services district can demonstrate had been approved by the
office of children and family services on or before October 1, 2008;
provided, however, that should insufficient funds be available to
provide state reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of such
costs, reimbursement shall be made proportionally to each district
based on the percentage of their total eligible claims to the amount
appropriated; and, provided further, however, that if the amount
appropriated exceeds the amount of funds necessary to reimburse 98

543 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
percent of 65 percent of the eligible social services district
expenditures, the office may, to the extent funds are available,
provide reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of eligible
social services district expenditures for new community preventive
services programs approved by the office and only up to the amounts
approved by the office. A local social services district seeking
federal and/or state reimbursement for community preventive services
provided on or after October 1, 2023 must submit claims that sepa-
rately identify the costs of such services in a form and manner and
at such times as are required by the department of family assistance
and that information regarding outcome based measures that demon-
strate quality of services provided and program effectiveness be
submitted to the office of children and family services in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office. Of the
amount appropriated herein, up to $1,000,000 may be used to provide
additional funding to an eligible program or programs with evalu-
ation results that show program effectiveness and demonstrate
private monetary support as determined by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget (13999)
... 12,124,750 .................................... (re. $2,230,000)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for services provided
prior to April 1, 2019 and suballocation to the office of mental
health and subsequently for suballocation from the office of mental
health to the department of health for 94 percent of 65 percent of
the nonfederal share of medical assistance payments for home and
community based waiver services provided in accordance with subdivi-
sion 9 of section 366 of the social services law as authorized by
selected social services districts which choose to use preventive
services funds to support such costs and to authorize the office of
temporary and disability assistance to intercept funds otherwise due
to the districts to provide the 38.9 percent local share of such
preventive services expenditures (14001) ...........................
6,213,000 ......................................... (re. $6,213,000)
For services and expenses of the office of children and family
services and local social services districts for activities neces-
sary to comply with certain provisions of the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter 7 of the laws of 1999
and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record checks
for foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and adult
household members. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available
in accordance with a plan to be developed by the commissioner of the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
following appropriation shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments and credits. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for
94 percent of 98 percent of one-half of the non-federal share of the
national and state fees for fingerprinting foster care parents,
prospective adoptive parents, and other adult household members.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
chapter 7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006,

544 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
local social services districts shall reimburse the commissioner of
the office of children and family services for an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws of
1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006, the commissioner of the
office of children and family services shall, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state and national criminal
record checks and any other related costs. The commissioner shall
ensure expenditures made pursuant to this provision reflect appro-
priate federal and local shares. The commissioner of the office of
children and family services shall request that the commissioner of
the office of temporary and disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and family services in an
amount equal to 53.94 percent of the nonfederal share of such
payments provided that such reimbursement in payments reflects actu-
al expenditures made on behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the commissioner shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the commissioner of the office of
children and family services in an amount equal to 53.94 percent of
the non-federal share of such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur on or before the one
hundred and twentieth day following the close of the preceding quar-
ter and shall be charged among districts based on the number of
children currently placed in foster care in each local social
services district provided that this methodology is revised quarter-
ly to reflect most current available data. Amounts appropriated
herein may, subject to the director of the budget, be interchanged
or transferred with any other appropriation of the office of chil-
dren and family services or the office of temporary and disability
assistance as necessary to reimburse the state share of local social
services district costs appropriated herein (14002) ................
1,857,000 ......................................... (re. $1,857,000)
For services and expenses for the adoption subsidy program pursuant to
title 9 of article 6 of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the liability of
the state to social services districts and the amount to be distrib-
uted or otherwise expended by the state to reimburse social services
districts pursuant to section 456 of the social services law shall
be 62 percent of eligible social services district expenditures.
The amount hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of aid
heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds shall be
available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, reimburse-
ments, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within

545 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be available for reimbursement
of local district claims only to the extent that such claims are
submitted within twenty-four months of the last day of the state
fiscal year in which the expenditures were incurred, unless waived
for good cause by the commissioner subject to the approval of the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law including, but not
limited to, any chapter of the laws of 2024 which enacts a cost of
living adjustment for the state fiscal year beginning on April 1,
2024, the commissioner shall continue to apply any cost of living
adjustment increase in effect on March 31, 2024 for the entire rate
year that began when such cost of living adjustment increase was in
effect. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
commissioner shall apply a 2.84 percent cost of living adjustment
for the rate year that begins on July 1, 2024 for the purposes of
establishing rates of payments, contracts, or any other form of
reimbursement, provided that this shall not prevent the commissioner
from applying additional trend or staff retention factors for this
program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (13917) .....................
235,795,000 ...................................... (re. $65,875,000)

546 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of certain local or regional multidiscipli-
nary child abuse investigation teams approved by the office of chil-
dren and family services for the purpose of investigating reports of
suspected child abuse or maltreatment and for new and established
child advocacy centers (14005) .....................................
5,229,900 ......................................... (re. $4,416,000)
For additional services and expenses of child advocacy centers. This
funding is to be distributed to newly established child advocacy
centers and existing child advocacy centers weighted on a three-year
average of client volume (13932) ...................................
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $674,000)
For services and expenses, including local administrative costs, for
providing medicaid home and community based waiver services pursuant
to subdivision 12 of section 366 of the social services law. The
amount appropriated herein is subject to a spending plan approved by
the division of the budget and may be available for transfer or
suballocation to the department of health for the medical assistance
program for such services and expenses incurred prior to July 1,
2021 (13919) ... 73,289,000 ...................... (re. $70,756,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services

547 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropriation
may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the dormitory
authority of the state of New York by such social services district
for expenses otherwise reimbursable under this appropriation and
such amounts shall be available for payment to the dormitory author-
ity of the state of New York for such amounts due and owing by such
social services district (13921) ...................................
6,620,000 ......................................... (re. $6,620,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports activities and
education grant program for underserved youth under the age of eigh-
teen years pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and

548 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
family services and approved by the director of the budget (15080)
... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $4,593,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2024 to December 31,
2024; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2024 through December
31, 2024 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and non-secure detention facili-
ties and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund

549 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account -
22186 (13922) ... 76,160,000 ..................... (re. $11,873,000)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein shall be available to the office of children and
family services for payment of the state share of a county's prior
years claim for reimbursement based upon a subsequent review by the
office of actual expenditures for care, maintenance and supervision
provided to youth in detention, to address any underpayment of state
aid to the county for services and expenses for detention in a prior
calendar year (14067) ... 9,444,000 ............... (re. $9,444,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of Octo-
ber 1, 2024 through September 30, 2025 that have been approved by
the office of children and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget; provided, however, if a
municipality is unable to use all of its allocation for such program
period within the required time frames, the municipality may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver to permit
the municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for
an additional one-year program period for eligible expenditures.
Of the amount appropriated herein $3,000,000 shall be directed by
municipalities in their annual supervision and treatment services
for juveniles plan to support new interventions or additional capac-
ity for youth with multiple detention admissions or arrests in any
12-month period, youth alleged to have engaged in violent behaviors
or vehicle-related crimes, youth who leave home without permission,
trafficked youth, and/or youth at risk of gang recruitment. Within
the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be limit-
ed to the amount of such municipality's distribution. A portion of
the funds appropriated herein may be used by the office to enter
into contracts to provide statewide training and technical assist-
ance and support to assist programs and municipalities to effec-
tively implement the supervision and treatment services for juve-
niles program and assess impact. These funds, not to exceed $500,000

550 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
in any program year, shall be exempt from the required county match-
ing funds.
The office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of the calendar
quarter in which the claimed services were delivered. These funds
shall not be used to supplant other state and local funds (14068)
... 11,376,000 .................................... (re. $7,101,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $3,682,000)
For eligible services and expenses of youth development programs as
determined by the office of children and family services. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the contrary, a youth devel-
opment program shall mean a program designed to provide community-
level services to promote positive youth development but shall not
include approved runaway programs or transitional independent living
support programs as such terms are defined in section 532-a of the
executive law. Each county or a city with a population of one
million or more, which shall be known as a municipality, operating a
youth development program approved by the office of children and
family services shall be eligible for one hundred percent state
reimbursement of its qualified expenditures, subject to the amount
available under this appropriation and exclusive of any federal
funds made available therefor, not to exceed the municipality's
distribution of state aid for youth development programs. The amount
appropriated herein for youth development programs shall be distrib-
uted by the office of children and family services to eligible muni-
cipalities that have a comprehensive plan that has been developed in
consultation with the applicable municipal youth bureau and approved
by the office of children and family services. The distribution of
the amount appropriated herein to eligible municipalities by the
office of children and family services shall be based on factors as
determined by the office and subject to the approval of the director
of budget; such factors shall include the number of youth under the
age of twenty-one residing in the municipality as shown by the last
published federal census certified in the same manner as provided by

551 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
section 54 of the state finance law and may include, but not be
limited to, the percentage of youth living in poverty within the
municipality or such other factors as provided for in the regu-
lations of the office of children and family services. Up to fifteen
percent of the youth development funds that a municipality would
allocate to an approved local youth bureau pursuant to an approved
comprehensive plan may be used for administrative functions
performed by such local youth bureau. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, an approved local youth bureau that is not
providing, operating, administering or monitoring youth development
programs shall not receive funding under this appropriation. The
office shall not reimburse any claims for youth development programs
unless they are submitted within twelve months of the calendar quar-
ter in which the expenditure was made. The office may require that
such claims be submitted to the office electronically in the manner
and format required by the office. A municipality may enter into
contracts to effectuate its youth development program as approved by
the office of children and family services. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation for youth development programs until a
plan has been approved by the director of the budget and a certif-
icate of approval allocating these funds has been issued by the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, provisions
relating to youth development programs and runaway and homeless
youth services pursuant to part G of chapter 57 of laws of 2013, as
amended by part M of the chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, shall here-
by remain in effect (13925) ... 14,121,700 ....... (re. $10,988,000)
For payment of state aid for programs for the provision of eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth pursuant to a plan, submitted
by an eligible county, or a city having a population of one million
or more, which shall be known as a municipality, and approved by the
office of children and family services as part of such munici-
pality's comprehensive plan in accordance with article 19-H of the
executive law.
Of the amount appropriated herein, the office of children and family
services shall not reimburse any claims unless they are submitted
within twelve months of the calendar quarter in which the claimed
service or services were delivered.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims for provision of
services to runaway and homeless youth be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office, and
the information regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate
quality of services provided and program effectiveness be submitted
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation
until an annual expenditure plan is approved by the director of the
budget and a certificate of approval allocating these funds has been
issued by the director of the budget and copies of such certificate
or any amendment thereto filed with the state comptroller, the
chairperson of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of

552 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the assembly ways and means committee (14009) ......................
6,484,000 ......................................... (re. $5,831,000)
For services and expenses provided by local probation departments, for
the post-placement care of youth leaving a youth residential facili-
ty and for services and expenses of the office of children and fami-
ly services related to community-based programs for youth in the
care of the office of children and family services which may include
but not be limited to multi-systemic therapy, family functional
therapy and/or functional therapeutic foster care, and electronic
monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available subject to the
approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14010) ... 311,700 ....... (re. $285,000)
Notwithstanding sections 131-u and 459-c of the social services law or
any other law to the contrary, for reimbursement of 98 percent of 50
percent of eligible expenditures to local social services districts
for the provision and administration of, after first deducting ther-
efrom any federal funds properly received or to be received on
account thereof: adult protective services; residential services for
victims of domestic violence not in receipt of public assistance
during the time the victims were residing in residential programs
for victims of domestic violence; and nonresidential services for
victims of domestic violence incurred on or after October 1, 2024
and before October 1, 2025 that are claimed by March 1, 2026.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the

553 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law (14012) ... 65,000,000 ....... (re. $56,663,000)
For services and expenses related to a pilot program, which shall be
cost neutral to participating providers, to provide flexible, survi-
vor-centered services to individuals and families who have experi-
enced domestic violence (15065) ....................................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of kinship care to be provided through
Permanency Resource Centers. Such funds shall be awarded competi-
tively and are available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (14077) ...
338,750 .............................................. (re. $75,000)
For additional services and expenses of not-for-profit and voluntary
agencies providing support services to the caretaker relative of a
minor child when such services are provided to eligible individuals
and families. Such funds are available pursuant to a plan prepared
by the office of children and family services and approved by the
director of the budget to continue or expand existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, toward new
contracts to continue programs where the existing contractors are
not satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of chil-
dren and family services and/or to award new contracts through a
competitive process (13947) ... 1,900,000 ......... (re. $1,900,000)
For services and expenses for supportive housing for young adults aged
25 years or younger leaving or having recently left foster care or
who had been in foster care for more than a year after their 16th
birthday and who are at-risk of street homelessness or sheltered
homelessness provided under the joint project between the state and
the city of New York, known as the New York New York III supportive
housing agreement. No expenditure shall be made until a certificate
of allocation has been approved by the director of the budget with
copies to be filed with the chairpersons of the senate finance
committee and the assembly ways and means committee. The amount
appropriated herein may be transferred or otherwise made available
to the city of New York administration for children's services for
services and expenses related to implementing the project.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except a chapter of
the laws of 2024 authorizing a 2.84 percent cost of living adjust-

554 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ment increase for the period commencing on April 1, 2024 and ending
March 31, 2025, the commissioner shall not apply any other cost of
living adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (13929) ...............
2,402,000 ........................................... (re. $875,000)
For services and expenses to assist foster care congregate care
programs licensed by the office of children and family services that
meet the definition of an Institution for Mental Disease under
federal law. Funds shall be made available for, but may not be
limited to, supporting medical staffing needs, services provided to
Medicaid-enrolled children placed in a foster care congregate facil-
ity that qualifies as an institution for mental disease, and other
necessary investments for such foster care congregate programs. The
amount appropriated herein may be made available for transfer or
suballocation to the department of health (60588) ..................
17,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Catholic Family Center in Rochester
to establish, operate, and administrate a statewide kinship informa-
tion, education, program services and referral network (14013)
220,500 ............................................. (re. $220,500)
For additional services and expenses of the Catholic Family Center in
Rochester to establish and operate a statewide kinship information
and referral network (15212) ... 100,000 ............. (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses associated with sexually exploited children
and youth up to age 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the state's liability under subdivision 5 of section 447-b of the
social services law shall be limited to the amount appropriated
herein (14055) ... 1,000,000 ...................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the settlement house program.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome-based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14017) ..................................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,090,000)
For services and expenses of Day One Learning (60616) ................
1,600,000 ........................................... (re. $541,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (60617) .............
2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000)
For services and expenses of Simon Wiesenthal Center (60618) .........
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of United Way of Greater Rochester (60608)
... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $2,210,000)
For services and expenses of 2-1-1 New York, including funding to
qualified regional collaborators (13931) ...........................
2,400,000 ............................................ (re. $46,000)
For services and expenses of Afikim Foundation (60549) ...............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of AFRO LATIN JAZZ ALLIANCE (60593) ........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
(60501) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)

555 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Beraca Community Development Corporation
(60619) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Bivona Child Advocacy Center (60620) ...
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls Club of Western New York
(60595) ... 400,000 .................................. (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Community Services (60622) ...
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Buffalo Irish Center (60625) ............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Advocacy Support and Transfor-
mation (60596) ... 50,000 ............................ (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Elder Law and Justice (15251)
... 125,000 ......................................... (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Family Representation (15285)
... 150,000 .......................................... (re. $76,000)
For services and expenses of Children of Promise (60552) .............
200,000 .............................................. (re. $80,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee NYC (15234) ..........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Commonpoint Queens (60553) ..............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Connect Center For Youth (60597) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Covenant House (15116) ..................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of COUNCIL OF PEOPLES ORGANIZATION, INC
(60598) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Diaspora Community Services (60623)
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of DOMINICO AMERICAN SOCIETY OF QUEENS Inc
(15291) ... 90,000 ................................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of East Flatbush Village (15031) ...........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of El Centro Hispano (15069) ...............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of EXTOLLING EXCELLENCE FOUNDATION FOR
SERVICE AND SCHOLARSHIP, Inc. (60599) ... 20,000 ..... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Fearless! (Safe Homes of Orange County)
(15051) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $35,000)
For services and expenses of Federation of Protestant Welfare Agencies
(FPWA) (60600) ... 75,000 ............................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Fostering Youth Success Alliance (60624)
... 75,000 ........................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund (15034) ..................
1,600,000 ........................................... (re. $699,000)
For services and expenses of Fun in the Son (60557) ..................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fund for the City of New York - Jamaica
Bay Rockaway Conservancy Parks (60558) .............................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)

556 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Fund for the City of New York - The New
Pride Agenda, Inc. (15061) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Haitian Americans United For Progress
(60627) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Heartshare St. Vincent Services (60628)
... 300,000 ......................................... (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15226) .............
200,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Heritage Cultural Institute
(60562) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Greater Ithaca Activities Center (60629)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of JCC Rockland (60564) ....................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Board (15297) ....................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Child Care Association (15270) ...
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Kiryas Joel Social Services Organization,
Inc (60630) ... 100,000 .............................. (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses of Konbit Neg LaKay Rockland County (60631)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Latina Moms Connect, Inc (60603) ........
15,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Little Haiti BK, Inc. (60604) ...........
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (60578) ......................................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Minkwon Center for Community Action, Inc.
(60568) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New Rochelle Boys and Girls Club (60569)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of NYS Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs, Inc
(60605) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Open Buffalo (60606) ....................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Pakistani American Society of New York
(60514) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of ParentChild+, Inc. (60570) ..............
200,000 .............................................. (re. $51,000)
For services and expenses of Pauline Walley Evangelistic Ministries
Youth Program (60636) ... 17,000 ..................... (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of Riseboro (60572) ........................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses of SCO Family Services Madonna Heights
School (60516) ... 50,000 ............................ (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of The Stack Project (60637) ...............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Sesame Flyers (60607) ...................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)

557 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Simon Wiesenthal Center (60573) .........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of South End Children's Cafe (60517) .......
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Southside United HDFC / Los Sures (60518)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of St. Luke's Community Food Program (15266)
... 30,000 ........................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of St. Nicholas Chess 4 Kids, Inc. (15265)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of The Black Institute (15280) .............
50,000 ................................................ (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses of The Community Foundation of Herkimer and
Oneida Counties, INC (60632) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of The Flatbush Development Corp (15295) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (60574) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (60633) ......
100,000 .............................................. (re. $46,000)
For services and expenses of Victory Community Services (60634) ......
46,000 ............................................... (re. $46,000)
For services and expenses of Waterwell (60635) .......................
632,000 ............................................. (re. $632,000)
For services and expenses of West Indian Day Carnival Association
(15268) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Wiz Kids Books B4 Basketball Program
(60576) ... 30,000 ................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Young Parents United (60638) ............
75,000 ............................................... (re. $36,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater New York (60500) ...
300,000 ............................................. (re. $241,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater New York (60609) ...
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (15068)
... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $7,416,000)
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and

558 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (60610)
... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $9,327,000)
For services and expenses of Association of New York State Youth
Bureaus, Inc. (15021) ... 225,000 ................... (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
(15126) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls Club of Harlem (15022) ...
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Boys and Girls Club of Northern Westches-
ter Inc (60639) ... 140,000 ......................... (re. $140,000)
For services and expenses of Chinese-American Planning Council
[(15286)] 15027 ... 250,000 ......................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Common Point Queens (15029) .............
135,000 ............................................. (re. $135,000)
For services and expenses of Help Me Grow New York (60612) ...........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $375,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15131) .............
650,000 ............................................. (re. $650,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley -
Housing and Kinship Caregiver Services (15040) .....................
400,000 .............................................. (re. $99,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley -
LGBTQ+ Services (60614) ... 151,667 ................. (re. $151,667)
For services and expenses of Make the Road - Community Organizing
Projects (15045) ... 250,000 ........................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (D/B/A Met Council) (15255) ..................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New Alternatives for Children Inc (13978)
... 450,000 ......................................... (re. $133,000)
For services and expenses of New York State Alliance of Boys and Girls
Club Inc (13983) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $434,000)
For services and expenses of New York State YMCA Foundation Inc.
(13957) ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of NYPD Youth Explorers Program (15049) ....
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Shalom Task Force, Inc. (15143) .........
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency Inc. (15054)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of East River Development Alliance, Inc.
(Urban Upbound) (15055) ... 200,000 ................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Youth Bureau (15057)
... 260,000 ......................................... (re. $260,000)
For services and expenses of White Plains Youth Bureau - Grandpas
United (60611) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)

559 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of White Plains Youth Bureau - Grandpas
United - Fatherhood Initiative Pilot Program (60641) ...............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of human services and veterans community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other agencies, including the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance and the department of veterans'
services with the approval of the temporary president of the senate
and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to an plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60579) ................
9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $9,500,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports grant program.
Funding shall be allocated to municipal youth bureaus to operate a
grant program for eligible not-for-profit or community-based organ-
izations that provide team sports programming to underserved youth
under the age of eighteen years. Youth Bureaus shall undertake
efforts to provide notice to such organizations of the availability
of grant funds. No grant awarded under this program shall exceed
$50,000. Allowable expenses shall include, but not be limited to:
purchase of equipment or uniforms, acquisition or rental of facility
or field space, staffing, referees and coaches, and educational
programming. OCFS shall publish as part of its annual report: the
number of children and youth served by the program by municipality,
the identities of the eligible organizations receiving funds, and
the sums awarded to each eligible organization (60613) .............
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,942,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenditures to be made in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
673(a)(8)(D). Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
amount herein appropriated shall be used to provide post-adoption
services, post-guardianship services, and services to support and
sustain positive permanent outcomes for children who otherwise might
enter into foster care in accordance with federal requirements.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased by transfer or by interchange with any
other appropriation or with any other item or items within the
amounts appropriated within the office of children and family
services if needed to meet federal requirements and with the
approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the

560 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly
ways and means committee. Of the amount appropriated herein, at
least $11 million shall be made available for the home visiting
program (13959) ... 30,619,000 ................... (re. $30,148,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 909,000 ................................. (re. $865,000)
For services and expenses related to the home visiting program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to continue or expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing contractors are not satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive proc-
ess. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (13928) .....
26,275,000 ....................................... (re. $11,676,000)
For services and expenses of the William B. Hoyt memorial children and
family trust fund, for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph (a)
of subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available, grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Programs funded through such trust
shall submit information regarding outcome based measures that
demonstrate quality of services provided and program effectiveness
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to the
office of children and family services miscellaneous special revenue
fund, children and family trust fund (14015) .......................
787,935 ............................................. (re. $787,935)
For services and expenses of after-school programs and technical
assistance to after-school grant recipients. Such funds are to be
available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget to extend
or expand current advantage after-school or empire state after-
school contracts, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts through a competitive process, and/or award allocations to
municipalities to conduct a competitive bid for such services.
Notwithstanding any provision of section 112 and section 163 of the
state finance law to the contrary, the office of children and family
services shall be authorized to develop and implement an expedited

561 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
contracting process in consultation with the office of the attorney
general and the office of the state comptroller for initial awards
for the 2024-25 school year made pursuant to a request for proposals
conducted in accordance with section 163 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding section 112 and section 163 of the state finance law
or any provision of law to the contrary, a portion of the funds
appropriated herein shall be available to continue previously
awarded empire state after-school contracts with school districts
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding
section 112 and section 163 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, upon a determination by the
commissioner that after-school programs awarded pursuant to a
request for proposals will not be in place for the 2024-25 school
year, funds appropriated herein shall be available to continue
previously awarded empire state afterschool and advantage after-
school contracts pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of chil-
dren and family services and approved by the director of the budget
(60642) ... 109,740,000 .......................... (re. $66,467,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of BERGEN BASIN COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT CORPO-
RATION (60551) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Haitian American Community Center (60626)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Young Men's Christian Association of
Greater New York (YMCA of Greater New York) (13977) ................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $152,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be made available to reimburse 62 percent of
eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed by
March 31, 2025 for child welfare services which shall include and be
limited to preventive services provided pursuant to section 409-a of
the social services law other than community optional preventive
services, child protective services, independent living services,
after-care services as defined in regulations of the department of
family assistance, and adoption administration and services, other
than adoption subsidies provided pursuant to title 9 of article 6 of
the social services law and regulations of the department of family
assistance incurred on or after October 1, 2023 and before October
1, 2024 and that are otherwise reimbursable by the state on or after
April 1, 2023, after first deducting therefrom any federal funds
properly received or to be received on account thereof upon certif-
ication by the social services district that it will not be using
these funds to supplant other state and local funds and that the
district will not submit claims for reimbursement under this appro-
priation for the same type and level of services that the county
previously provided and claimed under any contract in existence on

562 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
October 1, 2002 as other than child protective, preventive, inde-
pendent living, after care or adoption services or adoption adminis-
tration.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits; provided, however, that notwithstanding
any other provision of law, for a district to receive reimbursement
for such services, the amount of funds that the district expends on
such services from its flexible fund for family services allocation
and any flexible fund for family services funds transferred at the
district's request to the title XX social services block grant must,
to the extent that families are eligible therefore, be equal to or
greater than the district's portion of the $382,322,341 statewide
child welfare threshold amount, which shall be established pursuant
to a formula developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the office of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, selected social services
districts may authorize the office of temporary and disability
assistance to intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the
office of children and family services otherwise due to the
districts under this appropriation and/or under any other general
fund - aid to localities appropriation available to such districts
to suballocate to the office of mental health and subsequently for
suballocation from the office of mental health to the department of
health to use for the 38.9 percent of the non-federal share of the
medical assistance payments for home and community based waiver
services provided in accordance with subdivision 9 of section 366 of
the social services law as authorized by such selected social
services districts which choose to use preventive services funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, social services districts
may authorize the office of temporary and disability assistance to
intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the office of children
and family services otherwise due to the districts under this appro-
priation and/or under any other general fund - aid to localities
appropriation available to such districts to transfer to any miscel-
laneous special revenue fund available to the office of children and
family services to use for the local share of the federal funds
available for education and training vouchers provided in accordance
with section 477 of title IV-E of the social security act as author-
ized by such social services districts which choose to use funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program

563 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments for adoption subsidies by
direct deposit or debit card. Local social services districts shall
reimburse the office for the costs of administering such direct
deposit or debit card payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the office of children and family services
shall, on a quarterly basis, request that the office of temporary
and disability assistance reimburse the office of children and fami-
ly services in an amount equal to 38 percent of the non-federal
share of the costs of administering such direct deposit or debit
card payments to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of children and
family services shall reissue per diem rates, required pursuant to
section 529 of the executive law, for calendar years 2002 through
2009 to remove any adjustments to the costs included in determining
such rates to reflect any changes in federal funding made available
to the office or to local social services districts for such costs
and, provided further, the office shall not include any such adjust-
ments in per diem rates established hereafter.
All reimbursement made by local social services districts for care,
maintenance and supervision under this section shall be paid direct-
ly to the state through the office of children and family services
for deposit into a miscellaneous special revenue fund known as the
youth facility per diem account.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-

564 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (13998) .....................
900,045,000 ...................................... (re. $68,507,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be made available to reimburse 62 percent of
eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed by
March 31, 2024 for child welfare services which shall include and be
limited to preventive services provided pursuant to section 409-a of
the social services law other than community optional preventive
services, child protective services, independent living services,
after-care services as defined in regulations of the department of
family assistance, and adoption administration and services, other
than adoption subsidies provided pursuant to title 9 of article 6 of
the social services law and regulations of the department of family
assistance incurred on or after October 1, 2022 and before October
1, 2023 and that are otherwise reimbursable by the state on or after
April 1, 2023, after first deducting therefrom any federal funds
properly received or to be received on account thereof upon certif-
ication by the social services district that it will not be using
these funds to supplant other state and local funds and that the
district will not submit claims for reimbursement under this appro-
priation for the same type and level of services that the county
previously provided and claimed under any contract in existence on
October 1, 2002 as other than child protective, preventive, inde-
pendent living, after care or adoption services or adoption adminis-
tration.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits; provided, however, that notwithstanding
any other provision of law, for a district to receive reimbursement
for such services, the amount of funds that the district expends on
such services from its flexible fund for family services allocation
and any flexible fund for family services funds transferred at the
district's request to the title XX social services block grant must,
to the extent that families are eligible therefore, be equal to or
greater than the district's portion of the $382,322,341 statewide
child welfare threshold amount, which shall be established pursuant
to a formula developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the office of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, selected social services
districts may authorize the office of temporary and disability
assistance to intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the
office of children and family services otherwise due to the
districts under this appropriation and/or under any other general
fund - aid to localities appropriation available to such districts
to suballocate to the office of mental health and subsequently for
suballocation from the office of mental health to the department of
health to use for the 38.9 percent of the non-federal share of the

565 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
medical assistance payments for home and community based waiver
services provided in accordance with subdivision 9 of section 366 of
the social services law as authorized by such selected social
services districts which choose to use preventive services funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, social services districts
may authorize the office of temporary and disability assistance to
intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the office of children
and family services otherwise due to the districts under this appro-
priation and/or under any other general fund - aid to localities
appropriation available to such districts to transfer to any miscel-
laneous special revenue fund available to the office of children and
family services to use for the local share of the federal funds
available for education and training vouchers provided in accordance
with section 477 of title IV-E of the social security act as author-
ized by such social services districts which choose to use funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments for adoption subsidies by
direct deposit or debit card. Local social services districts shall

566 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
reimburse the office for the costs of administering such direct
deposit or debit card payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the office of children and family services
shall, on a quarterly basis, request that the office of temporary
and disability assistance reimburse the office of children and fami-
ly services in an amount equal to 38 percent of the non-federal
share of the costs of administering such direct deposit or debit
card payments to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of children and
family services shall reissue per diem rates, required pursuant to
section 529 of the executive law, for calendar years 2002 through
2009 to remove any adjustments to the costs included in determining
such rates to reflect any changes in federal funding made available
to the office or to local social services districts for such costs
and, provided further, the office shall not include any such adjust-
ments in per diem rates established hereafter.
All reimbursement made by local social services districts for care,
maintenance and supervision under this section shall be paid direct-
ly to the state through the office of children and family services
for deposit into a miscellaneous special revenue fund known as the
youth facility per diem account.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (60584) .....................
900,045,000 ...................................... (re. $54,856,000)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for services provided
prior to April 1, 2019 and suballocation to the office of mental
health and subsequently for suballocation from the office of mental
health to the department of health for 94 percent of 65 percent of
the nonfederal share of medical assistance payments for home and
community based waiver services provided in accordance with subdivi-
sion 9 of section 366 of the social services law as authorized by
selected social services districts which choose to use preventive
services funds to support such costs and to authorize the office of
temporary and disability assistance to intercept funds otherwise due
to the districts to provide the 38.9 percent local share of such
preventive services expenditures (14001) ...........................
6,213,000 ......................................... (re. $6,213,000)
For services and expenses of the office of children and family
services and local social services districts for activities neces-
sary to comply with certain provisions of the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter 7 of the laws of 1999
and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record checks
for foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and adult
household members. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available
in accordance with a plan to be developed by the commissioner of the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget.

567 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
following appropriation shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments and credits. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for
94 percent of 98 percent of one-half of the non-federal share of the
national and state fees for fingerprinting foster care parents,
prospective adoptive parents, and other adult household members.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
chapter 7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006,
local social services districts shall reimburse the commissioner of
the office of children and family services for an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws of
1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006, the commissioner of the
office of children and family services shall, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state and national criminal
record checks and any other related costs. The commissioner shall
ensure expenditures made pursuant to this provision reflect appro-
priate federal and local shares. The commissioner of the office of
children and family services shall request that the commissioner of
the office of temporary and disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and family services in an
amount equal to 53.94 percent of the nonfederal share of such
payments provided that such reimbursement in payments reflects actu-
al expenditures made on behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the commissioner shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the commissioner of the office of
children and family services in an amount equal to 53.94 percent of
the non-federal share of such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur on or before the one
hundred and twentieth day following the close of the preceding quar-
ter and shall be charged among districts based on the number of
children currently placed in foster care in each local social
services district provided that this methodology is revised quarter-
ly to reflect most current available data. Amounts appropriated
herein may, subject to the director of the budget, be interchanged
or transferred with any other appropriation of the office of chil-
dren and family services or the office of temporary and disability
assistance as necessary to reimburse the state share of local social
services district costs appropriated herein (14002) ................
1,857,000 ......................................... (re. $1,857,000)
For services and expenses of certain local or regional multidiscipli-
nary child abuse investigation teams approved by the office of chil-
dren and family services for the purpose of investigating reports of
suspected child abuse or maltreatment and for new and established
child advocacy centers (14005) .....................................
5,229,900 ......................................... (re. $2,086,000)

568 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional services and expenses of child advocacy centers. This
funding is to be distributed to newly established child advocacy
centers and existing child advocacy centers weighted on a three-year
average of client volume (13932) ... 2,000,000 ...... (re. $182,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care

569 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropriation
may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the dormitory
authority of the state of New York by such social services district
for expenses otherwise reimbursable under this appropriation and
such amounts shall be available for payment to the dormitory author-
ity of the state of New York for such amounts due and owing by such
social services district (13921) ...................................
6,620,000 ......................................... (re. $6,620,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports activities and
education grant program for underserved youth under the age of eigh-
teen years pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget (15080)
... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,507,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2023 to December 31,
2023; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-

570 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2023 through December
31, 2023 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and non-secure detention facili-
ties and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account -
22186 (13922) ... 76,160,000 ...................... (re. $8,125,000)

571 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein shall be available to the office of children and
family services for payment of the state share of a county's prior
years claim for reimbursement based upon a subsequent review by the
office of actual expenditures for care, maintenance and supervision
provided to youth in detention, to address any underpayment of state
aid to the county for services and expenses for detention in a prior
calendar year (14067) ... 9,444,000 ............... (re. $9,444,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of Octo-
ber 1, 2023 through September 30, 2024 that have been approved by
the office of children and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget; provided, however, if a
municipality is unable to use all of its allocation for such program
period within the required time frames, the municipality may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver to permit
the municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for
an additional one-year program period for eligible expenditures.
Within the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be
limited to the amount of such municipality's distribution. A portion
of the funds appropriated herein may be used by the office to enter
into contracts to provide statewide training and technical assist-
ance and support to assist programs and municipalities to effec-
tively implement the supervision and treatment services for juve-
niles program and assess impact. These funds, not to exceed $500,000
in any program year, shall be exempt from the required county match-
ing funds.
The office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of the calendar
quarter in which the claimed services were delivered. These funds
shall not be used to supplant other state and local funds (14068)
... 8,376,000 ..................................... (re. $1,781,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated

572 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $3,792,000)
For eligible services and expenses of youth development programs as
determined by the office of children and family services. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the contrary, a youth devel-
opment program shall mean a program designed to provide community-
level services to promote positive youth development but shall not
include approved runaway programs or transitional independent living
support programs as such terms are defined in section 532-a of the
executive law. Each county or a city with a population of one
million or more, which shall be known as a municipality, operating a
youth development program approved by the office of children and
family services shall be eligible for one hundred percent state
reimbursement of its qualified expenditures, subject to the amount
available under this appropriation and exclusive of any federal
funds made available therefor, not to exceed the municipality's
distribution of state aid for youth development programs. The amount
appropriated herein for youth development programs shall be distrib-
uted by the office of children and family services to eligible muni-
cipalities that have a comprehensive plan that has been developed in
consultation with the applicable municipal youth bureau and approved
by the office of children and family services. The distribution of
the amount appropriated herein to eligible municipalities by the
office of children and family services shall be based on factors as
determined by the office and subject to the approval of the director
of budget; such factors shall include the number of youth under the
age of twenty-one residing in the municipality as shown by the last
published federal census certified in the same manner as provided by
section 54 of the state finance law and may include, but not be
limited to, the percentage of youth living in poverty within the
municipality or such other factors as provided for in the regu-
lations of the office of children and family services. Up to fifteen
percent of the youth development funds that a municipality would
allocate to an approved local youth bureau pursuant to an approved
comprehensive plan may be used for administrative functions
performed by such local youth bureau. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, an approved local youth bureau that is not
providing, operating, administering or monitoring youth development
programs shall not receive funding under this appropriation. The
office shall not reimburse any claims for youth development programs
unless they are submitted within twelve months of the calendar quar-
ter in which the expenditure was made. The office may require that
such claims be submitted to the office electronically in the manner
and format required by the office. A municipality may enter into
contracts to effectuate its youth development program as approved by
the office of children and family services. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation for youth development programs until a
plan has been approved by the director of the budget and a certif-
icate of approval allocating these funds has been issued by the
director of the budget.

573 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, provisions
relating to youth development programs and runaway and homeless
youth services pursuant to part G of chapter 57 of laws of 2013, as
amended by part M of the chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, shall here-
by remain in effect (13925) ... 14,121,700 .......... (re. $279,000)
For payment of state aid for programs for the provision of eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth pursuant to a plan, submitted
by an eligible county, or a city having a population of one million
or more, which shall be known as a municipality, and approved by the
office of children and family services as part of such munici-
pality's comprehensive plan in accordance with article 19-H of the
executive law.
Of the amount appropriated herein, the office of children and family
services shall not reimburse any claims unless they are submitted
within twelve months of the calendar quarter in which the claimed
service or services were delivered.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims for provision of
services to runaway and homeless youth be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office, and
the information regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate
quality of services provided and program effectiveness be submitted
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. No expenditures shall be made from this appropriation
until an annual expenditure plan is approved by the director of the
budget and a certificate of approval allocating these funds has been
issued by the director of the budget and copies of such certificate
or any amendment thereto filed with the state comptroller, the
chairperson of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of
the assembly ways and means committee (14009) ......................
6,484,000 ......................................... (re. $2,695,000)
For services and expenses provided by local probation departments, for
the post-placement care of youth leaving a youth residential facili-
ty and for services and expenses of the office of children and fami-
ly services related to community-based programs for youth in the
care of the office of children and family services which may include
but not be limited to multi-systemic therapy, family functional
therapy and/or functional therapeutic foster care, and electronic
monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available subject to the
approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14010) ... 311,700 ........ (re. $55,000)
Notwithstanding sections 131-u and 459-c of the social services law or
any other law to the contrary, for reimbursement of 98 percent of 50
percent of eligible expenditures to local social services districts
for the provision and administration of, after first deducting ther-
efrom any federal funds properly received or to be received on
account thereof: adult protective services; residential services for

574 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
victims of domestic violence not in receipt of public assistance
during the time the victims were residing in residential programs
for victims of domestic violence; and nonresidential services for
victims of domestic violence incurred on or after October 1, 2023
and before October 1, 2024 that are claimed by March 1, 2025.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law (14012) ... 44,000,000 ....... (re. $24,266,000)
Notwithstanding sections 131-u and 459-c of the social services law or
any other law to the contrary, for reimbursement of 98 percent of 50
percent of eligible expenditures to local social services districts
for the provision and administration of, after first deducting ther-
efrom any federal funds properly received or to be received on
account thereof: adult protective services; residential services for
victims of domestic violence not in receipt of public assistance
during the time the victims were residing in residential programs
for victims of domestic violence; and nonresidential services for
victims of domestic violence incurred on or after October 1, 2022
and before October 1, 2023 that are claimed by March 31, 2024.

575 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law (60586) ... 44,000,000 .......... (re. $852,000)
For services and expenses related to a pilot program, which shall be
cost neutral to participating providers, to provide flexible, survi-
vor-centered services to individuals and families who have experi-
enced domestic violence (15065) ....................................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of not-for-profit and voluntary
agencies providing support services to the caretaker relative of a
minor child when such services are provided to eligible individuals
and families. Such funds are available pursuant to a plan prepared
by the office of children and family services and approved by the
director of the budget to continue or expand existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, toward new
contracts to continue programs where the existing contractors are
not satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of chil-
dren and family services and/or to award new contracts through a
competitive process (13947) ... 1,900,000 ........... (re. $789,000)

576 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional services and expenses of the advantage after school
program. Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared
by the office of children and family services and approved by the
director of the budget to extend or expand current contracts with
community based organizations, to award new contracts to continue
programs where the existing contractors are not satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive process
to community based organizations (13949) ...........................
5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $945,000)
For services and expenses to assist foster care congregate care
programs licensed by the office of children and family services that
meet the definition of an Institution for Mental Disease under
federal law. Funds shall be made available for, but may not be
limited to, supporting medical staffing needs, services provided to
Medicaid-enrolled children placed in a foster care congregate facil-
ity that qualifies as an institution for mental disease, and other
necessary investments for such foster care congregate programs. The
amount appropriated herein may be made available for transfer or
suballocation to the department of health (60588) ..................
17,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Catholic Family Center in Rochester
to establish, operate, and administrate a statewide kinship informa-
tion, education, program services and referral network (14013) ...
220,500 ............................................. (re. $169,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Catholic Family Center in
Rochester to establish and operate a statewide kinship information
and referral network (15212) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses associated with sexually exploited children
and youth up to age 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the state's liability under subdivision 5 of section 447-b of the
social services law shall be limited to the amount appropriated
herein (14055) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $220,000)
For services and expenses related to the settlement house program.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome-based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14017) ... 2,450,000 ..... (re. $837,000)
For services and expenses of Afikim Foundation (60549) ...............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Afro Latin Jazz Alliance (60593) ........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
(60501) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of BRAATA Productions Corp. (60594) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (60551) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Elder Law and Justice (15251)
... 125,000 ........................................... (re. $2,000)

577 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee NYC (15234) ..........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Children of Promise (60552) .............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Commonpoint Queens (60553) ..............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Connect Center For Youth (60597) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell ILR Buffalo Co-Lab (60510) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Dominico American Society of Queens, Inc.
(15291) ... 90,000 .................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of East Flatbush Village (15031) ...........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Extolling Excellence Foundation For
Service and Scholarship, Inc. (60599) ... 20,000 ..... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Fearless! (Safe Homes of Orange County)
(15051) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of The Flatbush Development Corp (15295) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund (15034) ..................
1,600,000 ............................................ (re. $83,000)
For services and expenses of Fun in the Son (60557) ..................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fund for the City of New York - Jamaica
Bay Rockaway Conservancy Parks (60558) .............................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Fund for the City of New York - The New
Pride Agenda, Inc. (15061) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Hidden Gem, Inc. (60602) ................
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Board (15297) ....................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Latina Moms Connect, Inc (60603) ........
15,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Little Haiti BK, Inc. (60604) ...........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Minkwon Center for Community Action, Inc.
(60568) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New Rochelle Boys and Girls Club (60569)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New York State Alliance of Boys and Girls
Clubs, Inc.(60605) ... 500,000 ....................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Open Buffalo (60606) ....................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Pakistani American Society of New York
(60514) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Riseboro (60572) ........................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of Sesame Flyers (60607) ...................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)

578 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Simon Wiesenthal Center (60573) .........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of South End Children's Cafe (60517) .......
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Southside United HDFC / Los Sures (60518)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of St. Luke's Community Food Program (15266)
... 25,000 ........................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of St. Nicholas Chess 4 Kids, Inc. (15265)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (60574) ......
50,000 ................................................ (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of West Indian Day Carnival Association
(15268) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Wiz Kids Books B4 Basketball Program
(60576) ... 30,000 ................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater New York (60609) ........
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,359,000)
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (15068)
... 15,000,000 .................................... (re. $8,331,000)
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (60610)
... 4,750,000 ..................................... (re. $3,659,000)
For services and expenses of Association of New York State Youth
Bureaus (15021) ... 225,000 ......................... (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
(15126) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Chinese-American Planning Council
[(15286)] (15027) ... 250,000 ......................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Common Point Queens (15029) .............
135,000 ............................................. (re. $135,000)

579 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Grandpas United (60611) .................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $114,000)
For services and expenses of Help Me Grow New York (60612) ...........
500,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15131) .............
500,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley -
LGBTQ+ Services (60614) ... 151,667 .................. (re. $46,000)
For services and expenses of Make the Road Community Organizing
Projects (15045) ... 250,000 ........................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses for New York State Alliance of Boys and
Girls Club (13983) ... 750,000 ...................... (re. $137,000)
For services and expenses of New York State YMCA Foundation (13957)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses for NYPD Youth Explorers Program (15049) ...
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Shalom Task Force, Inc. (15143) .........
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (15054) ......
100,000 .............................................. (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of Urban Upbound (15055) ...................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Youth Bureau (15057)
... 260,000 ......................................... (re. $260,000)
For services and expenses of human services and veterans community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other agencies, including the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance and the department of veterans'
services with the approval of the temporary president of the senate
and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to an plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60579) ................
9,548,000 ......................................... (re. $4,857,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports grant program.
Funding shall be allocated to municipal youth bureaus to operate a
grant program for eligible not-for-profit or community-based organ-
izations that provide team sports programming to underserved youth
under the age of eighteen years. Youth Bureaus shall undertake
efforts to provide notice to such organizations of the availability
of grant funds. No grant awarded under this program shall exceed
$50,000. Allowable expenses shall include, but not be limited to:
purchase of equipment or uniforms, acquisition or rental of facility
or field space, staffing, referees and coaches, and educational

580 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
programming. OCFS shall publish as part of its annual report: the
number of children and youth served by the program by municipality,
the identities of the eligible organizations receiving funds, and
the sums awarded to each eligible organization (60613) .............
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,035,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenditures to be made in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
673(a)(8)(D). Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
amount herein appropriated shall be used to provide post-adoption
services, post-guardianship services, and services to support and
sustain positive permanent outcomes for children who otherwise might
enter into foster care in accordance with federal requirements.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased by transfer or by interchange with any
other appropriation or with any other item or items within the
amounts appropriated within the office of children and family
services if needed to meet federal requirements and with the
approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly
ways and means committee. Of the amount appropriated herein, at
least $11 million shall be made available for the home visiting
program (13959) ... 30,076,000 ................... (re. $11,567,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 843,000 .................................. (re. $71,000)
For services and expenses related to the home visiting program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to continue or expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing contractors are not satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive proc-
ess. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (13928) ...
26,183,056 ........................................ (re. $5,886,000)
For services and expenses of the William B. Hoyt memorial children and
family trust fund, for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph (a)
of subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available, grants renewed for subsequent years may

581 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be funded at initial award level. Programs funded through such trust
shall submit information regarding outcome based measures that
demonstrate quality of services provided and program effectiveness
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to the
office of children and family services miscellaneous special revenue
fund, children and family trust fund (14015) .......................
713,000 ............................................. (re. $713,000)
For services and expenses of the advantage after school program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to extend or expand current contracts with community based
organizations, to award new contracts to continue programs where the
existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined
by the office of children and family services and/or to award new
contracts through a competitive process to community based organiza-
tions (14014) ......................................................
29,666,000 ....................................... (re. $13,426,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state after-school program.
Such funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to provide awards to school
districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and other
eligible entities, provided that amounts of the funds appropriated
herein shall be made available as follows:
(i) $35,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on responses
to the empire state after-school program request for proposals
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2017
(ii) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2018
(iii) $10,000,000 for the continuation of awards made based on
responses to the empire state after-school program request for
proposals pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019 (60587) .......
57,339,000 ....................................... (re. $41,917,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount appropriated
herein shall be available to reimburse for 98 percent of 65 percent
of eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed
by March 31, 2023 for those community preventive services provided
from October 1, 2021 through September 30, 2022 at a cost that does
not exceed the cost that was in effect on October 1, 2008 and that a
social services district can demonstrate had been approved by the
office of children and family services on or before October 1, 2008;
provided, however, that should insufficient funds be available to
provide state reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of such
costs, reimbursement shall be made proportionally to each district
based on the percentage of their total eligible claims to the amount
appropriated; and, provided further, however, that if the amount

582 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriated exceeds the amount of funds necessary to reimburse 98
percent of 65 percent of the eligible social services district
expenditures, the office may, to the extent funds are available,
provide reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of eligible
social services district expenditures for new community preventive
services programs approved by the office and only up to the amounts
approved by the office. A local social services district seeking
federal and/or state reimbursement for community preventive services
provided on or after October 1, 2021 must submit claims that sepa-
rately identify the costs of such services in a form and manner and
at such times as are required by the department of family assistance
and that information regarding outcome based measures that demon-
strate quality of services provided and program effectiveness be
submitted to the office of children and family services in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office. Of the
amount appropriated herein, up to $1,000,000 may be used to provide
additional funding to an eligible program or programs with evalu-
ation results that show program effectiveness and demonstrate
private monetary support as determined by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget (13999)
... 12,124,750 .................................... (re. $2,405,000)
For services and expenses of the office of children and family
services and local social services districts for activities neces-
sary to comply with certain provisions of the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter 7 of the laws of 1999
and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record checks
for foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and adult
household members. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available
in accordance with a plan to be developed by the commissioner of the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
following appropriation shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments and credits. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for
94 percent of 98 percent of one-half of the non-federal share of the
national and state fees for fingerprinting foster care parents,
prospective adoptive parents, and other adult household members.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
chapter 7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006,
local social services districts shall reimburse the commissioner of
the office of children and family services for an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws of
1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006, the commissioner of the
office of children and family services shall, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state and national criminal
record checks and any other related costs. The commissioner shall
ensure expenditures made pursuant to this provision reflect appro-
priate federal and local shares. The commissioner of the office of

583 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
children and family services shall request that the commissioner of
the office of temporary and disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and family services in an
amount equal to 53.94 percent of the nonfederal share of such
payments provided that such reimbursement in payments reflects actu-
al expenditures made on behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the commissioner shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the commissioner of the office of
children and family services in an amount equal to 53.94 percent of
the non-federal share of such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur on or before the one
hundred and twentieth day following the close of the preceding quar-
ter and shall be charged among districts based on the number of
children currently placed in foster care in each local social
services district provided that this methodology is revised quarter-
ly to reflect most current available data. Amounts appropriated
herein may, subject to the director of the budget, be interchanged
or transferred with any other appropriation of the office of chil-
dren and family services or the office of temporary and disability
assistance as necessary to reimburse the state share of local social
services district costs appropriated herein (14002) ................
1,857,000 ......................................... (re. $1,857,000)
For services and expenditures to be made in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
673(a)(8)(D). Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
amount herein appropriated shall be used to provide post-adoption
services, post-guardianship services, and services to support and
sustain positive permanent outcomes for children who otherwise might
enter into foster care in accordance with federal requirements.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased by transfer or by interchange with any
other appropriation or with any other item or items within the
amounts appropriated within the office of children and family
services if needed to meet federal requirements and with the
approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly
ways and means committee. Of the amount appropriated herein, at
least $11 million shall be made available for the home visiting
program (13959) ... 22,800,000 .................... (re. $2,454,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 829,100 ................................. (re. $767,000)
For services and expenses of certain local or regional multidiscipli-
nary child abuse investigation teams approved by the office of chil-
dren and family services for the purpose of investigating reports of
suspected child abuse or maltreatment and for new and established

584 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
child advocacy centers (14005) .....................................
5,229,900 ........................................... (re. $150,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded

585 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropriation
may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the dormitory
authority of the state of New York by such social services district
for expenses otherwise reimbursable under this appropriation and
such amounts shall be available for payment to the dormitory author-
ity of the state of New York for such amounts due and owing by such
social services district (13921) ...................................
6,620,000 ......................................... (re. $2,190,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports activities and
education grant program for underserved youth under the age of eigh-
teen years pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the Director of the Budget (15080)
... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,991,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2022 to December 31,
2022; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of

586 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2022 through December
31, 2022 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and non-secure detention facili-
ties and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account -
22186 (13922) ... 76,160,000 ...................... (re. $9,443,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-

587 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of Octo-
ber 1, 2022 through September 30, 2023 that have been approved by
the office of children and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget; provided, however, if a
municipality is unable to use all of its allocation for such program
period within the required time frames, the municipality may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver to permit
the municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for
an additional one-year program period for eligible expenditures.
Within the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be
limited to the amount of such municipality's distribution. A portion
of the funds appropriated herein may be used by the office to enter
into contracts to provide statewide training and technical assist-
ance and support to assist programs and municipalities to effec-
tively implement the supervision and treatment services for juve-
niles program and assess impact. These funds, not to exceed $500,000
in any program year, shall be exempt from the required county match-
ing funds. The office of children and family services shall not
reimburse any claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of
the calendar quarter in which the claimed services were delivered.
These funds shall not be used to supplant other state and local
funds (14068) ... 8,376,000 ......................... (re. $257,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $3,116,000)
For eligible services and expenses of youth development programs as
determined by the office of children and family services. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the contrary, a youth devel-
opment program shall mean a program designed to provide community-
level services to promote positive youth development but shall not
include approved runaway programs or transitional independent living
support programs as such terms are defined in section 532-a of the
executive law. Each county or a city with a population of one

588 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
million or more, which shall be known as a municipality, operating a
youth development program approved by the office of children and
family services shall be eligible for one hundred percent state
reimbursement of its qualified expenditures, subject to the amount
available under this appropriation and exclusive of any federal
funds made available therefor, not to exceed the municipality's
distribution of state aid for youth development programs. The amount
appropriated herein for youth development programs shall be distrib-
uted by the office of children and family services to eligible muni-
cipalities that have a comprehensive plan that has been developed in
consultation with the applicable municipal youth bureau and approved
by the office of children and family services. The distribution of
the amount appropriated herein to eligible municipalities by the
office of children and family services shall be based on factors as
determined by the office and subject to the approval of the director
of budget; such factors shall include the number of youth under the
age of twenty-one residing in the municipality as shown by the last
published federal census certified in the same manner as provided by
section 54 of the state finance law and may include, but not be
limited to, the percentage of youth living in poverty within the
municipality or such other factors as provided for in the regu-
lations of the office of children and family services. Up to fifteen
percent of the youth development funds that a municipality would
allocate to an approved local youth bureau pursuant to an approved
comprehensive plan may be used for administrative functions
performed by such local youth bureau. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, an approved local youth bureau that is not
providing, operating, administering or monitoring youth development
programs shall not receive funding under this appropriation. The
office shall not reimburse any claims for youth development programs
unless they are submitted within twelve months of the calendar quar-
ter in which the expenditure was made. The office may require that
such claims be submitted to the office electronically in the manner
and format required by the office. A municipality may enter into
contracts to effectuate its youth development program as approved by
the office of children and family services. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation for youth development programs until a
plan has been approved by the director of the budget and a certif-
icate of approval allocating these funds has been issued by the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, provisions
relating to youth development programs and runaway and homeless
youth services pursuant to part G of chapter 57 of laws of 2013, as
amended by part M of the chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, shall here-
by remain in effect (13925) ... 14,121,700 ........... (re. $56,000)
For services and expenses provided by local probation departments, for
the post-placement care of youth leaving a youth residential facili-
ty and for services and expenses of the office of children and fami-
ly services related to community-based programs for youth in the
care of the office of children and family services which may include
but not be limited to multi-systemic therapy, family functional

589 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
therapy and/or functional therapeutic foster care, and electronic
monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available subject to the
approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14010) ..................................
311,700 ............................................. (re. $311,700)
For services and expenses related to a pilot program, which shall be
cost neutral to participating providers, to provide flexible, survi-
vor-centered services to individuals and families who have experi-
enced domestic violence (15065) ....................................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of not-for-profit and voluntary
agencies providing support services to the caretaker relative of a
minor child when such services are provided to eligible individuals
and families. Such funds are available pursuant to a plan prepared
by the office of children and family services and approved by the
director of the budget to continue or expand existing programs with
existing contractors that are satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, to award new
contracts to continue programs where the existing contractors are
not satisfactorily performing as determined by the office of chil-
dren and family services and/or to award new contracts through a
competitive process (13947) ... 1,900,000 ............ (re. $37,000)
For services and expenses related to the home visiting program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to continue or expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing contractors are not satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive proc-
ess. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (13928)
26,162,200 ....................................... (re. $11,936,000)
For services and expenses of the William B. Hoyt memorial children and
family trust fund, for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph a of
subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available, grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Programs funded through such trust
shall submit information regarding outcome based measures that
demonstrate quality of services provided and program effectiveness

590 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to the
office of children and family services miscellaneous special revenue
fund, children and family trust fund (14015) .......................
643,850 ............................................. (re. $589,000)
For services and expenses for supportive housing for young adults aged
25 years or younger leaving or having recently left foster care or
who had been in foster care for more than a year after their 16th
birthday and who are at-risk of street homelessness or sheltered
homelessness provided under the joint project between the state and
the city of New York, known as the New York New York III supportive
housing agreement. No expenditure shall be made until a certificate
of allocation has been approved by the director of the budget with
copies to be filed with the chairpersons of the senate finance
committee and the assembly ways and means committee. The amount
appropriated herein may be transferred or otherwise made available
to the city of New York administration for children's services for
services and expenses related to implementing the project.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except a chapter of
the laws of 2022 authorizing a 5.4 percent cost of living adjustment
increase for the period commencing on April 1, 2022 and ending March
31, 2023, the commissioner shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (13929) ...............
2,251,000 ......................................... (re. $1,837,000)
For services and expenses associated with sexually exploited children
and youth up to age 21. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the state's liability under subdivision 5 of section 447-b of the
social services law shall be limited to the amount appropriated
herein (14055) ... 2,000,000 ...................... (re. $1,018,000)
For services and expenses related to the settlement house program.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14017) ... 2,450,000 ..... (re. $699,000)
For services and expenses of Afikim Foundation (60549) ...............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of Asian American Legal Defense (15010) ...
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Association to Benefit Children (60550)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
(60501) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Bergen Basin Community Development Corpo-
ration (60551) ... 50,000 ............................ (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Children of Promise (60552) .............
100,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee NYC (15234) ..........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Common Point Queens (60553) .............
500,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)

591 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Doctor Theodore A. Atlas Foundation, Inc.
(60555) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Dominico American Society of Queens, Inc.
(15291) ... 90,000 .................................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of Flushing Council on Culture and the Arts,
Inc. (60556) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund (15034) ..................
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of Fun in the Son (60557) ..................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Fund for the City of New York - Jamaica
Bay Rockaway Conservancy Parks (60558) ... 50,000 .... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of The New Pride Agenda, Inc. administered
by the Fund for the City of New York (15061) .......................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Go Bike Buffalo (60559) .................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $114,000)
For services and expenses of Good Shephard Services (60560) ..........
30,000 ............................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Greater Ridgewood Youth Council, Inc.
(15038) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Heritage Cultural Institute
(60562) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of ImageOut (60563) ........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Board (15297) ....................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Junior Achievement of New York (15263)
... 250,000 ........................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of La Central YMCA (60565) .................
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Long Island Cares (60566) ...............
200,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Long Island Youth Foundation (15043) ....
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of Mary Nelson Youth Center (60567) ........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (15255) ... 500,000 ........... (re. $343,000)
For services and expenses of Minkwon Center for Community Action, Inc.
(60568) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New Rochelle Boys and Girls Club (60569)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Pakistani American Society of New York
(60514) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Players of Utica (60571) ................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $39,000)
For services and expenses of Riseboro (60572) ........................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $26,000)
For services and expenses of Simon Wiesenthal Center (60573) .........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)

592 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of South End Children's Cafe (60517) .......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Southside United HDFC / Los Sures (60518)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of St. Luke's Community Food Program (15266)
... 25,000 ........................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of St. Nicholas Chess 4 Kids, Inc. (15265)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of The Center for Youth (15011) ............
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of The Flatbush Development Corp (15295) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (60574) ......
50,000 ................................................ (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of Wellness Institute of Greater Buffalo
(60575) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of West Indian Day Carnival Association
(15268) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Wiz Kids Books B4 Basketball Program
(60576) ... 30,000 ................................... (re. $30,000)
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to an plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (15068)
... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $5,871,000)
For services and expenses of Association of New York State Youth
Bureaus (15021) ... 225,000 .......................... (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children and Families
(15126) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee NYC (15261) ..........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Common Point Queens (15029) .............
135,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15131) .............
300,000 ............................................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley -
LGBTQ+ Services (60614) ... 151,667 ................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Make the Road - Community Organizing
Projects (15045) ... 250,000 ........................ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (60578) ... 100,000 ............. (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of New York State YMCA Foundation (13957)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)

593 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses for NYPD Youth Explorers Program (15049) ...
100,000 .............................................. (re. $85,000)
For services and expenses of Shalom Task Force, Inc. (15143) .........
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
For services and expenses of Tri-Community Youth Agency (15054) ......
100,000 .............................................. (re. $26,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Youth Bureau (15057)
... 260,000 ......................................... (re. $260,000)
For services and expenses of Woodside on the Move (15244) ............
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of human services and veterans community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transfer between other agencies, including the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of veterans' services
with the approval of the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to an plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (60579) ................
10,660,000 ........................................ (re. $4,643,000)
For services and expenses of Community Voices for Youth and Families
of Long Island, pursuant to the following sub-schedule (15236)
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
Sub-Schedule
Long Island Advocacy Center,
Inc .............................. 201,371
TRI Community and Youth Agency
of Huntington .................... 201,370
Colonial Youth & Family
Services ......................... 123,287
Hispanic Brotherhood of Rock-
ville Centre, Inc ................. 61,644
Tempo Youth Services ................ 61,644
The Safe Center LI ................. 123,287
Hicksville Teen-Age Council,
Inc .............................. 201,370
Uniondale Community Council,
Inc .............................. 123,287

594 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Espoir International Youth
Program .......................... 201,370
Family and Children's Associ-
ation, Inc ....................... 201,370
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount appropriated
herein shall be available to reimburse for 98 percent of 65 percent
of eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed
by March 31, 2022 for those community preventive services provided
from October 1, 2020 through September 30, 2021 at a cost that does
not exceed the cost that was in effect on October 1, 2008 and that a
social services district can demonstrate had been approved by the
office of children and family services on or before October 1, 2008;
provided, however, that should insufficient funds be available to
provide state reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of such
costs, reimbursement shall be made proportionally to each district
based on the percentage of their total eligible claims to the amount
appropriated; and, provided further, however, that if the amount
appropriated exceeds the amount of funds necessary to reimburse 98
percent of 65 percent of the eligible social services district
expenditures, the office may, to the extent funds are available,
provide reimbursement for 98 percent of 65 percent of eligible
social services district expenditures for new community preventive
services programs approved by the office and only up to the amounts
approved by the office. A local social services district seeking
federal and/or state reimbursement for community preventive services
provided on or after October 1, 2020 must submit claims that sepa-
rately identify the costs of such services in a form and manner and
at such times as are required by the department of family assistance
and that information regarding outcome based measures that demon-
strate quality of services provided and program effectiveness be
submitted to the office of children and family services in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office. Of the
amount appropriated herein, up to $1,000,000 may be used to provide
additional funding to an eligible program or programs with evalu-
ation results that show program effectiveness and demonstrate
private monetary support as determined by the office of children and
family services and approved by the director of the budget (13999)
... 12,124,750 ...................................... (re. $914,000)
For services and expenses of the office of children and family
services and local social services districts for activities neces-
sary to comply with certain provisions of the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter 7 of the laws of 1999
and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record checks
for foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and adult
household members. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available
in accordance with a plan to be developed by the commissioner of the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget.

595 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
following appropriation shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments and credits. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for
94 percent of 98 percent of one-half of the non-federal share of the
national and state fees for fingerprinting foster care parents,
prospective adoptive parents, and other adult household members.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
chapter 7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006,
local social services districts shall reimburse the commissioner of
the office of children and family services for an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws of
1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006, the commissioner of the
office of children and family services shall, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state and national criminal
record checks and any other related costs. The commissioner shall
ensure expenditures made pursuant to this provision reflect appro-
priate federal and local shares. The commissioner of the office of
children and family services shall request that the commissioner of
the office of temporary and disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and family services in an
amount equal to 53.94 percent of the nonfederal share of such
payments provided that such reimbursement in payments reflects actu-
al expenditures made on behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the commissioner shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the commissioner of the office of
children and family services in an amount equal to 53.94 percent of
the non-federal share of such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur on or before the one
hundred and twentieth day following the close of the preceding quar-
ter and shall be charged among districts based on the number of
children currently placed in foster care in each local social
services district provided that this methodology is revised quarter-
ly to reflect most current available data. Amounts appropriated
herein may, subject to the director of the budget, be interchanged
or transferred with any other appropriation of the office of chil-
dren and family services or the office of temporary and disability
assistance as necessary to reimburse the state share of local social
services district costs appropriated herein (14002) ................
1,857,000 ......................................... (re. $1,857,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 829,100 ................................. (re. $697,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.

596 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency

597 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropriation
may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the dormitory
authority of the state of New York by such social services district
for expenses otherwise reimbursable under this appropriation and
such amounts shall be available for payment to the dormitory author-
ity of the state of New York for such amounts due and owing by such
social services district (13921) ... 6,620,000 .... (re. $6,620,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide youth sports activities and
education grant program for underserved youth under the age of eigh-
teen years pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and
family services and approved by the Director of the Budget (15080)
... 1,000,000 ........................................ (re. $54,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2021 to December 31,
2021; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-

598 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2021 through December
31, 2021 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and non-secure detention facili-
ties and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account -
22186 (13922) ... 76,160,000 ...................... (re. $1,888,000)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein shall be available to the office of children and
family services for payment of the state share of a county's prior
years claim for reimbursement based upon a subsequent review by the
office of actual expenditures for care, maintenance and supervision
provided to youth in detention, to address any underpayment of state

599 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
aid to the county for services and expenses for detention in a prior
calendar year (14067) ... 9,444,000 ............... (re. $9,442,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of Octo-
ber 1, 2021 through September 30, 2022 that have been approved by
the office of children and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget; provided, however, if a
municipality is unable to use all of its allocation for such program
period within the required time frames, the municipality may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver to permit
the municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for
an additional one-year program period for eligible expenditures.
Within the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be
limited to the amount of such municipality's distribution. A portion
of the funds appropriated herein may be used by the office to enter
into contracts to provide statewide training and technical assist-
ance and support to assist programs and municipalities to effec-
tively implement the supervision and treatment services for juve-
niles program and assess impact. These funds, not to exceed $500,000
in any program year, shall be exempt from the required county match-
ing funds.
The office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of the calendar
quarter in which the claimed services were delivered. These funds
shall not be used to supplant other state and local funds (14068)
... 8,376,000 ..................................... (re. $2,030,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $4,600,000)
For eligible services and expenses of youth development programs as
determined by the office of children and family services. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the contrary, a youth devel-

600 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
opment program shall mean a program designed to provide community-
level services to promote positive youth development but shall not
include approved runaway programs or transitional independent living
support programs as such terms are defined in section 532-a of the
executive law. Each county or a city with a population of one
million or more, which shall be known as a municipality, operating a
youth development program approved by the office of children and
family services shall be eligible for one hundred percent state
reimbursement of its qualified expenditures, subject to the amount
available under this appropriation and exclusive of any federal
funds made available therefor, not to exceed the municipality's
distribution of state aid for youth development programs. The amount
appropriated herein for youth development programs shall be distrib-
uted by the office of children and family services to eligible muni-
cipalities that have a comprehensive plan that has been developed in
consultation with the applicable municipal youth bureau and approved
by the office of children and family services. The distribution of
the amount appropriated herein to eligible municipalities by the
office of children and family services shall be based on factors as
determined by the office and subject to the approval of the director
of budget; such factors shall include the number of youth under the
age of twenty-one residing in the municipality as shown by the last
published federal census certified in the same manner as provided by
section 54 of the state finance law and may include, but not be
limited to, the percentage of youth living in poverty within the
municipality or such other factors as provided for in the regu-
lations of the office of children and family services. Up to fifteen
percent of the youth development funds that a municipality would
allocate to an approved local youth bureau pursuant to an approved
comprehensive plan may be used for administrative functions
performed by such local youth bureau. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, an approved local youth bureau that is not
providing, operating, administering or monitoring youth development
programs shall not receive funding under this appropriation. The
office shall not reimburse any claims for youth development programs
unless they are submitted within twelve months of the calendar quar-
ter in which the expenditure was made. The office may require that
such claims be submitted to the office electronically in the manner
and format required by the office. A municipality may enter into
contracts to effectuate its youth development program as approved by
the office of children and family services. No expenditures shall be
made from this appropriation for youth development programs until a
plan has been approved by the director of the budget and a certif-
icate of approval allocating these funds has been issued by the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, provisions
relating to youth development programs and runaway and homeless
youth services pursuant to part G of chapter 57 of laws of 2013, as
amended by part M of the chapter 56 of the laws of 2017, shall here-
by remain in effect (13925) ... 14,121,700 ........ (re. $2,096,000)

601 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses provided by local probation departments, for
the post-placement care of youth leaving a youth residential facili-
ty and for services and expenses of the office of children and fami-
ly services related to community-based programs for youth in the
care of the office of children and family services which may include
but not be limited to multi-systemic therapy, family functional
therapy and/or functional therapeutic foster care, and electronic
monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available subject to the
approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14010) ... 311,700 ....... (re. $310,000)
For services and expenses related to a pilot program, which shall be
cost neutral to participating providers, to provide flexible, survi-
vor-centered services to individuals and families who have experi-
enced domestic violence (15065) ....................................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the home visiting program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to continue or expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing contractors are not satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive proc-
ess. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (13928) .....
26,162,200 ........................................ (re. $5,249,000)
For services and expenses of the William B. Hoyt memorial children and
family trust fund, for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph a of
subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available, grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Programs funded through such trust
shall submit information regarding outcome based measures that
demonstrate quality of services provided and program effectiveness
to the office in a form and manner and at such times as required by
the office. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to the
office of children and family services miscellaneous special revenue
fund, children and family trust fund (14015) .......................
643,850 ............................................. (re. $643,850)
For services and expenses for supportive housing for young adults aged
25 years or younger leaving or having recently left foster care or

602 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
who had been in foster care for more than a year after their 16th
birthday and who are at-risk of street homelessness or sheltered
homelessness provided under the joint project between the state and
the city of New York, known as the New York New York III supportive
housing agreement. No expenditure shall be made until a certificate
of allocation has been approved by the director of the budget with
copies to be filed with the chairpersons of the senate finance
committee and the assembly ways and means committee. The amount
appropriated herein may be transferred or otherwise made available
to the city of New York administration for children's services for
services and expenses related to implementing the project.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except a chapter of
the laws of 2021 authorizing a 1 percent cost of living adjustment
increase, but including section 1 of part C of chapter 57 of the
laws of 2006, as amended by section 1 of part I of chapter 60 of the
laws of 2014, for the period commencing on April 1, 2021 and ending
March 31, 2022 the director shall not apply any other cost of living
adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement (13929) ...............
2,170,000 ........................................... (re. $314,000)
For services and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts for health,
human services, and community services organizations. Notwithstand-
ing section twenty-four of the state finance law or any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan approved by the temporary president of
the senate and the director of the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation (15072) ..........
450,230 ............................................. (re. $287,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Youth Bureau (15057)
... 285,000 ......................................... (re. $285,000)
For services and expenses of Association of New York State Youth
Bureaus (15021) ... 250,000 ........................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of NYPD Youth Explorers Program (15049) ...
100,000 .............................................. (re. $93,000)
For services and expenses of New York State Alliance of Boys and Girls
Club (13983) ... 750,000 .............................. (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Life After Loss Andre (15083) ...........
5,000 ................................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Lower East Side Girls Club (15084) ......
5,000 ................................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Rochester Jamaican Organization (15085)
... 5,000 ............................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Swim Strong Foundation (15086) ..........
5,000 ................................................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of 19th Ward Community Association (15087)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Bedford-Stuyvesant YMCA (15088) .........
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Dodge YMCA (15089) ......................
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)

603 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of HEAVN (15090) ...........................
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Manhasset Great Neck Economic Opportunity
Council (15091) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Queens Community House (15092) ..........
10,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Shorefront Jewish Community Council Food
Pantry (15093) ... 10,000 ............................ (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater New York (13977) ........
280,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Swim Strong Foundation of Far Rockaway
(15097) ... 15,000 ................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Asian Americans for Equality (15278) ....
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Castle Hill YMCA (15099) ................
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Housing and Family Services of Greater
New York, Inc (15001) ... 20,000 ..................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Community Council of Pelham Park-
way (15106) ... 20,000 ............................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of New Life Community Development Corpo-
ration (15109) ... 20,000 ............................ (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Bernice Caesar Multi-Purpose Center
(15113) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Caribbean American Center of New York,
Inc (15114) ... 25,000 ................................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Covenant House (15116) ..................
20,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Equinox Youth Services (15117) ..........
25,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of South End Meals (15119) .................
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Weeksville Heritage Center (15056) ......
25,000 ............................................... (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of Gantry Parents Association (15036) ......
30,000 ............................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Pelham Together (15053) .................
30,000 ............................................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge Heights Community Center
(15121) ... 35,000 ................................... (re. $35,000)
For services and expenses of Throggs Neck Community Action Partnership
(15124) ... 40,000 .................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (D/B/A Met Council) (15255) ..................
155,000 .............................................. (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of OHEL Children's Home and Family Services,
Inc. (15380) ... 55,000 .............................. (re. $55,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children & Families
(15126) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Baden Street Settlement (15127) .........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)

604 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Flatbush YMCA (15129) ...................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Highland Park Conservancy (15130) .......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15131) .............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15226) .............
500,000 .............................................. (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Theatre Interactions (15060) ......
90,000 ............................................... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Rochdale Village NORC (15136) ...........
58,000 ............................................... (re. $58,000)
For services and expenses of Campaign Against Hunger (15023) .........
60,000 ............................................... (re. $60,000)
For services and expenses of Federation of Italian American Organiza-
tions (15033) ... 80,000 ............................. (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Long Beach Christmas Angel (15042) ......
85,000 ............................................... (re. $85,000)
For services and expenses of Newburgh LGBTQ+ Center (15140) ..........
96,000 ............................................... (re. $96,000)
For services and expenses of Emerald Isle Immigration Center (15141)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Fortune Society--Freedom Commons (15035)
... 100,000 ........................................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of Gateway Youth Outreach, Inc. (GYO)
(13990) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $67,000)
For services and expenses of Mt. Olive Lackawanna Life Center Campus
Project (15142) ... 150,000 ......................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Tri Community Youth Agency (15054) ......
100,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater NY -- Bedford-Stuyvesant
YMCA (15058) ... 100,000 .............................. (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Martin Luther King Multi-Purpose Center
(15271) ... 110,000 ................................. (re. $110,000)
For services and expenses of Common Point Queens (15029) .............
135,000 ............................................. (re. $135,000)
For services and expenses of Shalom Task Force (STF) (15143) .........
175,000 .............................................. (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of Woodside on the Move (15244) ............
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of The Mary Mitchell Family and Youth Center
(15144) ... 200,000 ................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Urban Upbound (15064) ...................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Chinese American Planning Council
[(15286)] (15027) ... 360,000 ........................ (re. $91,000)
For services and expenses of Delta Minerva Life Development Center,
Inc (15146) ... 2,500 ................................. (re. $2,500)
For services and expenses of LGBTQI Advocacy Institute of Equality New
York (15147) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000)

605 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Greater Ridgewood Youth Council (15038)
... 90,000 ............................................ (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee NYC (15234) ..........
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund (15034) ..................
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $77,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater NY (60500) ..............
4,000,000 ........................................... (re. $214,000)
For services and expenses of Asian American Legal Defense (15010) ....
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Astor Services for Children & Families
(60501) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Elder Law and Justice (15251)
... 125,000 ........................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Chinese American Planning Council
[(15027)] (15286) ... 75,000 ......................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Family Justice Center of Erie County
(15032) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Irish Cultural and Folk Art Association
of WNY (60504) ... 75,000 ............................ (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Long Island Youth Foundation (15043) ...
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of St. Luke's Community Food Program (15266)
... 25,000 ........................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of St. Nicholas Chess 4 Kids, Inc. (15265)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of West Indian Carnival Day Association
(15268) ... 300,000 ................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Campaign Against Hunger (60509) .........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of HOUR Children, Inc (60513) ..............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Pakistani American Society of New York
(60514) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of SCO Family of Services Madonna Heights
School (60516) ... 40,000 ............................ (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of SOUTHSIDE UNITED HDFC / LOS SURES (60518)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Acacia Network - Hispanos Unidos de
Buffalo (60520) ... 150,000 .......................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of for New York Immigration Coalition
(15274) ... 1,500,000 ............................... (re. $103,000)
For services and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with
certain municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwith-
standing section twenty-four of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan approved by the speaker
of the assembly and the director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropriation
(15068) ... 6,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,867,000)

606 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding subdivision 5 of section 24 of the state finance law,
the sum of $10,000,000 is hereby made available subject to a plan to
be approved by the director of the budget (60522) ..................
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,443,000)
For services and expenses related to the settlement house program.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14017) ... 2,450,000 ..... (re. $699,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of Community Voices for Youth and Families
of Long Island, pursuant to the following sub-schedule (15236)
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
Sub-Schedule
Long Island Advocacy Center,
Inc .............................. 201,371
TRI Community and Youth Agency
of Huntington .................... 201,370
Colonial Youth & Family
Services ......................... 123,287
Hispanic Brotherhood of Rock-
ville Centre, Inc ................. 61,644
Tempo Youth Services ................ 61,644
The Safe Center LI ................. 123,287
Hicksville Teen-Age Council,
Inc .............................. 201,370
Uniondale Community Council,
Inc .............................. 123,287
Espoir International Youth
Program .......................... 201,370
Family and Children's Associ-
ation, Inc ....................... 201,370
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of The New Pride Agenda, Inc. administered
by the fund for the City of New York (15061) .......................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of The New Pride Agenda, Inc. administered
by the fund for the City of New York (60507) .......................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:

607 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be made available to reimburse 62 percent of
eligible social services district expenditures that are claimed by
March 31, 2021 for child welfare services which shall include and be
limited to preventive services provided pursuant to section 409-a of
the social services law other than community optional preventive
services, child protective services, independent living services,
after-care services as defined in regulations of the department of
family assistance, and adoption administration and services, other
than adoption subsidies provided pursuant to title 9 of article 6 of
the social services law and regulations of the department of family
assistance incurred on or after October 1, 2019 and before October
1, 2020 and that are otherwise reimbursable by the state on or after
April 1, 2020, after first deducting therefrom any federal funds
properly received or to be received on account thereof upon certif-
ication by the social services district that it will not be using
these funds to supplant other state and local funds and that the
district will not submit claims for reimbursement under this appro-
priation for the same type and level of services that the county
previously provided and claimed under any contract in existence on
October 1, 2002 as other than child protective, preventive, inde-
pendent living, after care or adoption services or adoption adminis-
tration.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits; provided, however, that notwithstanding
any other provision of law, for a district to receive reimbursement
for such services, the amount of funds that the district expends on
such services from its flexible fund for family services allocation
and any flexible fund for family services funds transferred at the
district's request to the title XX social services block grant must,
to the extent that families are eligible therefore, be equal to or
greater than the district's portion of the $382,322,341 statewide
child welfare threshold amount, which shall be established pursuant
to a formula developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the office of children and family services and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, selected social services
districts may authorize the office of temporary and disability
assistance to intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the
office of children and family services otherwise due to the
districts under this appropriation and/or under any other general
fund - aid to localities appropriation available to such districts
to suballocate to the office of mental health and subsequently for
suballocation from the office of mental health to the department of
health to use for the 38.9 percent of the non-federal share of the
medical assistance payments for home and community based waiver
services provided in accordance with subdivision 9 of section 366 of
the social services law as authorized by such selected social

608 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
services districts which choose to use preventive services funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, social services districts
may authorize the office of temporary and disability assistance to
intercept a portion of the funds on behalf of the office of children
and family services otherwise due to the districts under this appro-
priation and/or under any other general fund - aid to localities
appropriation available to such districts to transfer to any miscel-
laneous special revenue fund available to the office of children and
family services to use for the local share of the federal funds
available for education and training vouchers provided in accordance
with section 477 of title IV-E of the social security act as author-
ized by such social services districts which choose to use funds to
support such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments for adoption subsidies by
direct deposit or debit card. Local social services districts shall
reimburse the office for the costs of administering such direct
deposit or debit card payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the office of children and family services

609 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall, on a quarterly basis, request that the office of temporary
and disability assistance reimburse the office of children and fami-
ly services in an amount equal to 38 percent of the non-federal
share of the costs of administering such direct deposit or debit
card payments to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of children and
family services shall reissue per diem rates, required pursuant to
section 529 of the executive law, for calendar years 2002 through
2009 to remove any adjustments to the costs included in determining
such rates to reflect any changes in federal funding made available
to the office or to local social services districts for such costs
and, provided further, the office shall not include any such adjust-
ments in per diem rates established hereafter.
All reimbursement made by local social services districts for care,
maintenance and supervision under this section shall be paid direct-
ly to the state through the office of children and family services
for deposit into a miscellaneous special revenue fund known as the
youth facility per diem account.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropri-
ation, may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the state
under section 529 of the executive law (13998) .....................
610,073,000 ........................................... (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 829,100 ................................. (re. $601,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the

610 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, amounts
due and owing to a social services district under this appropriation
may be reduced up to such amounts due and owing to the dormitory
authority of the state of New York by such social services district

611 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
for expenses otherwise reimbursable under this appropriation and
such amounts shall be available for payment to the dormitory author-
ity of the state of New York for such amounts due and owing by such
social services district (13921) ... 6,620,000 .... (re. $6,620,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2020 to December 31,
2020; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2020 through December
31, 2020 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and non-secure detention facili-
ties and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and

612 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account -
22186 (13922) ... 76,160,000 ...................... (re. $7,017,000)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein shall be available to the office of children and
family services for payment of the state share of a county's prior
years claim for reimbursement based upon a subsequent review by the
office of actual expenditures for care, maintenance and supervision
provided to youth in detention, to address any underpayment of state
aid to the county for services and expenses for detention in a prior
calendar year (14067) ... 9,444,000 ............... (re. $9,444,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of Octo-
ber 1, 2020 through September 30, 2021 that have been approved by
the office of children and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget; provided, however, if a
municipality is unable to use all of its allocation for such program
period within the required time frames, the municipality may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver to permit
the municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for
an additional one-year program period for eligible expenditures.
Within the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be
limited to the amount of such municipality's distribution. A portion
of the funds appropriated herein may be used by the office to enter
into contracts to provide statewide training and technical assist-
ance and support to assist programs and municipalities to effec-
tively implement the supervision and treatment services for juve-
niles program and assess impact. These funds, not to exceed $500,000
in any program year, shall be exempt from the required county match-
ing funds.
The office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of the calendar
quarter in which the claimed services were delivered. These funds

613 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall not be used to supplant other state and local funds (14068)
... 8,376,000 ..................................... (re. $2,062,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $4,561,000)
For services and expenses provided by local probation departments, for
the post-placement care of youth leaving a youth residential facili-
ty and for services and expenses of the office of children and fami-
ly services related to community-based programs for youth in the
care of the office of children and family services which may include
but not be limited to multi-systemic therapy, family functional
therapy and/or functional therapeutic foster care, and electronic
monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available subject to the
approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14010) ... 311,700 ....... (re. $303,000)
For services and expenses related to a pilot program, which shall be
cost neutral to participating providers, to provide flexible, survi-
vor-centered services to individuals and families who have experi-
enced domestic violence (15065) ... 5,000,000 ..... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the home visiting program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to continue or expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing contractors are not satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive proc-
ess. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form

614 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and manner and at such times as required by the office (13928)
26,162,200 ........................................ (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of the William B. Hoyt memorial children and
family trust fund, for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Programs funded through such trust shall submit infor-
mation regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office. Funds appro-
priated herein may be transferred to the office of children and
family services miscellaneous special revenue fund, children and
family trust fund (14015) ... 643,850 ............... (re. $612,000)
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund (15034) ..................
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $45,000)
For services and expenses of New York State YMCA Foundation (13957) ..
400,000 ............................................. (re. $400,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Cornell Center in Buffalo
(15074) ... 150,000 ................................... (re. $2,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding
section twenty-four of the state finance law or any provision of law
to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation (15068) ......................
6,700,000 ......................................... (re. $3,109,000)
For services and expenses of Asian Americans for Equality (15278) ...
100,000 .............................................. (re. $51,000)
For services and expenses of Chinese American Planning Council
[(15286)] (15027) ... 90,000 ......................... (re. $52,000)
For services and expenses of Commonpoint Queens (15029) ..............
135,000 ............................................. (re. $135,000)
For services and expenses of the Fearless! (Safe Homes of Orange Coun-
ty) (15051) ... 60,000 ............................... (re. $60,000)
For services and expenses of the Federation of Italian American Organ-
izations (15033) ... 80,000 .......................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Fortune Society Freedom Commons (15035)
... 100,000 ........................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Gantry Parents Association (15036) ......
30,000 ............................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Gateway Youth Outreach (13990) ..........
90,000 ............................................... (re. $46,000)
For services and expenses of Hudson Guild - Hartley House (15070) ...
40,000 ................................................ (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
(15040) ... 400,000 ................................. (re. $400,000)

615 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Long Beach Christmas Angel (15042) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of NYPD Youth Explorers Program (15049) ....
100,000 .............................................. (re. $63,000)
For services and expenses of the Tri Community Youth Agency (15054)
... 100,000 .......................................... (re. $26,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Youth Bureau (15057)
... 225,000 ......................................... (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of Woodside on the Move (15244) ............
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater NY - Bedford Stuyvesant
YMCA (15058) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Theatre Interactions, Inc (15060)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts for health,
human services, and community services organizations. Notwithstand-
ing section twenty-four of the state finance law or any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan approved by the temporary president of
the senate and the director of the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation (15072) ..........
2,846,509 ......................................... (re. $1,415,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of Community Voices for Youth and Families
of Long Island, pursuant to the following sub-schedule (15236)
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
Sub-Schedule
Long Island Advocacy Center,
Inc .............................. 201,371
TRI Community and Youth Agency
of Huntington .................... 201,370
Colonial Youth & Family
Services ......................... 123,287
Hispanic Brotherhood of Rock-
ville Centre, Inc ................. 61,644
Tempo Youth Services ................ 61,644
The Safe Center LI ................. 123,287
Hicksville Teen-Age Council,
Inc .............................. 201,370
Uniondale Community Council,
Inc .............................. 123,287
Espoir International Youth
Program .......................... 201,370
Family and Children's Associ-
ation, Inc ....................... 201,370

616 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of the office of children and family
services and local social services districts for activities neces-
sary to comply with certain provisions of the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter 7 of the laws of 1999
and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record checks
for foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and adult
household members. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available
in accordance with a plan to be developed by the commissioner of the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the following appropriation shall be net of refunds,
rebates, reimbursements and credits. Funds appropriated herein shall
be available for 94 percent of 98 percent of one-half of the non-
federal share of the national and state fees for fingerprinting
foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and other adult
household members.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
chapter 7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006,
local social services districts shall reimburse the commissioner of
the office of children and family services for an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws of
1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006, the commissioner of the
office of children and family services shall, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state and national criminal
record checks and any other related costs. The commissioner shall
ensure expenditures made pursuant to this provision reflect appro-
priate federal and local shares. The commissioner of the office of
children and family services shall request that the commissioner of
the office of temporary and disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and family services in an
amount equal to 53.94 percent of the nonfederal share of such
payments provided that such reimbursement in payments reflects actu-
al expenditures made on behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the commissioner shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the commissioner of the office of
children and family services in an amount equal to 53.94 percent of
the non-federal share of such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur on or before the one
hundred and twentieth day following the close of the preceding quar-
ter and shall be charged among districts based on the number of
children currently placed in foster care in each local social
services district provided that this methodology is revised quarter-
ly to reflect most current available data. Amounts appropriated
herein may, subject to the director of the budget, be interchanged

617 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
or transferred with any other appropriation of the office of chil-
dren and family services or the office of temporary and disability
assistance as necessary to reimburse the state share of local social
services district costs appropriated herein (14002) ................
1,857,000 ........................................... (re. $610,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 829,100 ................................. (re. $102,000)
For services and expenses, including local administrative costs, for
providing medicaid home and community based waiver services pursuant
to subdivision 12 of section 366 of the social services law. The
amount appropriated herein is subject to a spending plan approved by
the division of the budget and may be available for transfer or
suballocation to the department of health for the medical assistance
program for such services and expenses incurred prior to April 1,
2019.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for the period
commencing on April 1, 2019 and ending March 31, 2020 the commis-
sioner shall not apply any cost of living adjustment for the purpose
of establishing rates of payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement (13919) ... 73,289,000 ............. (re. $34,178,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, the money
hereby appropriated shall be available to the office net of disal-
lowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in

618 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
The amounts appropriated herein shall be available for reimbursement
of local district claims only to the extent that such claims are
submitted within twenty-four months of the last day of the state
fiscal year in which the expenditures were incurred, unless waived
for good cause by the commissioner subject to the approval of the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for the period
commencing on April 1, 2019 and ending March 31, 2020 the commis-
sioner shall not apply any cost of living adjustment for the purpose
of establishing rates of payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement.
Notwithstanding subdivision 10 of section 153 of the social services
law and any other provision of law to the contrary, for state fiscal
year 2019-20, the amount appropriated herein shall be available for
18.424 percent reimbursement for local expenditures for maintenance
of handicapped children placed by school districts, outside of those
located within a city having a population of one million or more,
pursuant to article 89 of the education law, except that in the case
of a student attending a state-operated school for the deaf or blind
pursuant to article 87 or 88 of the education law who was not placed
in such school by a school district shall be subject to 94 percent
of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement by the state after first
deducting therefrom any federal funds received or to be received on
account of such expenditures (13920) ...............................
22,009,000 .......................................... (re. $126,000)
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, the money
hereby appropriated shall be available to the office net of disal-
lowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds

619 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006
(13921) ... 6,620,000 ............................. (re. $5,632,000)

620 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2019 to December 31,
2019; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2019 through December
31, 2019 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and non-secure detention facili-
ties and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of
secure and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services

621 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account -
22186 (13922) ... 76,160,000 ..................... (re. $13,348,000)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein shall be available to the office of children and
family services for payment of the state share of a county's prior
years claim for reimbursement based upon a subsequent review by the
office of actual expenditures for care, maintenance and supervision
provided to youth in detention, to address any underpayment of state
aid to the county for services and expenses for detention in a prior
calendar year (14067) ... 9,444,000 ............... (re. $6,271,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of Octo-
ber 1, 2019 through September 30, 2020 that have been approved by
the office of children and family services pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget; provided, however, if a
municipality is unable to use all of its allocation for such program
period within the required time frames, the municipality may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver to permit
the municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for
an additional one-year program period for eligible expenditures.
Within the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be
limited to the amount of such municipality's distribution. The
office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of the calendar
quarter in which the claimed services were delivered. These funds
shall not be used to supplant other state and local funds (14068)
... 8,376,000 ..................................... (re. $2,038,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the

622 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $4,445,000)
For services and expenses provided by local probation departments, for
the post-placement care of youth leaving a youth residential facili-
ty and for services and expenses of the office of children and fami-
ly services related to community-based programs for youth in the
care of the office of children and family services which may include
but not be limited to multi-systemic therapy, family functional
therapy and/or functional therapeutic foster care, and electronic
monitoring.
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available subject to the
approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget.
Funded programs shall submit information regarding outcome based
measures that demonstrate quality of services provided and program
effectiveness to the office in a form and manner and at such times
as required by the office (14010) ... 311,700 ........ (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses related to the home visiting program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to continue or expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily performing as determined by the
office of children and family services, to award new contracts to
continue programs where the existing contractors are not satisfac-
torily performing as determined by the office of children and family
services and/or to award new contracts through a competitive proc-
ess. Such contracts shall provide for submission of information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness to the office in a form
and manner and at such times as required by the office (13928) .....
26,162,200 ........................................ (re. $1,006,000)
For services and expenses of a public/private partnership pilot
program to fund new and expand existing preventive, early childhood
development, and other services to at-risk children, youth and fami-
lies and such funds shall not be used to supplant other state, local
or federal funding. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, state funding for the pilot program shall be limited
to the amount appropriated herein and shall not constitute more than
65 percent of eligible program expenditures, with the remaining 35
percent of program expenditures to be supported with private funds.
The funds shall be distributed through a competitive process for
services in an eligible region pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget. Eligible regions are the Capital, Central New York,

623 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Finger Lakes, Long Island, Mid-Hudson, Mohawk Valley, New York City,
North Country, Southern Tier or Western New York regions (13903) ...
3,594,000 ......................................... (re. $1,161,000)
For services and expenses of American-Legion Girls State Program
(15019) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Asian American Legal Defense (15010)
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Asian Americans for Equality (15278)
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Association of New York State Youth
Bureaus (15021) ... 250,000 ........................... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of Campaign Against Hunger (15023) .........
60,000 ............................................... (re. $11,413)
For services and expenses of Chinese American Planning Council
[(15286)] (15027) ... 90,000 ......................... (re. $48,000)
For services and expenses of the Chinese American Planning Council
Manhattan Community Center (15026) ... 75,000 ........ (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of the Chinese American Planning Council
[(15027)] (15286) ... 75,000 ......................... (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee for New York City
(15234) ... 200,000 .................................. (re. $27,000)
For services and expenses of Common Point Queens (15029) .............
135,000 ............................................. (re. $135,000)
For services and expenses of Community Voices for Youth and Families
of Long Island (15236) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $336,000)
For services and expenses of East Flatbush Village (15031) ...........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Edwin Gould Service for Children and
Families (15267) ... 90,000 .......................... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Federation of Italian American Organiza-
tions (15033) ... 80,000 ............................. (re. $29,000)
For services and expenses of Fresh Air Fund (15034) ..................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $114,000)
For services and expenses of Fortune Society Freedom Commons (15035)
... 100,000 .......................................... (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of Gantry Parents Association (15036) ......
30,000 ............................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Gateway Youth Outreach (13990) ..........
90,000 ............................................... (re. $58,000)
For services and expenses of Greater Ridgewood Youth Council (15038)
... 90,000 ........................................... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Hartley House Inc (15039) ...............
40,000 ................................................ (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation (15226) .............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Board (15297) ....................
100,000 .............................................. (re. $64,000)
For services and expenses of Jewish Child Care Association (15270) ...
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Junior Achievement of NY (15263) ........
250,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)

624 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
(15040) ... 400,000 .................................. (re. $45,000)
For services and expenses of La Liga, the Spanish Action League of
Onondaga County (15041) ... 90,000 ................... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Long Beach Christmas Angel (15042) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Long Island Youth Foundation (15043)
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of Long Island Pre-Kindergarten Technical
Assistance Center (15044) ... 250,000 ................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Make the Road New York (15045) ..........
90,000 ............................................... (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of Metropolitan New York Coordinating Coun-
cil on Jewish Poverty (15255) ... 90,000 .............. (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of New York State Coalition Against Domestic
Violence (15048) ... 150,000 ........................ (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of NYPD Youth Explorers Program (15049) ...
100,000 .............................................. (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of New York State Alliance of Boys and Girls
Club (13983) ... 750,000 .............................. (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of New York State YMCA Foundation (13957)
... 400,000 ......................................... (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses of Oneida County Youth Bureau (15050) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Opportunities for a Better Tomorrow
(15245) ... 150,000 .................................. (re. $26,000)
For services and expenses of Ossining Children's Center (15052) ......
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of St. Nicholas Chess 4 Kids, Inc (15265)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Tri Community Youth Agency (15054) ......
100,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Weeksville Heritage Center (15056) ......
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of West Indian American Day Carnival Associ-
ation (15268) ... 125,000 ............................ (re. $22,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester County Youth Bureau (15057)
... 225,000 .......................................... (re. $56,000)
For services and expenses of Woodside on the Move (15244) ............
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of YMCA of Greater NY - Bedford Stuyvesant
YMCA (15058) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $22,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Theatre Interactions, Inc (15060)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Pathways 2 Apprenticeship (15062) .......
100,000 .............................................. (re. $13,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of Arab American Family Support Center
(15020) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)

625 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of the Capital District YMCA (15077) .......
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses of the office of children and family
services and local social services districts for activities neces-
sary to comply with certain provisions of the adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89) and chapter 7 of the laws of 1999
and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006 requiring criminal record checks
for foster care parents, prospective adoptive parents, and adult
household members. Funds appropriated herein shall be made available
in accordance with a plan to be developed by the commissioner of the
office of children and family services and approved by the director
of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
following appropriation shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments and credits. Funds appropriated herein shall be available for
94 percent of 98 percent of one-half of the non-federal share of the
national and state fees for fingerprinting foster care parents,
prospective adoptive parents, and other adult household members.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
chapter 7 of the laws of 1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006,
local social services districts shall reimburse the commissioner of
the office of children and family services for an amount equal to
53.94 percent of the non-federal share of the cost of obtaining
state and national fingerprint records. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and pursuant to chapter 7 of the laws of
1999 and chapter 668 of the laws of 2006, the commissioner of the
office of children and family services shall, on behalf of local
social services districts, make payments to the division of criminal
justice services for processing of state and national criminal
record checks and any other related costs. The commissioner shall
ensure expenditures made pursuant to this provision reflect appro-
priate federal and local shares. The commissioner of the office of
children and family services shall request that the commissioner of
the office of temporary and disability assistance reimburse the
commissioner of the office of children and family services in an
amount equal to 53.94 percent of the nonfederal share of such
payments provided that such reimbursement in payments reflects actu-
al expenditures made on behalf of each local social services
district to capture the local share of such costs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the social services law
or the state finance law, the commissioner shall, on a quarterly
basis, request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance reimburse the commissioner of the office of
children and family services in an amount equal to 53.94 percent of
the non-federal share of such fees to capture the local share of
such fees. Such reimbursement shall occur on or before the one
hundred and twentieth day following the close of the preceding quar-

626 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ter and shall be charged among districts based on the number of
children currently placed in foster care in each local social
services district provided that this methodology is revised quarter-
ly to reflect most current available data. Amounts appropriated
herein may, subject to the director of the budget, be interchanged
or transferred with any other appropriation of the office of chil-
dren and family services or the office of temporary and disability
assistance as necessary to reimburse the state share of local social
services district costs appropriated herein (14002) ................
1,857,000 ......................................... (re. $1,049,000)
For services and expenses of certain child fatality review teams
approved by the office of children and family services for the
purposes of investigating and/or reviewing the death of children
(14004) ... 829,100 .................................. (re. $40,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2018 to December 31,
2018; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2018 through December
31, 2018 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention

627 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and nonsecure detention facilities
and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of secure
and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account
(22186) (13922) ... 76,160,000 ................... (re. $36,456,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $2,830,000)
For services and expenses of the advantage after school program. Such
funds are to be available pursuant to a plan prepared by the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget to extend or expand current contracts with community based
organizations, to award new contracts to continue programs where the

628 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as determined
by the office of children and family services and/or to award new
contracts through a competitive process to community based organiza-
tions (14014) ... 17,255,300 ..................... (re. $13,802,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State YMCA Foundation
(13957) ... 400,000 ................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of OHEL Children's Home and Family Services
(15380) ... 200,000 ................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses for the NYS Alliance of Boys & Girls Clubs
(13983) ... 700,000 ................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Yeled V'Yelda Early Childhood Center
(13904) ... 175,000 ................................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee for New York City
(15234) ... 150,000 ................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Citizens Committee for New York City
(15261) ... 200,000 ................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Hillside Children's Center for the Rein-
vesting in Youth program (15235) ... 260,000 ......... (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of Community Voices for Youth and Families
of Long Island (15236) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,485,000)
For services and expenses of Riverdale Neighborhood House (15225) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $54,000)
For services and expenses for Opportunities for a Better Tomorrow
(15245) ... 150,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses for the Jewish Board (15297) ...............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Hispanic Federation (15226) .........
200,000 .............................................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of the West Indian American Day Carnival
Association (15268) ... 125,000 ....................... (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of the Catholic Charities Neighborhood
Service (15250) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of the Dominican Women's Development Center
(15252) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $55,000)
For services and expenses of nonprofit human services organizations.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the
assembly and the director of the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in an assembly resolution calling for the
expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to the assembly upon a roll
call vote (15272) ... 5,000,000 ................... (re. $2,260,000)
For costs incurred by not for profit agencies that administer human
services programs related to increases in the minimum wage pursuant
to a plan approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law to the contrary, all or a portion of the
money hereby appropriated may be transferred or sub-allocated to any

629 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
aid to localities appropriation of any state department or agency
(15273) ... 15,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,602,000)
For services and expenses of New York Immigration Coalition (15274)
... 350,000 ........................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of St. Athanasius Catholic Academy (15243)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of Opportunities for a Better Tomorrow
(15257) ... 50,000 .................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Elder Law and Justice; such
funds may be sub-allocated to the Division of Criminal Justice
Services (15275) ... 125,000 .......................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of the Chinese American Planning Council
(15286) ... 100,000 ................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Community Service Society of New York
(15287) ... 50,000 .................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Community Voices Heard (15288) ..........
300,000 .............................................. (re. $53,000)
For services and expenses of Crown Heights Youth Collective (15289)
... 50,000 ............................................ (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Dominicanos USA, Inc (15290) ............
50,000 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Dominico American Society of Queens
(15291) ... 100,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Housing and Family Services of Greater
New York (15001) ... 65,000 .......................... (re. $22,000)
For services and expenses of SBH Community Service Network (13974) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of Young Mens and Young Womens Hebrew Asso-
ciation of the Bronx (15005) ... 50,000 .............. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of Elmcor Youth and Adult Activities, Inc
(15006) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $28,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For eligible services and expenses provided during state fiscal year
2017-18 by a city with a population in excess of one million for a
close to home initiative to provide juvenile justice services. Funds
appropriated herein shall be made available for eligible services
provided consistent with plans that cover juvenile delinquents in
non-secure and limited secure settings submitted by a city with a
population in excess of one million and approved by the office of
children and family services and the director of the budget. The
office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims for expenditures for residential services unless they are
submitted in final within twenty-two months of the calendar quarter
in which the claimed service or services were delivered and shall
not reimburse any claims that were or will be transferred from this
appropriation to the foster care block grant appropriation or the
child welfare services appropriation.
Notwithstanding any provision of articles 153, 154 and 163 of the
education law, there shall be an exemption from the professional
licensure requirements of such articles, and nothing contained in

630 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
such articles, or in any other provisions of law related to the
licensure requirements of persons licensed under those articles,
shall prohibit or limit the activities or services of any person in
the employ of a program or service operated, certified, regulated,
funded, approved by, or under contract with the office of children
and family services, a local governmental unit as such term is
defined in article 41 of the mental hygiene law, and/or a local
social services district as defined in section 61 of the social
services law, and all such entities shall be considered to be
approved settings for the receipt of supervised experience for the
professions governed by articles 153, 154 and 163 of the education
law, and furthermore, no such entity shall be required to apply for
nor be required to receive a waiver pursuant to section 6503-a of
the education law in order to perform any activities or provide any
services (13927) ... 41,400,000 .................. (re. $16,475,000)
For payment of state aid for services and expenses for programs pursu-
ant to section 530 of the executive law for secure and non-secure
detention services provided from January 1, 2017 to December 31,
2017; provided, however, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
law to the contrary, the liability of the state and the amount to be
distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to section
530 of the executive law shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursuant to such
law after taking into consideration any other limitations on the
amount of such expenditure or liability set forth in the state budg-
et for such year, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Within the amounts appropriated herein,
state reimbursement shall be limited to the amount of the munici-
pality's distribution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
allocations shall be based on a plan developed by the office of
children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget and shall be based, in part, on each municipality's history
of detention utilization, youth population and other factors as
determined by the office. Any portion of a municipality's distrib-
ution not claimed by the municipality for reimbursement of detention
expenditures made during the period January 1, 2017 through December
31, 2017 may be claimed by such municipality to reimburse 62 percent
of expenditures during such period for supervision and treatment
services for juveniles programs not otherwise reimbursable pursuant
to chapter 58 of the laws of 2011. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may provide for
reimbursement of up to 100 percent of the cost of care, maintenance
and supervision for youth whose residence is outside the county
providing the services up to the county's distribution; provided
that upon such reimbursement from this appropriation, the office of
children and family services shall bill, and the home county of such
youth shall reimburse the office of children and family services,
for 51 percent of the cost of care, maintenance and supervision of
such youth.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office of children and
family services may require that such claims and data on detention

631 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
use be submitted to the office electronically in the manner and
format required by the office.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the office shall be author-
ized to promulgate regulations permitting the office to impose
fiscal sanctions in the event that the office finds non-compliance
with regulations governing secure and nonsecure detention facilities
and to establish cost standards related to reimbursement of secure
and non-secure detention services.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys
appropriated herein with any other local assistance - general fund
appropriation within the office of children and family services
except where transfer or interchange of appropriation is prohibited
or otherwise restricted by law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a social services
district fails to provide reimbursement to the office of children
and family services pursuant to section 529 of the executive law
within 60 days of receiving a bill for services under such section,
or by the date certain set by such office for providing reimburse-
ment, whichever is later, the offices of the department of family
assistance are authorized to exercise the state's set-off rights by
withholding any amounts due and owing to such district under this
appropriation, up to such amounts due and owing to the state under
section 529 of the executive law and transferring such funds to the
miscellaneous special revenue fund youth facility per diem account
(22186).
Notwithstanding any provision of articles 153, 154 and 163 of the
education law, there shall be an exemption from the professional
licensure requirements of such articles, and nothing contained in
such articles, or in any other provisions of law related to the
licensure requirements of persons licensed under those articles,
shall prohibit or limit the activities or services of any person in
the employ of a program or service operated, certified, regulated,
funded, approved by, or under contract with the office of children
and family services, a local governmental unit as such term is
defined in article 41 of the mental hygiene law, and/or a local
social services district as defined in section 61 of the social
services law, and all such entities shall be considered to be
approved settings for the receipt of supervised experience for the
professions governed by articles 153, 154 and 163 of the education
law, and furthermore, no such entity shall be required to apply for
nor be required to receive a waiver pursuant to section 6503-a of
the education law in order to perform any activities or provide any
services (13922) ... 76,160,000 .................. (re. $31,147,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to

632 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $2,499,000)
For services and expenses of OHEL Children's Home and Family Services
(15380) ... 200,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Yeled V'Yelda Early Childhood Center
(13904) ... 200,000 .................................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expense of JCCA Healing Center (15216) ..............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Riverdale Neighborhood House (15225) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Big Brothers Big Sisters New York City
(15233) ... 150,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Hillside Children's Center for the Rein-
vesting in Youth program (15235) ... 260,000 .......... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of Community Voices for Youth and Families
of Long Island, pursuant to the following sub-schedule (15236)
1,012,000 ........................................... (re. $247,000)
sub-schedule
The Safe Center LI .................. 30,000
Time Out Club of Hempstead,
Inc ............................... 30,000
Uniondale Community Council ......... 30,000
Tempo Youth Services ................ 15,000
Five Towns Community Center,
Inc. .............................. 15,000
Hispanic Brotherhood of Rock-
ville Centre, Inc. ................ 15,000
Bridgehampton Child Care and
Recreational Center ............... 30,000
Colonial Youth & Family
Services .......................... 30,000
Glen Cove Boys and Girls Club
at Lincoln House, Inc. ............ 49,000
Glen Cove Youth Bureau .............. 49,000
La Fuerza Unida, Inc. ............... 49,000
Nassau County Coalition

633 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Against Domestic Violence,
Inc. .............................. 49,000
TRI Community and Youth Agency
of Huntington ..................... 49,000
Youth & Family Counseling
Agency of Oyster Bay .............. 49,000
Belmont Child Care Association ...... 49,000
Concerned Citizens for Roslyn
Youth, Inc ........................ 49,000
Copay, Inc. ......................... 49,000
Espoir International Youth
Program ........................... 49,000
Floral Park Youth Council ........... 49,000
Gateway Youth Outreach, Inc. ........ 33,000
Littig House Community Center,
Inc. .............................. 49,000
Long Island Advocacy Center,
Inc. .............................. 49,000
Manhasset-Great Neck Economic
Opportunity Council ............... 49,000
Family and Childrens Associ-
ation, Inc. ....................... 49,000
Hicksville Teen-Age Council,
Inc. .............................. 49,000
For services and expenses of Opportunities for a Better Tomorrow
(15245) ... 115,000 .................................. (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of Catholic Charities Neighborhood Services
(15250) ... 50,000 .................................... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of Dominican Women's Development Center
(15252) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of Mothers Aligned Saving Kids (15254) .....
50,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses for Bronx Jewish Community Council (15256)
... 135,000 ........................................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses for Opportunities for a Better Tomorrow
(15257) ... 100,000 ................................... (re. $6,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses of Catholic Charities Community Services,
Archdiocese of New York Alianza Dominicana (15249) .................
75,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, the money
hereby appropriated shall be available to the office net of disal-
lowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.

634 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein, or such other
amount as may be approved by the director of the budget, shall be
available for 94 percent of 98 percent of 50 percent reimbursement
after deducting any federal funds available therefor to social
services districts for amounts attributable to dormitory authority
billings or approved refinancing of such billings which result in
local social services districts' claims in excess of a local
district's foster care block grant allocation. In addition, subject
to the approval of the director of the budget, a portion of funds
appropriated herein, or such other amount as may be approved by the
director of the budget, shall be available for reimbursement related
to payments made by a social services district to foster care
providers subject to the provisions of section 410-i of the social
services law for expenses directly related to projects funded
through the housing finance agency for those foster care providers
which also received revised or supplemental rates from the applica-
ble regulating agency to accommodate the housing finance agency
payments or the refinancing of previously approved dormitory author-
ity payments.
Notwithstanding section 398-a of the social services law or any other
law to the contrary, such reimbursement shall be available for 94

635 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
percent of 98 percent of 50 percent of social services district
costs, after deducting federal funds available therefor, for those
social services districts' claims in excess of a social services
district's foster care block grant allocation for those amounts
exclusively attributable to the previously approved revised or
supplemental rates. In addition, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of funds appropriated herein may
also be used for payments to the dormitory authority of the state of
New York for advisory services including, but not limited to, site
visits and review of applications, building plans and cost estimates
for voluntary agency programs for which the office of children and
family services establishes maximum state aid rates and for capital
projects for residential institutions for children seeking financing
under paragraph b of subdivision 40 of section 1680 of the public
authorities law, as amended by chapter 508 of the laws of 2006
(13921) ... 6,620,000 ............................. (re. $3,846,000)
Notwithstanding section 530 of the executive law or any other law to
the contrary, for reimbursement of 49 percent of approved capital
expenditures for secure juvenile detention. Such reimbursement shall
be in the form of depreciation of approved capital costs and inter-
est on bonds, notes or other indebtedness necessarily undertaken to
finance construction costs. Notwithstanding any provision of laws to
the contrary, funding for such costs shall be limited to the amount
appropriated herein. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
office of children and family services may require that such claims
for reimbursement of capital expenditures be submitted to the office
electronically in the manner and format required by the office.
Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other
provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may,
upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of children and
family services, authorize the interchange of moneys appropriated
herein with any other local assistance - general fund appropriation
within the office of children and family services (14008) ..........
4,600,000 ......................................... (re. $2,362,000)
For state aid to reimburse 100 percent of social services district
expenditures related to the improvement of staff to client ratios in
the local district child protective workforce including, but not
limited to new hiring to increase the number of caseworkers and to
increase the number of supervisory staff in the local district child
protective workforce. Each social services district receiving these
funds shall certify that the district will not be using these funds
to supplant other state and local funds and that the district will
not submit claims for reimbursement under this appropriation for the
same type and level of funding so certified, and the district shall
submit to the office of children and family services information
regarding outcome based measures that demonstrate quality of
services provided and program effectiveness of such improved staff
to client ratios in a form and manner and at such times as required
by the office; provided, however, that a district may use these
funds for expenditures to continue or expand activities that were

636 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
funded with last year's appropriation that was enacted for this
purpose (14000) ... 758,000 ......................... (re. $108,000)
For services and expenses of Young Men's and Young Women's Hebrew
Association of Boro Park (13975) ... 25,000 ........... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Cattaraugus Youth Bureau (15211) ........
200,000 .............................................. (re. $30,000)
For services and expense of JCCA Healing Center (15216) ..............
400,000 ............................................. (re. $141,000)
For services and expenses of Riverdale Neighborhood House (15225) ...
100,000 .............................................. (re. $16,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses of HASC Center (13972) .....................
175,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the YMCA of Greater New York (13977) ...
200,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the New York State YMCA Foundation
(13957) ... 500,000 .................................. (re. $10,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount appro-
priated herein shall be available under the supervision and treat-
ment services for juveniles program for 62 percent state reimburse-
ment to counties and the city of New York for eligible expenditures
for the provision and administration of eligible supervision and
treatment services for juveniles programs during the period of April
1, 2014 through March 31, 2015 that have been approved by the office
of children and family services pursuant to a plan approved by the
director of the budget; provided, however, if a municipality is
unable to use or claim all of its allocation for such program period
within the required time frames, the municipality may apply to the
office of children and family services for a waiver to permit the
municipality to continue to have the funds available to it for an
additional one-year program period upon a showing and certification
by the municipality that such funds will be used only to reimburse
the municipality for eligible expenditures for eligible services
provided during the period of April 1, 2014 through March 31, 2015
for which the municipality was unable to claim within the required
timeframes and for non-recurring eligible services or expenses that
will occur during the period April 1, 2015 through March 31, 2016.
Any funds that are remaining after all such waivers have been
approved may be used to provide additional reimbursement to those
counties that chose to transfer funds from their detention block
grants into their supervision and treatment services for juveniles
programs for the April 1, 2014 through March 31, 2015 program period
proportionately to the amount each such district transferred.
Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 529-b of the
executive law or any other law to contrary, a municipality that was

637 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
eligible for a minimum funding allocation under the supervision and
treatment services for juveniles program for state fiscal year
2013-14 but did not submit an application for such funds may apply
to the office of children and family services for a waiver of the
local share requirement for the program funds for state fiscal year
2014-15 upon a showing that the municipality has fiscal issues that
significantly impact its ability to provide the required local share
and that providing the program funds to the municipality without a
local share will enable the municipality to implement services
designed to decrease the use of detention or residential care for
such youth.
Within the amounts appropriated herein, state reimbursement shall be
limited to the amount of such municipality's distribution. The
office of children and family services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted within 12 months of the calendar
quarter in which the claimed services were delivered. These funds
shall not be used to supplant other state and local funds (14068)
... 8,376,000 ..................................... (re. $2,013,000)
For services and expenses of the WAIT House for the Healthy Parenting
and Mentoring program (15382) ... 100,000 ............. (re. $3,000)
By chapter 110, section 15, of the laws of 2010:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, subject to an
expenditure plan approved by the director of the budget, for eligi-
ble services and expenses of improving the quality of child welfare
services that may include, but not be limited to, training to
mandated reporters regarding the proper identification of and
response to signs of child abuse and neglect, public information
programs and services that advance a zero tolerance campaign of
child abuse and neglect, and demonstration projects to test models
for new or targeted expansion of services beyond the level currently
funded by local social services districts including continuing to
contract with existing providers that are performing satisfactorily
(13916) ... 1,796,400 ............................... (re. $565,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Family First Transition Act Account - 25175
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to implementation of the family
first prevention services act pursuant to the federal family first
transition act (P.L. 116-94).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred, interchanged or suballocated to any
aid to localities or state operations appropriation within the
office of children and family services to accomplish the intent of
this appropriation (15066) ... 25,000,000 ........ (re. $21,926,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:

638 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to implementation of the family
first prevention services act pursuant to the federal family first
transition act (P.L. 116-94).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred, interchanged or suballocated to any
aid to localities or state operations appropriation within the
office of children and family services to accomplish the intent of
this appropriation (15066) ... 25,000,000 ......... (re. $8,172,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Social Services Block Grant Account - 25182
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses for supportive social services provided
pursuant to title XX of the federal social security act. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law, the moneys hereby appropriated
shall be apportioned by the office of children and family services
to local social services districts, to reimburse local district
expenditures for supportive services and training subject to the
approval of the director of the budget; provided, however, that
reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expenditures
for services incurred during a particular federal fiscal year will
be limited to expenditures claimed by March 31 of the following
year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, of the funds available
herein, including any funds transferred from the temporary assist-
ance to needy families block grant to the title XX block grant,
$66,000,000 shall be allocated to social services districts, solely
for reimbursement of expenditures for the provision and adminis-
tration of adult protective services, residential services for
victims of domestic violence who are not in receipt of public
assistance during the time the victims were residing in residential
programs for victims of domestic violence, and nonresidential
services for victims of domestic violence, pursuant to an allocation
plan developed by the office and submitted for approval by the divi-
sion of the budget no later than 60 days following enactment of this
chapter, based on each district's claims for such costs and any
other factors as identified in the allocation plan, adjusted by
applicable cost allocation methodology and net of any retroactive
payments for the 12 month period ending June 30, 2024 that are
submitted on or before January 2, 2025; provided, however, that if
the office determines that the total amount of a social services
district's claims for such services which could be reimbursed from
these funds is less than the amount allocated to the district for
such claims, the office may, subject to approval by the director of
the budget, reallocate the unused funds to other social services
districts with eligible claims that exceed their allocation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, of the
available funds appropriated herein, except for funds transferred to
Title XX by social services districts from their allocation of the

639 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
flexible fund for family services, and except for funds required by
this appropriation to be expended on adult protective services,
residential services for victims of domestic violence and training,
shall be solely available for child welfare services. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law to the contrary, funds allocated
herein that are available for child welfare services shall be allo-
cated to social services districts by the office of children and
family services based on each district's claims for such costs
incurred and any other factor as identified in the allocation plan.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, of the
amount appropriated herein a portion of funds may be set aside by
the office of children and family services to be utilized by local
departments of social services for eligible expenditures pursuant to
Subtitle B of Title XX of the Social Security Act, otherwise known
as the Elder Justice Act, as authorized and funded through the Coro-
navirus Response and Relief Supplement Appropriations Act of 2021;
any such funds shall be spent and claimed for in a manner and at
such time as directed by the office of children and family services.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in

640 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law (13985) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $61,136,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses for supportive social services provided
pursuant to title XX of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the moneys hereby appro-
priated shall be apportioned by the office of children and family
services to local social services districts, to reimburse local
district expenditures for supportive services and training subject
to the approval of the director of the budget; provided, however,
that reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expend-
itures for services incurred during a particular federal fiscal year
will be limited to expenditures claimed by March 31 of the following
year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, of the funds available
herein, including any funds transferred from the temporary assist-
ance to needy families block grant to the title XX block grant,
$66,000,000 shall be allocated to social services districts, solely
for reimbursement of expenditures for the provision and adminis-
tration of adult protective services, residential services for
victims of domestic violence who are not in receipt of public
assistance during the time the victims were residing in residential
programs for victims of domestic violence, and nonresidential
services for victims of domestic violence, pursuant to an allocation
plan developed by the office and submitted for approval by the divi-
sion of the budget no later than 60 days following enactment of this
chapter, based on each district's claims for such costs and any
other factors as identified in the allocation plan, adjusted by
applicable cost allocation methodology and net of any retroactive
payments for the 12 month period ending June 30, 2023 that are
submitted on or before January 2, 2024; provided, however, that if
the office determines that the total amount of a social services
district's claims for such services which could be reimbursed from
these funds is less than the amount allocated to the district for
such claims, the office may, subject to approval by the director of
the budget, reallocate the unused funds to other social services
districts with eligible claims that exceed their allocation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, of the
available funds appropriated herein, except for funds transferred to
Title XX by social services districts from their allocation of the
flexible fund for family services, and except for funds required by
this appropriation to be expended on adult protective services,
residential services for victims of domestic violence and training,
shall be solely available for child welfare services. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law to the contrary, funds allocated
herein that are available for child welfare services shall be allo-
cated to social services districts by the office of children and

641 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
family services based on each district's claims for such costs
incurred and any other factor as identified in the allocation plan.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, of the
amount appropriated herein a portion of funds may be set aside by
the office of children and family services to be utilized by local
departments of social services for eligible expenditures pursuant to
Subtitle B of Title XX of the Social Security Act, otherwise known
as the Elder Justice Act, as authorized and funded through the Coro-
navirus Response and Relief Supplement Appropriations Act of 2021;
any such funds shall be spent and claimed for in a manner and at
such time as directed by the office of children and family services.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of
state aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici-
palities. Subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the office net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law (13985) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $60,710,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:

642 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses for supportive social services provided
pursuant to title XX of the federal social security act. Notwith-
standing any other provision of law, the moneys hereby appropriated
shall be apportioned by the office of children and family services
to local social services districts, to reimburse local district
expenditures for supportive services and training subject to the
approval of the director of the budget; provided, however, that
reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expenditures
for services incurred during a particular federal fiscal year will
be limited to expenditures claimed by March 31 of the following
year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, of the funds available
herein, including any funds transferred from the temporary assist-
ance to needy families block grant to the title XX block grant,
$66,000,000 shall be allocated to social services districts, solely
for reimbursement of expenditures for the provision and adminis-
tration of adult protective services, residential services for
victims of domestic violence who are not in receipt of public
assistance during the time the victims were residing in residential
programs for victims of domestic violence, and nonresidential
services for victims of domestic violence, pursuant to an allocation
plan developed by the office and submitted for approval by the divi-
sion of the budget no later than 60 days following enactment of this
chapter, based on each district's claims for such costs and any
other factors as identified in the allocation plan, adjusted by
applicable cost allocation methodology and net of any retroactive
payments for the 12 month period ending June 30, 2022 that are
submitted on or before January 2, 2023; provided, however, that if
the office determines that the total amount of a social services
district's claims for such services which could be reimbursed from
these funds is less than the amount allocated to the district for
such claims, the office may, subject to approval by the director of
the budget, reallocate the unused funds to other social services
districts with eligible claims that exceed their allocation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, of the
available funds appropriated herein, except for funds transferred to
Title XX by social services districts from their allocation of the
flexible fund for family services, and except for funds required by
this appropriation to be expended on adult protective services,
residential services for victims of domestic violence and training,
shall be solely available for child welfare services. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law to the contrary, funds allocated
herein that are available for child welfare services shall be allo-
cated to social services districts by the office of children and
family services based on each district's claims for such costs
incurred and any other factor as identified in the allocation plan.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, of the
amount appropriated herein a portion of funds may be set aside by
the office of children and family services to be utilized by local
departments of social services for eligible expenditures pursuant to
Subtitle B of Title XX of the Social Security Act, otherwise known

643 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
as the Elder Justice Act, as authorized and funded through the Coro-
navirus Response and Relief Supplement Appropriations Act of 2021;
any such funds shall be spent and claimed for in a manner and at
such time as directed by the office of children and family services.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of state
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state comptroller or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law (13985) ... 150,000,000 ...... (re. $49,474,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Title IV-a, IV-b, IV-e Account - 25175
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses for the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program, including
related administrative expenses, and for services and expenses for

644 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
child welfare and family preservation and family support services
provided pursuant to title IV-a, subparts 1 and 2 of title IV-b and
title IV-e of the federal social security act including the federal
share of costs incurred implementing the federal adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89); provided, however, that
reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expenditures
for services other than the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program incurred
during a particular federal fiscal year will be limited to expendi-
tures claimed by March 31 of the following year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
adoption incentive payments received pursuant to section 473A of the
federal social security act shall be distributed by the office of
children and family services in a manner as determined by such
office for eligible services and expenditures.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi-
nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family
court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or
person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such
child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed
against such child any offense, that would render such child either
a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf-
ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L.
106-386, or any successor federal statute.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the

645 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any aid to local-
ities or state operations appropriation of any state department,
agency, or the judiciary (13955) ...................................
868,900,000 ..................................... (re. $820,895,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses for the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program, including
related administrative expenses, and for services and expenses for
child welfare and family preservation and family support services
provided pursuant to title IV-a, subparts 1 and 2 of title IV-b and
title IV-e of the federal social security act including the federal
share of costs incurred implementing the federal adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89); provided, however, that
reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expenditures
for services other than the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program incurred
during a particular federal fiscal year will be limited to expendi-
tures claimed by March 31 of the following year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
adoption incentive payments received pursuant to section 473A of the
federal social security act shall be distributed by the office of
children and family services in a manner as determined by such
office for eligible services and expenditures.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi-
nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family
court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or
person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such
child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed
against such child any offense, that would render such child either
a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf-
ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L.
106-386, or any successor federal statute.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of

646 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any aid to local-
ities or state operations appropriation of any state department,
agency, or the judiciary (13955) ...................................
868,900,000 ......................................... (re. $936,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses for the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program, including
related administrative expenses, and for services and expenses for
child welfare and family preservation and family support services
provided pursuant to title IV-a, subparts 1 and 2 of title IV-b and
title IV-e of the federal social security act including the federal
share of costs incurred implementing the federal adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89); provided, however, that
reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expenditures
for services other than the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program incurred
during a particular federal fiscal year will be limited to expendi-
tures claimed by March 31 of the following year.

647 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
adoption incentive payments received pursuant to section 473A of the
federal social security act shall be distributed by the office of
children and family services in a manner as determined by such
office for eligible services and expenditures.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi-
nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family
court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or
person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such
child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed
against such child any offense, that would render such child either
a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf-
ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L.
106-386, or any successor federal statute.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.

648 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any aid to local-
ities or state operations appropriation of any state department,
agency, or the judiciary (13955) ...................................
868,900,000 ..................................... (re. $350,963,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses for the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program, including
related administrative expenses, and for services and expenses for
child welfare and family preservation and family support services
provided pursuant to title IV-a, subparts 1 and 2 of title IV-b and
title IV-e of the federal social security act including the federal
share of costs incurred implementing the federal adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89); provided, however, that
reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expenditures
for services other than the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program incurred
during a particular federal fiscal year will be limited to expendi-
tures claimed by March 31 of the following year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
adoption incentive payments received pursuant to section 473A of the
federal social security act shall be distributed by the office of
children and family services in a manner as determined by such
office for eligible services and expenditures.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi-
nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family
court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or
person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such
child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed
against such child any offense, that would render such child either
a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf-
ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L.
106-386, or any successor federal statute.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made

649 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any aid to local-
ities or state operations appropriation of any state department,
agency, or the judiciary (13955) ...................................
868,900,000 ...................................... (re. $51,198,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses for the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program, including
related administrative expenses, and for services and expenses for
child welfare and family preservation and family support services
provided pursuant to title IV-a, subparts 1 and 2 of title IV-b and
title IV-e of the federal social security act including the federal
share of costs incurred implementing the federal adoption and safe
families act of 1997 (P.L. 105-89); provided, however, that
reimbursement to social services districts for eligible expenditures
for services other than the foster care and adoption assistance
program, and the kinship guardianship assistance program incurred
during a particular federal fiscal year will be limited to expendi-
tures claimed by March 31 of the following year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
adoption incentive payments received pursuant to section 473A of the
federal social security act shall be distributed by the office of
children and family services in a manner as determined by such
office for eligible services and expenditures.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi-
nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family
court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or
person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such
child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed
against such child any offense, that would render such child either

650 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf-
ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L.
106-386, or any successor federal statute.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner or the state commissioner of health as due from
local social services districts each month as their share of
payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social services law
may be set aside by the state comptroller in an interest-bearing
account with such interest accruing to the credit of the locality in
order to ensure the orderly and prompt payment of providers under
section 367-b of the social services law pursuant to an estimate
provided by the commissioner of health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within
the office of children and family services and/or the office of
temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the
office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of
paying local social services districts' costs of the above program
and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts
appropriated within the office of children and family services
general fund - local assistance account with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such approval with the depart-
ment of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways
and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any aid to local-
ities or state operations appropriation of any state department,
agency, or the judiciary (13955) ...................................
868,900,000 ...................................... (re. $56,833,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Children and Family Trust Fund Account - 20128
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

651 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the administration and implemen-
tation of contracts for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence under the William B. Hoyt memorial chil-
dren and family trust fund pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph (a)
of subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Funds appropriated to the children
and family trust fund shall be available for expenditure for such
services and expenses herein (14015) ... 3,459,000 (re. $3,459,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the administration and implemen-
tation of contracts for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence under the William B. Hoyt memorial chil-
dren and family trust fund pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph (a)
of subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Funds appropriated to the children
and family trust fund shall be available for expenditure for such
services and expenses herein (14015) ...............................
3,459,000 ......................................... (re. $2,765,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the administration and implemen-
tation of contracts for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence under the William B. Hoyt memorial chil-
dren and family trust fund pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph (a)
of subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Funds appropriated to the children
and family trust fund shall be available for expenditure for such
services and expenses herein (14015) ...............................
3,459,000 ......................................... (re. $2,723,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to the administration and implemen-
tation of contracts for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence under the William B. Hoyt memorial chil-
dren and family trust fund pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph a of
subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided

652 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Funds appropriated to the children
and family trust fund shall be available for expenditure for such
services and expenses herein (14015) ...............................
3,459,000 ......................................... (re. $2,591,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the administration and implemen-
tation of contracts for prevention and support service programs for
victims of family violence under the William B. Hoyt memorial chil-
dren and family trust fund pursuant to article 10-A of the social
services law. Provided, however, that notwithstanding paragraph a of
subdivision 2 of section 481-e of the social services law, such
funds shall be awarded through a competitive process and, provided
further, that notwithstanding subdivision 6 of such section, to the
extent funds are available grants renewed for subsequent years may
be funded at initial award level. Funds appropriated to the children
and family trust fund shall be available for expenditure for such
services and expenses herein (14015) ...............................
3,459,000 ......................................... (re. $2,658,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Family Preservation and Federal Family Violence Services Account -
22082
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses associated with the home visiting program,
the coordinated children's services initiative, domestic violence
programs and related programs, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (13911) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses associated with the home visiting program,
the coordinated children's services initiative, domestic violence
programs and related programs, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (13911) ..........................................
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses associated with the home visiting program,
the coordinated children's services initiative, domestic violence
programs and related programs, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (13911) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses associated with the home visiting program,
the coordinated children's services initiative, domestic violence
programs and related programs, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (13911) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $20,000,000)

653 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses associated with the home visiting program,
the coordinated children's services initiative, domestic violence
programs and related programs, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget. Provided however, of the amounts appropriated
herein, $10,000,000 shall be reserved for the expenditure of addi-
tional federal funding made available to recover from public health
emergencies (13911) ... 20,000,000 ............... (re. $19,983,000)
NEW YORK STATE COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of Helen Keller Services for the Blind
(15230) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $65,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of Helen Keller Services for the Blind
(15230) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $65,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of Helen Keller Services for the Blind
(15230) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $65,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of Helen Keller Services for the Blind
(15230) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $65,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of Helen Keller services for the Blind
(15230) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $65,000)
For services and expenses of Helen Keller services for the Blind -
Port Washington (15073) ... 50,000 ................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses of the National Federation of the Blind for
NFB-Newsline (13902) ... 75,000 ....................... (re. $6,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For services and expenses of the National Federation of the Blind for
NFB-Newsline (13902) ... 75,000 ....................... (re. $2,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund Rehabilitation Services/Supported Employment
Account - 25213
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

654 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for
the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education
department (13953) ... 350,000 ...................... (re. $350,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for
the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education
department (13953) ... 350,000 ...................... (re. $350,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for
the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education
department (13953) ... 350,000 ...................... (re. $350,000)
TRAINING AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For state reimbursement to local social services districts for train-
ing expenses associated with title IV-a, title IV-e, title IV-d,
title IV-f and title XIX of the federal social security act or their
successor titles and programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds
shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation and/or
suballocated to any other agency for the purpose of paying local
social services district cost or may be increased or decreased by
interchange with any other appropriation or with any other item or
items within the amounts appropriated within the office of children
and family services - local assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
The amount appropriated herein, as may be adjusted by transfer of
general fund moneys for administration of child welfare, training
and development, public assistance, and food stamp programs appro-
priated in the office of children and family services and the office
of temporary and disability assistance, shall constitute total state

655 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
reimbursement for all local training programs in state fiscal year
2025-26 (13984) ... 4,815,800 ..................... (re. $2,574,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For state reimbursement to local social services districts for train-
ing expenses associated with title IV-a, title IV-e, title IV-d,
title IV-f and title XIX of the federal social security act or their
successor titles and programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation and/or
suballocated to any other agency for the purpose of paying local
social services district cost or may be increased or decreased by
interchange with any other appropriation or with any other item or
items within the amounts appropriated within the office of children
and family services - local assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
The amount appropriated herein, as may be adjusted by transfer of
general fund moneys for administration of child welfare, training
and development, public assistance, and food stamp programs appro-
priated in the office of children and family services and the office
of temporary and disability assistance, shall constitute total state
reimbursement for all local training programs in state fiscal year
2021-22 (13984) ... 4,815,800 ....................... (re. $316,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For state reimbursement to local social services districts for train-
ing expenses associated with title IV-a, title IV-e, title IV-d,
title IV-f and title XIX of the federal social security act or their
successor titles and programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation and/or
suballocated to any other agency for the purpose of paying local

656 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
social services district cost or may be increased or decreased by
interchange with any other appropriation or with any other item or
items within the amounts appropriated within the office of children
and family services - local assistance account with the approval of
the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
The amount appropriated herein, as may be adjusted by transfer of
general fund moneys for administration of child welfare, training
and development, public assistance, and food stamp programs appro-
priated in the office of children and family services and the office
of temporary and disability assistance, shall constitute total state
reimbursement for all local training programs in state fiscal year
2020-21 (13984) ... 4,815,800 ........................ (re. $27,000)

657 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 2,328,260,000 1,770,418,768
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 4,808,100,000 7,407,795,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 19,900,000 0
Fiduciary Funds .................... 10,000,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 7,166,260,000 9,178,213,768
================ ================
SCHEDULE
CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM ............................. 140,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Child Support Account - 25115
For reimbursement of local administrative
expenses for child support and establish-
ment of paternity pursuant to title IV-D
of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding subdivision 1 of section
111-d and section 153 of the social
services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, such reimbursement shall
constitute total reimbursement for activ-
ities funded herein in state fiscal year
2026-27. Notwithstanding section 111-e of
the social services law or any other
provision of law, social services
districts shall retain the non-federal
share of any support collections otherwise
payable as reimbursement to the state.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities. Subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance federal fund - local assistance

658 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
account with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, amounts appropriated herein
received pursuant to section 391 of the
federal personal responsibility and work
opportunity reconciliation act of 1996 may
be used without state or local financial
participation to provide grants or enter
into contracts with courts, local public
agencies, or nonprofit private entities
consistent with federal law and require-
ments. Such grants and/or contracts shall
be made based on the results of a compet-
itive procurement.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be
suballocated or transferred to any other
state department or agency for the
purposes stated herein.
Funds appropriated herein may be used for a
federally approved research and demon-
stration project for improved custodial
cooperation. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, these funds
shall be available without local financial
participation (52200) ...................... 140,000,000
--------------
EMPIRE STATE SUPPORTIVE HOUSING INITIATIVE PROGRAM ......... 300,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the empire
state supportive housing initiative.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to
support a statewide multiagency supportive
housing program to provide housing and
support services for vulnerable New York-
ers including but not limited to seniors,
veterans, victims of domestic violence,
formerly incarcerated individuals, indi-
viduals diagnosed with HIV/AIDS, homeless
individuals with co-presenting health

659 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
conditions and eligible services to runa-
way and homeless youth.
Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of a state
department or agency holding an empire
state supportive housing initiative
contract shall be authorized, subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, to continue contracts which were
executed on or before March 31, 2026 with
entities providing supportive housing
services, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative
procedures.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
such allocation and distribution is
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget of a plan for such program
submitted by the administering department
or agency.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be
suballocated or transferred to any state
department or agency for the purposes
stated herein.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance general fund - local assistance
account with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee (52399) .................... 300,000,000
--------------
EMPLOYMENT AND INCOME SUPPORT PROGRAM .................... 6,184,564,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For state reimbursement of the safety net
assistance program as established pursuant
to chapter 436 of the laws of 1997.

660 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social
services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, funds appropriated here-
in shall reimburse 29 percent of safety
net assistance expenditures, including the
cost of providing shelter supplements for
safety net assistance households at local
option, including eligible households
containing a household member who has been
released from prison, in order to prevent
eviction and address homelessness in
accordance with social services district
plans approved by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the director
of the budget, provided, however, that in
social services districts with a popu-
lation over five million no shelter
supplements other than the family home-
lessness and eviction prevention supple-
ment shall be reimbursed, provided however
funds appropriated herein shall only be
used to reimburse rental costs up to the
maximum rent levels in place as of January
1, 2021, then adjusted consistent with the
annual year-over-year percentage changes
in fair market rent, provided, however, in
the event of a decrease in fair market
rent the value of the maximum rent levels
reimbursed with funds appropriated herein
shall not decrease and shall be set at the
maximum rent levels established during the
prior year, and further provided that such
supplements shall not be part of the stan-
dard of need pursuant to section 131-a of
the social services law. Funds appropri-
ated herein shall also reimburse 29
percent of safety net assistance expendi-
tures, in social services districts with a
population over five million, for emergen-
cy shelter, transportation, or nutrition
payments which the district determines are
necessary to establish or maintain inde-
pendent living arrangements among persons
living with medically diagnosed HIV
infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the state department of health and who
are homeless or facing homelessness and
for whom no viable and less costly alter-
native to housing is available; provided,
however, that funds appropriated herein
may only be used for such purposes if the

661 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
cost of such allowances are not eligible
for reimbursement under medical assistance
or other programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29
percent of safety net assistance expendi-
tures, in social services districts with a
population of five million or fewer, for
emergency shelter payments promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability
assistance which the district determines
are necessary to establish or maintain
independent living arrangements among
persons living with medically diagnosed
HIV infection as defined by the AIDS
institute of the state department of
health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and
less costly alternative to housing is
available; provided, however, that funds
appropriated herein may only be used for
such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement
under medical assistance or other
programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29
percent of safety net assistance expendi-
tures, in social services districts with a
population of five million or fewer, for
emergency shelter payments in excess of
those promulgated by the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance but not
exceeding an amount reasonably approximate
to 100 percent of fair market rent, at
local option which the district determines
are necessary to establish or maintain
independent living arrangements among
persons living with medically diagnosed
HIV infection as defined by the AIDS
institute of the State department of
health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and
less costly alternative to housing is
available; provided, however, that funds
appropriated herein may only be used for
such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement
under medical assistance or other
programs. Such emergency shelter payments
shall only be made at local option and in
accordance with a plan approved by the
office of temporary and disability assist-

662 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ance and the director of the budget.
Provided, however, notwithstanding section
153 of the social services law or any
other inconsistent provision of law, if
necessary funding, as determined by the
director of the budget, is secured in a
social services district from the medical
assistance program by reducing the capita-
tion rates paid to medicaid managed care
organizations by the amount of savings
resulting from stably housing individuals
living with medically diagnosed HIV
infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the state department of health, the
social services district shall make such
emergency shelter payments in excess of
those promulgated by the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance but not
exceeding an amount reasonably approximate
to 100 percent of fair market rent, and
the savings shall be used to reimburse 100
percent of the cost of such excess emer-
gency shelter payments for cases reim-
bursed under the safety net assistance or
family assistance programs in social
services districts with a population of
five million or fewer, in accordance with
a plan approved by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the director
of the budget; provided further that
reimbursement shall be provided to medi-
caid managed care organizations through
adjustments to capitation rates should
actual gross savings not be realized as
determined by the director of the budget.
For persons living with medically diagnosed
HIV infection as defined by the AIDS
institute of the state department of
health living in social services districts
with a population over five million who
are receiving public assistance, funds
appropriated herein shall be used to reim-
burse 29 percent of the additional rental
costs determined based on limiting such
person's earned and/or unearned income
contribution to 30 percent.
For persons living with medically diagnosed
HIV infection as defined by the AIDS
institute of the state department of
health living in social services districts
with a population of five million or fewer

663 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
who are receiving public assistance, funds
appropriated herein may be used to reim-
burse up to 100 percent of the additional
rental costs determined based on limiting
such person's earned and/or unearned
income contribution to 30 percent. Such
payments of additional rental costs shall
only be made at local option and in
accordance with a plan approved by the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance and the director of the budget.
Provided, however, notwithstanding section
153 of the social services law or any
other inconsistent provision of law, if
necessary funding, as determined by the
director of the budget, is secured in a
social services district from the medical
assistance program by reducing the capita-
tion rates paid to medicaid managed care
organizations by the amount of savings
resulting from stably housing individuals
living with medically diagnosed HIV
infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the state department of health, the
social services district shall make such
payments of additional rental costs, for
cases reimbursed under the safety net
assistance and family assistance program,
and the savings shall be used to reimburse
100 percent of the cost of the additional
rental costs determined based on limiting
such person's earned and/or unearned
income contribution to 30 percent in
social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or fewer, in
accordance with a plan approved by the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance and the director of the budget;
provided further that reimbursement shall
be provided to medicaid managed care
organizations through adjustments to capi-
tation rates should actual gross savings
not be realized as determined by the
director of the budget.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to
enter into contracts with persons or enti-
ties authorized pursuant to subdivision
(j) of section 17 of the social services
law consistent with federal law and
requirements. Such contracts will be
consistent with subdivision (j) of section

664 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
17 of the social services law. Notwith-
standing section 153 of the social
services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce
reimbursement otherwise payable to social
services districts to recover 29 percent
of costs incurred by the office for
expenditures related to subdivision (j) of
section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities. Subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits, including
those related to title IV-E of the social
security act; and including, but not
limited to, additional federal funds
resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance general fund - local assistance
account with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Social services districts shall be required
to report to the office of temporary and
disability assistance on an annual basis,
information, as determined and requested
by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is
sought for providing temporary housing
assistance to homeless individuals and
families. Such information shall be
submitted electronically to the extent
feasible as determined by the office, and
shall be used to evaluate expenditures by
such social services districts for the
provision of temporary housing assistance
for homeless individuals and families.

665 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social
services law, or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office of temporary
and disability assistance may withhold or
deny reimbursement, in whole or in part,
to any social services district that fails
to develop or submit a homeless services
plan subject to the approval of the office
of temporary and disability assistance,
fails to provide homeless services and
outreach in accordance with its approved
homeless services plan, or fails to devel-
op or submit homeless services outcome
reports, consistent with those require-
ments promulgated by the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social
services law, or any other inconsistent
provision of law, such appropriation shall
be available for reimbursement of eligible
costs incurred on or after January 1, 2026
and before January 1, 2027, that are
otherwise reimbursable by the state on or
after April 1, 2026, that are claimed by
March 1, 2027. Such reimbursement shall
constitute total state reimbursement for
activities funded herein in state fiscal
year 2026-2027 (52203) ..................... 950,000,000
For allocation to social services districts
with a population of five million or
fewer, for services and expenses related
to the payment of rent arrears necessary
to retain housing, to households that are
in receipt of or who would be eligible for
ongoing or emergency public assistance
pursuant to section 131-a of the social
services law but have exhausted the allow-
able frequency of such payments through
the emergency safety net assistance or
emergency assistance to families programs.
Such payments shall not exceed a total of
six months of arrears in addition to
payments previously made through the emer-
gency safety net assistance or emergency
assistance to families programs. Such
payments shall not be limited by the shel-
ter allowance amount set forth in section
131-a of the social services law and shall
not be part of the standard of need pursu-
ant to section 131-a of the social
services law. Funds appropriated herein

666 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
shall be allocated to social services
districts selected in accordance with a
methodology developed that shall consider
the rate of eviction filings and other
indicators of need as determined by the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance and approved by the director of the
budget (53051) .............................. 10,000,000
For expenditures for additional state
payments for eligible aged, blind, and
disabled persons related to supplemental
security income and for expenditures made
pursuant to title 8 of article 5 of the
social services law. Such funds are avail-
able for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, the
amount herein appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation within the office
of temporary and disability assistance
general fund - local assistance account
with the approval of the director of the
budget, who shall file such approval with
the department of audit and control and
copies thereof with the chairman of the
senate finance committee and the chairman
of the assembly ways and means committee
(52311) .................................... 700,000,000
For services and expenses of a program,
pursuant to section 35 of the social
services law, providing legal represen-
tation of individuals whose federal disa-
bility benefits have been denied or may be
discontinued. The commissioner shall
reduce reimbursement otherwise payable to
social services districts to ensure that
social services districts shall financial-
ly participate in additional legal repre-
sentation expenditures made pursuant to
this provision. Such reduction in local
reimbursement shall be allocated among
districts by the commissioner based on the
cost of, and number of district residents
served by, each legal assistance program,
or by such alternative cost allocation
procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with
social services officials (52291) ............ 5,260,000
For additional services and expenses of a
program, pursuant to section 35 of the

667 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
social services law, providing legal
representation of individuals whose feder-
al disability benefits have been denied or
may be discontinued. The commissioner
shall reduce reimbursement otherwise paya-
ble to social services districts to ensure
that social services districts shall
financially participate in additional
legal representation expenditures made
pursuant to this provision. Such reduction
in local reimbursement shall be allocated
among districts by the commissioner based
on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance
program, or by such alternative cost allo-
cation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with
social services officials (52335) ............ 1,500,000
For services to support human immunodefici-
ency virus specific employment programs.
Components of each such program shall
include, but not be limited to, on-the-job
training and employment. Each such program
shall guarantee that individuals complet-
ing the program obtain full-time employ-
ment with health insurance coverage, such
health insurance coverage may be provided
directly through employment or any local,
state, or federal program. The office of
temporary and disability assistance, in
conjunction with the AIDS institute of the
department of health, shall select the
organizations to operate such programs
through a competitive bid process (52293) .... 1,161,000
For grants to community based organizations
for nutrition outreach in areas where a
significant percentage or number of those
potentially eligible for food assistance
programs are not participating in such
programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall also be used
to provide funding for a targeted infla-
tionary increase for the period April 1,
2026 through March 31, 2027 the director
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors pursu-
ant to a chapter of the laws of 2026, for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement (52292) ........................ 3,738,000

668 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For additional services and expenses of a
program to provide grants to community
based organizations for nutrition outreach
in areas where a significant percentage or
number of those potentially eligible for
food assistance programs are not partic-
ipating in such programs (53013) ............. 5,000,000
For services and expenses incurred by local
social services districts in relation to
the adult shelter cap. Such payments shall
be made until March 31, 2042 at which time
the adult shelter cap liability will be
deemed fully reimbursed (52294) .............. 2,000,000
For services and expenses of the Double Up
Food Bucks program administered by the
Field & Fork Network (53020) ................. 2,000,000
For services and expenses of Caring for the
Hungry and Homeless of Peekskill (53032) ........ 50,000
For services and expenses of Center for
Community Alternatives (53033) ................. 500,000
For services and expenses of Cornell Cooper-
ative Extension Dutchess County for the
Green Teen Program (53052) ..................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Feeding West-
Chester (53066) ................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Goddard River-
side Community Center (53015) .................. 125,000
For services and expenses of Housing Help
(52376) ......................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of ICNA Relief,
Inc (53058) ..................................... 15,000
For services and expenses of Island Harvest
LTD (53016) .................................... 300,000
For services and expenses of Jericho Road
Community Health Center - Vive Shelter
(53067) ........................................ 200,000
For services and expenses of Meals on Wheels
Rockland County (53014) ......................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Mylah's Organ-
ization (53068) ................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Part of the
Solution (53055) ............................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Part of the
Solution (53054) ............................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Rockville
Centre/Lakeview Economic Opportunity
Center (53070) .................................. 40,000
For services and expenses of SAGE (52393) ........ 150,000
For services and expenses of The Albany
Damien Center (53056) .......................... 250,000

669 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of The Campaign
Against Hunger (23336) ......................... 650,000
For services and expenses of The Hope
Program (53000) ................................. 50,000
For services and expenses of Trillium Health
(53057) ........................................ 750,000
For services and expenses of Urban Resource
Institute (53018) .............................. 150,000
For services and expenses of Westchester
Community Opportunity Program, Inc.
(53004) ........................................ 125,000
For services and expenses of Italian Ameri-
can Civil Rights League ........................ 200,000
For services and expenses of Woodside on the
Move ........................................... 500,000
For services and expenses of Unique People
Services ....................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Urban Pathways
(53003) ......................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Pa'Lante Harlem
Inc. (60640) ................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of National Diaper
Banks, pursuant to the following sub-sche-
dule ........................................... 750,000
Sub-Schedule
(914) Cares ......................... 93,750
The Allied Foundation ................ 9,375
Baby Steps Baby Pantry at
Christ Lutheran Church ............ 13,125
Central New York Diaper Bank
Inc. .............................. 99,375
Every Bottom Covered ................ 93,750
Expecting Relief .................... 71,250
GOOD+ Foundation .................... 75,000
Her Village Inc. ..................... 9,000
Foodlink ............................ 25,500
The Diaper Bank of Orange
Ulster and Sullivan ................ 7,500
Little Essentials ................... 18,750
Cooperstown Food Pantry .............. 7,500
NYC Mammas Give Back Inc. ........... 37,500
Public Health Solutions -
Queens Diaper Bank ................ 99,375
The Food Pantries ................... 22,500
The HopeLine ........................ 37,500
The Sharing Shelf ................... 22,500
Twin Tiers Baby Bank ................. 6,750
For services and expenses of National Diaper

670 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Banks, pursuant to the following sub-sche-
dule ......................................... 1,000,000
Sub-Schedule
(914) Cares ........................ 125,000
The Allied Foundation ............... 12,500
Baby Steps Baby Pantry at
Christ Lutheran Church ............ 17,500
Central New York Diaper Bank
Inc. ............................. 132,500
Cooperstown Food Pantry ............. 10,000
Every Bottom Covered ............... 125,000
Expecting Relief .................... 95,000
Foodlink ............................ 34,000
GOOD+ Foundation ................... 100,000
Her Village Inc. .................... 12,000
Little Essentials ................... 25,000
NYC Mammas Give Back Inc. ........... 50,000
Public Health Solutions -
Queens Diaper Bank ............... 132,500
The Diaper Bank of Orange
Ulster and Sullivan ............... 10,000
The Food Pantries ................... 30,000
The HopeLine ........................ 50,000
The Sharing Shelf ................... 30,000
Twin Tiers Baby Bank ................. 9,000
Program account subtotal ............... 1,687,464,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Home Energy Assistance Program Account - 25123
Notwithstanding section 97 of the social
services law, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for services and
expenses, including payments to public and
private agencies and individuals for the
low income home energy assistance program
provided pursuant to the low income energy
assistance act of 1981. Funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, may be transferred
or suballocated to other state agencies
for expenses related to the low income
home energy assistance program.
Notwithstanding section 163 of the state
finance law, the office of temporary and
disability assistance may enter into an

671 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
agreement to provide an amount of funds,
not to exceed the unspent balance at the
conclusion of the heating season from a
prior budget year, to the New York state
energy research and development authority,
to administer a program for low-cost resi-
dential weatherization or other energy-re-
lated home repair for low-income house-
holds.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of the law, the amount herein appropriated
may be increased or decreased by inter-
change with any other appropriation within
the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance
account with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee (52215) .................... 600,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 600,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Account - 25178
For reimbursement of the cost of the family
assistance and the emergency assistance to
families programs. Notwithstanding section
153 of the social services law or any
inconsistent provision of law, funds
appropriated herein shall be provided
without state or local participation
except that for social services districts
with a population of five million or more,
reimbursement will be eighty-five percent.
Funds appropriated herein shall also
include the cost of providing shelter
supplements for family assistance house-
holds at local option, including eligible
households containing a household member
who has been released from prison, in
order to prevent eviction and address
homelessness in accordance with social
services district plans approved by the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance and the director of the budget,

672 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
provided, however, that in social services
districts with a population over five
million no shelter supplements other than
the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement shall be reimbursed,
provided however funds appropriated herein
shall only be used to reimburse rental
costs up to the maximum rent levels in
place as of January 1, 2021, then adjusted
consistent with the annual year-over-year
percentage changes in fair market rent,
provided, however, in the event of a
decrease in fair market rent the value of
the maximum rent levels reimbursed with
funds appropriated herein shall not
decrease and shall be set at the maximum
rent levels established during the prior
year, and further provided that such
supplements shall not be part of the stan-
dard of need pursuant to section 131-a of
the social services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall also reim-
burse for family assistance expenditures
for emergency shelter, transportation, or
nutrition payments which the district
determines are necessary to establish or
maintain independent living arrangements
among persons living with medically diag-
nosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS
institute of the State department of
health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and
less costly alternative to housing is
available; provided, however, that funds
appropriated herein may only be used for
such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement
under medical assistance or other
programs.
For persons living with medically diagnosed
HIV infection as defined by the AIDS
institute of the state department of
health who are receiving public assistance
funds appropriated herein shall not be
used to reimburse the additional rental
costs determined based on limiting such
person's earned and/or unearned income
contribution to 30 percent.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to
enter into contracts with persons or enti-
ties authorized pursuant to subdivision

673 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
(j) of section 17 of the social services
law consistent with federal law and
requirements. Such contracts will be made
consistent with subdivision (j) of section
17 of the social services law. Notwith-
standing section 153 of the social
services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce
reimbursement otherwise payable to social
services districts to recover the federal
share of costs incurred by the office for
expenditures related to subdivision (j) of
section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities. Subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits including, but
not limited to, additional federal funds
resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance federal fund - local assistance
account with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Social services districts shall be required
to report to the office of temporary and
disability assistance on an annual basis,
information, as determined and requested
by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is
sought for providing temporary housing
assistance to homeless individuals and
families. Such information shall be
submitted electronically to the extent
feasible as determined by the office, and
shall be used to evaluate expenditures by
such social services districts for the

674 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
provision of temporary housing assistance
for homeless individuals and families.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social
services law, or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office of temporary
and disability assistance may withhold or
deny reimbursement, in whole or in part,
to any social services district that fails
to develop or submit a homeless services
plan subject to the approval of the office
of temporary and disability assistance,
fails to provide homeless services and
outreach in accordance with its approved
homeless services plan, or fails to devel-
op or submit homeless services outcome
reports, consistent with those require-
ments promulgated by the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social
services law, or any other inconsistent
provision of law, such appropriation shall
be available for reimbursement of eligible
costs incurred on or after January 1, 2026
and before January 1, 2027, that are
otherwise reimbursable by the state on or
after April 1, 2026, that are claimed by
March 1, 2027. Such reimbursement shall
constitute total federal reimbursement for
activities funded herein in state fiscal
year 2026-27 (52203) ..................... 1,500,000,000
For transfer to the credit of the office of
children and family services federal
health and human services fund, state
operations or federal health and human
services fund, local assistance, federal
day care account for additional reimburse-
ment to social services districts for
child care assistance provided pursuant to
title 5-C of article 6 of the social
services law. The funds shall be appor-
tioned among the social services districts
by the office according to an allocation
plan developed by the office and submitted
to the director of the budget for approval
within 60 days of enactment of the budget.
The funds allocated to a district under
this appropriation in addition to any
state block grant funds allocated to the
district for child care services and any
funds the district requests the office of
temporary and disability assistance to

675 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
transfer from the district's flexible fund
for family services allocation to the
federal day care account shall constitute
the district's entire block grant allo-
cation for a particular federal fiscal
year, which shall be available only for
child care assistance expenditures made
during that federal fiscal year and which
are claimed by March 31 of the year imme-
diately following the end of that federal
fiscal year. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, any claims for child
care assistance made by a social services
district for expenditures made during a
particular federal fiscal year, other than
claims made under title XX of the federal
social security act and under the supple-
mental nutrition assistance program
employment and training funds, shall be
counted against the social services
district's block grant allocation for that
federal fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its
allocation from the block grant in accord-
ance with the applicable provision in
federal law and regulations relating to
the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regu-
lations of the office of children and
family services. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, each district's claims
submitted under the state block grant for
child care will be processed in a manner
that maximizes the availability of federal
funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in
each applicable federal fiscal year. Prior
to transfer of funds appropriated herein,
the commissioner of the office of children
and family services shall consult with the
commissioner of the office of temporary
and disability assistance to determine the
availability of such funding and to
request that the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance takes necessary steps to notify the
department of health and human services of
the transfer of funding (52209) ............ 484,805,000
For allocation to local social services
districts for the flexible fund for family
services. Funds shall, without state or

676 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
local participation, be allocated to local
social services districts in accordance
with a methodology developed by the office
of temporary and disability assistance and
the office of children and family services
and approved by the director of the budg-
et. Such amounts allocated to local social
services districts shall hereinafter be
referred to as the flexible fund for fami-
ly services and shall be used for eligible
services to eligible individuals under the
State plan for the federal temporary
assistance for needy families block grant.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities and, notwith-
standing section 153 of the social
services law and any inconsistent
provision of law, shall constitute the
full amount of federal temporary assist-
ance for needy families funds to be paid
on account of activities funded in whole
or in part hereunder and the full amount
of state reimbursement to be paid on
account of local district administrative
claims. District allocations from the
flexible fund for family services may be
spent only pursuant to plans of expendi-
ture, developed by each social services
district and the local governing body and
approved by the office of temporary and
disability assistance, the office of chil-
dren and family services, and the director
of the budget. Such allocation shall be
available for reimbursement through March
31, 2029; provided, however, that
reimbursement for child welfare services
other than foster care services shall be
available for eligible expenditures
incurred on or after October 1, 2026 and
before October 1, 2027 that are otherwise
reimbursable by the state on or after
April 1, 2026 and that are claimed by
March 31, 2028.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amounts so appropriated for
allocation to local social services
districts, may be used, without state or
local financial participation, by social
services districts for such district's
first eligible expenditures that occurred

677 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
on or after October 1, 2026, or, subject
to the approval of the director of the
budget, during any other period beginning
on or after January 1, 1997, for tuition
costs for foster care children who are
eligible for emergency assistance for
families in the manner the state was
authorized to fund such costs under part A
of title IV of the social security act as
such part was in effect on September 30,
1995; provided that the funds appropriated
herein may not be used to reimburse local-
ities for costs disallowed under title
IV-E of the social security act. Such
expenditures shall constitute good cause
pursuant to section 408 (a) (10) of the
social security act. Such funds may also
be used, without state or local partic-
ipation, for care, maintenance, super-
vision, and tuition for juvenile delin-
quents and persons in need of supervision
who are placed in residential programs
operated by authorized agencies and who
are eligible for emergency assistance to
families in the manner the state was
authorized to fund such costs under part A
of title IV of the social security act as
such part was in effect on September 30,
1995. Such expenditures shall constitute
good cause pursuant to section 408 (a)
(10) of the social security act. Unless
otherwise approved by the commissioner of
the office of children and family services
with the approval of the director of the
budget, these funds may be used only for
eligible expenditures made from October 1,
2026 through September 30, 2027. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of
law, the funds so appropriated may not be
used to reimburse localities for costs
disallowed under title IV-E of the social
security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a social services district may
request that the office of temporary and
disability assistance retain and transfer
a portion of the district's allocation of
these funds to the credit of the office of
children and family services federal
health and human services fund, local
assistance, title XX social services block

678 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
grant for use by the district for eligible
title XX services and/or to the credit of
the office of children and family services
federal health and human services fund,
local assistance, federal day care account
for use by the district for eligible child
care expenditures under the state block
grant for child care, within the percent-
ages established by the state in accord-
ance with the federal social security act
and related federal regulations. Any funds
transferred at a district's request to the
title XX social services block grant shall
be used by the district for eligible title
XX social services provided in accordance
with the provisions of the federal social
security act and the social services law
to children or their families whose income
is less than 200 percent of the federal
poverty level applicable to the family
size involved. Any funds transferred at a
district's request to the office of chil-
dren and family services federal health
and human services fund, local assistance,
federal day care account shall be made
available to the district for use for
eligible child care expenditures in
accordance with the applicable provisions
of federal law and regulations relating to
federal funds included in the state block
grant for child care and in accordance
with applicable state law and regulations
of the office of children and family
services. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, any claims made by a
social services district for expenditures
made for child care during a particular
federal fiscal year, other than claims
made under title XX of the federal social
security act and under the supplemental
nutrition assistance program employment
and training funds, shall be counted
against the social services district's
block grant for child care for that feder-
al fiscal year. Each social services
district must certify to the office of
children and family services and the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, within 90 days of enactment of the
budget but before August 15, 2026, the

679 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
amount of funds it wishes to have trans-
ferred under this provision.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the amount of the funds that each district
expends on child welfare services from its
flexible fund for family services funds
and any flexible fund for family services
funds transferred at the district's
request to the title XX social services
block grant must, to the extent that fami-
lies are eligible therefore, be equal to
or greater than the district's portion of
the $457,322,342 statewide child welfare
threshold amount, which shall be estab-
lished pursuant to a formula developed by
the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the office of children and
family services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
including the state finance law and any
local procurement law, at the request of a
social services district and with the
approval of the director of the budget, a
portion of the funds appropriated herein
may be retained by the office of temporary
and disability assistance for any services
eligible for funding under the flexible
fund for family services for which the
applicable state agency has a contractual
relationship. Such funds may be suballo-
cated, transferred or otherwise made
available to the department of transporta-
tion or to other state agencies, as neces-
sary, and as approved by the director of
the budget (52223) ......................... 964,000,000
The following remaining appropriations with-
in the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal health and human
services fund temporary assistance for
needy families account shall be available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter to accrue to municipalities.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, such funds may be increased or
decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation within the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance or office
of children and family services federal
fund - local assistance account with the
approval of the director of the budget.

680 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Such funds shall be provided without state
or local participation for services to
eligible individuals under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy
families block grant whose incomes do not
exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty
level or who are otherwise eligible under
such plan, provided that such services to
eligible persons not in receipt of public
assistance shall not constitute "assist-
ance" under applicable federal regulations
and no more than 15 percent of the funds
made available herein may be used for
administration, provided further that the
director of the budget does not determine
that such use of funds can be expected to
have the effect of increasing qualified
state expenditures under paragraph 7 of
subdivision (a) of section 409 of the
federal social security act above the
minimum applicable federal maintenance of
effort requirement. Such funds may be
transferred, suballocated, or otherwise
made available to other state agencies, as
necessary, and as approved by the director
of the budget:
For allocation to local social services
districts for the summer youth employment
program. Such funds shall be provided
without state or local participation for
services to eligible individuals aged
fourteen to twenty. Notwithstanding any
other inconsistent law to the contrary,
the commissioner of any local department
of social services may assign all or a
portion of moneys appropriated herein on
behalf of such local department of social
services to the workforce investment board
designated by such commissioner and upon
receipt of such monies, any such workforce
investment board shall be obligated to
utilize such funds consistent with the
purposes of this appropriation. Funds
appropriated herein shall be allocated to
local social services districts in accord-
ance with a methodology developed by the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance and approved by the director of the
budget. At the request of local social
services districts, funds not used for
costs of the summer youth program may be

681 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
transferred to the credit of the
district's allocation of the flexible fund
for family services; provided, however,
that a minimum of $47,700,000 will be used
for the summer youth program (52205) ........ 53,000,000
For additional services and expenses related
to summer youth employment program. Such
funds shall be provided without state or
local participation for services to eligi-
ble individuals aged fourteen to twenty
(53060) ...................................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of a youth employ-
ment program operating in localities in
receipt of project GIVE funding, as
provided by the division of criminal
justice services. Such funds shall be
provided for services to eligible individ-
uals aged fourteen to twenty. Notwith-
standing any other inconsistent law to the
contrary, the commissioner of any local
department of social services may assign
all or a portion of moneys appropriated
herein on behalf of such local department
of social services to the workforce
investment board designated by such
commissioner and upon receipt of such
monies, any such workforce investment
board shall be obligated to utilize such
funds consistent with the purposes of this
appropriation. Funds appropriated herein
shall be allocated to local social
services districts in accordance with a
methodology developed by the office of
temporary and disability assistance and
approved by the director of the budget
(53025) ..................................... 42,000,000
For services and expenses related to the
provision of non-residential domestic
violence. Such funds may be made available
to the office of children and family
services. Local social services districts
are encouraged to collaborate with not-
for-profit providers in the provision of
such services (52206) ........................ 3,000,000
For additional services and expenses related
to the provision of nonresidential domes-
tic violence. Such funds may be made
available to the office of children and
family services. Local social services
districts are encouraged to collaborate

682 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
with not-for-profit providers in the
provision of such services (53007) ............. 200,000
For payment to Metropolitan College for
eligible services and expenses relating to
the continuation and expansion of a
project to assist individuals and families
in moving out of poverty through the
pursuit of higher education. Projects
shall include intensive, long-term case
management and statistically-based outcome
assessments. The amount appropriated here-
in shall be made available for one project
at Metropolitan College for an education
and work consortium that moves significant
numbers of people from welfare to perma-
nent employment. Such project shall
provide services to recipients of family
assistance, safety net assistance and
other eligible individuals. The consortium
shall consist of three institutions of
higher education with one of the insti-
tutions being a CUNY institution, one a
New York city based institution, and one
based in Westchester County (52249) ............ 800,000
For services related to the development of
technology assisted learning programs at
the educational opportunity centers. Such
funds may be made available in accordance
with a memorandum of understanding between
the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the state university of New
York. Provided, however, that funds appro-
priated herein shall be used to provide
basic educational skills, job readiness
training, and occupational training to
program participants. Of the funds appro-
priated herein, up to $215,000 shall be
available without state or local financial
participation for the development of tech-
nology assisted learning programs provided
by community based organizations which
serve eligible individuals living with
HIV/AIDS (52213) ............................. 4,100,000
For services, notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, and without state or
local financial participation, of the
career pathways program for not-for-pro-
fit, community-based organizations provid-
ing coordinated, comprehensive employment
services beyond the level currently funded
by local social services districts to

683 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
eligible individuals and families. Such
funds are to be made available to estab-
lish a career pathways program to link
education and occupational training to
subsequent employment through a continuum
of educational programs and integrated
support services to enable eligible
participants, including disconnected young
adults, ages sixteen to twenty-four, to
advance over time both to higher levels of
education and to higher wage jobs in
targeted occupational sectors. With funds
appropriated herein, the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance in consul-
tation with the department of labor shall
establish the career pathways program and
provide technical support, as needed, to
provide education, training, and job
placement for low-income individuals, age
sixteen and older. Preference shall be
given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds
who are unemployed or underemployed, in
areas of the state with demonstrated labor
market needs and unemployment rates that
are greater than the appropriate or
comparative rate of employment for the
region, and to persons in receipt of fami-
ly assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the
extent practicable, at least sixty percent
shall be available for services to eigh-
teen to twenty-four year olds, with
remaining funds available to recipients of
family assistance and/or safety net
assistance, without age restrictions, and
sixteen to seventeen year old self-sup-
porting individuals who are heads of
household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with
the department of labor shall develop a
request for proposals and shall receive,
review, and assess applications. In
selecting proposals, the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance and the
department of labor shall give preference
to programs that demonstrate community-
based collaborations with education and
training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training
providers may include, but not, be limited
to general equivalency diplomas programs,

684 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
community colleges, junior colleges, busi-
ness and trade schools, vocational insti-
tutions, and institutions with baccalau-
reate degree-granting programs; programs
that provide for a career path or career
paths, as supported by identified local
employment needs; programs that provide
employment services, including but not
limited to, post-secondary training
designed to meet the needs of employers in
the local labor market, or catchment area;
programs that include education and train-
ing components, such as remedial educa-
tion, individual training plans, pre-em-
ployment training, workplace basic skills,
and literacy skills training. Such educa-
tion and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other
credentialing bodies for the purpose of
providing participants with certificates,
diplomas, or degrees; projects that
provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to
tutoring, mentoring, child care, after
school program access, transportation, and
case management, as part of the individual
training plan. Preference shall be given
to proposals that include not-for-profit
collaborations with education, training,
or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional commu-
nity resources and provide participant
support services; training that result in
job placement; and education that links
participants with occupational skills
training and/or employer-related creden-
tials, credits, diplomas or certificates
(52266) ...................................... 1,425,000
For the services of Centro of Oneida for the
implementation of programs, or the
provision of additional transportation
services to such eligible individuals and
families, for the purpose of transporta-
tion to and from employment or other
allowable work activities (52262) ............... 25,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the funds appropriated herein
shall be available for transfer to the
federal health and human services fund,
local assistance account, federal day care
account to provide additional funding for

685 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
subsidies and quality activities at the
city university of New York, provided that
of such amount, $56,000 shall be available
to community colleges and $85,000 shall be
available to senior colleges (52260) ........... 141,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the funds appropriated herein
shall be available for transfer to the
federal health and human services fund,
local assistance account, federal day care
account to provide additional funding for
subsidies and quality activities at the
state university of New York, provided
that of such amount, $77,000 shall be
available to community colleges and
$116,000 shall be available to state oper-
ated campuses (52210) .......................... 193,000
For preventive services to eligible individ-
uals and families, including but not
limited to: intensive case management and
related services for families with chil-
dren at risk of foster care placement due
to the presence of alcohol and/or
substance abuse in the household; family
preservation services, centers and
programs; foster care diversion demon-
strations; and not-for-profit provider
collaborations with family treatment
courts. Such funds are available pursuant
to a plan prepared by the office of chil-
dren and family services and approved by
the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing
contractors that are satisfactorily
performing as determined by the office of
children and family services, to award new
contracts to continue programs where the
existing contractors are not satisfactori-
ly performing as determined by the office
of children and family services, and/or
award new contracts through a competitive
process. Provided that, of the funds
appropriated herein, at least $274,000
shall be available for programs providing
post adoption services (52269) ................. 785,000
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee
Regional Transportation Authority for the
provision of transportation services to
eligible individuals and families, for the
purpose of transportation to and from
employment or other allowable work activ-

686 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ities. Such funds may be made available to
the department of transportation for the
administration of the Rochester-Genesee
Regional Transportation Authority (52261) ....... 82,000
For the services of the Jewish Child Care
Association of New York (JCCA) provided
within JCCA's Center for Healing including
delivery of clinical services to children
and families who have suffered child abuse
and/or exploitation and/or children exhib-
iting problematic sexual behavior (PSB),
training child welfare workers, teachers
and others to increase awareness of
commercially sexually exploited children
(CSEC), sexually abused children, and/or
children exhibiting PSB (23337) ................ 200,000
For services related to the wheels for work
program, including, but not limited to
activities which procure, repair, finance,
and/or insure vehicles needed for trans-
portation to and from employment or allow-
able work activities (52253) ................... 144,000
For costs associated with services and
expenses incurred by local social services
districts to provide case management
services including, but not limited to,
assessments, crisis intervention, treat-
ment and system navigation support, and
connection to community resources, to
eligible households under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy
families block grant. Funds appropriated
herein shall be allocated to local social
services districts in accordance with a
methodology developed by the office of
temporary and disability assistance and
approved by the director of the budget
(53043) ..................................... 17,200,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 3,077,100,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25024
For reimbursement to social services
districts for administrative expenditures
associated with the supplemental nutrition
assistance program, and for reimbursement
to the United States department of agri-

687 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
culture for supplemental nutrition assist-
ance program recoveries. Such reimburse-
ment shall constitute total state
reimbursement for local district adminis-
trative claims.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities. Subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits including but
not limited to additional federal funds
resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the amount herein appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance federal fund - local assistance
account with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the money hereby appropriated may,
with the approval of the director of the
budget, be increased or decreased by
interchange or transfer with the amounts
appropriated within the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance federal
food and nutrition services - federal
state operations account.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds appropriated herein may be
used for reimbursement of supplemental
nutrition assistance program employment
and training expenditures and shall be
made available to social services
districts or may be set aside, transferred
or suballocated to other state agencies
for state administered programs for the
provision of services to supplemental
nutrition assistance program recipients
and applicants in accordance with a plan
developed by the office of temporary and

688 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
disability assistance and approved by the
director of the budget. Funds appropriated
herein may be used to fund the cost of
child care services provided to eligible
supplemental nutrition assistance program
employment and training program partic-
ipants subject to a plan approved by the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, the office of children and family
services and the director of the budget
only to the extent that the office of
children and family services and the
director of the budget determine that the
use of such funds will not jeopardize the
state's ability to receive the state's
entire allotment of federal child care
development funds and child care funds
available under title IV-A of the social
security act. Any child care funded
through the supplemental nutrition assist-
ance program employment and training grant
must be provided in a manner consistent
with the federal law and regulations
relating to the federal funds included in
the state block grant for child care and
the regulations of the office of children
and family services for such block grant.
Districts shall submit claims and other
reports regarding the use of the supple-
mental nutrition assistance program
employment and training funds for child
care services at such times and in such
manner and format as required by the
department of family assistance.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds appropriated herein, subject
to the approval of the director of the
budget and in accordance with a memorandum
of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and
any other state agency, may be suballo-
cated, transferred or otherwise made
available to any other state agency,
consistent with federal law, regulations
or waivers for expenses related to nutri-
tion education programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of the funds appropri-
ated herein may be made available to
community based organizations in accord-
ance with chapter 820 of the laws of 1987

689 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
for nutrition outreach in areas where a
significant percentage or number of those
potentially eligible for food assistance
programs are not participating in such
programs (52224) ........................... 500,000,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for services and expenses of a summer
electronic benefit transfer program pursu-
ant to the consolidated appropriations
act, 2023.
Use of such funds shall be in accordance
with all relevant rules and regulations
promulgated by the United States depart-
ment of agriculture.
Funds appropriated herein, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
may be transferred, suballocated, or
otherwise made available to any other
state agency or authority for purposes of
the program defined herein.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of the law, the amount herein appropriated
may be increased or decreased by inter-
change with any other appropriation within
the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance
or state operations accounts with the
approval of the director of the budget,
who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies
thereof with the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee (53045) .. 300,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 800,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Donated Funds Account - 20179
For services and expenses related to agency
programs and paid from funds donated to
the agency from private foundations,
corporations and individuals or from other
sources (52202) ............................. 10,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 10,000,000
--------------
Fiduciary Funds

690 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund
Special Offset Fiduciary Account - 60628
For direct payment or transfer to other
funds, as approved by the director of the
budget as restitution to the federal,
state or local governments of funds recov-
ered from public assistance recipients or
former recipients pursuant to chapter 81
of the laws of 1995 or the federal social
security act including but not limited to
lottery winnings or prizes and federal and
state tax refunds (52202) ................... 10,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 10,000,000
--------------
LEGAL REPRESENTATION FOR EVICTION ........................... 55,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of a program for
legal services and representation for
eviction cases outside of New York city.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31506) .............. 35,000,000
For additional services and expenses of a
program for legal services and represen-
tation for eviction cases outside of New
York City .................................... 6,700,000
For services and expenses of a program for
legal services and representation for
eviction cases in New York City for legal
representation services, as follows:
$5,300,000 for Legal Services NYC,
$5,300,000 for the Legal Aid Society,
$2,700,000 for the City of New York to
distribute to providers of legal services
and representation for eviction cases,
excluding Legal Services NYC and the Legal
Aid Society, in proportion to the caseload
of such providers ........................... 13,300,000
--------------
SPECIALIZED SERVICES PROGRAM ............................... 486,696,000
--------------

691 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of a program to
provide shelter supplements at local
option to individuals and families regard-
less of immigration status who are experi-
encing homelessness or are facing an immi-
nent loss of housing, including
individuals and families without children.
Provided, however, that in social services
districts with a population over five
million, funds allocated to such district
shall be used in the first instance to
reimburse rental costs above the maximum
rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021
up to the United States department of
housing and urban development's fair
market rent level for the family homeless-
ness and eviction prevention supplement
program pursuant to section 131-bb of the
social services law, then adjusted
consistent with the annual year-over-year
percentage changes in fair market rent,
provided, however, in the event of a
decrease in fair market rent the value of
the maximum rent levels reimbursed with
funds appropriated herein shall not
decrease and shall be set at the maximum
rent levels established during the prior
year, and any remaining funds for such
district may be used to provide shelter
supplements pursuant to the purposes
appropriated herein.
Such supplements shall be provided to house-
holds who earn no more than 30 percent of
area median income at the time of applica-
tion, provided however, that if sufficient
demand does not exist for households who
earn no more than 30 percent of area medi-
an income, supplements may be provided for
households earning up to 50 percent of
area median income.
Such supplements shall be provided in
accordance with social services district
plans, provided however that no plan shall
require supplements to be below 85 percent
of fair market rent, but may allow for
supplements above 85 percent of fair
market rent at local cost; provided
further however that at least 50 percent

692 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of the supplements shall be allocated for
households who are currently in shelter or
experiencing homelessness, unless suffi-
cient demand does not exist for such
households within the district. A social
services district plan may provide for the
administration of portions of this program
to be delegated to another public agency
or to a contractor or non-profit organiza-
tion.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to
reimburse up to 100 percent of the addi-
tional rental costs determined based on
limiting such household's earned and/or
unearned income contribution to 30
percent. Each supplement shall be provided
until 30 percent of the household's earned
and/or unearned income reaches the total
monthly rent.
Supplements provided herein shall not be
part of the standard of need pursuant to
section 131-a of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary such supplements shall not be
subject to recoupment or repayment.
Notwithstanding the aforementioned
requirement that a social services
district with a population over five
million shall use this funding to reim-
burse rental costs above the maximum rent
levels in place as of January 1, 2021 up
to the United States department of housing
and urban development's fair market rent
level for the family homelessness and
eviction prevention supplement pursuant to
section 131-bb of the social services law,
then adjusted consistent with the annual
year-over-year percentage changes in fair
market rent, provided, however, in the
event of a decrease in fair market rent
the value of the maximum rent levels reim-
bursed with funds appropriated herein
shall not decrease and shall be set at the
maximum rent levels established during the
prior year, nothing in this language shall
prohibit undocumented individuals and
families from receiving this assistance.
Plans shall be subject to approval by the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance and the director of the budget.

693 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
The office of temporary and disability
assistance shall prepare and submit an
annual program report to the chairs of the
senate committee on social services and
the senate finance committee, and the
chairs of the assembly committee on social
services, and the assembly ways and means
committee. Such report shall include
available information regarding the
program or participants in the program,
including but not limited to: the number
of income eligible individuals or families
under 30 percent of area median income
that applied and received assistance, the
number of income eligible individuals or
families between 30 and 50 percent area
median income that applied and received
assistance, the number of individuals and
families that applied but were denied
assistance due to a lack of resources; the
number of individuals and families that
applied and were denied assistance due to
income exceeding eligibility, who would
otherwise be deemed eligible, and the
average income of those denied for such
reason; the number of participants who
were able to leave shelter as a result of
the rental supplements; the number of
individuals and families served by the
program who are in receipt of other forms
of public assistance; the number of
supplements issued by local social
services district; the average value of
supplements issued by local social
services district; the average recipient
contribution by local social services
district, and the number of local social
services districts providing supplements
above 85 percent of fair market rent. Such
report shall be submitted on or before
November 1 of each year.
Funds shall be allocated to each social
services district pursuant to a methodol-
ogy developed by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and based on
each district's relative share of public
assistance households as of March 31, 2026
or any other factors determined relevant
by the office (53009) ...................... 100,000,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to
reimburse New York city expenditures for

694 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
adult shelters. Notwithstanding section
153 of the social services law or any
other inconsistent provision of law, such
funds shall be available for eligible
costs incurred on or after January 1, 2026
and before January 1, 2027 that are other-
wise reimbursable by the state on or after
April 1, 2026 and that are claimed by
March 31, 2027. Such reimbursement shall
constitute total state reimbursement for
activities funded herein in state fiscal
year 2026-27, and shall include reimburse-
ment for costs associated with a court
mandated plan to improve shelter condi-
tions for medically frail persons and
additional costs incurred as part of a
plan to reduce over-crowding in congregate
shelters. New York city shall be required
to report to the office of temporary and
disability assistance on an annual basis,
information, as determined and requested
by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is
sought for providing temporary housing
assistance to homeless individuals and
families. Such information shall be
submitted electronically to the extent
feasible as determined by the office, and
shall be used to evaluate expenditures for
the provision of temporary housing assist-
ance for homeless individuals and families
(52297) ..................................... 69,018,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to
reimburse those expenditures made by local
social services districts outside the city
of New York for adult shelters and public
homes. Notwithstanding section 153 of the
social services law or any other incon-
sistent provision of law, such funds shall
be available for eligible costs incurred
on or after January 1, 2026, and before
January 1, 2027, that are otherwise reim-
bursable by the state on or after April 1,
2026. Such reimbursement shall constitute
total state reimbursement for activities
funded herein in state fiscal year 2026-27
(52338) ...................................... 5,500,000
For services and expenses related to home-
less housing and preventive services
programs including but not limited to the
New York state supportive housing program,

695 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the solutions to end homelessness program
and the operational support for AIDS hous-
ing program. Provided, however, that no
funds may be encumbered, contracted, or
disbursed from this appropriation as a
result of the availability of $74,181,000
for the programs funded herein pursuant to
a chapter of the laws of 2026. Of the
amount appropriated herein, no less than
$56,300,000 shall be allocated to the New
York state supportive housing program. No
funds shall be expended from this appro-
priation until the director of the budget
has approved a spending plan submitted by
the office of temporary and disability
assistance in such detail as required by
the director of the budget. (52329) ......... 74,181,000
For services and expenses related to costs
incurred by local social services
districts to implement emergency measures
for the homeless during inclement winter
weather. Funds appropriated herein shall
be allocated to local social services
districts in accordance with a methodology
developed by the office of temporary and
disability assistance and approved by the
director of the budget. For any program
year beginning on or after April 1, 2026,
such methodology shall provide annual
allocations to local social services
districts totaling no more than
$20,000,000. Such allocations shall be
issued no later than September 1 of the
program year and shall represent the maxi-
mum amount of reimbursement to the
district for such program year. The office
of temporary and disability assistance may
subsequently revise such allocations based
on actual district needs provided the
allocations total no more than
$20,000,000.
Notwithstanding any other inconsistent
provision of law, such funds shall be made
available for eligible costs incurred on
or after October 1, 2025. Such reimburse-
ment shall constitute total state
reimbursement for activities funded herein
in state fiscal year 2026-27 (52356) ........ 20,000,000
For services and expenses of a pilot program
related to the provision of case manage-
ment services for households in receipt of

696 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
public assistance containing a household
member who has been released from prison.
Such funds will be provided by the commis-
sioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance to selected social
services districts with a population below
five million that have a shelter supple-
ment plan approved by the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance and the
director of the budget (52275) ................. 200,000
For services of programs, in local social
services districts with a population in
excess of five million, that meet the
emergency needs of homeless individuals
and families and those at risk of becoming
homeless. Such funds shall be made avail-
able pursuant to a program plan developed
by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and approved by the director of
the budget (52247) ........................... 1,000,000
For services related to the human traffick-
ing program as established pursuant to
article 10-D of social services law
(52305) ...................................... 2,397,000
For services and expenses of a program to
provide enhanced services to refugees and
other individuals eligible for refugee
benefits and services, pursuant to federal
law or regulations in effect as of October
1, 2025, and eligible individuals added
thereafter, to assist such individuals and
families to attain economic self-suffici-
ency and reduce or eliminate reliance on
public assistance benefits as a primary
means of support. Funds appropriated here-
in shall, at the discretion of the commis-
sioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance, be awarded to agen-
cies that have resettled refugees through
a program designated by the federal
government that are currently under
contract with the office of temporary and
disability assistance to provide services
to refugees and other individuals eligible
for refugee benefits and services, pursu-
ant to federal law or regulations in
effect as of October 1, 2025, and eligible
individuals added thereafter, and individ-
ual awards shall be made proportionately
based on the number of refugees each

697 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
organization resettled in the previous
five year period (52302) ..................... 2,000,000
For additional services and expenses of a
program to provide enhanced services to
refugees and other individuals eligible
for refugee benefits and services, pursu-
ant to federal law or regulations in
effect as of October 1, 2025, and eligible
individuals added thereafter to assist
such individuals and families to attain
economic self-sufficiency and reduce or
eliminate reliance on public assistance
benefits as a primary means of support.
Funds appropriated herein shall, at the
discretion of the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, be awarded to agencies that have
resettled refugees through a program
designated by the federal government that
are currently under contract with the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance to provide services to refugees and
other individuals eligible for refugee
benefits and services, pursuant to federal
law or regulations in effect as of October
1, 2025, and eligible individuals added
thereafter and individual awards shall be
made proportionately based on the number
of refugees each organization resettled in
the previous five year period (53022) ........ 5,000,000
For services and expenses of a program to
provide services and assistance to non-ci-
tizens who can provide appropriate
documentation from the United States
department of homeland security demon-
strating entry to the United States on or
after January 1, 2022 as long as such
individuals are not otherwise eligible for
ORR-funded services, enhanced services to
refugees, and are not in receipt of a
valid or expired visa, to stabilize such
individuals and families, prioritizing
families with children, through case
management services, direct assistance to
meet basic needs not otherwise supported
by public assistance such as food, cloth-
ing and shelter, and other services deter-
mined necessary by the office of temporary
and disability assistance. Funds appropri-
ated herein shall, at the discretion of
the commissioner of the office of tempo-

698 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
rary and disability assistance, be awarded
to agencies that have resettled refugees
through a program designated by the feder-
al government that are currently under
contract with the office of temporary and
disability assistance to provide such
services and assistance to these recently
arrived non-citizen populations, with
funding being allocated proportional to
the geographic distribution of this popu-
lation in the state of New York (53028) ...... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of the refugee and
immigrant student welcome grants program,
pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019
(53046) ...................................... 1,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 285,796,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Refugee Resettlement Account - 25160
For services related to refugee programs
including but not limited to the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee resettlement program
and the Cuban-Haitian and refugee targeted
assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980
as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
for aid to municipalities and for payments
to the federal government for expenditures
made pursuant to the social services law
and the state plan for individual and
family grant program under the disaster
relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue to municipalities. Subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance net of disallowances, refunds,
reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds appropriated herein, subject
to the approval of the director of the
budget and in accordance with a memorandum
of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and

699 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
any other state agency, may be transferred
or suballocated to any other state agency
for expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, and subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, the amount appro-
priated herein may be increased or
decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation with-
in the office of temporary and disability
assistance (52304) ......................... 180,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 180,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Homeless Housing Account - 25328
For services related to federal homeless and
other federal support services grants.
Subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, the amount appropriated herein
may be made available to other state agen-
cies through transfer or suballocation for
services and expenses related to federal
homeless and other federal support
services grants. The director of the budg-
et is hereby authorized to transfer or
suballocate appropriation authority
contained herein to any other fund in
which federal homeless and other federal
support services grants are actually
received (52219) ............................ 11,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 11,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Family and Adult Shelter Sanction Account - 22080
For payment of family and adult shelter
reimbursement previously withheld by the
commissioner due to violations of office
regulations governing operation of such
shelters. Such payments shall only be made
after remediation or correction of such
violations to the satisfaction of the
commissioner of temporary and disability
assistance. No expenditure may be made

700 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
from this account for any other purpose.
No expenditure may be made from this
account without approval of the director
of the budget (52297) ........................ 9,900,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 9,900,000
--------------

701 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Child Support Account - 25115
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For reimbursement of local administrative expenses for child support
and establishment of paternity pursuant to title IV-D of the federal
social security act. Notwithstanding subdivision 1 of section 111-d
and section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, such reimbursement shall constitute total
reimbursement for activities funded herein in state fiscal year
2025-26. Notwithstanding section 111-e of the social services law or
any other provision of law, social services districts shall retain
the non-federal share of any support collections otherwise payable
as reimbursement to the state.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, amounts appropri-
ated herein received pursuant to section 391 of the federal personal
responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996 may
be used without state or local financial participation to provide
grants or enter into contracts with courts, local public agencies,
or nonprofit private entities consistent with federal law and
requirements. Such grants and/or contracts shall be made based on
the results of a competitive procurement.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any other state
department or agency for the purposes stated herein.
Funds appropriated herein may be used for a federally approved
research and demonstration project for improved custodial cooper-
ation. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, these
funds shall be available without local financial participation
(52200) ... 140,000,000 ......................... (re. $140,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For reimbursement of local administrative expenses for child support
and establishment of paternity pursuant to title IV-D of the federal
social security act. Notwithstanding subdivision 1 of section 111-d

702 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, such reimbursement shall constitute total
reimbursement for activities funded herein in state fiscal year
2024-25. Notwithstanding section 111-e of the social services law or
any other provision of law, social services districts shall retain
the non-federal share of any support collections otherwise payable
as reimbursement to the state.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, amounts appropri-
ated herein received pursuant to section 391 of the federal personal
responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996 may
be used without state or local financial participation to provide
grants or enter into contracts with courts, local public agencies,
or nonprofit private entities consistent with federal law and
requirements. Such grants and/or contracts shall be made based on
the results of a competitive procurement.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any other state
department or agency for the purposes stated herein.
Funds appropriated herein may be used for a federally approved
research and demonstration project for improved custodial cooper-
ation. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, these
funds shall be available without local financial participation
(52200) ... 140,000,000 .......................... (re. $40,662,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For reimbursement of local administrative expenses for child support
and establishment of paternity pursuant to title IV-D of the federal
social security act. Notwithstanding subdivision 1 of section 111-d
and section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, such reimbursement shall constitute total
reimbursement for activities funded herein in state fiscal year
2023-24. Notwithstanding section 111-e of the social services law or
any other provision of law, social services districts shall retain
the non-federal share of any support collections otherwise payable
as reimbursement to the state.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the

703 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, amounts appropri-
ated herein received pursuant to section 391 of the federal personal
responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996 may
be used without state or local financial participation to provide
grants or enter into contracts with courts, local public agencies,
or nonprofit private entities consistent with federal law and
requirements. Such grants and/or contracts shall be made based on
the results of a competitive procurement.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any other state
department or agency for the purposes stated herein.
Funds appropriated herein may be used for a federally approved
research and demonstration project for improved custodial cooper-
ation. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, these
funds shall be available without local financial participation
(52200) ... 140,000,000 .......................... (re. $29,754,000)
EMPIRE STATE SUPPORTIVE HOUSING INITIATIVE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the empire state supportive housing
initiative.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to support a statewide multia-
gency supportive housing program to provide housing and support
services for vulnerable New Yorkers including but not limited to
seniors, veterans, victims of domestic violence, formerly incarcer-
ated individuals, individuals diagnosed with HIV/AIDS, homeless
individuals with co-presenting health conditions and eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth.
Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the commission-
er of a state department or agency holding an empire state support-
ive housing initiative contract shall be authorized, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts which
were executed on or before March 31, 2025 with entities providing
supportive housing services, without any additional requirements
that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative procedures.

704 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, such allocation and distrib-
ution is subject to the approval of the director of the budget of a
plan for such program submitted by the administering department or
agency.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart-
ment or agency for the purposes stated herein.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance general fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee (52399) ...................................
240,000,000 ..................................... (re. $240,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the empire state supportive housing
initiative.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to support a statewide multia-
gency supportive housing program to provide housing and support
services for vulnerable New Yorkers including but not limited to
seniors, veterans, victims of domestic violence, formerly incarcer-
ated individuals, individuals diagnosed with HIV/AIDS, homeless
individuals with co-presenting health conditions and eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth.
Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the commission-
er of a state department or agency holding an empire state support-
ive housing initiative contract shall be authorized, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts which
were executed on or before March 31, 2024 with entities providing
supportive housing services, without any additional requirements
that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative procedures.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, such allocation and distrib-
ution is subject to the approval of the director of the budget of a
plan for such program submitted by the administering department or
agency.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart-
ment or agency for the purposes stated herein.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance general fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee (52399) ...................................
210,000,000 ..................................... (re. $183,138,000)

705 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the empire state supportive housing
initiative.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to support a statewide multia-
gency supportive housing program to provide housing and support
services for vulnerable New Yorkers including but not limited to
seniors, veterans, victims of domestic violence, formerly incarcer-
ated individuals, individuals diagnosed with HIV/AIDS, homeless
individuals with co-presenting health conditions and eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth.
Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the commission-
er of a state department or agency holding an empire state support-
ive housing initiative contract shall be authorized, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts which
were executed on or before March 31, 2023 with entities providing
supportive housing services, without any additional requirements
that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative procedures.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, such allocation and distrib-
ution is subject to the approval of the director of the budget of a
plan for such program submitted by the administering department or
agency.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart-
ment or agency for the purposes stated herein.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance general fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee (52399) ...................................
210,000,000 ...................................... (re. $26,093,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the empire state supportive housing
initiative.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to support a statewide multia-
gency supportive housing program to provide housing and support
services for vulnerable New Yorkers including but not limited to
seniors, veterans, victims of domestic violence, formerly incarcer-
ated individuals, individuals diagnosed with HIV/AIDS, homeless
individuals with co-presenting health conditions and eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth.
Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the commission-
er of a state department or agency holding an empire state support-
ive housing initiative contract shall be authorized, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts which
were executed on or before March 31, 2022 with entities providing
supportive housing services, without any additional requirements

706 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative procedures.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, such allocation and distrib-
ution is subject to the approval of the director of the budget of a
plan for such program submitted by the administering department or
agency.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart-
ment or agency for the purposes stated herein.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance general fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee (52399) ...................................
110,000,000 ...................................... (re. $11,189,000)
EMPLOYMENT AND INCOME SUPPORT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For state reimbursement of the safety net assistance program as estab-
lished pursuant to chapter 436 of the laws of 1997.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law or any other
inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated herein shall reim-
burse 29 percent of safety net assistance expenditures, including
the cost of providing shelter supplements for safety net assistance
households at local option, including eligible households containing
a household member who has been released from prison, in order to
prevent eviction and address homelessness in accordance with social
services district plans approved by the office of temporary and
disability assistance and the director of the budget, provided,
however, that in social services districts with a population over
five million no shelter supplements other than the family homeless-
ness and eviction prevention supplement shall be reimbursed,
provided however funds appropriated herein shall only be used to
reimburse rental costs up to the maximum rent levels in place as of
January 1, 2021, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-
year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however, in
the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum
rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not
decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, and further provided that such supplements
shall not be part of the standard of need pursuant to section 131-a
of the social services law. Funds appropriated herein shall also
reimburse 29 percent of safety net assistance expenditures, in
social services districts with a population over five million, for

707 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
emergency shelter, transportation, or nutrition payments which the
district determines are necessary to establish or maintain independ-
ent living arrangements among persons living with medically diag-
nosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute of the state
department of health and who are homeless or facing homelessness and
for whom no viable and less costly alternative to housing is avail-
able; provided, however, that funds appropriated herein may only be
used for such purposes if the cost of such allowances are not eligi-
ble for reimbursement under medical assistance or other programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29 percent of safety net
assistance expenditures, in social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or fewer, for emergency shelter payments
promulgated by the office of temporary and disability assistance
which the district determines are necessary to establish or maintain
independent living arrangements among persons living with medically
diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute of the
state department of health and who are homeless or facing homeless-
ness and for whom no viable and less costly alternative to housing
is available; provided, however, that funds appropriated herein may
only be used for such purposes if the cost of such allowances are
not eligible for reimbursement under medical assistance or other
programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29 percent of safety net
assistance expenditures, in social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or fewer, for emergency shelter payments in
excess of those promulgated by the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance but not exceeding an amount reasonably approximate to
100 percent of fair market rent, at local option which the district
determines are necessary to establish or maintain independent living
arrangements among persons living with medically diagnosed HIV
infection as defined by the AIDS institute of the State department
of health and who are homeless or facing homelessness and for whom
no viable and less costly alternative to housing is available;
provided, however, that funds appropriated herein may only be used
for such purposes if the cost of such allowances are not eligible
for reimbursement under medical assistance or other programs. Such
emergency shelter payments shall only be made at local option and in
accordance with a plan approved by the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance and the director of the budget. Provided, however,
notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law or any other
inconsistent provision of law, if necessary funding, as determined
by the director of the budget, is secured in a social services
district from the medical assistance program by reducing the capita-
tion rates paid to medicaid managed care organizations by the amount
of savings resulting from stably housing individuals living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the state department of health, the social services district
shall make such emergency shelter payments in excess of those
promulgated by the office of temporary and disability assistance but
not exceeding an amount reasonably approximate to 100 percent of
fair market rent, and the savings shall be used to reimburse 100

708 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
percent of the cost of such excess emergency shelter payments for
cases reimbursed under the safety net assistance or family assist-
ance programs in social services districts with a population of five
million or fewer, in accordance with a plan approved by the office
of temporary and disability assistance and the director of the budg-
et; provided further that reimbursement shall be provided to medi-
caid managed care organizations through adjustments to capitation
rates should actual gross savings not be realized as determined by
the director of the budget.
For persons living with medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined
by the AIDS institute of the state department of health living in
social services districts with a population over five million who
are receiving public assistance, funds appropriated herein shall be
used to reimburse 29 percent of the additional rental costs deter-
mined based on limiting such person's earned and/or unearned income
contribution to 30 percent.
For persons living with medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined
by the AIDS institute of the state department of health living in
social services districts with a population of five million or fewer
who are receiving public assistance, funds appropriated herein may
be used to reimburse up to 100 percent of the additional rental
costs determined based on limiting such person's earned and/or
unearned income contribution to 30 percent. Such payments of addi-
tional rental costs shall only be made at local option and in
accordance with a plan approved by the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance and the director of the budget. Provided, however,
notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law or any other
inconsistent provision of law, if necessary funding, as determined
by the director of the budget, is secured in a social services
district from the medical assistance program by reducing the capita-
tion rates paid to medicaid managed care organizations by the amount
of savings resulting from stably housing individuals living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the state department of health, the social services district
shall make such payments of additional rental costs, for cases reim-
bursed under the safety net assistance and family assistance
program, and the savings shall be used to reimburse 100 percent of
the cost of the additional rental costs determined based on limiting
such person's earned and/or unearned income contribution to 30
percent in social services districts with a population of five
million or fewer, in accordance with a plan approved by the office
of temporary and disability assistance and the director of the budg-
et; provided further that reimbursement shall be provided to medi-
caid managed care organizations through adjustments to capitation
rates should actual gross savings not be realized as determined by
the director of the budget.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to enter into contracts with
persons or entities authorized pursuant to subdivision (j) of
section 17 of the social services law consistent with federal law
and requirements. Such contracts will be consistent with subdivision
(j) of section 17 of the social services law. Notwithstanding

709 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce reimbursement otherwise
payable to social services districts to recover 29 percent of costs
incurred by the office for expenditures related to subdivision (j)
of section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits, including those related to
title IV-E of the social security act; and including, but not limit-
ed to, additional federal funds resulting from any changes in feder-
al cost allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance general fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Social services districts shall be required to report to the office of
temporary and disability assistance on an annual basis, information,
as determined and requested by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is sought for providing tempo-
rary housing assistance to homeless individuals and families. Such
information shall be submitted electronically to the extent feasible
as determined by the office, and shall be used to evaluate expendi-
tures by such social services districts for the provision of tempo-
rary housing assistance for homeless individuals and families.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance may withhold or deny reimbursement, in whole or in
part, to any social services district that fails to develop or
submit a homeless services plan subject to the approval of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, fails to provide
homeless services and outreach in accordance with its approved home-
less services plan, or fails to develop or submit homeless services
outcome reports, consistent with those requirements promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, such appropriation shall be available
for reimbursement of eligible costs incurred on or after January 1,
2025 and before January 1, 2026, that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state on or after April 1, 2025, that are claimed by March 1,
2026. Such reimbursement shall constitute total state reimbursement
for activities funded herein in state fiscal year 2025-2026 (52203)
... 950,000,000 ................................. (re. $478,112,000)
For allocation to social services districts with a population of five
million or fewer, for services and expenses related to the payment
of rent arrears necessary to retain housing, to households that are

710 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
in receipt of or who would be eligible for ongoing or emergency
public assistance pursuant to section 131-a of the social services
law but have exhausted the allowable frequency of such payments
through the emergency safety net assistance or emergency assistance
to families programs. Such payments shall not exceed a total of six
months of arrears in addition to payments previously made through
the emergency safety net assistance or emergency assistance to fami-
lies programs. Such payments shall not be limited by the shelter
allowance amount set forth in section 131-a of the social services
law and shall not be part of the standard of need pursuant to
section 131-a of the social services law. Funds appropriated herein
shall be allocated to social services districts selected in accord-
ance with a methodology developed that shall consider the rate of
eviction filings and other indicators of need as determined by the
office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by the
director of the budget (53051) .....................................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For services and expenses of a program, pursuant to section 35 of the
social services law, providing legal representation of individuals
whose federal disability benefits have been denied or may be discon-
tinued. The commissioner shall reduce reimbursement otherwise paya-
ble to social services districts to ensure that social services
districts shall financially participate in additional legal repre-
sentation expenditures made pursuant to this provision. Such
reduction in local reimbursement shall be allocated among districts
by the commissioner based on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance program, or by such
alternative cost allocation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with social services officials
(52291) ... 5,260,000 ............................. (re. $3,637,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program, pursuant to section
35 of the social services law, providing legal representation of
individuals whose federal disability benefits have been denied or
may be discontinued. The commissioner shall reduce reimbursement
otherwise payable to social services districts to ensure that social
services districts shall financially participate in additional legal
representation expenditures made pursuant to this provision. Such
reduction in local reimbursement shall be allocated among districts
by the commissioner based on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance program, or by such
alternative cost allocation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with social services officials
(52335) ... 1,500,000 ................................ (re. $60,000)
For services to support human immunodeficiency virus specific employ-
ment programs. Components of each such program shall include, but
not be limited to, on-the-job training and employment. Each such
program shall guarantee that individuals completing the program
obtain full-time employment with health insurance coverage, such
health insurance coverage may be provided directly through employ-
ment or any local, state, or federal program. The office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance, in conjunction with the AIDS insti-

711 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tute of the department of health, shall select the organizations to
operate such programs through a competitive bid process (52293) ....
1,161,000 ......................................... (re. $1,161,000)
For grants to community based organizations for nutrition outreach in
areas where a significant percentage or number of those potentially
eligible for food assistance programs are not participating in such
programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall also be used to provide funding for a
targeted inflationary increase for the period April 1, 2025 through
March 31, 2026 the director shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases, inflation factors, or
trend factors pursuant to a chapter of the laws of 2025, for the
purpose of establishing rates of payments, contracts or any other
form of reimbursement (52292) ... 3,642,000 ....... (re. $3,642,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to provide grants to
community based organizations for nutrition outreach in areas where
a significant percentage or number of those potentially eligible for
food assistance programs are not participating in such programs
(53013) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Double Up Food Bucks program adminis-
tered by the Field & Fork Network (53020) ..........................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Arab American Family Support Center
(52360) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Caring for the Hungry and Homeless of
Peekskill (53032) ... 50,000 ......................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Community Alternatives (53033)
... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Congregation Chasdei Lev (53065) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell Cooperative Extension Dutchess
County for the Green Teen Program (53052) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Feeding Westchester (53066) .............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Goddard Riverside Community Center
(53015) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Housing Help (52376) ....................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of ICNA Relief, Inc (53058) ................
15,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Island Harvest LTD (53016) ..............
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Jericho Road Community Health Center -
Vive Shelter (53067) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Meals on Wheels Rockland County (53014)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Mylah's Organization (53068) ............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of NiskyNOW (53069) ........................
30,000 ............................................... (re. $30,000)

712 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Part of the Solution (53055) ............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Part of the Solution (53054) ............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Rockville Centre/Lakeview Economic Oppor-
tunity Center (53070) ... 40,000 ..................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of SAGE (52393) ............................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Schenectady Shares - The Daily Bread Food
Pantry (53071) ... 60,000 ............................ (re. $60,000)
For services and expenses of Schenectady Works - City Mission of Sche-
nectady Downtown Ambassador Program (53034) ........................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of The Albany Damien Center (53056) ........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of The Campaign Against Hunger (23336) .....
650,000 ............................................. (re. $650,000)
For services and expenses of The Hope Program (53000) ................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Trillium Health (53057) .................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of Urban Resource Institute (53018) ........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester Community Opportunity
Program, Inc. (53004) ... 125,000 ................... (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of a demonstration project in Monroe County
to provide work incentive payments to eligible participants in
receipt of means-tested government assistance. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be allocated to Monroe County for allowable project costs,
including but not limited to costs related to eligibility determi-
nation and program enrollment, financial counseling and case manage-
ment, work incentive payments to eligible program participants and
to contract with an outside entity to study and evaluate program
outcomes. Notwithstanding section 131-a of the social services law
or any law to the contrary, payments provided to participants
through this demonstration project shall be exempt and disregarded
as income in determining the need for aid provided pursuant to
public assistance programs to the extent allowed by federal law
(53061) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,000,000)
For services and expenses incurred by Baby2Baby for the purchase and
distribution of diapers and postpartum boxes to eligible families
(53062) ... 9,000,000 ............................. (re. $9,000,000)
For services and expenses incurred by the New York City Department of
Homeless Services for the expansion of Welcome Centers in public
transportation locations. Such funds shall be made available pursu-
ant to a plan developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and approved by the director of the budget (53063) ...
18,500,000 ....................................... (re. $18,500,000)

713 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as amended by chapter
172, section 2, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of National Diaper Banks, pursuant to the
following sub-schedule (53036) ... 1,500,000 ...... (re. $1,500,000)
Sub-Schedule
(914) Cares ........................ 187,500
The Allied Foundation ............... 18,750
Baby Steps Baby Pantry at
Christ Lutheran Church ............ 26,250
Central New York Diaper Bank Inc. .. 198,750
Every Bottom Covered ............... 187,500
Expecting Relief ................... 142,500
GOOD+ Foundation ................... 150,000
Her Village Inc. .................... 18,000
Junior League of Central West-
chester ........................... 56,250
Junior League of Rochester
Diaper Bank ....................... 11,250
Little Essentials ................... 37,500
Moms for Moms, NYC .................. 58,500
NYC Mammas Give Back Inc. ........... 75,000
Public Health Solutions -
Queens Diaper Bank ............... 198,750
The Food Pantries ................... 45,000
The HopeLine ........................ 75,000
Twin Tiers Baby Bank ................ 13,500
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For allocation to social services districts with a population of five
million or fewer, for services and expenses related to the payment
of rent arrears necessary to retain housing, to households that are
in receipt of or who would be eligible for ongoing or emergency
public assistance pursuant to section 131-a of the social services
law but have exhausted the allowable frequency of such payments
through the emergency safety net assistance or emergency assistance
to families programs. Such payments shall not exceed a total of six
months of arrears in addition to payments previously made through
the emergency safety net assistance or emergency assistance to fami-
lies programs. Such payments shall not be limited by the shelter
allowance amount set forth in sections 131-a of the social services
law and shall not be part of the standard of need pursuant to
section 131-a of the social services law. Funds appropriated herein
shall be allocated to social services districts selected in accord-
ance with a methodology developed that shall consider the rate of
eviction filings and other indicators of need as determined by the
office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by the
director of the budget (53051) .....................................
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,035,000)

714 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of a program, pursuant to section 35 of the
social services law, providing legal representation of individuals
whose federal disability benefits have been denied or may be discon-
tinued. The commissioner shall reduce reimbursement otherwise paya-
ble to social services districts to ensure that social services
districts shall financially participate in additional legal repre-
sentation expenditures made pursuant to this provision. Such
reduction in local reimbursement shall be allocated among districts
by the commissioner based on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance program, or by such
alternative cost allocation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with social services officials
(52291) ... 5,260,000 ................................ (re. $15,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program, pursuant to section
35 of the social services law, providing legal representation of
individuals whose federal disability benefits have been denied or
may be discontinued. The commissioner shall reduce reimbursement
otherwise payable to social services districts to ensure that social
services districts shall financially participate in additional legal
representation expenditures made pursuant to this provision. Such
reduction in local reimbursement shall be allocated among districts
by the commissioner based on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance program, or by such
alternative cost allocation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with social services officials
(52335) ... 1,500,000 ................................. (re. $6,100)
For services to support human immunodeficiency virus specific employ-
ment programs. Components of each such program shall include, but
not be limited to, on-the-job training and employment. Each such
program shall guarantee that individuals completing the program
obtain full-time employment with health insurance coverage, such
health insurance coverage may be provided directly through employ-
ment or any local, state, or federal program. The office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance, in conjunction with the AIDS insti-
tute of the department of health, shall select the organizations to
operate such programs through a competitive bid process (52293) ....
1,161,000 ......................................... (re. $1,161,000)
For grants to community based organizations for nutrition outreach in
areas where a significant percentage or number of those potentially
eligible for food assistance programs are not participating in such
programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall also be used to provide funding for a
cost of living adjustment for the period April 1, 2024 through March
31, 2025 pursuant to a chapter of the laws of 2024, for the purpose
of establishing rates of payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement (52292) ... 3,550,000 ............... (re. $3,550,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to provide grants to
community based organizations for nutrition outreach in areas where
a significant percentage or number of those potentially eligible for
food assistance programs are not participating in such programs
(53013) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,000,000)

715 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Double Up Food Bucks program adminis-
tered by the Field & Fork Network (53020) ..........................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,752,000)
For services and expenses of National Diaper Banks (53036) ...........
750,000 ............................................. (re. $649,000)
For services and expenses of National Diaper Banks (53053) ...........
750,000 ............................................. (re. $674,000)
For services and expenses of Housing Help (52376) ....................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of SAGE (52393) ............................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Arab American Family Support Center
(52360) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Caring for the Hungry and Homeless of
Peekskill (53032) ... 50,000 ......................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Community Alternatives (53033)
... 375,000 ......................................... (re. $375,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell Cooperative Extension Dutchess
County for the Green Teen Program (53052) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Goddard Riverside Community Center
(53015) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Meals on Wheels of Rockland County
(53014) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of People to People (53017) ................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Schenectady Works - City Mission of Sche-
nectady Downtown Ambassador Program (53034) ........................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of The Campaign Against Hunger (23336) .....
650,000 ............................................. (re. $650,000)
For services and expenses of The Hope Program (53000) ................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Urban Resource Institute (53018) ........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester Community Opportunity
Program, Inc. (53004) ... 125,000 ................... (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Part of the Solution (53054) ............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Part of the Solution (53055) ............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of The Albany Damien Center (53056) ........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Trillium Health (53057) .................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of Muslim Community Network (53059) ........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:

716 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of a program, pursuant to section 35 of the
social services law, providing legal representation of individuals
whose federal disability benefits have been denied or may be discon-
tinued. The commissioner shall reduce reimbursement otherwise paya-
ble to social services districts to ensure that social services
districts shall financially participate in additional legal repre-
sentation expenditures made pursuant to this provision. Such
reduction in local reimbursement shall be allocated among districts
by the commissioner based on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance program, or by such
alternative cost allocation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with social services officials
(52291) ... 5,260,000 ............................... (re. $182,000)
For services to support human immunodeficiency virus specific employ-
ment programs. Components of each such program shall include, but
not be limited to, on-the-job training and employment. Each such
program shall guarantee that individuals completing the program
obtain full-time employment with health insurance coverage, such
health insurance coverage may be provided directly through employ-
ment or any local, state, or federal program. The office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance, in conjunction with the AIDS insti-
tute of the department of health, shall select the organizations to
operate such programs through a competitive bid process (52293) ...
1,161,000 ......................................... (re. $1,161,000)
For grants to community based organizations for nutrition outreach in
areas where a significant percentage or number of those potentially
eligible for food assistance programs are not participating in such
programs.
Funds appropriated herein shall also be used to provide funding for a
cost of living adjustment for the period April 1, 2023 through March
31, 2024 pursuant to a chapter of the laws of 2023, for the purpose
of establishing rates of payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement (52292) ... 3,450,000 ................. (re. $292,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to provide grants to
community based organizations for nutrition outreach in areas where
a significant percentage or number of those potentially eligible for
food assistance programs are not participating in such programs
(53013) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,192,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to assist individ-
uals or families with their retroactive public assistance benefits
that were stolen on or after January 1, 2022 (53031) ...............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Arab American Family Support Center
(52360) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Meals on Wheels Rockland County (53014)
... 50,000 ............................................ (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of Goddard Riverside Community Center
(53015) ... 125,000 ................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Center for Community Alternatives (53033)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)

717 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of City Mission of Schenectady Downtown
Ambassador Program (53034) ... 75,000 ................ (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of HIAS (53035) ............................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Double Up Food Bucks program adminis-
tered by the Field & Fork Network (53020) ..........................
2,000,000 ............................................. (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of People to People (53017) ................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Urban Resource Institute (53018) ........
150,000 .............................................. (re. $19,000)
For services and expenses of West Side Federation of Senior & Support-
ive Housing (53019) ... 125,000 ...................... (re. $48,000)
For services and expenses of Island Harvest Food Bank Workforce Devel-
opment Institute (53016) ... 300,000 ................ (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of National Diaper Banks (53036) ...........
500,000 .............................................. (re. $42,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of a program, pursuant to section 35 of the
social services law, providing legal representation of individuals
whose federal disability benefits have been denied or may be discon-
tinued. The commissioner shall reduce reimbursement otherwise paya-
ble to social services districts to ensure that social services
districts shall financially participate in additional legal repre-
sentation expenditures made pursuant to this provision. Such
reduction in local reimbursement shall be allocated among districts
by the commissioner based on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance program, or by such
alternative cost allocation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with social services officials
(52291) ... 5,260,000 ............................. (re. $1,424,000)
For services to support human immunodeficiency virus specific employ-
ment programs. Components of each such program shall include, but
not be limited to, on-the-job training and employment. Each such
program shall guarantee that individuals completing the program
obtain full-time employment with health insurance coverage. The
office of temporary and disability assistance, in conjunction with
the AIDS institute of the department of health, shall select the
organizations to operate such programs through a competitive bid
process (52293) ... 1,161,000 ..................... (re. $1,161,000)
For services and expenses of Meals on Wheels Rockland County (53014)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses of The Campaign Against Hunger (23336) .....
200,000 ............................................... (re. $1,868)
For services and expenses of Island Harvest Food Bank Workforce Devel-
opment Institute (53016) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $4,100)
For services and expenses of People to People (53017) ................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Urban Resource Institute (53018) ........
125,000 .............................................. (re. $14,000)

718 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Housing Help (52376) ....................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of the Double Up Food Bucks program adminis-
tered by the Field & Fork Network (53020) ..........................
2,000,000 ............................................. (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of human services and veterans community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred between other agencies, including the office of children
and family services and the department of veterans' services with
the approval of the temporary president of the senate and the direc-
tor of the budget. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the
senate and the director of the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for the expendi-
ture of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote
(53021) ... 1,500,000 ............................... (re. $523,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of a program, pursuant to section 35 of the
social services law, providing legal representation of individuals
whose federal disability benefits have been denied or may be discon-
tinued. The commissioner shall reduce reimbursement otherwise paya-
ble to social services districts to ensure that social services
districts shall financially participate in additional legal repre-
sentation expenditures made pursuant to this provision. Such
reduction in local reimbursement shall be allocated among districts
by the commissioner based on the cost of, and number of district
residents served by, each legal assistance program, or by such
alternative cost allocation procedure deemed appropriate by the
commissioner after consultation with social services officials
(52291) ... 2,630,000 ............................... (re. $715,000)
For services to support human immunodeficiency virus specific employ-
ment programs. Components of each such program shall include, but
not be limited to, on-the-job training and employment. Each such
program shall guarantee that individuals completing the program
obtain full-time employment with health insurance coverage. The
office of temporary and disability assistance, in conjunction with
the AIDS institute of the department of health, shall select the
organizations to operate such programs through a competitive bid
process (52293) ... 1,161,000 ..................... (re. $1,161,000)
For services and expenses of Barakah Muslim Charity (52361) ..........
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Works (52363) .....................
70,000 ............................................... (re. $59,000)
For services and expenses of Cameron Community Ministries (52365) ....
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)

719 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Charlotte Community Association (52366)
... 10,000 ............................................ (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Coalition for Hispanic Family Services
(52367) ... 21,000 ................................... (re. $21,000)
For services and expenses of Guyana Cultural Association (52372) .....
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Heather Hurley (52373) ..................
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of HONOR (52375) ... 50,000 .. (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Ibero-American Action League (52313) ....
50,000 ................................................ (re. $2,100)
For services and expenses of La Fuerza Unida, Inc (52380) ............
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Littig House Community Center, Inc.
(52382) ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Long Beach Martin Luther King Center,
Inc. (52383) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of NAACP New York State Chapter (52386) ....
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Nos Quedamos (52390) ....................
60,000 ................................................ (re. $1,100)
For services and expenses of Sesame Flyers (52394) ...................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of St. Joseph's House of Hospitality (52395)
... 10,000 ........................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of United Community Services of OC, Inc.
(53001) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of United Neighborhood Houses (53002) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester Community Opportunity
Program, Inc. (53004) ... 12,500 ..................... (re. $12,500)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services to support human immunodeficiency virus specific employ-
ment programs. Components of each such program shall include, but
not be limited to, on-the-job training and employment. Each such
program shall guarantee that individuals completing the program
obtain full-time employment with health insurance coverage. The
office of temporary and disability assistance, in conjunction with
the AIDS institute of the department of health, shall select the
organizations to operate such programs through a competitive bid
process (52293) ... 1,161,000 ..................... (re. $1,121,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for state
reimbursement of a program in social services districts with a popu-
lation over five million for shelter supplements in order to prevent
eviction and to address homelessness in accordance with a plan
approved by the office of temporary and disability assistance and
the director of the budget. Expenditures for such shelter supple-
ments for individuals and families in receipt of safety net assist-
ance shall be reimbursed at 29 percent by this appropriation.
Expenditures for any other such shelter supplements shall be fully

720 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
reimbursed by this appropriation. Such reimbursement shall consti-
tute total reimbursement for activities funded herein for state
fiscal year 2020-21 (52221) ... 15,000,000 ....... (re. $15,000,000)
For services and expenses of a voluntary initiative in social services
districts with a population of five million or fewer to fund emer-
gency shelter allowance payments in excess of those promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability assistance, but not exceeding
an amount reasonably approximate to 100 percent of fair market rent,
and to reimburse 100 percent of the additional rental costs deter-
mined based on limiting such person's earned and/or unearned income
contribution to 30 percent, which the district determines are neces-
sary to establish or maintain independent living arrangements among
persons in receipt of public assistance who are living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the State department of health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and less costly alternative to
housing is available; provided, however, that funds appropriated
herein may only be used for such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement under medical assistance or
other programs, and further provided that such payments shall not be
part of the standard of need pursuant to section 131-a of the social
services law. Such funds may be provided by the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assistance to participating
social services districts with a population of five million or fewer
in accordance with a plan submitted by such social services district
and approved by the office of temporary and disability assistance
and the director of the budget. Up to $1,000,000 may be made avail-
able, without local participation, to selected social services
districts that submit an approved plan, which includes one or more
agreements with medicaid managed care organizations, performing
provider systems, and/or other third-party payors to provide dollar
for dollar matching funding and an agreement with a qualified not-
for-profit entity to provide services, including case management, to
those persons in receipt of the emergency shelter allowance in
excess of that promulgated by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the 30 percent income contribution identified in this
paragraph. To the extent that savings are realized over the course
of the designated period set forth in the plan, at the end of the
period set forth in the plan, the medicaid managed care organiza-
tion, performing provider system, and/or other third-party payor
shall continue to fully fund such ongoing excess shelter allowance
payments and services for the participating public assistance recip-
ients (52350) ... 5,000,000 ....................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of Ibero-American Action League (52313)
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Mohawk Valley Latino Association (52314)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Family Residences and Essential Enter-
prises, Inc (52317) ... 50,000 ....................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Centro Civico of Amsterdam (52346) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)

721 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Spanish Action League in Onondaga (52347)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Hempstead Hispanic Civic Association
(52348) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Hispanic Federation (52352) .........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
For services related to the development of technology assisted learn-
ing programs at the educational opportunity centers. Such funds may
be made available in accordance with a memorandum of understanding
between the office of temporary and disability assistance and the
state university of New York. Provided, however, that funds appro-
priated herein shall be used to provide basic educational skills,
job readiness training, and occupational training to program partic-
ipants. Of the funds appropriated herein, up to $215,000 shall be
available without state or local financial participation for the
development of technology assisted learning programs provided by
community based organizations which serve eligible individuals
living with HIV/AIDS (52213) ... 2,000,000 ........ (re. $2,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses related to the continuation of the empire
state poverty reduction initiative (52351) .........................
4,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,514,000)
For services and expenses of Mohawk Valley Latino Association (52314)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of Centro Civico of Amsterdam (52346) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $31,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses of the Council on Jewish Organizations of
Flatbush for community social services programs (52282) ............
380,000 .............................................. (re. $53,000)
For services and expenses of Mohawk Valley Latino Association (52314)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of Family Residences and Essential Enter-
prises, Inc (52317) ... 50,000 ........................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of Hempstead Hispanic Civic Association
(52348) ... 50,000 .................................... (re. $9,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2019:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for state
reimbursement of pilot programs in social services districts with a
population over five million or with a city with a population of at
least 205,000 but not more than 215,000 pursuant to the 2010 decen-
nial census for shelter supplements in order to prevent eviction and
to address homelessness. Such program shall provide shelter supple-
ments to individuals and families who reside in the respective

722 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
locations, are eligible for public assistance and are homeless or at
imminent risk of homelessness, that in addition to the basic shelter
allowance, totals up to one hundred percent of the 2018 Housing and
Urban Development Fair Market Rent of the respective local social
services districts, for a period up to four years, pursuant to a
plan submitted by each such social services district and approved by
the office of temporary and disability assistance. Such shelter
supplements shall be provided directly to the landlord or vendor and
shall not be considered as part of the standard of need as defined
in section 131-a of the social services law. Of the amount appropri-
ated herein, $1.1 million shall be made available to a district with
a city with a population of at least 205,000 but not more than
215,000 pursuant to the 2010 federal decennial census, and $13.5
million shall be made available to a social services district with a
population of over five million. The commissioner of the office of
temporary and disability assistance shall use the remaining appro-
priation balance to contract with a qualified evaluator to conduct
an evaluation and report on both the implementation and outcomes of
such shelter supplement program. Expenditures for such shelter
supplements shall be fully reimbursed by this appropriation. Such
reimbursement shall constitute total reimbursement for activities
funded herein (52221) ... 15,000,000 ............. (re. $14,960,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Home Energy Assistance Program Account - 25123
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding section 97 of the social services law, funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for services and expenses, including
payments to public and private agencies and individuals for the low
income home energy assistance program provided pursuant to the low
income energy assistance act of 1981. Funds appropriated herein,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for expenses related
to the low income home energy assistance program.
Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law, the office of
temporary and disability assistance may enter into an agreement to
provide an amount of funds, not to exceed the unspent balance at the
conclusion of the heating season from a prior budget year, to the
New York state energy research and development authority, to admin-
ister a program for low-cost residential weatherization or other
energy-related home repair for low-income households.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the amount
herein appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the office of temporary and
disability assistance federal fund - local assistance account with
the approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and control and copies thereof
with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman

723 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of the assembly ways and means committee (52215) ...................
600,000,000 ..................................... (re. $600,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding section 97 of the social services law, funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for services and expenses, including
payments to public and private agencies and individuals for the low
income home energy assistance program provided pursuant to the low
income energy assistance act of 1981. Funds appropriated herein,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for expenses related
to the low income home energy assistance program.
Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law, the office of
temporary and disability assistance may enter into an agreement to
provide an amount of funds, not to exceed the unspent balance at the
conclusion of the heating season from a prior budget year, to the
New York state energy research and development authority, to admin-
ister a program for low-cost residential weatherization or other
energy-related home repair for low-income households.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the amount
herein appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the office of temporary and
disability assistance federal fund - local assistance account with
the approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and control and copies thereof
with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman
of the assembly ways and means committee (52215) ...................
600,000,000 ..................................... (re. $221,534,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding section 97 of the social services law, funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for services and expenses, including
payments to public and private agencies and individuals for the low
income home energy assistance program provided pursuant to the low
income energy assistance act of 1981. Funds appropriated herein,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for expenses related
to the low income home energy assistance program.
Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law, the office of
temporary and disability assistance may enter into an agreement to
provide an amount of funds, not to exceed the unspent balance at the
conclusion of the heating season from a prior budget year, to the
New York state energy research and development authority, to admin-
ister a program for low-cost residential weatherization or other
energy-related home repair for low-income households.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the amount
herein appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the office of temporary and
disability assistance federal fund - local assistance account with
the approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and control and copies thereof

724 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman
of the assembly ways and means committee (52215) ...................
600,000,000 ..................................... (re. $222,774,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Account - 25178
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For reimbursement of the cost of the family assistance and the emer-
gency assistance to families programs. Notwithstanding section 153
of the social services law or any inconsistent provision of law,
funds appropriated herein shall be provided without state or local
participation except that for social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or more, reimbursement will be eighty-five
percent. Funds appropriated herein shall also include the cost of
providing shelter supplements for family assistance households at
local option, including eligible households containing a household
member who has been released from prison, in order to prevent
eviction and address homelessness in accordance with social services
district plans approved by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the director of the budget, provided, however, that
in social services districts with a population over five million no
shelter supplements other than the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement shall be reimbursed, provided however funds
appropriated herein shall only be used to reimburse rental costs up
to the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021, then
adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-year percentage chang-
es in fair market rent, provided, however, in the event of a
decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum rent levels
reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not decrease and
shall be set at the maximum rent levels established during the prior
year, and further provided that such supplements shall not be part
of the standard of need pursuant to section 131-a of the social
services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall also reimburse for family assistance
expenditures for emergency shelter, transportation, or nutrition
payments which the district determines are necessary to establish or
maintain independent living arrangements among persons living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the State department of health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and less costly alternative to
housing is available; provided, however, that funds appropriated
herein may only be used for such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement under medical assistance or
other programs.
For persons living with medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined
by the AIDS institute of the state department of health who are
receiving public assistance funds appropriated herein shall not be
used to reimburse the additional rental costs determined based on

725 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
limiting such person's earned and/or unearned income contribution to
30 percent.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to enter into contracts with
persons or entities authorized pursuant to subdivision (j) of
section 17 of the social services law consistent with federal law
and requirements. Such contracts will be made consistent with subdi-
vision (j) of section 17 of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce reimbursement otherwise
payable to social services districts to recover the federal share of
costs incurred by the office for expenditures related to subdivision
(j) of section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including, but not limited to,
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Social services districts shall be required to report to the office of
temporary and disability assistance on an annual basis, information,
as determined and requested by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is sought for providing tempo-
rary housing assistance to homeless individuals and families. Such
information shall be submitted electronically to the extent feasible
as determined by the office, and shall be used to evaluate expendi-
tures by such social services districts for the provision of tempo-
rary housing assistance for homeless individuals and families.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance may withhold or deny reimbursement, in whole or in
part, to any social services district that fails to develop or
submit a homeless services plan subject to the approval of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, fails to provide
homeless services and outreach in accordance with its approved home-
less services plan, or fails to develop or submit homeless services
outcome reports, consistent with those requirements promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, such appropriation shall be available
for reimbursement of eligible costs incurred on or after January 1,
2025 and before January 1, 2026, that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state on or after April 1, 2025, that are claimed by March 1,

726 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
2026. Such reimbursement shall constitute total federal reimburse-
ment for activities funded herein in state fiscal year 2025-26
(52203) ... 1,500,000,000 ....................... (re. $829,507,000)
For transfer to the credit of the office of children and family
services federal health and human services fund, state operations or
federal health and human services fund, local assistance, federal
day care account for additional reimbursement to social services
districts for child care assistance provided pursuant to title 5-C
of article 6 of the social services law. The funds shall be appor-
tioned among the social services districts by the office according
to an allocation plan developed by the office and submitted to the
director of the budget for approval within 60 days of enactment of
the budget. The funds allocated to a district under this appropri-
ation in addition to any state block grant funds allocated to the
district for child care services and any funds the district requests
the office of temporary and disability assistance to transfer from
the district's flexible fund for family services allocation to the
federal day care account shall constitute the district's entire
block grant allocation for a particular federal fiscal year, which
shall be available only for child care assistance expenditures made
during that federal fiscal year and which are claimed by March 31 of
the year immediately following the end of that federal fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any claims for child
care assistance made by a social services district for expenditures
made during a particular federal fiscal year, other than claims made
under title XX of the federal social security act and under the
supplemental nutrition assistance program employment and training
funds, shall be counted against the social services district's block
grant allocation for that federal fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provision in federal law and
regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. Prior to transfer of funds appropriated herein, the
commissioner of the office of children and family services shall
consult with the commissioner of the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance to determine the availability of such funding and
to request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance takes necessary steps to notify the department
of health and human services of the transfer of funding (52209) ....
483,630,000 ..................................... (re. $483,630,000)
For allocation to local social services districts for the flexible
fund for family services. Funds shall, without state or local
participation, be allocated to local social services districts in
accordance with a methodology developed by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the office of children and family

727 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
services and approved by the director of the budget. Such amounts
allocated to local social services districts shall hereinafter be
referred to as the flexible fund for family services and shall be
used for eligible services to eligible individuals under the State
plan for the federal temporary assistance for needy families block
grant.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities and, notwithstanding
section 153 of the social services law and any inconsistent
provision of law, shall constitute the full amount of federal tempo-
rary assistance for needy families funds to be paid on account of
activities funded in whole or in part hereunder and the full amount
of state reimbursement to be paid on account of local district
administrative claims. District allocations from the flexible fund
for family services may be spent only pursuant to plans of expendi-
ture, developed by each social services district and the local
governing body and approved by the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance, the office of children and family services, and the
director of the budget. Such allocation shall be available for
reimbursement through March 31, 2028; provided, however, that
reimbursement for child welfare services other than foster care
services shall be available for eligible expenditures incurred on or
after October 1, 2025 and before October 1, 2026 that are otherwise
reimbursable by the state on or after April 1, 2025 and that are
claimed by March 31, 2027.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amounts so
appropriated for allocation to local social services districts, may
be used, without state or local financial participation, by social
services districts for such district's first eligible expenditures
that occurred on or after October 1, 2025, or, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, during any other period
beginning on or after January 1, 1997, for tuition costs for foster
care children who are eligible for emergency assistance for families
in the manner the state was authorized to fund such costs under part
A of title IV of the social security act as such part was in effect
on September 30, 1995; provided that the funds appropriated herein
may not be used to reimburse localities for costs disallowed under
title IV-E of the social security act. Such expenditures shall
constitute good cause pursuant to section 408 (a) (10) of the social
security act. Such funds may also be used, without state or local
participation, for care, maintenance, supervision, and tuition for
juvenile delinquents and persons in need of supervision who are
placed in residential programs operated by authorized agencies and
who are eligible for emergency assistance to families in the manner
the state was authorized to fund such costs under part A of title IV
of the social security act as such part was in effect on September
30, 1995. Such expenditures shall constitute good cause pursuant to
section 408 (a) (10) of the social security act. Unless otherwise
approved by the commissioner of the office of children and family
services with the approval of the director of the budget, these
funds may be used only for eligible expenditures made from October

728 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
1, 2025 through September 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the funds so appropriated may not be used to reim-
burse localities for costs disallowed under title IV-E of the social
security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a social services
district may request that the office of temporary and disability
assistance retain and transfer a portion of the district's allo-
cation of these funds to the credit of the office of children and
family services federal health and human services fund, local
assistance, title XX social services block grant for use by the
district for eligible title XX services and/or to the credit of the
office of children and family services federal health and human
services fund, local assistance, federal day care account for use by
the district for eligible child care expenditures under the state
block grant for child care, within the percentages established by
the state in accordance with the federal social security act and
related federal regulations. Any funds transferred at a district's
request to the title XX social services block grant shall be used by
the district for eligible title XX social services provided in
accordance with the provisions of the federal social security act
and the social services law to children or their families whose
income is less than 200 percent of the federal poverty level appli-
cable to the family size involved. Any funds transferred at a
district's request to the office of children and family services
federal health and human services fund, local assistance, federal
day care account shall be made available to the district for use for
eligible child care expenditures in accordance with the applicable
provisions of federal law and regulations relating to federal funds
included in the state block grant for child care and in accordance
with applicable state law and regulations of the office of children
and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
claims made by a social services district for expenditures made for
child care during a particular federal fiscal year, other than
claims made under title XX of the federal social security act and
under the supplemental nutrition assistance program employment and
training funds, shall be counted against the social services
district's block grant for child care for that federal fiscal year.
Each social services district must certify to the office of children
and family services and the office of temporary and disability
assistance, within 90 days of enactment of the budget but before
August 15, 2025, the amount of funds it wishes to have transferred
under this provision.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of the funds
that each district expends on child welfare services from its flexi-
ble fund for family services funds and any flexible fund for family
services funds transferred at the district's request to the title XX
social services block grant must, to the extent that families are
eligible therefore, be equal to or greater than the district's
portion of the $457,322,341 statewide child welfare threshold
amount, which shall be established pursuant to a formula developed
by the office of temporary and disability assistance and the office

729 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law including the state finance
law and any local procurement law, at the request of a social
services district and with the approval of the director of the budg-
et, a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be retained by
the office of temporary and disability assistance for any services
eligible for funding under the flexible fund for family services for
which the applicable state agency has a contractual relationship.
Such funds may be suballocated, transferred or otherwise made avail-
able to the department of transportation or to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget (52223)
... 964,000,000 ................................. (re. $964,000,000)
The following remaining appropriations within the office of temporary
and disability assistance federal health and human services fund
temporary assistance for needy families account shall be available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
such funds may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance or office of children and family services federal fund -
local assistance account with the approval of the director of the
budget. Such funds shall be provided without state or local partic-
ipation for services to eligible individuals under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy families block grant whose
incomes do not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level or
who are otherwise eligible under such plan, provided that such
services to eligible persons not in receipt of public assistance
shall not constitute "assistance" under applicable federal regu-
lations and no more than 15 percent of the funds made available
herein may be used for administration, provided further that the
director of the budget does not determine that such use of funds can
be expected to have the effect of increasing qualified state expend-
itures under paragraph 7 of subdivision (a) of section 409 of the
federal social security act above the minimum applicable federal
maintenance of effort requirement. Such funds may be transferred,
suballocated, or otherwise made available to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget:
For allocation to local social services districts for the summer youth
employment program. Such funds shall be provided without state or
local participation for services to eligible individuals aged four-
teen to twenty. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent law to the
contrary, the commissioner of any local department of social
services may assign all or a portion of moneys appropriated herein
on behalf of such local department of social services to the work-
force investment board designated by such commissioner and upon
receipt of such monies, any such workforce investment board shall be
obligated to utilize such funds consistent with the purposes of this
appropriation. Funds appropriated herein shall be allocated to local
social services districts in accordance with a methodology developed
by the office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by

730 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the director of the budget. At the request of local social services
districts, funds not used for costs of the summer youth program may
be transferred to the credit of the district's allocation of the
flexible fund for family services; provided, however, that a minimum
of $46,350,000 will be used for the summer youth program (52205) ...
51,500,000 ........................................ (re. $3,876,000)
For additional services and expenses related to summer youth employ-
ment program. Such funds shall be provided without state or local
participation for services to eligible individuals aged fourteen to
twenty (53060) ... 5,000,000 ...................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of a youth employment program operating in
localities in receipt of project GIVE funding, as provided by the
division of criminal justice services. Such funds shall be provided
for services to eligible individuals aged fourteen to twenty.
Notwithstanding any other inconsistent law to the contrary, the
commissioner of any local department of social services may assign
all or a portion of moneys appropriated herein on behalf of such
local department of social services to the workforce investment
board designated by such commissioner and upon receipt of such
monies, any such workforce investment board shall be obligated to
utilize such funds consistent with the purposes of this appropri-
ation. Funds appropriated herein shall be allocated to local social
services districts in accordance with a methodology developed by the
office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by the
director of the budget (53025) .....................................
40,600,000 ....................................... (re. $35,085,000)
For services and expenses related to the provision of non-residential
domestic violence. Such funds may be made available to the office of
children and family services. Local social services districts are
encouraged to collaborate with not-for-profit providers in the
provision of such services (52206) .................................
3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the provision of
nonresidential domestic violence. Such funds may be made available
to the office of children and family services. Local social services
districts are encouraged to collaborate with not-for-profit provid-
ers in the provision of such services (53007) ......................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For payment to Metropolitan College for eligible services and expenses
relating to the continuation and expansion of a project to assist
individuals and families in moving out of poverty through the
pursuit of higher education. Projects shall include intensive, long-
term case management and statistically-based outcome assessments.
The amount appropriated herein shall be made available for one
project at Metropolitan College for an education and work consortium
that moves significant numbers of people from welfare to permanent
employment.
Such project shall provide services to recipients of family assist-
ance, safety net assistance and other eligible individuals. The
consortium shall consist of three institutions of higher education
with one of the institutions being a CUNY institution, one a New

731 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
York city based institution, and one based in Westchester county
(52249) ... 800,000 ................................. (re. $800,000)
For services related to the development of technology assisted learn-
ing programs at the educational opportunity centers. Such funds may
be made available in accordance with a memorandum of understanding
between the office of temporary and disability assistance and the
state university of New York. Provided, however, that funds appro-
priated herein shall be used to provide basic educational skills,
job readiness training, and occupational training to program partic-
ipants. Of the funds appropriated herein, up to $215,000 shall be
available without state or local financial participation for the
development of technology assisted learning programs provided by
community based organizations which serve eligible individuals
living with HIV/AIDS (52213) .......................................
4,100,000 ......................................... (re. $4,100,000)
For services, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and
without state or local financial participation, of the career path-
ways program for not-for-profit, community-based organizations
providing coordinated, comprehensive employment services beyond the
level currently funded by local social services districts to eligi-
ble individuals and families. Such funds are to be made available to
establish a career pathways program to link education and occupa-
tional training to subsequent employment through a continuum of
educational programs and integrated support services to enable
eligible participants, including disconnected young adults, ages
sixteen to twenty-four, to advance over time both to higher levels
of education and to higher wage jobs in targeted occupational
sectors. With funds appropriated herein, the office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall establish the career pathways program and provide technical
support, as needed, to provide education, training, and job place-
ment for low-income individuals, age sixteen and older. Preference
shall be given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds who are unem-
ployed or underemployed, in areas of the state with demonstrated
labor market needs and unemployment rates that are greater than the
appropriate or comparative rate of employment for the region, and to
persons in receipt of family assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the extent practicable, at
least sixty percent shall be available for services to eighteen to
twenty-four year olds, with remaining funds available to recipients
of family assistance and/or safety net assistance, without age
restrictions, and sixteen to seventeen year old self-supporting
individuals who are heads of household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall develop a request for proposals and shall receive, review, and
assess applications. In selecting proposals, the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of labor shall give
preference to programs that demonstrate community-based collab-
orations with education and training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training providers may include, but not,
be limited to general equivalency diplomas programs, community

732 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
colleges, junior colleges, business and trade schools, vocational
institutions, and institutions with baccalaureate degree-granting
programs; programs that provide for a career path or career paths,
as supported by identified local employment needs; programs that
provide employment services, including but not limited to, post-sec-
ondary training designed to meet the needs of employers in the local
labor market, or catchment area; programs that include education and
training components, such as remedial education, individual training
plans, pre-employment training, workplace basic skills, and literacy
skills training. Such education and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other credentialing bodies for
the purpose of providing participants with certificates, diplomas,
or degrees; projects that provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to tutoring, mentoring, child
care, after school program access, transportation, and case manage-
ment, as part of the individual training plan. Preference shall be
given to proposals that include not-for-profit collaborations with
education, training, or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional community resources and provide
participant support services; training that result in job placement;
and education that links participants with occupational skills
training and/or employer-related credentials, credits, diplomas or
certificates (52266) ... 1,425,000 ................ (re. $1,425,000)
For the services of Centro of Oneida for the implementation of
programs, or the provision of additional transportation services to
such eligible individuals and families, for the purpose of transpor-
tation to and from employment or other allowable work activities
(52262) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for transfer to the federal health
and human services fund, local assistance account, federal day care
account to provide additional funding for subsidies and quality
activities at the city university of New York, provided that of such
amount, $56,000 shall be available to community colleges and $85,000
shall be available to senior colleges (52260) ......................
141,000 ............................................. (re. $141,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for transfer to the federal health
and human services fund, local assistance account, federal day care
account to provide additional funding for subsidies and quality
activities at the state university of New York, provided that of
such amount, $77,000 shall be available to community colleges and
$116,000 shall be available to state operated campuses (52210) ...
193,000 ............................................. (re. $193,000)
For preventive services to eligible individuals and families, includ-
ing but not limited to: intensive case management and related
services for families with children at risk of foster care placement
due to the presence of alcohol and/or substance abuse in the house-
hold; family preservation services, centers and programs; foster
care diversion demonstrations; and not-for-profit provider collab-
orations with family treatment courts. Such funds are available

733 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, and/or award
new contracts through a competitive process. Provided that, of the
funds appropriated herein, at least $274,000 shall be available for
programs providing post adoption services (52269) ..................
785,000 ............................................. (re. $704,000)
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation
Authority for the provision of transportation services to eligible
individuals and families, for the purpose of transportation to and
from employment or other allowable work activities.
Such funds may be made available to the department of transportation
for the administration of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transporta-
tion Authority (52261) ... 82,000 .................... (re. $82,000)
For the services of the Jewish Child Care Association of New York
(JCCA) provided within JCCA's Center for Healing including delivery
of clinical services to children and families who have suffered
child abuse and/or exploitation and/or children exhibiting problem-
atic sexual behavior (PSB), training child welfare workers, teachers
and others to increase awareness of commercially sexually exploited
children (CSEC), sexually abused children, and/or children exhibit-
ing PSB (23337) ... 200,000 ......................... (re. $200,000)
For the services of a wage subsidy program. Eligible not-for-profit
community based organizations in social services districts shall
administer a program that enables employers to offer subsidized
employment, including but not limited to, expanded supportive tran-
sitional work activities for such eligible individuals and families
consistent with the provisions of section 336-e and section 336-f of
the social services law, as applicable. Provided that, of the
$475,000, not less than $297,000 shall be for programs in social
services districts with a population in excess of two million.
Preference shall be given to proposals that include provisions for
job retention, case management and job placement services. Partic-
ipation in the program by such eligible individuals and families
shall be limited to one year. Participating employers shall make
reasonable efforts to retain individuals served by the program
(52255) ... 475,000 ................................. (re. $475,000)
For services related to the wheels for work program, including, but
not limited to activities which procure, repair, finance, and/or
insure vehicles needed for transportation to and from employment or
allowable work activities (52253) ... 144,000 ....... (re. $144,000)
For costs associated with services and expenses incurred by local
social services districts to provide case management services
including, but not limited to, assessments, crisis intervention,
treatment and system navigation support, and connection to community
resources, to eligible households under the state plan for the
temporary assistance for needy families block grant. Funds appropri-

734 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ated herein shall be allocated to local social services districts in
accordance with a methodology developed by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and approved by the director of the budget
(53043) ... 17,200,000 ........................... (re. $17,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For reimbursement of the cost of the family assistance and the emer-
gency assistance to families programs. Notwithstanding section 153
of the social services law or any inconsistent provision of law,
funds appropriated herein shall be provided without state or local
participation except that for social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or more, reimbursement will be eighty-five
percent. Funds appropriated herein shall also include the cost of
providing shelter supplements for family assistance households at
local option, including eligible households containing a household
member who has been released from prison, in order to prevent
eviction and address homelessness in accordance with social services
district plans approved by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the director of the budget, provided, however, that
in social services districts with a population over five million no
shelter supplements other than the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement shall be reimbursed, provided however funds
appropriated herein shall only be used to reimburse rental costs up
to the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021, then
adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-year percentage chang-
es in fair market rent, provided, however, in the event of a
decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum rent levels
reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not decrease and
shall be set at the maximum rent levels established during the prior
year, and further provided that such supplements shall not be part
of the standard of need pursuant to section 131-a of the social
services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall also reimburse for family assistance
expenditures for emergency shelter, transportation, or nutrition
payments which the district determines are necessary to establish or
maintain independent living arrangements among persons living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the State department of health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and less costly alternative to
housing is available; provided, however, that funds appropriated
herein may only be used for such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement under medical assistance or
other programs.
For persons living with medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined
by the AIDS institute of the state department of health who are
receiving public assistance funds appropriated herein shall not be
used to reimburse the additional rental costs determined based on
limiting such person's earned and/or unearned income contribution to
30 percent.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to enter into contracts with
persons or entities authorized pursuant to subdivision (j) of

735 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
section 17 of the social services law consistent with federal law
and requirements. Such contracts will be made consistent with subdi-
vision (j) of section 17 of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce reimbursement otherwise
payable to social services districts to recover the federal share of
costs incurred by the office for expenditures related to subdivision
(j) of section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including, but not limited to,
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Social services districts shall be required to report to the office of
temporary and disability assistance on an annual basis, information,
as determined and requested by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is sought for providing tempo-
rary housing assistance to homeless individuals and families. Such
information shall be submitted electronically to the extent feasible
as determined by the office, and shall be used to evaluate expendi-
tures by such social services districts for the provision of tempo-
rary housing assistance for homeless individuals and families.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance may withhold or deny reimbursement, in whole or in
part, to any social services district that fails to develop or
submit a homeless services plan subject to the approval of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, fails to provide
homeless services and outreach in accordance with its approved home-
less services plan, or fails to develop or submit homeless services
outcome reports, consistent with those requirements promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, such appropriation shall be available
for reimbursement of eligible costs incurred on or after January 1,
2024 and before January 1, 2025, that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state on or after April 1, 2024, that are claimed by March 1,
2025. Such reimbursement shall constitute total federal reimburse-
ment for activities funded herein in state fiscal year 2024-25
(52203) ... 1,500,000,000 ....................... (re. $819,151,000)

736 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For transfer to the credit of the office of children and family
services federal health and human services fund, state operations or
federal health and human services fund, local assistance, federal
day care account for additional reimbursement to social services
districts for child care assistance provided pursuant to title 5-C
of article 6 of the social services law. The funds shall be appor-
tioned among the social services districts by the office according
to an allocation plan developed by the office and submitted to the
director of the budget for approval within 60 days of enactment of
the budget. The funds allocated to a district under this appropri-
ation in addition to any state block grant funds allocated to the
district for child care services and any funds the district requests
the office of temporary and disability assistance to transfer from
the district's flexible fund for family services allocation to the
federal day care account shall constitute the district's entire
block grant allocation for a particular federal fiscal year, which
shall be available only for child care assistance expenditures made
during that federal fiscal year and which are claimed by March 31 of
the year immediately following the end of that federal fiscal year.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any claims for child
care assistance made by a social services district for expenditures
made during a particular federal fiscal year, other than claims made
under title XX of the federal social security act and under the
supplemental nutrition assistance program employment and training
funds, shall be counted against the social services district's block
grant allocation for that federal fiscal year.
A social services district shall expend its allocation from the block
grant in accordance with the applicable provision in federal law and
regulations relating to the federal funds included in the state
block grant for child care and the regulations of the office of
children and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, each district's claims submitted under the state block grant
for child care will be processed in a manner that maximizes the
availability of federal funds and ensures that the district meets
its maintenance of effort requirement in each applicable federal
fiscal year. Prior to transfer of funds appropriated herein, the
commissioner of the office of children and family services shall
consult with the commissioner of the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance to determine the availability of such funding and
to request that the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance takes necessary steps to notify the department
of health and human services of the transfer of funding (52209) ....
463,630,000 ..................................... (re. $463,630,000)
For allocation to local social services districts for the flexible
fund for family services. Funds shall, without state or local
participation, be allocated to local social services districts in
accordance with a methodology developed by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget. Such amounts
allocated to local social services districts shall hereinafter be
referred to as the flexible fund for family services and shall be

737 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
used for eligible services to eligible individuals under the State
plan for the federal temporary assistance for needy families block
grant.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities and, notwithstanding
section 153 of the social services law and any inconsistent
provision of law, shall constitute the full amount of federal tempo-
rary assistance for needy families funds to be paid on account of
activities funded in whole or in part hereunder and the full amount
of state reimbursement to be paid on account of local district
administrative claims. District allocations from the flexible fund
for family services may be spent only pursuant to plans of expendi-
ture, developed by each social services district and the local
governing body and approved by the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance, the office of children and family services, and the
director of the budget. Such allocation shall be available for
reimbursement through March 31, 2027; provided, however, that
reimbursement for child welfare services other than foster care
services shall be available for eligible expenditures incurred on or
after October 1, 2024 and before October 1, 2025 that are otherwise
reimbursable by the state on or after April 1, 2024 and that are
claimed by March 31, 2026.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amounts so
appropriated for allocation to local social services districts, may
be used, without state or local financial participation, by social
services districts for such district's first eligible expenditures
that occurred on or after October 1, 2024, or, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, during any other period
beginning on or after January 1, 1997, for tuition costs for foster
care children who are eligible for emergency assistance for families
in the manner the state was authorized to fund such costs under part
A of title IV of the social security act as such part was in effect
on September 30, 1995; provided that the funds appropriated herein
may not be used to reimburse localities for costs disallowed under
title IV-E of the social security act. Such expenditures shall
constitute good cause pursuant to section 408 (a) (10) of the social
security act. Such funds may also be used, without state or local
participation, for care, maintenance, supervision, and tuition for
juvenile delinquents and persons in need of supervision who are
placed in residential programs operated by authorized agencies and
who are eligible for emergency assistance to families in the manner
the state was authorized to fund such costs under part A of title IV
of the social security act as such part was in effect on September
30, 1995. Such expenditures shall constitute good cause pursuant to
section 408 (a) (10) of the social security act. Unless otherwise
approved by the commissioner of the office of children and family
services with the approval of the director of the budget, these
funds may be used only for eligible expenditures made from October
1, 2024 through September 30, 2025. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the funds so appropriated may not be used to reim-

738 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
burse localities for costs disallowed under title IV-E of the social
security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a social services
district may request that the office of temporary and disability
assistance retain and transfer a portion of the district's allo-
cation of these funds to the credit of the office of children and
family services federal health and human services fund, local
assistance, title XX social services block grant for use by the
district for eligible title XX services and/or to the credit of the
office of children and family services federal health and human
services fund, local assistance, federal day care account for use by
the district for eligible child care expenditures under the state
block grant for child care, within the percentages established by
the state in accordance with the federal social security act and
related federal regulations. Any funds transferred at a district's
request to the title XX social services block grant shall be used by
the district for eligible title XX social services provided in
accordance with the provisions of the federal social security act
and the social services law to children or their families whose
income is less than 200 percent of the federal poverty level appli-
cable to the family size involved. Any funds transferred at a
district's request to the office of children and family services
federal health and human services fund, local assistance, federal
day care account shall be made available to the district for use for
eligible child care expenditures in accordance with the applicable
provisions of federal law and regulations relating to federal funds
included in the state block grant for child care and in accordance
with applicable state law and regulations of the office of children
and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
claims made by a social services district for expenditures made for
child care during a particular federal fiscal year, other than
claims made under title XX of the federal social security act and
under the supplemental nutrition assistance program employment and
training funds, shall be counted against the social services
district's block grant for child care for that federal fiscal year.
Each social services district must certify to the office of children
and family services and the office of temporary and disability
assistance, within 90 days of enactment of the budget but before
August 15, 2024, the amount of funds it wishes to have transferred
under this provision.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of the funds
that each district expends on child welfare services from its flexi-
ble fund for family services funds and any flexible fund for family
services funds transferred at the district's request to the title XX
social services block grant must, to the extent that families are
eligible therefore, be equal to or greater than the district's
portion of the $457,322,341 statewide child welfare threshold
amount, which shall be established pursuant to a formula developed
by the office of temporary and disability assistance and the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget.

739 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law including the state finance
law and any local procurement law, at the request of a social
services district and with the approval of the director of the budg-
et, a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be retained by
the office of temporary and disability assistance for any services
eligible for funding under the flexible fund for family services for
which the applicable state agency has a contractual relationship.
Such funds may be suballocated, transferred or otherwise made avail-
able to the department of transportation or to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget (52223)
... 1,014,000,000 ............................... (re. $141,251,000)
The following remaining appropriations within the office of temporary
and disability assistance federal health and human services fund
temporary assistance for needy families account shall be available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
such funds may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance or office of children and family services federal fund -
local assistance account with the approval of the director of the
budget. Such funds shall be provided without state or local partic-
ipation for services to eligible individuals under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy families block grant whose
incomes do not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level or
who are otherwise eligible under such plan, provided that such
services to eligible persons not in receipt of public assistance
shall not constitute "assistance" under applicable federal regu-
lations and no more than 15 percent of the funds made available
herein may be used for administration, provided further that the
director of the budget does not determine that such use of funds can
be expected to have the effect of increasing qualified state expend-
itures under paragraph 7 of subdivision (a) of section 409 of the
federal social security act above the minimum applicable federal
maintenance of effort requirement. Such funds may be transferred,
suballocated, or otherwise made available to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget:
For allocation to local social services districts for the summer youth
employment program. Such funds shall be provided without state or
local participation for services to eligible individuals aged four-
teen to twenty. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent law to the
contrary, the commissioner of any local department of social
services may assign all or a portion of moneys appropriated herein
on behalf of such local department of social services to the work-
force investment board designated by such commissioner and upon
receipt of such monies, any such workforce investment board shall be
obligated to utilize such funds consistent with the purposes of this
appropriation. Funds appropriated herein shall be allocated to local
social services districts in accordance with a methodology developed
by the office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by
the director of the budget. At the request of local social services
districts, funds not used for costs of the summer youth program may

740 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be transferred to the credit of the district's allocation of the
flexible fund for family services; provided, however, that a minimum
of $45,000,000 will be used for the summer youth program (52205) ...
50,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,321,000)
For services and expenses of a youth employment program operating in
localities in receipt of project GIVE funding, as provided by the
division of criminal justice services. Such funds shall be provided
for services to eligible individuals aged fourteen to twenty.
Notwithstanding any other inconsistent law to the contrary, the
commissioner of any local department of social services may assign
all or a portion of moneys appropriated herein on behalf of such
local department of social services to the workforce investment
board designated by such commissioner and upon receipt of such
monies, any such workforce investment board shall be obligated to
utilize such funds consistent with the purposes of this appropri-
ation. Funds appropriated herein shall be allocated to local social
services districts in accordance with a methodology developed by the
office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by the
director of the budget (53025) .....................................
38,800,000 ....................................... (re. $13,728,000)
For services and expenses related to the provision of non-residential
domestic violence. Such funds may be made available to the office of
children and family services. Local social services districts are
encouraged to collaborate with not-for-profit providers in the
provision of such services (52206) .................................
3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $661,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the provision of
nonresidential domestic violence. Such funds may be made available
to the office of children and family services. Local social services
districts are encouraged to collaborate with not-for-profit provid-
ers in the provision of such services (53007) ......................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For the continuation and expansion of a demonstration project to
assist individuals and families in moving out of poverty through the
pursuit of higher education. Projects shall include intensive, long-
term case management and statistically-based outcome assessments.
The amount appropriated herein shall be made available for one
project at an education and work consortium having developed
programs that moved significant numbers of people from welfare to
permanent employment, in receipt of financial commitments from a
not-for-profit foundation, and having an established working
relationship with regional social services agencies, the local busi-
ness community and other public and/or private institutions of high-
er education. Such program shall provide services to recipients of
family assistance, safety net assistance and other eligible individ-
uals. The consortium shall consist of three institutions of higher
education with one of the institutions being a CUNY institution, one
a New York city based institution, and one based in Westchester
county (52249) ... 800,000 .......................... (re. $339,000)
For services related to the development of technology assisted learn-
ing programs at the educational opportunity centers. Such funds may

741 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be made available in accordance with a memorandum of understanding
between the office of temporary and disability assistance and the
state university of New York. Provided, however, that funds appro-
priated herein shall be used to provide basic educational skills,
job readiness training, and occupational training to program partic-
ipants. Of the funds appropriated herein, up to $215,000 shall be
available without state or local financial participation for the
development of technology assisted learning programs provided by
community based organizations which serve eligible individuals
living with HIV/AIDS (52213) .......................................
4,100,000 ......................................... (re. $4,100,000)
For services, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and
without state or local financial participation, of the career path-
ways program for not-for-profit, community-based organizations
providing coordinated, comprehensive employment services beyond the
level currently funded by local social services districts to eligi-
ble individuals and families. Such funds are to be made available to
establish a career pathways program to link education and occupa-
tional training to subsequent employment through a continuum of
educational programs and integrated support services to enable
eligible participants, including disconnected young adults, ages
sixteen to twenty-four, to advance over time both to higher levels
of education and to higher wage jobs in targeted occupational
sectors. With funds appropriated herein, the office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall establish the career pathways program and provide technical
support, as needed, to provide education, training, and job place-
ment for low-income individuals, age sixteen and older. Preference
shall be given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds who are unem-
ployed or underemployed, in areas of the state with demonstrated
labor market needs and unemployment rates that are greater than the
appropriate or comparative rate of employment for the region, and to
persons in receipt of family assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the extent practicable, at
least sixty percent shall be available for services to eighteen to
twenty-four year olds, with remaining funds available to recipients
of family assistance and/or safety net assistance, without age
restrictions, and sixteen to seventeen year old self-supporting
individuals who are heads of household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall develop a request for proposals and shall receive, review, and
assess applications. In selecting proposals, the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of labor shall give
preference to programs that demonstrate community-based collab-
orations with education and training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training providers may include, but not,
be limited to general equivalency diplomas programs, community
colleges, junior colleges, business and trade schools, vocational
institutions, and institutions with baccalaureate degree-granting
programs; programs that provide for a career path or career paths,
as supported by identified local employment needs; programs that

742 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provide employment services, including but not limited to, post-sec-
ondary training designed to meet the needs of employers in the local
labor market, or catchment area; programs that include education and
training components, such as remedial education, individual training
plans, pre-employment training, workplace basic skills, and literacy
skills training. Such education and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other credentialing bodies for
the purpose of providing participants with certificates, diplomas,
or degrees; projects that provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to tutoring, mentoring, child
care, after school program access, transportation, and case manage-
ment, as part of the individual training plan. Preference shall be
given to proposals that include not-for-profit collaborations with
education, training, or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional community resources and provide
participant support services; training that result in job placement;
and education that links participants with occupational skills
training and/or employer-related credentials, credits, diplomas or
certificates (52266) ... 1,425,000 ................ (re. $1,425,000)
For the services of Centro of Oneida for the implementation of
programs, or the provision of additional transportation services to
such eligible individuals and families, for the purpose of transpor-
tation to and from employment or other allowable work activities
(52262) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for transfer to the federal health
and human services fund, local assistance account, federal day care
account to provide additional funding for subsidies and quality
activities at the city university of New York, provided that of such
amount, $56,000 shall be available to community colleges and $85,000
shall be available to senior colleges (52260) ......................
141,000 ............................................. (re. $141,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the funds appropri-
ated herein shall be available for transfer to the federal health
and human services fund, local assistance account, federal day care
account to provide additional funding for subsidies and quality
activities at the state university of New York, provided that of
such amount, $77,000 shall be available to community colleges and
$116,000 shall be available to state operated campuses (52210) .....
193,000 ............................................. (re. $193,000)
For preventive services to eligible individuals and families, includ-
ing but not limited to: intensive case management and related
services for families with children at risk of foster care placement
due to the presence of alcohol and/or substance abuse in the house-
hold; family preservation services, centers and programs; foster
care diversion demonstrations; and not-for-profit provider collab-
orations with family treatment courts. Such funds are available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and

743 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
family services, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, and/or award
new contracts through a competitive process. Provided that, of the
funds appropriated herein, at least $274,000 shall be available for
programs providing post adoption services (52269) ..................
785,000 ............................................. (re. $460,000)
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation
Authority for the provision of transportation services to eligible
individuals and families, for the purpose of transportation to and
from employment or other allowable work activities.
Such funds may be made available to the department of transportation
for the administration of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transporta-
tion Authority (52261) ... 82,000 .................... (re. $82,000)
For the services of the Jewish Child Care Association of New York
(JCCA) provided within JCCA's Center for Healing including delivery
of clinical services to children and families who have suffered
child abuse and/or exploitation and/or children exhibiting problem-
atic sexual behavior (PSB), training child welfare workers, teachers
and others to increase awareness of commercially sexually exploited
children (CSEC), sexually abused children, and/or children exhibit-
ing PSB (23337) ... 200,000 ......................... (re. $200,000)
For the services of a wage subsidy program. Eligible not-for-profit
community based organizations in social services districts shall
administer a program that enables employers to offer subsidized
employment, including but not limited to, expanded supportive tran-
sitional work activities for such eligible individuals and families
consistent with the provisions of section 336-e and section 336-f of
the social services law, as applicable. Provided that, of the
$475,000, not less than $297,000 shall be for programs in social
services districts with a population in excess of two million.
Preference shall be given to proposals that include provisions for
job retention, case management and job placement services. Partic-
ipation in the program by such eligible individuals and families
shall be limited to one year. Participating employers shall make
reasonable efforts to retain individuals served by the program
(52255) ... 475,000 ................................. (re. $475,000)
For services related to the wheels for work program, including, but
not limited to activities which procure, repair, finance, and/or
insure vehicles needed for transportation to and from employment or
allowable work activities (52253) ... 144,000 ....... (re. $144,000)
For costs associated with services and expenses incurred by local
social services districts to provide case management services
including, but not limited to, assessments, crisis intervention,
treatment and system navigation support, and connection to community
resources, to eligible households under the state plan for the
temporary assistance for needy families block grant. Funds appropri-
ated herein shall be allocated to local social services districts in
accordance with a methodology developed by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and approved by the director of the budget
(53043) ... 17,200,000 ........................... (re. $14,027,000)

744 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Funds appropriated herein shall be made available to local social
services districts to provide services, assistance and/or supports
targeted to households with children under the age of 18 living
below the 2024 federal poverty level at time of program enrollment,
residing in areas of concentrated poverty, and eligible under the
state plan for the temporary assistance for needy families block
grant. Of the amounts appropriated herein, $25 million shall be
allocated to Monroe county for use in the city of Rochester, $12.25
million to Erie county for use in the city of Buffalo, and $12.25
million to Onondaga county for use in the city of Syracuse. Funds
shall be provided pursuant to a plan submitted by the county social
services commissioner, which shall include consultation with the
mayor of the respective City, to and approved by the office of
temporary and disability assistance. Any assistance granted through
this program shall not be considered income or resources for
purposes of eligibility for public benefits or other public assist-
ance to the extent allowed by law and approved by the commissioner
of the office of temporary and disability assistance. Notwithstand-
ing section 163 of the state finance law, section 142 of the econom-
ic development law, or any other inconsistent provision of law, the
commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assistance
may use up to $500,000 to fund a non-competitive contract or
contracts with one or more qualified evaluators to conduct an evalu-
ation and report on both the implementation and outcomes of the
funds provided for herein (53044) ..................................
50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For reimbursement of the cost of the family assistance and the emer-
gency assistance to families programs. Notwithstanding section 153
of the social services law or any inconsistent provision of law,
funds appropriated herein shall be provided without state or local
participation except that for social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or more, reimbursement will be eighty-five
percent. Funds appropriated herein shall also include the cost of
providing shelter supplements for family assistance households at
local option, including eligible households containing a household
member who has been released from prison, in order to prevent
eviction and address homelessness in accordance with social services
district plans approved by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the director of the budget, provided, however, that
in social services districts with a population over five million no
shelter supplements other than the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement shall be reimbursed, provided however funds
appropriated herein shall only be used to reimburse rental costs up
to the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021, then
adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-year percentage chang-
es in fair market rent, provided, however, in the event of a
decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum rent levels
reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not decrease and
shall be set at the maximum rent levels established during the prior

745 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
year, and further provided that such supplements shall not be part
of the standard of need pursuant to section 131-a of the social
services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall also reimburse for family assistance
expenditures for emergency shelter, transportation, or nutrition
payments which the district determines are necessary to establish or
maintain independent living arrangements among persons living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the State department of health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and less costly alternative to
housing is available; provided, however, that funds appropriated
herein may only be used for such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement under medical assistance or
other programs.
For persons living with medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined
by the AIDS institute of the state department of health who are
receiving public assistance funds appropriated herein shall not be
used to reimburse the additional rental costs determined based on
limiting such person's earned and/or unearned income contribution to
30 percent.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to enter into contracts with
persons or entities authorized pursuant to subdivision (j) of
section 17 of the social services law consistent with federal law
and requirements. Such contracts will be made consistent with subdi-
vision (j) of section 17 of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce reimbursement otherwise
payable to social services districts to recover the federal share of
costs incurred by the office for expenditures related to subdivision
(j) of section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including, but not limited to,
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Social services districts shall be required to report to the office of
temporary and disability assistance on an annual basis, information,
as determined and requested by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is sought for providing tempo-
rary housing assistance to homeless individuals and families. Such
information shall be submitted electronically to the extent feasible

746 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
as determined by the office, and shall be used to evaluate expendi-
tures by such social services districts for the provision of tempo-
rary housing assistance for homeless individuals and families.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance may withhold or deny reimbursement, in whole or in
part, to any social services district that fails to develop or
submit a homeless services plan subject to the approval of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, fails to provide
homeless services and outreach in accordance with its approved home-
less services plan, or fails to develop or submit homeless services
outcome reports, consistent with those requirements promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, such appropriation shall be available
for reimbursement of eligible costs incurred on or after January 1,
2023 and before January 1, 2024, that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state on or after April 1, 2023, that are claimed by March 1,
2024. Such reimbursement shall constitute total federal reimburse-
ment for activities funded herein in state fiscal year 2023-24
(52203) ... 1,500,000,000 ....................... (re. $301,942,000)
For allocation to local social services districts for the flexible
fund for family services. Funds shall, without state or local
participation, be allocated to local social services districts in
accordance with a methodology developed by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget. Such amounts
allocated to local social services districts shall hereinafter be
referred to as the flexible fund for family services and shall be
used for eligible services to eligible individuals under the State
plan for the federal temporary assistance for needy families block
grant.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities and, notwithstanding
section 153 of the social services law and any inconsistent
provision of law, shall constitute the full amount of federal tempo-
rary assistance for needy families funds to be paid on account of
activities funded in whole or in part hereunder and the full amount
of state reimbursement to be paid on account of local district
administrative claims. District allocations from the flexible fund
for family services may be spent only pursuant to plans of expendi-
ture, developed by each social services district and the local
governing body and approved by the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance, the office of children and family services, and the
director of the budget. Such allocation shall be available for
reimbursement through March 31, 2026; provided, however, that
reimbursement for child welfare services other than foster care
services shall be available for eligible expenditures incurred on or
after October 1, 2023 and before October 1, 2024 that are otherwise
reimbursable by the state on or after April 1, 2023 and that are
claimed by March 31, 2025.

747 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amounts so
appropriated for allocation to local social services districts, may
be used, without state or local financial participation, by social
services districts for such district's first eligible expenditures
that occurred on or after October 1, 2023, or, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, during any other period
beginning on or after January 1, 1997, for tuition costs for foster
care children who are eligible for emergency assistance for families
in the manner the state was authorized to fund such costs under part
A of title IV of the social security act as such part was in effect
on September 30, 1995; provided that the funds appropriated herein
may not be used to reimburse localities for costs disallowed under
title IV-E of the social security act. Such expenditures shall
constitute good cause pursuant to section 408 (a) (10) of the social
security act. Such funds may also be used, without state or local
participation, for care, maintenance, supervision, and tuition for
juvenile delinquents and persons in need of supervision who are
placed in residential programs operated by authorized agencies and
who are eligible for emergency assistance to families in the manner
the state was authorized to fund such costs under part A of title IV
of the social security act as such part was in effect on September
30, 1995. Such expenditures shall constitute good cause pursuant to
section 408 (a) (10) of the social security act. Unless otherwise
approved by the commissioner of the office of children and family
services with the approval of the director of the budget, these
funds may be used only for eligible expenditures made from October
1, 2023 through September 30, 2024. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the funds so appropriated may not be used to reim-
burse localities for costs disallowed under title IV-E of the social
security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a social services
district may request that the office of temporary and disability
assistance retain and transfer a portion of the district's allo-
cation of these funds to the credit of the office of children and
family services federal health and human services fund, local
assistance, title XX social services block grant for use by the
district for eligible title XX services and/or to the credit of the
office of children and family services federal health and human
services fund, local assistance, federal day care account for use by
the district for eligible child care expenditures under the state
block grant for child care, within the percentages established by
the state in accordance with the federal social security act and
related federal regulations. Any funds transferred at a district's
request to the title XX social services block grant shall be used by
the district for eligible title XX social services provided in
accordance with the provisions of the federal social security act
and the social services law to children or their families whose
income is less than 200 percent of the federal poverty level appli-
cable to the family size involved. Any funds transferred at a
district's request to the office of children and family services
federal health and human services fund, local assistance, federal

748 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
day care account shall be made available to the district for use for
eligible child care expenditures in accordance with the applicable
provisions of federal law and regulations relating to federal funds
included in the state block grant for child care and in accordance
with applicable state law and regulations of the office of children
and family services. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
claims made by a social services district for expenditures made for
child care during a particular federal fiscal year, other than
claims made under title XX of the federal social security act and
under the supplemental nutrition assistance program employment and
training funds, shall be counted against the social services
district's block grant for child care for that federal fiscal year.
Each social services district must certify to the office of children
and family services and the office of temporary and disability
assistance, within 90 days of enactment of the budget but before
August 15, 2023, the amount of funds it wishes to have transferred
under this provision.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of the funds
that each district expends on child welfare services from its flexi-
ble fund for family services funds and any flexible fund for family
services funds transferred at the district's request to the title XX
social services block grant must, to the extent that families are
eligible therefore, be equal to or greater than the district's
portion of the $382,322,341 statewide child welfare threshold
amount, which shall be established pursuant to a formula developed
by the office of temporary and disability assistance and the office
of children and family services and approved by the director of the
budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law including the state finance
law and any local procurement law, at the request of a social
services district and with the approval of the director of the budg-
et, a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be retained by
the office of temporary and disability assistance for any services
eligible for funding under the flexible fund for family services for
which the applicable state agency has a contractual relationship.
Such funds may be suballocated, transferred or otherwise made avail-
able to the department of transportation or to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget (52223)
... 964,000,000 .................................. (re. $52,801,000)
The following remaining appropriations within the office of temporary
and disability assistance federal health and human services fund
temporary assistance for needy families account shall be available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
such funds may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance or office of children and family services federal fund -
local assistance account with the approval of the director of the
budget. Such funds shall be provided without state or local partic-
ipation for services to eligible individuals under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy families block grant whose

749 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
incomes do not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level or
who are otherwise eligible under such plan, provided that such
services to eligible persons not in receipt of public assistance
shall not constitute "assistance" under applicable federal regu-
lations and no more than 15 percent of the funds made available
herein may be used for administration, provided further that the
director of the budget does not determine that such use of funds can
be expected to have the effect of increasing qualified state expend-
itures under paragraph 7 of subdivision (a) of section 409 of the
federal social security act above the minimum applicable federal
maintenance of effort requirement. Such funds may be transferred,
suballocated, or otherwise made available to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget:
For allocation to local social services districts for the summer youth
employment program. Such funds shall be provided without state or
local participation for services to eligible individuals aged four-
teen to twenty. Notwithstanding any other inconsistent law to the
contrary, the commissioner of any local department of social
services may assign all or a portion of moneys appropriated herein
on behalf of such local department of social services to the work-
force investment board designated by such commissioner and upon
receipt of such monies, any such workforce investment board shall be
obligated to utilize such funds consistent with the purposes of this
appropriation. Funds appropriated herein shall be allocated to local
social services districts in accordance with a methodology developed
by the office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by
the director of the budget. At the request of local social services
districts, funds not used for costs of the summer youth program may
be transferred to the credit of the district's allocation of the
flexible fund for family services; provided, however, that a minimum
of $42,100,000 will be used for the summer youth program (52205) ...
47,100,000 .......................................... (re. $980,000)
For services and expenses of a youth employment program operating in
localities in receipt of project GIVE funding, as provided by the
division of criminal justice services. Such funds shall be provided
for services to eligible individuals aged fourteen to twenty.
Notwithstanding any other inconsistent law to the contrary, the
commissioner of any local department of social services may assign
all or a portion of moneys appropriated herein on behalf of such
local department of social services to the workforce investment
board designated by such commissioner and upon receipt of such
monies, any such workforce investment board shall be obligated to
utilize such funds consistent with the purposes of this appropri-
ation. Funds appropriated herein shall be allocated to local social
services districts in accordance with a methodology developed by the
office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by the
director of the budget (53025) .....................................
18,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,359,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the provision of
nonresidential domestic violence. Such funds may be made available
to the office of children and family services. Local social services

750 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
districts are encouraged to collaborate with not-for-profit provid-
ers in the provision of such services (53007) ......................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services related to the development of technology assisted learn-
ing programs at the educational opportunity centers. Such funds may
be made available in accordance with a memorandum of understanding
between the office of temporary and disability assistance and the
state university of New York. Provided, however, that funds appro-
priated herein shall be used to provide basic educational skills,
job readiness training, and occupational training to program partic-
ipants. Of the funds appropriated herein, up to $215,000 shall be
available without state or local financial participation for the
development of technology assisted learning programs provided by
community based organizations which serve eligible individuals
living with HIV/AIDS (52213) .......................................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,664,000)
For services, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and
without state or local financial participation, of the career path-
ways program for not-for-profit, community-based organizations
providing coordinated, comprehensive employment services beyond the
level currently funded by local social services districts to eligi-
ble individuals and families. Such funds are to be made available to
establish a career pathways program to link education and occupa-
tional training to subsequent employment through a continuum of
educational programs and integrated support services to enable
eligible participants, including disconnected young adults, ages
sixteen to twenty-four, to advance over time both to higher levels
of education and to higher wage jobs in targeted occupational
sectors. With funds appropriated herein, the office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall establish the career pathways program and provide technical
support, as needed, to provide education, training, and job place-
ment for low-income individuals, age sixteen and older. Preference
shall be given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds who are unem-
ployed or underemployed, in areas of the state with demonstrated
labor market needs and unemployment rates that are greater than the
appropriate or comparative rate of employment for the region, and to
persons in receipt of family assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the extent practicable, at
least sixty percent shall be available for services to eighteen to
twenty-four year olds, with remaining funds available to recipients
of family assistance and/or safety net assistance, without age
restrictions, and sixteen to seventeen year old self-supporting
individuals who are heads of household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall develop a request for proposals and shall receive, review, and
assess applications. In selecting proposals, the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of labor shall give
preference to programs that demonstrate community-based collab-
orations with education and training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training providers may include, but not,

751 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be limited to general equivalency diplomas programs, community
colleges, junior colleges, business and trade schools, vocational
institutions, and institutions with baccalaureate degree-granting
programs; programs that provide for a career path or career paths,
as supported by identified local employment needs; programs that
provide employment services, including but not limited to, post-sec-
ondary training designed to meet the needs of employers in the local
labor market, or catchment area; programs that include education and
training components, such as remedial education, individual training
plans, pre-employment training, workplace basic skills, and literacy
skills training. Such education and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other credentialing bodies for
the purpose of providing participants with certificates, diplomas,
or degrees; projects that provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to tutoring, mentoring, child
care, after school program access, transportation, and case manage-
ment, as part of the individual training plan. Preference shall be
given to proposals that include not-for-profit collaborations with
education, training, or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional community resources and provide
participant support services; training that result in job placement;
and education that links participants with occupational skills
training and/or employer-related credentials, credits, diplomas or
certificates (52266) ... 1,425,000 ................ (re. $1,425,000)
For the services of Centro of Oneida for the implementation of
programs, or the provision of additional transportation services to
such eligible individuals and families, for the purpose of transpor-
tation to and from employment or other allowable work activities
(52262) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
For preventive services to eligible individuals and families, includ-
ing but not limited to: intensive case management and related
services for families with children at risk of foster care placement
due to the presence of alcohol and/or substance abuse in the house-
hold; family preservation services, centers and programs; foster
care diversion demonstrations; and not-for-profit provider collab-
orations with family treatment courts. Such funds are available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, and/or award
new contracts through a competitive process. Provided that, of the
funds appropriated herein, at least $274,000 shall be available for
programs providing post adoption services (52269) ..................
785,000 ............................................. (re. $473,000)
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation
Authority for the provision of transportation services to eligible
individuals and families, for the purpose of transportation to and
from employment or other allowable work activities.

752 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Such funds may be made available to the department of transportation
for the administration of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transporta-
tion Authority (52261) ... 82,000 .................... (re. $82,000)
For the services of the Jewish Child Care Association of New York
(JCCA) provided within JCCA's Center for Healing to deliver clinical
services to children and families who have suffered child abuse
and/or exploitation, to develop a training for child welfare work-
ers, teachers and others to increase awareness of commercially sexu-
ally exploited children (CSEC) with intellectual and developmental
disabilities (IDD), as well as develop an appropriate treatment
model for the CSEC IDD population to be administered in the Edenwald
program as a pilot (23337) .........................................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For the services of a wage subsidy program. Eligible not-for-profit
community based organizations in social services districts shall
administer a program that enables employers to offer subsidized
employment, including but not limited to, expanded supportive tran-
sitional work activities for such eligible individuals and families
consistent with the provisions of section 336-e and section 336-f of
the social services law, as applicable. Provided that, of the
$475,000, not less than $297,000 shall be for programs in social
services districts with a population in excess of two million.
Preference shall be given to proposals that include provisions for
job retention, case management and job placement services. Partic-
ipation in the program by such eligible individuals and families
shall be limited to one year. Participating employers shall make
reasonable efforts to retain individuals served by the program
(52255) ... 475,000 ................................. (re. $475,000)
For services related to the wheels for work program, including, but
not limited to activities which procure, repair, finance, and/or
insure vehicles needed for transportation to and from employment or
allowable work activities (52253) ... 144,000 ....... (re. $144,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter
360, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For reimbursement of the cost of the family assistance and the emer-
gency assistance to families programs. Notwithstanding section 153
of the social services law or any inconsistent provision of law,
funds appropriated herein shall be provided without state or local
participation except that for social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or more, reimbursement will be eighty-five
percent. Funds appropriated herein shall also include the cost of
providing shelter supplements for family assistance households at
local option, including eligible households containing a household
member who has been released from prison, in order to prevent
eviction and address homelessness in accordance with social services
district plans approved by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the director of the budget, provided, however, that
in social services districts with a population over five million no
shelter supplements other than the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement shall be reimbursed, provided however funds

753 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriated herein shall only be used to reimburse rental costs up
to the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021, then
adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-year percentage chang-
es in fair market rent, provided, however, in the event of a
decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum rent levels
reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not decrease and
shall be set at the maximum rent levels established during the prior
year, and further provided that such supplements shall not be part
of the standard of need pursuant to section 131-a of the social
services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall also reimburse for family assistance
expenditures for emergency shelter, transportation, or nutrition
payments which the district determines are necessary to establish or
maintain independent living arrangements among persons living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the State department of health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and less costly alternative to
housing is available; provided, however, that funds appropriated
herein may only be used for such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement under medical assistance or
other programs.
For persons living with medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined
by the AIDS institute of the state department of health who are
receiving public assistance funds appropriated herein shall not be
used to reimburse the additional rental costs determined based on
limiting such person's earned and/or unearned income contribution to
30 percent.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to enter into contracts with
persons or entities authorized pursuant to subdivision (j) of
section 17 of the social services law consistent with federal law
and requirements. Such contracts will be made consistent with subdi-
vision (j) of section 17 of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce reimbursement otherwise
payable to social services districts to recover the federal share of
costs incurred by the office for expenditures related to subdivision
(j) of section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including, but not limited to,
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman

754 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Social services districts shall be required to report to the office of
temporary and disability assistance on an annual basis, information,
as determined and requested by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is sought for providing tempo-
rary housing assistance to homeless individuals and families. Such
information shall be submitted electronically to the extent feasible
as determined by the office, and shall be used to evaluate expendi-
tures by such social services districts for the provision of tempo-
rary housing assistance for homeless individuals and families.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance may withhold or deny reimbursement, in whole or in
part, to any social services district that fails to develop or
submit a homeless services plan subject to the approval of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, fails to provide
homeless services and outreach in accordance with its approved home-
less services plan, or fails to develop or submit homeless services
outcome reports, consistent with those requirements promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, such appropriation shall be available
for reimbursement of eligible costs incurred on or after January 1,
2022 and before January 1, 2023, that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state on or after April 1, 2022, that are claimed by March 1,
2023. Such reimbursement shall constitute total federal reimburse-
ment for activities funded herein in state fiscal year 2022-23
(52203) ... 1,500,000,000 ....................... (re. $420,984,000)
The following remaining appropriations within the office of temporary
and disability assistance federal health and human services fund
temporary assistance for needy families account shall be available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
such funds may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance or office of children and family services federal fund -
local assistance account with the approval of the director of the
budget. Such funds shall be provided without state or local partic-
ipation for services to eligible individuals under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy families block grant whose
incomes do not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level or
who are otherwise eligible under such plan, provided that such
services to eligible persons not in receipt of public assistance
shall not constitute "assistance" under applicable federal regu-
lations and no more than 15 percent of the funds made available
herein may be used for administration, provided further that the
director of the budget does not determine that such use of funds can
be expected to have the effect of increasing qualified state expend-
itures under paragraph 7 of subdivision (a) of section 409 of the
federal social security act above the minimum applicable federal

755 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
maintenance of effort requirement. Such funds may be transferred,
suballocated, or otherwise made available to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget:
For additional services and expenses related to the provision of
nonresidential domestic violence. Such funds may be made available
to the office of children and family services. Local social services
districts are encouraged to collaborate with not-for-profit provid-
ers in the provision of such services (53007) ......................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and
without state or local financial participation, of the career path-
ways program for not-for-profit, community-based organizations
providing coordinated, comprehensive employment services beyond the
level currently funded by local social services districts to eligi-
ble individuals and families. Such funds are to be made available to
establish a career pathways program to link education and occupa-
tional training to subsequent employment through a continuum of
educational programs and integrated support services to enable
eligible participants, including disconnected young adults, ages
sixteen to twenty-four, to advance over time both to higher levels
of education and to higher wage jobs in targeted occupational
sectors. With funds appropriated herein, the office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall establish the career pathways program and provide technical
support, as needed, to provide education, training, and job place-
ment for low-income individuals, age sixteen and older. Preference
shall be given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds who are unem-
ployed or underemployed, in areas of the state with demonstrated
labor market needs and unemployment rates that are greater than the
appropriate or comparative rate of employment for the region, and to
persons in receipt of family assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the extent practicable, at
least sixty percent shall be available for services to eighteen to
twenty-four year olds, with remaining funds available to recipients
of family assistance and/or safety net assistance, without age
restrictions, and sixteen to seventeen year old self-supporting
individuals who are heads of household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall develop a request for proposals and shall receive, review, and
assess applications. In selecting proposals, the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of labor shall give
preference to programs that demonstrate community-based collab-
orations with education and training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training providers may include, but not,
be limited to general equivalency diplomas programs, community
colleges, junior colleges, business and trade schools, vocational
institutions, and institutions with baccalaureate degree-granting
programs; programs that provide for a career path or career paths,
as supported by identified local employment needs; programs that
provide employment services, including but not limited to, post-sec-
ondary training designed to meet the needs of employers in the local

756 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
labor market, or catchment area; programs that include education and
training components, such as remedial education, individual training
plans, pre-employment training, workplace basic skills, and literacy
skills training. Such education and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other credentialing bodies for
the purpose of providing participants with certificates, diplomas,
or degrees; projects that provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to tutoring, mentoring, child
care, after school program access, transportation, and case manage-
ment, as part of the individual training plan. Preference shall be
given to proposals that include not-for-profit collaborations with
education, training, or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional community resources and provide
participant support services; training that result in job placement;
and education that links participants with occupational skills
training and/or employer-related credentials, credits, diplomas or
certificates (52266) ... 1,425,000 ................ (re. $1,425,000)
For preventive services to eligible individuals and families, includ-
ing but not limited to: intensive case management and related
services for families with children at risk of foster care placement
due to the presence of alcohol and/or substance abuse in the house-
hold; family preservation services, centers and programs; foster
care diversion demonstrations; and not-for-profit provider collab-
orations with family treatment courts. Such funds are available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, and/or award
new contracts through a competitive process. Provided that, of the
funds appropriated herein, at least $274,000 shall be available for
programs providing post adoption services (52269) ..................
785,000 ............................................. (re. $485,000)
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation
Authority for the provision of transportation services to eligible
individuals and families, for the purpose of transportation to and
from employment or other allowable work activities. Such funds may
be made available to the department of transportation for the admin-
istration of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation Authority
(52261) ... 82,000 ................................... (re. $82,000)
For the services of a wage subsidy program. Eligible not-for-profit
community based organizations in social services districts shall
administer a program that enables employers to offer subsidized
employment, including but not limited to, expanded supportive tran-
sitional work activities for such eligible individuals and families
consistent with the provisions of section 336-e and section 336-f of
the social services law, as applicable. Provided that, of the
$475,000, not less than $297,000 shall be for programs in social
services districts with a population in excess of two million.

757 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Preference shall be given to proposals that include provisions for
job retention, case management and job placement services. Partic-
ipation in the program by such eligible individuals and families
shall be limited to one year. Participating employers shall make
reasonable efforts to retain individuals served by the program
(52255) ... 475,000 ................................. (re. $475,000)
For services related to the wheels for work program, including, but
not limited to activities which procure, repair, finance, and/or
insure vehicles needed for transportation to and from employment or
allowable work activities (52253) ... 144,000 ....... (re. $136,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For reimbursement of the cost of the family assistance and the emer-
gency assistance to families programs. Notwithstanding section 153
of the social services law or any inconsistent provision of law,
funds appropriated herein shall be provided without state or local
participation except that for social services districts with a popu-
lation of five million or more, reimbursement will be eighty-five
percent. Funds appropriated herein shall also include the cost of
providing shelter supplements for family assistance households at
local option, including eligible households containing a household
member who has been released from prison, in order to prevent
eviction and address homelessness in accordance with social services
district plans approved by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and the director of the budget, provided, however, that
in social services districts with a population over five million no
shelter supplements other than those to prevent eviction shall be
reimbursed, and further provided that such supplements shall not be
part of the standard of need pursuant to section 131-a of the social
services law.
Funds appropriated herein shall also reimburse for family assistance
expenditures for emergency shelter, transportation, or nutrition
payments which the district determines are necessary to establish or
maintain independent living arrangements among persons living with
medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS institute
of the State department of health and who are homeless or facing
homelessness and for whom no viable and less costly alternative to
housing is available; provided, however, that funds appropriated
herein may only be used for such purposes if the cost of such allow-
ances are not eligible for reimbursement under medical assistance or
other programs.
For persons living with medically diagnosed HIV infection as defined
by the AIDS institute of the state department of health who are
receiving public assistance funds appropriated herein shall not be
used to reimburse the additional rental costs determined based on
limiting such person's earned and/or unearned income contribution to
30 percent.
Amounts appropriated herein may be used to enter into contracts with
persons or entities authorized pursuant to subdivision (i) of
section 17 of the social services law consistent with federal law
and requirements. Such contracts will be made consistent with subdi-

758 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
vision (i) of section 17 of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, the office may reduce reimbursement otherwise
payable to social services districts to recover the federal share of
costs incurred by the office for expenditures related to subdivision
(i) of section 17 of the social services law.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including, but not limited to,
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Social services districts shall be required to report to the office of
temporary and disability assistance on an annual basis, information,
as determined and requested by the office, related to services and
expenditures for which reimbursement is sought for providing tempo-
rary housing assistance to homeless individuals and families. Such
information shall be submitted electronically to the extent feasible
as determined by the office, and shall be used to evaluate expendi-
tures by such social services districts for the provision of tempo-
rary housing assistance for homeless individuals and families.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, the office of temporary and disabili-
ty assistance may withhold or deny reimbursement, in whole or in
part, to any social services district that fails to develop or
submit a homeless services plan subject to the approval of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, fails to provide
homeless services and outreach in accordance with its approved home-
less services plan, or fails to develop or submit homeless services
outcome reports, consistent with those requirements promulgated by
the office of temporary and disability assistance.
Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, such appropriation shall be available
for reimbursement of eligible costs incurred on or after January 1,
2021 and before January 1, 2022, that are otherwise reimbursable by
the state on or after April 1, 2021, that are claimed by March 1,
2022. Such reimbursement shall constitute total federal reimburse-
ment for activities funded herein in state fiscal year 2021-22
(52203) ... 1,500,000,000 ....................... (re. $127,119,000)
The following remaining appropriations within the office of temporary
and disability assistance federal health and human services fund
temporary assistance for needy families account shall be available

759 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
such funds may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance or office of children and family services federal fund -
local assistance account with the approval of the director of the
budget. Such funds shall be provided without state or local partic-
ipation for services to eligible individuals under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy families block grant whose
incomes do not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level or
who are otherwise eligible under such plan, provided that such
services to eligible persons not in receipt of public assistance
shall not constitute "assistance" under applicable federal regu-
lations and no more than 15 percent of the funds made available
herein may be used for administration, provided further that the
director of the budget does not determine that such use of funds can
be expected to have the effect of increasing qualified state expend-
itures under paragraph 7 of subdivision (a) of section 409 of the
federal social security act above the minimum applicable federal
maintenance of effort requirement. Such funds may be transferred,
suballocated, or otherwise made available to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget:
For services, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and
without state or local financial participation, of the career path-
ways program for not-for-profit, community-based organizations
providing coordinated, comprehensive employment services beyond the
level currently funded by local social services districts to eligi-
ble individuals and families. Such funds are to be made available to
establish a career pathways program to link education and occupa-
tional training to subsequent employment through a continuum of
educational programs and integrated support services to enable
eligible participants, including disconnected young adults, ages
sixteen to twenty-four, to advance over time both to higher levels
of education and to higher wage jobs in targeted occupational
sectors. With funds appropriated herein, the office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall establish the career pathways program and provide technical
support, as needed, to provide education, training, and job place-
ment for low-income individuals, age sixteen and older. Preference
shall be given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds who are unem-
ployed or underemployed, in areas of the state with demonstrated
labor market needs and unemployment rates that are greater than the
appropriate or comparative rate of employment for the region, and to
persons in receipt of family assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the extent practicable, at
least sixty percent shall be available for services to eighteen to
twenty-four year olds, with remaining funds available to recipients
of family assistance and/or safety net assistance, without age
restrictions, and sixteen to seventeen year old self-supporting
individuals who are heads of household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor

760 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall develop a request for proposals and shall receive, review, and
assess applications. In selecting proposals, the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of labor shall give
preference to programs that demonstrate community-based collab-
orations with education and training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training providers may include, but not,
be limited to general equivalency diplomas programs, community
colleges, junior colleges, business and trade schools, vocational
institutions, and institutions with baccalaureate degree-granting
programs; programs that provide for a career path or career paths,
as supported by identified local employment needs; programs that
provide employment services, including but not limited to, post-sec-
ondary training designed to meet the needs of employers in the local
labor market, or catchment area; programs that include education and
training components, such as remedial education, individual training
plans, pre-employment training, workplace basic skills, and literacy
skills training. Such education and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other credentialing bodies for
the purpose of providing participants with certificates, diplomas,
or degrees; projects that provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to tutoring, mentoring, child
care, after school program access, transportation, and case manage-
ment, as part of the individual training plan. Preference shall be
given to proposals that include not-for-profit collaborations with
education, training, or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional community resources and provide
participant support services; training that result in job placement;
and education that links participants with occupational skills
training and/or employer-related credentials, credits, diplomas or
certificates (52266) ... 1,425,000 .................. (re. $439,000)
For preventive services to eligible individuals and families, includ-
ing but not limited to: intensive case management and related
services for families with children at risk of foster care placement
due to the presence of alcohol and/or substance abuse in the house-
hold; family preservation services, centers and programs; foster
care diversion demonstrations; and not-for-profit provider collab-
orations with family treatment courts. Such funds are available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, and/or award
new contracts through a competitive process. Provided that, of the
funds appropriated herein, at least $274,000 shall be available for
programs providing post adoption services (52269) ..................
785,000 ............................................. (re. $485,000)
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation
Authority for the provision of transportation services to eligible
individuals and families, for the purpose of transportation to and

761 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
from employment or other allowable work activities. Such funds may
be made available to the department of transportation for the admin-
istration of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation Authority
(52261) ... 82,000 ................................... (re. $82,000)
For the services of a wage subsidy program. Eligible not-for-profit
community based organizations in social services districts shall
administer a program that enables employers to offer subsidized
employment, including but not limited to, expanded supportive tran-
sitional work activities for such eligible individuals and families
consistent with the provisions of section 336-e and section 336-f of
the social services law, as applicable. Provided that, of the
$475,000, not less than $297,000 shall be for programs in social
services districts with a population in excess of two million.
Preference shall be given to proposals that include provisions for
job retention, case management and job placement services. Partic-
ipation in the program by such eligible individuals and families
shall be limited to one year. Participating employers shall make
reasonable efforts to retain individuals served by the program
(52255) ... 475,000 ................................. (re. $475,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
The following remaining appropriations within the office of temporary
and disability assistance federal health and human services fund
temporary assistance for needy families account shall be available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to
municipalities. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law,
such funds may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance or office of children and family services federal fund -
local assistance account with the approval of the director of the
budget. Such funds shall be provided without state or local partic-
ipation for services to eligible individuals under the state plan
for the temporary assistance for needy families block grant whose
incomes do not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level or
who are otherwise eligible under such plan, provided that such
services to eligible persons not in receipt of public assistance
shall not constitute "assistance" under applicable federal regu-
lations and no more than 15 percent of the funds made available
herein may be used for administration, provided further that the
director of the budget does not determine that such use of funds can
be expected to have the effect of increasing qualified state expend-
itures under paragraph 7 of subdivision (a) of section 409 of the
federal social security act above the minimum applicable federal
maintenance of effort requirement. Such funds may be transferred,
suballocated, or otherwise made available to other state agencies,
as necessary, and as approved by the director of the budget:
For services, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and
without state or local financial participation, of the career path-
ways program for not-for-profit, community-based organizations
providing coordinated, comprehensive employment services beyond the
level currently funded by local social services districts to eligi-

762 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ble individuals and families. Such funds are to be made available to
establish a career pathways program to link education and occupa-
tional training to subsequent employment through a continuum of
educational programs and integrated support services to enable
eligible participants, including disconnected young adults, ages
sixteen to twenty-four, to advance over time both to higher levels
of education and to higher wage jobs in targeted occupational
sectors. With funds appropriated herein, the office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall establish the career pathways program and provide technical
support, as needed, to provide education, training, and job place-
ment for low-income individuals, age sixteen and older. Preference
shall be given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds who are unem-
ployed or underemployed, in areas of the state with demonstrated
labor market needs and unemployment rates that are greater than the
appropriate or comparative rate of employment for the region, and to
persons in receipt of family assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the extent practicable, at
least sixty percent shall be available for services to eighteen to
twenty-four year olds, with remaining funds available to recipients
of family assistance and/or safety net assistance, without age
restrictions, and sixteen to seventeen year old self-supporting
individuals who are heads of household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall develop a request for proposals and shall receive, review, and
assess applications. In selecting proposals, the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of labor shall give
preference to programs that demonstrate community-based collab-
orations with education and training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training providers may include, but not,
be limited to general equivalency diplomas programs, community
colleges, junior colleges, business and trade schools, vocational
institutions, and institutions with baccalaureate degree-granting
programs; programs that provide for a career path or career paths,
as supported by identified local employment needs; programs that
provide employment services, including but not limited to, post-sec-
ondary training designed to meet the needs of employers in the local
labor market, or catchment area; programs that include education and
training components, such as remedial education, individual training
plans, pre-employment training, workplace basic skills, and literacy
skills training. Such education and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other credentialing bodies for
the purpose of providing participants with certificates, diplomas,
or degrees; projects that provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to tutoring, mentoring, child
care, after school program access, transportation, and case manage-
ment, as part of the individual training plan. Preference shall be
given to proposals that include not-for-profit collaborations with
education, training, or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional community resources and provide
participant support services; training that result in job placement;

763 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and education that links participants with occupational skills
training and/or employer-related credentials, credits, diplomas or
certificates (52266) ... 1,425,000 ................ (re. $1,425,000)
For preventive services to eligible individuals and families, includ-
ing but not limited to: intensive case management and related
services for families with children at risk of foster care placement
due to the presence of alcohol and/or substance abuse in the house-
hold; family preservation services, centers and programs; foster
care diversion demonstrations; and not-for-profit provider collab-
orations with family treatment courts. Such funds are available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, and/or award
new contracts through a competitive process. Provided that, of the
funds appropriated herein, at least $274,000 shall be available for
programs providing post adoption services (52269) ..................
785,000 ............................................. (re. $485,000)
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation
Authority for the provision of transportation services to eligible
individuals and families, for the purpose of transportation to and
from employment or other allowable work activities. Such funds may
be made available to the department of transportation for the admin-
istration of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation Authority
(52261) ... 82,000 ................................... (re. $82,000)
For the services of a wage subsidy program. Eligible not-for-profit
community based organizations in social services districts shall
administer a program that enables employers to offer subsidized
employment, including but not limited to, expanded supportive tran-
sitional work activities for such eligible individuals and families
consistent with the provisions of section 336-e and section 336-f of
the social services law, as applicable. Provided that, of the
$475,000, not less than $297,000 shall be for programs in social
services districts with a population in excess of two million.
Preference shall be given to proposals that include provisions for
job retention, case management and job placement services. Partic-
ipation in the program by such eligible individuals and families
shall be limited to one year. Participating employers shall make
reasonable efforts to retain individuals served by the program
(52255) ... 475,000 ................................. (re. $475,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and
without state or local financial participation, of the career path-
ways program for not-for-profit, community-based organizations
providing coordinated, comprehensive employment services beyond the
level currently funded by local social services districts to eligi-
ble individuals and families. Such funds are to be made available to

764 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
establish a career pathways program to link education and occupa-
tional training to subsequent employment through a continuum of
educational programs and integrated support services to enable
eligible participants, including disconnected young adults, ages
sixteen to twenty-four, to advance over time both to higher levels
of education and to higher wage jobs in targeted occupational
sectors. With funds appropriated herein, the office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall establish the career pathways program and provide technical
support, as needed, to provide education, training, and job place-
ment for low-income individuals, age sixteen and older. Preference
shall be given to eighteen to twenty-four year olds who are unem-
ployed or underemployed, in areas of the state with demonstrated
labor market needs and unemployment rates that are greater than the
appropriate or comparative rate of employment for the region, and to
persons in receipt of family assistance and/or safety net assist-
ance. Of the amounts appropriated, to the extent practicable, at
least sixty percent shall be available for services to eighteen to
twenty-four year olds, with remaining funds available to recipients
of family assistance and/or safety net assistance, without age
restrictions, and sixteen to seventeen year old self-supporting
individuals who are heads of household. The office of temporary and
disability assistance in consultation with the department of labor
shall develop a request for proposals and shall receive, review, and
assess applications. In selecting proposals, the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the department of labor shall give
preference to programs that demonstrate community-based collab-
orations with education and training providers and employers in the
region. Such education and training providers may include, but not
be limited to general equivalency diplomas programs, community
colleges, junior colleges, business and trade schools, vocational
institutions, and institutions with baccalaureate degree-granting
programs; programs that provide for a career path or career paths,
as supported by identified local employment needs; programs that
provide employment services, including but not limited to, post-sec-
ondary training designed to meet the needs of employers in the local
labor market, or catchment area; programs that include education and
training components, such as remedial education, individual training
plans, pre-employment training, workplace basic skills, and literacy
skills training. Such education and training must include insti-
tutions, industry associations, or other credentialing bodies for
the purpose of providing participants with certificates, diplomas,
or degrees; projects that provide comprehensive student support
services, including but not limited to tutoring, mentoring, child
care, after school program access, transportation, and case manage-
ment, as part of the individual training plan. Preference shall be
given to proposals that include not-for-profit collaborations with
education, training, or employer stakeholders in the region;
programs which leverage additional community resources and provide
participant support services; training that result in job placement;
and education that links participants with occupational skills

765 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
training and/or employer-related credentials, credits, diplomas or
certificates (52266) ... 2,850,000 .................. (re. $662,000)
For preventive services to eligible individuals and families, includ-
ing but not limited to: intensive case management and related
services for families with children at risk of foster care placement
due to the presence of alcohol and/or substance abuse in the house-
hold; family preservation services, centers and programs; foster
care diversion demonstrations; and not-for-profit provider collab-
orations with family treatment courts. Such funds are available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the office of children and family
services and approved by the director of the budget to continue or
expand existing programs with existing contractors that are satis-
factorily performing as determined by the office of children and
family services, to award new contracts to continue programs where
the existing contractors are not satisfactorily performing as deter-
mined by the office of children and family services, and/or award
new contracts through a competitive process. Provided that, of the
funds appropriated herein, at least $274,000 shall be available for
programs providing post adoption services (52269) ..................
1,570,000 ......................................... (re. $1,270,000)
For the services of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation
Authority for the provision of transportation services to eligible
individuals and families, for the purpose of transportation to and
from employment or other allowable work activities. Such funds may
be made available to the department of transportation for the admin-
istration of the Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation Authority
(52261) ... 82,000 ................................... (re. $82,000)
For the services of a wage subsidy program. Eligible not-for-profit
community based organizations in social services districts shall
administer a program that enables employers to offer subsidized
employment, including but not limited to, expanded supportive tran-
sitional work activities for such eligible individuals and families
consistent with the provisions of section 336-e and section 336-f of
the social services law, as applicable. Provided that, of the
$475,000, not less than $297,000 shall be for programs in social
services districts with a population in excess of two million.
Preference shall be given to proposals that include provisions for
job retention, case management and job placement services. Partic-
ipation in the program by such eligible individuals and families
shall be limited to one year. Participating employers shall make
reasonable efforts to retain individuals served by the program
(52255) ... 475,000 ................................. (re. $170,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25024
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For reimbursement to social services districts for administrative
expenditures associated with the supplemental nutrition assistance
program, and for reimbursement to the United States department of

766 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
agriculture for supplemental nutrition assistance program recov-
eries. Such reimbursement shall constitute total state reimbursement
for local district administrative claims.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including but not limited to
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may, with the approval of the director of the budget,
be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with the
amounts appropriated within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal food and nutrition services - federal state oper-
ations account.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be used for reimbursement of supplemental nutrition
assistance program employment and training expenditures and shall be
made available to social services districts or may be set aside,
transferred or suballocated to other state agencies for state admin-
istered programs for the provision of services to supplemental
nutrition assistance program recipients and applicants in accordance
with a plan developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and approved by the director of the budget. Funds appro-
priated herein may be used to fund the cost of child care services
provided to eligible supplemental nutrition assistance program
employment and training program participants subject to a plan
approved by the office of temporary and disability assistance, the
office of children and family services and the director of the budg-
et only to the extent that the office of children and family
services and the director of the budget determine that the use of
such funds will not jeopardize the state's ability to receive the
state's entire allotment of federal child care development funds and
child care funds available under title IV-A of the social security
act. Any child care funded through the supplemental nutrition
assistance program employment and training grant must be provided in
a manner consistent with the federal law and regulations relating to
the federal funds included in the state block grant for child care
and the regulations of the office of children and family services
for such block grant. Districts shall submit claims and other
reports regarding the use of the supplemental nutrition assistance
program employment and training funds for child care services at

767 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
such times and in such manner and format as required by the depart-
ment of family assistance.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be suballocated, transferred or otherwise made available to any
other state agency, consistent with federal law, regulations or
waivers for expenses related to nutrition education programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be made available to community based
organizations in accordance with chapter 820 of the laws of 1987 for
nutrition outreach in areas where a significant percentage or number
of those potentially eligible for food assistance programs are not
participating in such programs (52224) .............................
500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $500,000,000)
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for services and expenses
of a summer electronic benefit transfer program pursuant to the
consolidated appropriations act, 2023.
Use of such funds shall be in accordance with all relevant rules and
regulations promulgated by the United States department of agricul-
ture.
Funds appropriated herein, subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, may be transferred, suballocated, or otherwise made
available to any other state agency or authority for purposes of the
program defined herein.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the amount
herein appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange
with any other appropriation within the office of temporary and
disability assistance federal fund - local assistance or state oper-
ations accounts with the approval of the director of the budget, who
shall file such approval with the department of audit and control
and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee (53045)
... 300,000,000 ................................. (re. $106,493,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For reimbursement to social services districts for administrative
expenditures associated with the supplemental nutrition assistance
program, and for reimbursement to the United States department of
agriculture for supplemental nutrition assistance program recov-
eries. Such reimbursement shall constitute total state reimbursement
for local district administrative claims.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including but not limited to
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.

768 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may, with the approval of the director of the budget,
be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with the
amounts appropriated within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal food and nutrition services - federal state oper-
ations account.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be used for reimbursement of supplemental nutrition
assistance program employment and training expenditures and shall be
made available to social services districts or may be set aside,
transferred or suballocated to other state agencies for state admin-
istered programs for the provision of services to supplemental
nutrition assistance program recipients and applicants in accordance
with a plan developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and approved by the director of the budget. Funds appro-
priated herein may be used to fund the cost of child care services
provided to eligible supplemental nutrition assistance program
employment and training program participants subject to a plan
approved by the office of temporary and disability assistance, the
office of children and family services and the director of the budg-
et only to the extent that the office of children and family
services and the director of the budget determine that the use of
such funds will not jeopardize the state's ability to receive the
state's entire allotment of federal child care development funds and
child care funds available under title IV-A of the social security
act. Any child care funded through the supplemental nutrition
assistance program employment and training grant must be provided in
a manner consistent with the federal law and regulations relating to
the federal funds included in the state block grant for child care
and the regulations of the office of children and family services
for such block grant. Districts shall submit claims and other
reports regarding the use of the supplemental nutrition assistance
program employment and training funds for child care services at
such times and in such manner and format as required by the depart-
ment of family assistance.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be suballocated, transferred or otherwise made available to any
other state agency, consistent with federal law, regulations or
waivers for expenses related to nutrition education programs.

769 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be made available to community based
organizations in accordance with chapter 820 of the laws of 1987 for
nutrition outreach in areas where a significant percentage or number
of those potentially eligible for food assistance programs are not
participating in such programs (52224) .............................
500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $186,396,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For reimbursement to social services districts for administrative
expenditures associated with the supplemental nutrition assistance
program, and for reimbursement to the United States department of
agriculture for supplemental nutrition assistance program recov-
eries. Such reimbursement shall constitute total state reimbursement
for local district administrative claims.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits including but not limited to
additional federal funds resulting from any changes in federal cost
allocation methodologies.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any
other appropriation within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal fund - local assistance account with the approval
of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman
of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly
ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may, with the approval of the director of the budget,
be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with the
amounts appropriated within the office of temporary and disability
assistance federal food and nutrition services - federal state oper-
ations account.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be used for reimbursement of supplemental nutrition
assistance program employment and training expenditures and shall be
made available to social services districts or may be set aside,
transferred or suballocated to other state agencies for state admin-
istered programs for the provision of services to supplemental
nutrition assistance program recipients and applicants in accordance
with a plan developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and approved by the director of the budget. Funds appro-
priated herein may be used to fund the cost of child care services
provided to eligible supplemental nutrition assistance program
employment and training program participants subject to a plan
approved by the office of temporary and disability assistance, the
office of children and family services and the director of the budg-

770 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
et only to the extent that the office of children and family
services and the director of the budget determine that the use of
such funds will not jeopardize the state's ability to receive the
state's entire allotment of federal child care development funds and
child care funds available under title IV-A of the social security
act. Any child care funded through the supplemental nutrition
assistance program employment and training grant must be provided in
a manner consistent with the federal law and regulations relating to
the federal funds included in the state block grant for child care
and the regulations of the office of children and family services
for such block grant. Districts shall submit claims and other
reports regarding the use of the supplemental nutrition assistance
program employment and training funds for child care services at
such times and in such manner and format as required by the depart-
ment of family assistance.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be suballocated, transferred or otherwise made available to any
other state agency, consistent with federal law, regulations or
waivers for expenses related to nutrition education programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be made available to community based
organizations in accordance with chapter 820 of the laws of 1987 for
nutrition outreach in areas where a significant percentage or number
of those potentially eligible for food assistance programs are not
participating in such programs (52224) .............................
490,879,364 ...................................... (re. $28,859,000)
LEGAL REPRESENTATION FOR EVICTION
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a program for legal services and repre-
sentation for eviction cases outside of New York city. Funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (31506) ... 35,000,000 .................... (re. $35,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program for legal services
and representation for eviction cases outside of New York City
(53072) ... 6,700,000 ............................. (re. $6,700,000)
For services and expenses of a program for legal services and repre-
sentation for eviction cases in New York City for legal represen-
tation services, as follows: $5,300,000 for Legal Services NYC,
$5,300,000 for the Legal Aid Society, $2,700,000 for the City of New
York to distribute to providers of legal services and representation
for eviction cases, excluding Legal Services NYC and the Legal Aid

771 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Society, in proportion to the caseload of such providers (53073) ...
13,300,000 ....................................... (re. $13,300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of a program for legal services and repre-
sentation for eviction cases outside of New York city. Funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (31506) ... 35,000,000 .................... (re. $23,637,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of a program for legal services and repre-
sentation for eviction cases outside of New York city. Funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (31506) ... 35,000,000 ..................... (re. $9,186,000)
For services and expenses of a program to provide grants for legal
services and representation for eviction cases statewide. Of funds
appropriated herein, $10 million shall be made available for
programs serving tenants in local social services districts with a
population over five million (53037) ...............................
15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $2,101,000)
SPECIALIZED SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a program to provide shelter supplements
at local option to individuals and families regardless of immi-
gration status who are experiencing homelessness or are facing an
imminent loss of housing, including individuals and families without
children. Provided, however, that in social services districts with
a population over five million, funds allocated to such district
shall be used in the first instance to reimburse rental costs above
the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021 up to the
United States department of housing and urban development's fair
market rent level for the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement program pursuant to section 131-bb of the
social services law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-
over-year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however,
in the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the
maximum rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall
not decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, and any remaining funds for such district may
be used to provide shelter supplements pursuant to the purposes
appropriated herein.
Such supplements shall be provided to households who earn no more than
30 percent of area median income at the time of application,
provided however, that if sufficient demand does not exist for

772 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
households who earn no more than 30 percent of area median income,
supplements may be provided for households earning up to 50 percent
of area median income.
Such supplements shall be provided in accordance with social services
district plans, provided however that no plan shall require supple-
ments to be below 85 percent of fair market rent, but may allow for
supplements above 85 percent of fair market rent at local cost;
provided further however that at least 50 percent of the supplements
shall be allocated for households who are currently in shelter or
experiencing homelessness, unless sufficient demand does not exist
for such households within the district. A social services district
plan may provide for the administration of portions of this program
to be delegated to another public agency or to a contractor or non-
profit organization.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to reimburse up to 100 percent
of the additional rental costs determined based on limiting such
household's earned and/or unearned income contribution to 30
percent. Each supplement shall be provided until 30 percent of the
household's earned and/or unearned income reaches the total monthly
rent.
Supplements provided herein shall not be part of the standard of need
pursuant to section 131-a of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary such supplements shall not
be subject to recoupment or repayment. Notwithstanding the afore-
mentioned requirement that a social services district with a popu-
lation over five million shall use this funding to reimburse rental
costs above the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021
up to the United States department of housing and urban develop-
ment's fair market rent level for the family homelessness and
eviction prevention supplement pursuant to section 131-bb of the
social services law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-
over-year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however,
in the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the
maximum rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall
not decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, nothing in this language shall prohibit
undocumented individuals and families from receiving this assist-
ance. Plans shall be subject to approval by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the director of the budget.
The office of temporary and disability assistance shall prepare and
submit an annual program report to the chairs of the senate commit-
tee on social services and the senate finance committee, and the
chairs of the assembly committee on social services, and the assem-
bly ways and means committee. Such report shall include available
information regarding the program or participants in the program,
including but not limited to: the number of income eligible individ-
uals or families under 30 percent of area median income that applied
and received assistance, the number of income eligible individuals
or families between 30 and 50 percent area median income that
applied and received assistance, the number of individuals and fami-
lies that applied but were denied assistance due to a lack of

773 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
resources; the number of individuals and families that applied and
were denied assistance due to income exceeding eligibility, who
would otherwise be deemed eligible, and the average income of those
denied for such reason; the number of participants who were able to
leave shelter as a result of the rental supplements; the number of
individuals and families served by the program who are in receipt of
other forms of public assistance; the number of supplements issued
by local social services district; the average value of supplements
issued by local social services district; the average recipient
contribution by local social services district, and the number of
local social services districts providing supplements above 85
percent of fair market rent. Such report shall be submitted on or
before November 1 of each year.
Funds shall be allocated to each social services district pursuant to
a methodology developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and based on each district's relative share of public
assistance households as of March 31, 2025 or any other factors
determined relevant by the office (53009) ..........................
100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $85,540,000)
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to reimburse those expendi-
tures made by local social services districts outside the city of
New York for adult shelters and public homes. Notwithstanding
section 153 of the social services law or any other inconsistent
provision of law, such funds shall be available for eligible costs
incurred on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2026,
that are otherwise reimbursable by the state on or after April 1,
2025. Such reimbursement shall constitute total state reimbursement
for activities funded herein in state fiscal year 2025-26 (52338)
... 5,500,000 ..................................... (re. $3,321,000)
For services and expenses related to homeless housing and preventive
services programs including but not limited to the New York state
supportive housing program, the solutions to end homelessness
program and the operational support for AIDS housing program.
Provided, however, that no funds may be encumbered, contracted, or
disbursed from this appropriation as a result of the availability of
$56,381,000 for the programs funded herein pursuant to a chapter of
the laws of 2025. Of the amount appropriated herein, no less than
$56,300,000 shall be allocated to the New York state supportive
housing program. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the office of temporary and disability assistance in
such detail as required by the director of the budget. (52329) .....
71,381,000 ....................................... (re. $71,381,000)
For services and expenses related to costs incurred by local social
services districts to implement emergency measures for the homeless
during inclement winter weather. Funds appropriated herein shall be
allocated to local social services districts in accordance with a
methodology developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and approved by the director of the budget. For any
program year beginning on or after April 1, 2025, such methodology
shall provide annual allocations to local social services districts

774 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
totaling no more than $20,000,000. Such allocations shall be issued
no later than September 1 of the program year and shall represent
the maximum amount of reimbursement to the district for such program
year. The office of temporary and disability assistance may subse-
quently revise such allocations based on actual district needs
provided the allocations total no more than $20,000,000.
Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of law, such funds
shall be made available for eligible costs incurred on or after
October 1, 2024. Such reimbursement shall constitute total state
reimbursement for activities funded herein in state fiscal year
2025-26 (52356) ... 20,000,000 ................... (re. $20,000,000)
For services and expenses of a pilot program related to the provision
of case management services for households in receipt of public
assistance containing a household member who has been released from
prison. Such funds will be provided by the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assistance to selected social
services districts with a population below five million that have a
shelter supplement plan approved by the office of temporary and
disability assistance and the director of the budget (52275) .......
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services of programs, in local social services districts with a
population in excess of five million, that meet the emergency needs
of homeless individuals and families and those at risk of becoming
homeless. Such funds shall be made available pursuant to a program
plan developed by the office of temporary and disability assistance
and approved by the director of the budget (52247) .................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services related to the human trafficking program as established
pursuant to article 10-D of social services law (52305) ............
2,397,000 ......................................... (re. $2,397,000)
For services and expenses of a program to provide enhanced services to
refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible individuals
to assist such individuals and families to attain economic self-suf-
ficiency and reduce or eliminate reliance on public assistance bene-
fits as a primary means of support. Funds appropriated herein shall,
at the discretion of the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance, be awarded to voluntary refugee resettlement
agencies and/or local representatives of such agencies currently
under contract with the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance whose primary mission is refugee resettlement to provide
services to refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible
populations and individual awards shall be made proportionately
based on the number of refugees each organization resettled in the
previous five year period (52302) ... 2,000,000 ... (re. $2,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to provide enhanced
services to refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible
individuals to assist such individuals and families to attain
economic self-sufficiency and reduce or eliminate reliance on public
assistance benefits as a primary means of support. Funds appropri-
ated herein shall, at the discretion of the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, be awarded to volun-

775 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tary refugee resettlement agencies and/or local representatives of
such agencies currently under contract with the office of temporary
and disability assistance whose primary mission is refugee resettle-
ment to provide services to refugees and other refugee resettlement
program-eligible populations and individual awards shall be made
proportionately based on the number of refugees each organization
resettled in the previous five year period (53022) .................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,938,000)
For services and expenses of a program to provide services and assist-
ance to non-citizens who can provide appropriate documentation from
the United States department of homeland security demonstrating
entry to the United States on or after January 1, 2022 as long as
such individuals are not otherwise eligible for ORR-funded services,
enhanced services to refugees, and are not in receipt of a valid or
expired visa, to stabilize such individuals and families, prioritiz-
ing families with children, through case management services, direct
assistance to meet basic needs not otherwise supported by public
assistance such as food, clothing and shelter, and other services
determined necessary by the office of temporary and disability
assistance. Funds appropriated herein shall, at the discretion of
the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, be awarded to voluntary refugee resettlement agencies and/or
local representatives of such agencies currently under contract with
the office of temporary and disability assistance whose primary
mission is refugee resettlement to provide such services and assist-
ance to these recently arrived non-citizen populations, with funding
being allocated proportional to the geographic distribution of this
population in the state of New York (53028) ........................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,947,000)
For services and expenses of the refugee and immigrant student welcome
grants program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019 (53046)
... 1,500,000 ..................................... (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a program to provide shelter supplements
at local option to individuals and families regardless of immi-
gration status who are experiencing homelessness or are facing an
imminent loss of housing, including individuals and families without
children. Provided, however, that in social services districts with
a population over five million, funds allocated to such district
shall be used in the first instance to reimburse rental costs above
the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021 up to the
United States department of housing and urban development's fair
market rent level for the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement program pursuant to section 131-bb of the
social services law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-
over-year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however,
in the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the
maximum rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall
not decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established

776 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
during the prior year, and any remaining funds for such district may
be used to provide shelter supplements pursuant to the purposes
appropriated herein.
Such supplements shall be provided to households who earn no more than
30 percent of area median income at the time of application,
provided however, that if sufficient demand does not exist for
households who earn no more than 30 percent of area median income,
supplements may be provided for households earning up to 50 percent
of area median income.
Such supplements shall be provided in accordance with social services
district plans, provided however that no plan shall require supple-
ments to be below 85 percent of fair market rent, but may allow for
supplements above 85 percent of fair market rent at local cost;
provided further however that at least 50 percent of the supplements
shall be allocated for households who are currently in shelter or
experiencing homelessness, unless sufficient demand does not exist
for such households within the district. A social services district
plan may provide for the administration of portions of this program
to be delegated to another public agency or to a contractor or non-
profit organization.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to reimburse up to 100 percent
of the additional rental costs determined based on limiting such
household's earned and/or unearned income contribution to 30
percent. Each supplement shall be provided until 30 percent of the
household's earned and/or unearned income reaches the total monthly
rent.
Supplements provided herein shall not be part of the standard of need
pursuant to section 131-a of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary such supplements shall not
be subject to recoupment or repayment. Notwithstanding the aforemen-
tioned requirement that a social services district with a population
over five million shall use this funding to reimburse rental costs
above the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021 up to
the United States department of housing and urban development's fair
market rent level for the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement pursuant to section 131-bb of the social
services law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-
year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however, in
the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum
rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not
decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, nothing in this language shall prohibit
undocumented individuals and families from receiving this assist-
ance. Plans shall be subject to approval by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the director of the budget.
The office of temporary and disability assistance shall prepare and
submit an annual program report to the chairs of the senate commit-
tee on social services and the senate finance committee, and the
chairs of the assembly committee on social services, and the assem-
bly ways and means committee. Such report shall include available
information regarding the program or participants in the program,

777 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
including but not limited to: the number of income eligible individ-
uals or families under 30 percent of area median income that applied
and received assistance, the number of income eligible individuals
or families between 30 and 50 percent area median income that
applied and received assistance, the number of individuals and fami-
lies that applied but were denied assistance due to a lack of
resources; the number of individuals and families that applied and
were denied assistance due to income exceeding eligibility, who
would otherwise be deemed eligible, and the average income of those
denied for such reason; the number of participants who were able to
leave shelter as a result of the rental supplements; the number of
individuals and families served by the program who are in receipt of
other forms of public assistance; the number of supplements issued
by local social services district; the average value of supplements
issued by local social services district; the average recipient
contribution by local social services district, and the number of
local social services districts providing supplements above 85
percent of fair market rent. Such report shall be submitted on or
before November 1 of each year.
Funds shall be allocated to each social services district pursuant to
a methodology developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and based on each district's relative share of public
assistance households as of March 31, 2024 or any other factors
determined relevant by the office (53009) ..........................
100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $53,494,000)
For services and expenses related to costs incurred by local social
services districts to implement emergency measures for the homeless
during inclement winter weather. Funds appropriated herein shall be
allocated to local social services districts in accordance with a
methodology developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and approved by the director of the budget. For any
program year beginning on or after April 1, 2024, such methodology
shall provide annual allocations to local social services districts
totaling no more than $20,000,000. Such allocations shall be issued
no later than September 1 of the program year and shall represent
the maximum amount of reimbursement to the district for such program
year. The office of temporary and disability assistance may subse-
quently revise such allocations based on actual district needs
provided the allocations total no more than $20,000,000.
Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of law, such funds
shall be made available for eligible costs incurred on or after
October 1, 2023. Such reimbursement shall constitute total state
reimbursement for activities funded herein in state fiscal year
2024-25 (52356) ... 20,000,000 .................... (re. $6,093,000)
For services and expenses of a pilot program related to the provision
of case management services for households in receipt of public
assistance containing a household member who has been released from
prison. Such funds will be provided by the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assistance to selected social
services districts with a population below five million that have a
shelter supplement plan approved by the office of temporary and

778 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
disability assistance and the director of the budget (52275) .......
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services of programs, in local social services districts with a
population in excess of five million, that meet the emergency needs
of homeless individuals and families and those at risk of becoming
homeless. Such funds shall be made available pursuant to a program
plan developed by the office of temporary and disability assistance
and approved by the director of the budget (52247) .................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $783,000)
For services related to the human trafficking program as established
pursuant to article 10-D of social services law (52305) ............
2,397,000 ......................................... (re. $2,397,000)
For services and expenses of a program to provide enhanced services to
refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible individuals
to assist such individuals and families to attain economic self-suf-
ficiency and reduce or eliminate reliance on public assistance bene-
fits as a primary means of support. Funds appropriated herein shall,
at the discretion of the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance, be awarded to voluntary refugee resettlement
agencies and/or local representatives of such agencies currently
under contract with the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance whose primary mission is refugee resettlement to provide
services to refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible
populations and individual awards shall be made proportionately
based on the number of refugees each organization resettled in the
previous five year period (52302) ... 2,000,000 ..... (re. $470,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to provide enhanced
services to refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible
individuals to assist such individuals and families to attain
economic self-sufficiency and reduce or eliminate reliance on public
assistance benefits as a primary means of support. Funds appropri-
ated herein shall, at the discretion of the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assistance, be awarded to volun-
tary refugee resettlement agencies and/or local representatives of
such agencies currently under contract with the office of temporary
and disability assistance whose primary mission is refugee resettle-
ment to provide services to refugees and other refugee resettlement
program-eligible populations and individual awards shall be made
proportionately based on the number of refugees each organization
resettled in the previous five year period (53022) .................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,412,000)
For services and expenses of a program to provide services and assist-
ance to non-citizens who can provide appropriate documentation from
the United States department of homeland security demonstrating
entry to the United States on or after January 1, 2022 as long as
such individuals are not otherwise eligible for ORR-funded services,
enhanced services to refugees, and are not in receipt of a valid or
expired visa, to stabilize such individuals and families, prioritiz-
ing families with children, through case management services, direct
assistance to meet basic needs not otherwise supported by public
assistance such as food, clothing and shelter, and other services

779 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
determined necessary by the office of temporary and disability
assistance. Funds appropriated herein shall, at the discretion of
the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, be awarded to voluntary refugee resettlement agencies and/or
local representatives of such agencies currently under contract with
the office of temporary and disability assistance whose primary
mission is refugee resettlement to provide such services and assist-
ance to these recently arrived non-citizen populations, with funding
being allocated proportional to the geographic distribution of this
population in the state of New York (53028) ........................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,562,000)
For services and expenses of the refugee and immigrant student welcome
grants program, pursuant to chapter 53 of the laws of 2019 (53046)
... 1,500,000 ..................................... (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of a program to provide shelter supplements
at local option to individuals and families regardless of immi-
gration status who are experiencing homelessness or are facing an
imminent loss of housing, including individuals and families without
children. Provided, however, that in social services districts with
a population over five million, funds allocated to such district
shall be used in the first instance to reimburse rental costs above
the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021 up to the
United States department of housing and urban development's fair
market rent level for the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement program pursuant to section 131-bb of the
social services law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-
over-year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however,
in the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the
maximum rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall
not decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, and any remaining funds for such district may
be used to provide shelter supplements pursuant to the purposes
appropriated herein.
Such supplements shall be provided to households who earn no more than
30 percent of area median income at the time of application,
provided however, that if sufficient demand does not exist for
households who earn no more than 30 percent of area median income,
supplements may be provided for households earning up to 50 percent
of area median income.
Such supplements shall be provided in accordance with social services
district plans, provided however that no plan shall require supple-
ments to be below 85 percent of fair market rent, but may allow for
supplements above 85 percent of fair market rent at local cost;
provided further however that at least 50 percent of the supplements
shall be allocated for households who are currently in shelter or
experiencing homelessness, unless sufficient demand does not exist
for such households within the district. A social services district
plan may provide for the administration of portions of this program

780 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to be delegated to another public agency or to a contractor or non-
profit organization.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to reimburse up to 100 percent
of the additional rental costs determined based on limiting such
household's earned and/or unearned income contribution to 30
percent. Each supplement shall be provided until 30 percent of the
household's earned and/or unearned income reaches the total monthly
rent.
Supplements provided herein shall not be part of the standard of need
pursuant to section 131-a of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary such supplements shall not
be subject to recoupment or repayment. Notwithstanding the aforemen-
tioned requirement that a social services district with a population
over five million shall use this funding to reimburse rental costs
above the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021 up to
the United States department of housing and urban development's fair
market rent level for the family homelessness and eviction
prevention supplement pursuant to section 131-bb of the social
services law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-
year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however, in
the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum
rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not
decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, nothing in this language shall prohibit
undocumented individuals and families from receiving this assist-
ance. Plans shall be subject to approval by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the director of the budget.
The office of temporary and disability assistance shall prepare and
submit an annual program report to the chairs of the senate commit-
tee on social services and the senate finance committee, and the
chairs of the assembly committee on social services, and the assem-
bly ways and means committee. Such report shall include available
information regarding the program or participants in the program,
including but not limited to: the number of income eligible individ-
uals or families under 30 percent of area median income that applied
and received assistance, the number of income eligible individuals
or families between 30 and 50 percent area median income that
applied and received assistance, the number of individuals and fami-
lies that applied but were denied assistance due to a lack of
resources; the number of individuals and families that applied and
were denied assistance due to income exceeding eligibility, who
would otherwise be deemed eligible, and the average income of those
denied for such reason; the number of participants who were able to
leave shelter as a result of the rental supplements; the number of
individuals and families served by the program who are in receipt of
other forms of public assistance; the number of supplements issued
by local social services district; the average value of supplements
issued by local social services district; the average recipient
contribution by local social services district, and the number of
local social services districts providing supplements above 85

781 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
percent of fair market rent. Such report shall be submitted on or
before November 1 of each year.
Funds shall be allocated to each social services district pursuant to
a methodology developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and based on each district's relative share of public
assistance households as of March 31, 2023 or any other factors
determined relevant by the office (53009) ..........................
100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $48,880,000)
For services and expenses related to homeless housing and preventive
services programs including but not limited to the New York state
supportive housing program, the solutions to end homelessness
program and the operational support for AIDS housing program.
Provided, however, that no funds may be encumbered, contracted, or
disbursed from this appropriation as a result of the availability of
$50,781,000 for the programs funded herein pursuant to a chapter of
the laws of 2023. No funds shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the office of temporary and disability assistance in
such detail as required by the director of the budget. (52329) .....
50,781,000 ....................................... (re. $50,774,000)
For services and expenses of a pilot program related to the provision
of case management services for households in receipt of public
assistance containing a household member who has been released from
prison. Such funds will be provided by the commissioner of the
office of temporary and disability assistance to selected social
services districts with a population below five million that have a
shelter supplement plan approved by the office of temporary and
disability assistance and the director of the budget (52275) .......
200,000 .............................................. (re. $90,000)
For services related to the human trafficking program as established
pursuant to article 10-D of social services law (52305) ............
2,397,000 ......................................... (re. $1,674,000)
For services and expenses of a program to provide enhanced services to
refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible individuals
to assist such individuals and families to attain economic self-suf-
ficiency and reduce or eliminate reliance on public assistance bene-
fits as a primary means of support. Funds appropriated herein shall,
at the discretion of the commissioner of the office of temporary and
disability assistance, be awarded to voluntary refugee resettlement
agencies and/or local representatives of such agencies currently
under contract with the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance whose primary mission is refugee resettlement to provide
services to refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible
populations and individual awards shall be made proportionately
based on the number of refugees each organization resettled in the
previous five year period (52302) ... 2,000,000 ..... (re. $182,000)
For additional services and expenses of a program to provide enhanced
services to refugees and other refugee resettlement program-eligible
individuals to assist such individuals and families to attain
economic self-sufficiency and reduce or eliminate reliance on public
assistance benefits as a primary means of support.

782 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Funds appropriated herein shall, at the discretion of the commissioner
of the office of temporary and disability assistance, be awarded to
voluntary refugee resettlement agencies and/or local representatives
of such agencies currently under contract with the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance whose primary mission is refugee
resettlement to provide services to refugees and other refugee
resettlement program-eligible populations and individual awards
shall be made proportionately based on the number of refugees each
organization resettled in the previous five year period (53022) ....
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,326,000)
For services and expenses of a program to provide services and assist-
ance to non-citizens who can provide appropriate documentation from
the United States department of homeland security demonstrating
entry to the United States on or after January 1, 2022 as long as
such individuals are not otherwise eligible for ORR-funded services,
enhanced services to refugees, and are not in receipt of a valid or
expired visa, to stabilize such individuals and families, prioritiz-
ing families with children, through case management services, direct
assistance to meet basic needs not otherwise supported by public
assistance such as food, clothing and shelter, and other services
determined necessary by the office of temporary and disability
assistance. Funds appropriated herein shall, at the discretion of
the commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, be awarded to voluntary refugee resettlement agencies and/or
local representatives of such agencies currently under contract with
the office of temporary and disability assistance whose primary
mission is refugee resettlement to provide such services and assist-
ance to these recently arrived non-citizen populations, with funding
being allocated proportional to the geographic distribution of this
population in the state of New York (53028) ........................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,612,000)
For supplemental costs associated with an emergency rental assistance
program pursuant to part BB of chapter 56 of the laws of 2021, as
amended. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds appro-
priated herein shall only be available for costs associated with
applications submitted on or before January 20, 2023, including for
tenants or occupants of federal-or state-funded subsidized public
housing authorities or other federal-or state-funded subsidized
housing that limits the household's share of the rent to a set
percentage of income. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred
or suballocated to any other state agency or authority. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropri-
ated herein to state operations for administration of emergency
rental assistance activities (53010) ...............................
356,000,000 ....................................... (re. $1,300,000)
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for COVID rental
arrears costs for tenants or residents of the New York City housing
authority to be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted to and
approved by the office of temporary and disability assistance and

783 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the director of the division of the budget (53039) .................
35,000,000 .......................................... (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a program to provide shelter supplements
at local option to individuals and families regardless of immi-
gration status who are experiencing homelessness or are facing an
imminent loss of housing, including individuals and families without
children. Provided, however, that in social service districts with a
population over five million, funds allocated to such district shall
be used in the first instance to reimburse rental costs above the
maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021 up to the United
States department of housing and urban development's fair market
rent level for the family homelessness and eviction prevention
supplement program pursuant to section 131-bb of the social services
law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-over-year
percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however, in the
event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the maximum
rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall not
decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, and any remaining funds for such district may
be used to provide shelter supplements pursuant to the purposes
appropriated herein.
Such supplements shall be provided to households who earn no more than
30 percent of area median income at the time of application,
provided however, that if sufficient demand does not exist for
households who earn no more than 30 percent of area median income,
supplements may be provided for households earning up to 50 percent
of area median income.
Such supplements shall be provided in accordance with social services
district plans, provided however that no plan shall require supple-
ments to be below 85 percent of fair market rent, but may allow for
supplements above 85 percent of fair market rent at local cost;
provided further however that at least 50 percent of the supplements
shall be allocated for households who are currently in shelter or
experiencing homelessness, unless sufficient demand does not exist
for such households within the district. A social services district
plan may provide for the administration of portions of this program
to be delegated to another public agency or to a contractor or
nonprofit organization.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to reimburse up to 100 percent
of the additional rental costs determined based on limiting such
household's earned and/or unearned income contribution to 30
percent. Each supplement shall be provided until 30 percent of the
household's earned and/or unearned income reaches the total monthly
rent.
Supplements provided herein shall not be part of the standard of need
pursuant to section 131-a of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary such supplements shall not
be subject to recoupment or repayment. Notwithstanding the afore-

784 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
mentioned requirement that a social services district with a popu-
lation over five million shall use this funding to reimburse rental
costs above the maximum rent levels in place as of January 1, 2021
up to the United States department of housing and urban develop-
ment's fair market rent level for the family homelessness and
eviction prevention supplement pursuant to section 131-bb of the
social services law, then adjusted consistent with the annual year-
over-year percentage changes in fair market rent, provided, however,
in the event of a decrease in fair market rent the value of the
maximum rent levels reimbursed with funds appropriated herein shall
not decrease and shall be set at the maximum rent levels established
during the prior year, nothing in this language shall prohibit
undocumented individuals and families from receiving this assist-
ance. Plans shall be subject to approval by the office of temporary
and disability assistance and the director of the budget.
The office of temporary and disability assistance shall prepare and
submit an annual program report to the chairs of the senate commit-
tee on social services and the senate finance committee, and the
chairs of the assembly committee on social services, and the assem-
bly ways and means committee. Such report shall include available
information regarding the program or participants in the program,
including but not limited to: the number of income eligible individ-
uals or families under 30 percent of area median income that applied
and received assistance, the number of income eligible individuals
or families between 30 and 50 percent area median income that
applied and received assistance, the number of individuals and fami-
lies that applied but were denied assistance due to a lack of
resources; the number of individuals and families that applied and
were denied assistance due to income exceeding eligibility, who
would otherwise be deemed eligible, and the average income of those
denied for such reason; the number of participants who were able to
leave shelter as a result of the rental supplements; the number of
individuals and families served by the program who are in receipt of
other forms of public assistance; the number of supplements issued
by local social services; the average value of supplements issued by
local social services district; the average recipient contribution
by local social services district, and the number of local social
services districts providing supplements above 85 percent of fair
market rent. Such report shall be submitted on or before November 1
of each year.
Funds shall be allocated to each social services district pursuant to
a methodology developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and based on each district's relative share of public
assistance households as of March 31, 2022 or any other factors
determined relevant by the office (53009) ..........................
100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $63,013,000)
For services and expenses related to homeless housing and preventive
services programs including but not limited to the New York state
supportive housing program, the solutions to end homelessness
program and the operational support for AIDS housing program. No
funds shall be expended from this appropriation until the director

785 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of the budget has approved a spending plan submitted by the office
of temporary and disability assistance in such detail as required by
the director of the budget (52329) .................................
47,981,000 ....................................... (re. $46,994,000)
For services related to the human trafficking program as established
pursuant to article 10-D of social services law (52305) ............
2,397,000 ........................................... (re. $494,000)
For supplemental costs associated with an emergency rental assistance
program pursuant to a plan approved by the office of temporary and
disability assistance and director of the budget.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any
other state agency or authority.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director
is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated
herein to state operations for administration of supplemental emer-
gency rental assistance activities (53010) .........................
679,940,000 ....................................... (re. $7,677,000)
For supplemental costs associated with assistance to small landlords
as defined in subdivision 12 of section 2 of subpart A of part BB of
chapter 56 of the laws of 2021, of a unit charging rent that does
not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the fair market rent by unit
size, with rental arrears accrued by a tenant, if such landlord has
used best efforts to contact and assist such tenant in applying for
a program funded with emergency rental assistance dollars, without
success, including instances in which such tenant has vacated while
owing such rental arrears or, provided funds remain available after
serving such landlords, for assistance to landlords of a unit charg-
ing rent that does not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the fair
market rent by unit size, with rental arrears accrued by a tenant,
if such landlord has used best efforts to contact and assist such
tenant in applying for a program funded with emergency rental
assistance dollars, without success, including instances in which
such tenant has vacated while owing such rental arrears.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any
other state agency or authority.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director
is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated
herein to state operations for administration of supplemental emer-
gency rental assistance activities (53012) .........................
115,221,447 .......................................... (re. $53,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of a program to provide shelter supplements
at local option to individuals and families regardless of immi-
gration status who are experiencing homelessness or are facing an
imminent loss of housing, including individuals and families without
children. Such supplements shall be provided to households who earn
no more than thirty percent of area median income at the time of
application, provided however, that if sufficient demand does not
exist for households who earn no more than thirty percent of area

786 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
median income, supplements may be provided for households earning up
to fifty percent of area median income.
Such supplements shall be provided in accordance with social services
district plans, provided however that no plan shall require supple-
ments to be below 85 percent of fair market rent, but may allow for
supplements above 85 percent of fair market rent at local cost;
provided further however that at least fifty percent of the supple-
ments shall be allocated for households who are currently in shelter
or experiencing homelessness, unless sufficient demand does not
exist for such households within the district. A social services
district plan may provide for the administration of portions of this
program to be delegated to another public agency or to a contractor
or non-profit organization.
Funds appropriated herein shall be used to reimburse up to 100 percent
of the additional rental costs determined based on limiting such
household's earned and/or unearned income contribution to 30
percent. Each supplement shall be provided until 30 percent of the
household's earned and/or unearned income reaches the total monthly
rent.
Supplements provided herein shall not be part of the standard of need
pursuant to section 131-a of the social services law. Notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary such supplements shall not
be subject to recoupment or repayment. Nothing in this language
shall prohibit undocumented individuals and families from receiving
this assistance. Plans shall be subject to approval by the office of
temporary and disability assistance and the director of the budget.
Funds shall be allocated to each social services district pursuant to
a methodology developed by the office of temporary and disability
assistance and based on each district's relative share of public
assistance households as of March 31, 2021 or any other factors
determined relevant by the office.
Such appropriation shall be available for reimbursement of eligible
claims incurred on or after September 30, 2021 (53009) .............
100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $89,876,000)
For services related to the human trafficking program as established
pursuant to article 10-D of social services law (52305) ............
2,397,000 ........................................... (re. $215,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as
amended by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as supple-
mented by an interchange in accordance with the state finance law,
is hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For supplemental costs associated with an emergency rental assistance
program pursuant to a plan approved by the office of temporary and
disability assistance and director of the budget. Such expenses
shall be (a) for forty-five days following the date when applica-
tions begin to be accepted, for providing assistance to households
with incomes that exceed eighty percent of area median income but do
not exceed one hundred percent of area median income, (b) after
forty-five days following the date when applications begin to be
accepted, for providing assistance to households with incomes that

787 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
exceed eighty percent of area median income but do not exceed one
hundred twenty percent of area median income, (c) for forty-five
days following the date when applications begin to be accepted, for
assistance to small landlords as defined in subdivision 12 of
section 2 of subpart A of part BB of chapter 56 of the laws of 2021,
of a unit charging rent that does not exceed one hundred fifty
percent of the fair market rent by unit size, with rental arrears
accrued by a tenant, if such landlord has used best efforts to
contact and assist such tenant in applying for a program funded with
emergency rental assistance dollars, without success, including
instances in which such tenant has vacated while owing such rental
arrears, or (d) after forty-five days following the date when appli-
cations begin to be accepted, for assistance to landlords of a unit
charging rent that does not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the
fair market rent by unit size, with rental arrears accrued by a
tenant, if such landlord has used best efforts to contact and assist
such tenant in applying for a program funded with emergency rental
assistance dollars, without success, including instances in which
such tenant has vacated while owing such rental arrears. Until such
time as the commissioner determines that the need justifies a real-
location, no more than one hundred twenty-five million dollars shall
be available for purposes noted in subdivision (a) or (b), and no
more than one hundred twenty-five million dollars shall be made
available for the purposes noted in subdivision (c) or (d), provided
however in no case shall the commissioner make such reallocation
earlier than ninety days after the date when applications begin to
be accepted; and provided further that the commissioner shall report
to the speaker of the assembly and the temporary president of the
senate when such reallocations are made and the reasons for such
reallocations.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any
other state agency or authority.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director
is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated
herein to state operations for administration of supplemental emer-
gency rental assistance activities (53010) .........................
[234,161,933] 234,207,109 ............................ (re. $75,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses related to homeless housing and preventive
services programs including but not limited to the New York state
supportive housing program, the solutions to end homelessness
program and the operational support for AIDS housing program. No
funds shall be expended from this appropriation until the director
of the budget has approved a spending plan submitted by the office
of temporary and disability assistance in such detail as required by
the director of the budget (52329) .................................
39,841,000 ....................................... (re. $30,974,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund

788 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Refugee Resettlement Account - 25160
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services related to refugee programs including but not limited to
the Cuban-Haitian and refugee resettlement program and the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee targeted assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980 as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for
expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation within the office of temporary
and disability assistance (52304) ..................................
180,000,000 ..................................... (re. $179,997,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services related to refugee programs including but not limited to
the Cuban-Haitian and refugee resettlement program and the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee targeted assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980 as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for
expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated

789 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
herein may be increased or decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation within the office of temporary
and disability assistance (52304) ..................................
180,000,000 ..................................... (re. $147,250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services related to refugee programs including but not limited to
the Cuban-Haitian and refugee resettlement program and the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee targeted assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980 as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for
expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation within the office of temporary
and disability assistance (52304) ..................................
50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $33,609,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services related to refugee programs including but not limited to
the Cuban-Haitian and refugee resettlement program and the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee targeted assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980 as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may

790 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for
expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation within the office of temporary
and disability assistance (52304) ..................................
26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $19,818,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services related to refugee programs including but not limited to
the Cuban-Haitian and refugee resettlement program and the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee targeted assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980 as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for
expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation within the office of temporary
and disability assistance (52304) ..................................
74,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,432,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services related to refugee programs including but not limited to
the Cuban-Haitian and refugee resettlement program and the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee targeted assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980 as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.

791 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for
expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation within the office of temporary
and disability assistance (52304) ..................................
26,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,131,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services related to refugee programs including but not limited to
the Cuban-Haitian and refugee resettlement program and the Cuban-
Haitian and refugee targeted assistance program provided pursuant to
the federal refugee assistance act of 1980 as amended.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to municipalities
and for payments to the federal government for expenditures made
pursuant to the social services law and the state plan for individ-
ual and family grant program under the disaster relief act of 1974.
Such funds are to be available for payment of aid heretofore accrued
or hereafter to accrue to municipalities. Subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, such funds shall be available to the
office of temporary and disability assistance net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein, subject to the approval of the director of the budget and in
accordance with a memorandum of understanding between the office of
temporary and disability assistance and any other state agency, may
be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for
expenses related to refugee programs.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased through transfer or interchange
with any other federal appropriation within the office of temporary
and disability assistance (52304) ..................................
26,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,398,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
CARES Emergency Rent - 25544
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of an emergency rental assistance program.
Households eligible for assistance under such program shall include
one or more individuals that has experienced financial hardship, is
at risk of homelessness or housing instability, and earns up to
eighty percent of area median income as determined by the United
States department of housing and urban development. Such assistance

792 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall support the payment of up to 12 months of rental arrears due
at the time of application and up to 3 months of prospective rent
pursuant to part BB of chapter 56 of the laws of 2021, as amended by
chapter 417 of the laws of 2021, federal law and other purposes set
forth in Public Law No. 116-260, Public Law 117-2, or any other
federal funds made available for this purpose.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, these funds shall be
available for applications received on or before January 20, 2023,
including for tenants or occupants of federal-or state-funded subsi-
dized public housing authorities or other federal-or state-funded
subsidized housing that limits the household's share of the rent to
a set percentage of income.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any funds beyond what
are needed to fund such applications received on or before January
20, 2023, shall be distributed pursuant to a plan submitted by the
office of temporary and disability assistance and approved by the
director of the division of the budget for other eligible services
other than the emergency rental assistance program pursuant to part
BB of chapter 56 of the laws of 2021, as amended.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any
other state agency or authority.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director
is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated
herein to state operations for administration of emergency rental
assistance activities (52219) ... 250,000,000 .... (re. $80,413,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of an emergency rental assistance program.
Households eligible for assistance under such program shall include
one or more individuals that has experienced financial hardship, is
at risk of homelessness or housing instability, and earns up to
eighty percent of area median income as determined by the United
States department of housing and urban development. Such assistance
shall support the payment of up to 12 months of rental arrears due
at the time of application and up to 3 months of prospective rent
pursuant to part BB of chapter 56 of the laws of 2021, as amended by
chapter 417 of the laws of 2021, federal law and other purposes set
forth in Public Law No. 116- 260, Public Law 117-2, or any other
federal funds made available for this purpose. Funds may also be
used to support a hardship fund for undocumented workers.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any
other state agency or authority.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director
is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated
herein to state operations for administration of emergency rental
assistance activities (52219) ... 90,000,000 ...... (re. $3,258,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Homeless Housing Account - 25328

793 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE
OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services related to federal homeless and other federal support
services grants. Subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, the amount appropriated herein may be made available to
other state agencies through transfer or suballocation for services
and expenses related to federal homeless and other federal support
services grants. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer or suballocate appropriation authority contained herein to
any other fund in which federal homeless and other federal support
services grants are actually received (52219) ......................
11,000,000 ....................................... (re. $11,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services related to federal homeless and other federal support
services grants. Subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, the amount appropriated herein may be made available to
other state agencies through transfer or suballocation for services
and expenses related to federal homeless and other federal support
services grants. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer or suballocate appropriation authority contained herein to
any other fund in which federal homeless and other federal support
services grants are actually received (52219) ......................
11,000,000 ........................................ (re. $4,549,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services related to federal homeless and other federal support
services grants. Subject to the approval of the director of the
budget, the amount appropriated herein may be made available to
other state agencies through transfer or suballocation for services
and expenses related to federal homeless and other federal support
services grants. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer or suballocate appropriation authority contained herein to
any other fund in which federal homeless and other federal support
services grants are actually received (52219) ......................
60,500,000 ....................................... (re. $22,320,000)

794 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 6,000,000 12,121,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 75,465,000 64,072,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 81,465,000 76,193,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ......................................... 850,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Settlement Account - 22045
For services and expenses related to the
enforcement actions in accordance with the
purposes outlined in the settlement under
which funding is obtained. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, all or
a portion of this appropriation may,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, be transferred to the special
revenue funds - other / state operations,
miscellaneous special revenue fund, bank-
ing department settlement account.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the director of the budget may
suballocate up to the full amount of this
appropriation to any department, agency or
authority (81001) .............................. 850,000
--------------
BANKING PROGRAM .............................................. 6,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the community
service society of New York associated
with operating education debt consumer
assistance program (32447) ................... 6,000,000
--------------
INSURANCE PROGRAM ........................................... 74,615,000
--------------

795 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Insurance Department Account - 21994
For suballocation to the division of home-
land security and emergency services for
aid to localities payments related to
municipalities fighting fires on state
property, expenses incurred under the
state's fire mobilization and mutual aid
plan, and for payment of training costs
incurred in accordance with section 209-x
of the general municipal law for training
of certain first-line supervisors of paid
fire departments at the New York city fire
training academy and in accordance with
rules and regulations promulgated by the
secretary of state and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, the amount
herein made available shall constitute the
state's entire obligation for all costs
incurred by the New York city fire train-
ing academy in state fiscal year 2026-27
(32423) ........................................ 989,000
For suballocation to the department of
health for aid to localities payments for
services and expenses related to state
grants for a program of family planning
services pursuant to article 2 of the
public health law which may include cervi-
cal cancer vaccine. A portion of this
appropriation may be transferred to state
operations for administration of the
program (32424) ............................. 27,402,000
For suballocation to the department of
health for aid to localities payments for
services and expenses related to the
administration of the immunization
program. A portion of this appropriation
may be transferred to state operations for
administration of the program (32429) ........ 7,520,000
For suballocation to the department of
health for aid to localities payments for
services and expenses related to the
administration of the lead poisoning
prevention and assistance program. A
portion of this appropriation may be
transferred to state operations for admin-
istration of the program (32425) ............ 14,604,000
For services and expenses related to the
healthy NY program. A portion of this

796 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
appropriation may be transferred to state
operations appropriations (32430) ........... 21,100,000
For services and expenses related to the
pilot program for entertainment industry
employees, including the payment of
liabilities incurred prior to April 1,
2026 (32432) ................................. 3,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 74,615,000
--------------

797 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
BANKING PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the community service society of New York
associated with operating education debt consumer assistance program
(32447) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of the community service society
of New York associated with operating education debt consumer
assistance program. All or a portion of the funds may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes of such appropriation (32448) .....................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For additional services and expenses of the community service society
of New York associated with operating education debt consumer
assistance program. All or a portion of the funds may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes of such appropriation (13300) .....................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the community service society of New York
associated with operating education debt consumer assistance program
(32447) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,369,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the Education Debt Consumer Assistance
Program. All or a portion of the funds may be suballocated or trans-
ferred to any department, agency, or public authority for the
purposes of such appropriation (32448) ... 250,000 .... (re. $1,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the community service society of New York
associated with operating education debt consumer assistance program
(32441) ... 3,000,000 ................................. (re. $1,000)
INSURANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, for a commuter van stabilization pilot
program to be developed by the superintendent of financial services
in consultation with other state agencies and public authorities as
necessary to develop program guidelines and eligibility criteria,
including provisions for insurance support to address cost dispari-
ties in the insurance market. Funds from this appropriation may also
be used to support safety, technology and equipment upgrades to

798 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
commuter vans deemed appropriate by the superintendent of financial
services to reduce insurance risk. The superintendent may enter into
agreements with a municipality or other entity to implement all or a
portion of the pilot program. In addition, funds from this appropri-
ation may also be suballocated to any state agency or public author-
ity to implement any portion of the pilot program (32445) ..........
11,000,000 ........................................ (re. $6,500,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Insurance Department Account - 21994
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency
services for aid to localities payments related to municipalities
fighting fires on state property, expenses incurred under the
state's fire mobilization and mutual aid plan, and for payment of
training costs incurred in accordance with section 209-x of the
general municipal law for training of certain first-line supervisors
of paid fire departments at the New York city fire training academy
and in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the
secretary of state and approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount herein made
available shall constitute the state's entire obligation for all
costs incurred by the New York city fire training academy in state
fiscal year 2025-26 (32423) ... 989,000 ............. (re. $989,000)
For suballocation to the department of health for aid to localities
payments for services and expenses related to state grants for a
program of family planning services pursuant to article 2 of the
public health law which may include cervical cancer vaccine. A
portion of this appropriation may be transferred to state operations
for administration of the program (32424) ..........................
27,402,000 ....................................... (re. $22,220,000)
For suballocation to the department of health for aid to localities
payments for services and expenses related to the administration of
the immunization program. A portion of this appropriation may be
transferred to state operations for administration of the program
(32429) ... 7,520,000 ............................. (re. $5,041,000)
For suballocation to the department of health for aid to localities
payments for services and expenses related to the administration of
the lead poisoning prevention and assistance program. A portion of
this appropriation may be transferred to state operations for admin-
istration of the program (32425) ...................................
14,604,000 ....................................... (re. $11,734,000)
For services and expenses related to the healthy NY program. A portion
of this appropriation may be transferred to state operations appro-
priations (32430) ... 21,100,000 ................. (re. $21,100,000)
For services and expenses related to the pilot program for enter-
tainment industry employees, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (32432) ............................
3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,978,000)

799 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the pilot program for enter-
tainment industry employees, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2024 (32432) ............................
3,000,000 ............................................ (re. $10,000)

800 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 5,800,000 0
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 368,000,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 373,800,000 0
================ ================
SCHEDULE
GAMING PROGRAM .............................................. 67,800,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of Cornell Univer-
sity College of Veterinary Medicine to
study and develop a protocol to advance
the field of thoroughbred injury detection
.............................................. 5,800,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,800,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
NYS Commercial Gaming Fund
Commercial Gaming Revenue Account - 23701
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties and munici-
palities eligible to receive aid pursuant
to paragraph b of subdivision 3 of section
97-nnnn of the state finance law from
gaming facility tax revenues from gaming
facilities located in region one of zone
two as defined by section 1310 of the
racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding
law attributable to a specific licensed
gaming facility located within such eligi-
ble county or municipality. Funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated to any
department, agency or public authority
(47705) ..................................... 10,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties eligible to
receive aid pursuant to paragraph c of
subdivision 3 of section 97-nnnn of the
state finance law from gaming facility tax
revenues from gaming facilities located in

801 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
region one of zone two as defined by
section 1310 of the racing, pari-mutuel
wagering and breeding law.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency or public
authority (47708) ........................... 10,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties and munici-
palities eligible to receive aid pursuant
to paragraph b of subdivision 3 of section
97-nnnn of the state finance law from
gaming facility tax revenues from gaming
facilities located in region two of zone
two as defined by section 1310 of the
racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding
law attributable to a specific licensed
gaming facility located within such eligi-
ble county or municipality. Funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated to any
department, agency or public authority
(47706) ..................................... 10,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties eligible to
receive aid pursuant to paragraph c of
subdivision 3 of section 97-nnnn of the
state finance law from gaming facility tax
revenues from gaming facilities located in
region two of zone two as defined by
section 1310 of the racing, pari-mutuel
wagering and breeding law.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency or public
authority (47709) ........................... 10,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties and munici-
palities eligible to receive aid pursuant
to paragraph b of subdivision 3 of section
97-nnnn of the state finance law from
gaming facility tax revenues from gaming
facilities located in region five of zone
two as defined by section 1310 of the
racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding
law attributable to a specific licensed
gaming facility located within such eligi-
ble county or municipality. Funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated to any
department, agency or public authority
(47707) ..................................... 11,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties eligible to
receive aid pursuant to paragraph c of
subdivision 3 of section 97-nnnn of the

802 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
state finance law from gaming facility tax
revenues from gaming facilities located in
region five of zone two as defined by
section 1310 of the racing, pari-mutuel
wagering and breeding law.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency or public
authority (47710) ........................... 11,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 62,000,000
--------------
TRIBAL STATE COMPACT REVENUE PROGRAM ....................... 306,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Tribal State Compact Revenue Account - 22169
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for services and expenses of grants
equal to 25 percent of the negotiated
percentage of the net drop from electronic
gaming devices the state receives from
such devices located at the Seneca Niagara
casino pursuant to the tribal compact for
the purposes specified in section 99-h of
the state finance law. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority (80588) .... 39,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, payments to counties eligible to
receive aid equal to 10 percent of the
negotiated percentage of the net drop from
electronic gaming devices the state
receives from such devices located at the
Seneca Niagara casino pursuant to the
tribal compact for purposes specified in
subdivision 3-a of section 99-h of the
state finance law. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority (80304) .... 25,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for services and expenses of grants
equal to 25 percent of the negotiated
percentage of the net drop from electronic
gaming devices the state receives from
such devices located at the Seneca Allega-
ny casino pursuant to the tribal compacts
for the purposes specified in subdivision
3 of section 99-h of the state finance law
and pursuant to a distribution jointly

803 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
submitted by the city of Salamanca and the
county of Cattaraugus to the director of
the budget. Copies of a distribution plan
jointly submitted by the city of Salamanca
and the county of Cattaraugus shall be
submitted to the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee. Funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated to
any department, agency or public authority
(80587) ..................................... 20,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, payments to counties eligible to
receive aid equal to 10 percent of the
negotiated percentage of the net drop from
electronic gaming devices the state
receives from such devices located at the
Seneca Allegany casino pursuant to the
tribal compact for purposes specified in
subdivision 3-a of section 99-h of the
state finance law. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority (80305) .... 13,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for services and expenses of grants
equal to 25 percent of the negotiated
percentage of the net drop from electronic
gaming devices the state receives from
such devices located at the Seneca Buffalo
Creek casino pursuant to the tribal
compact for the purposes specified in
section 99-h of the state finance law.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency or public
authority (80586) ........................... 32,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, payments to counties eligible to
receive aid equal to 10 percent of the
negotiated percentage of the net drop from
electronic gaming devices the state
receives from such devices located at the
Seneca Buffalo Creek casino pursuant to
the tribal compact for purposes specified
in subdivision 3-a of section 99-h of the
state finance law. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority (80306) .... 21,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for services and expenses of grants
equal to 25 percent of the negotiated
percentage of the net drop from electronic
gaming devices the state receives from

804 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
such devices located at the Akwesasne
Mohawk casino pursuant to the tribal
compacts for the purposes specified in
subdivision 3 of section 99-h of the state
finance law provided that the counties of
Franklin and St. Lawrence, and the
affected towns therein, shall each receive
50 percent of the monies appropriated
herein. Funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated to any department, agency or
public authority (80585) .................... 71,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties eligible to
receive aid equal to 10 percent of the
negotiated percentage of the net drop from
electronic gaming devices the state
receives from such devices located at the
Akwesasne Mohawk casino pursuant to the
tribal compact for purposes specified in
subdivision 3-a of section 99-h of the
state finance law. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority (80307) .... 13,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for services and expenses of grants
equal to 25 percent of the negotiated
percentage of the net drop from electronic
gaming devices plus an additional sum of
$6,000,000 the state receives from such
devices located at Oneida Nation casinos
pursuant to the tribal compact for
purposes specified in section 99-h of the
state finance law. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority (80308) .... 54,000,000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to counties eligible to
receive aid equal to 10 percent of the
negotiated percentage of the net drop from
electronic gaming devices the state
receives from such devices located at
Oneida Nation casinos pursuant to the
tribal compact for purposes specified in
subdivision 3-a of section 99-h of the
state finance law. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority (80309) .... 18,000,000
--------------

805 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 35,547,260,650 33,876,700,272
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 93,526,050,000 154,382,299,536
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 13,011,601,000 8,984,371,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 142,084,911,650 197,243,370,808
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ......................................... 266,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the office of
minority health including competitive
grants to promote community strategic
planning or new or improved health care
delivery systems and networks in minority
areas (29995) .................................. 266,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 266,000
--------------
AIDS INSTITUTE PROGRAM ..................................... 147,231,500
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses for regional and
targeted HIV, STD, and hepatitis C
services. To ensure organizational viabil-
ity, agency administration may be
supported subject to the review and
approval of the department of health.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of health shall
be authorized to continue contracts with
community service programs, multiservice
agencies and community development initi-
atives for all such contracts which were
executed on or before March 31, 2026,
without any additional requirements that
such contracts be subject to competitive
bidding or a request for proposals process
(29819) ..................................... 29,009,000

806 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses for HIV health
care and supportive services. A portion of
this appropriation may be suballocated to
other state agencies, or authorities
(26924) ..................................... 32,187,000
For services and expenses relating to the
New York/New York III supportive housing
agreement A portion of this appropriation
may be suballocated to other state agen-
cies, or authorities (59052) ................ 12,900,000
For services and expenses for hepatitis C
programs (29817) ............................. 3,981,000
For services and expenses for HIV, STD, and
hepatitis C prevention. A portion of these
funds may be suballocated to other state
agencies (29818) ............................ 30,586,000
For services and expenses for HIV clinical
and provider education programs (29816) ...... 2,716,000
For services and expenses of an opioid drug
addiction, prevention and treatment
program (26936) .............................. 7,785,000
For services and expenses of an opioid over-
dose prevention program for schools
(26935) ........................................ 272,000
For services and expenses to support the STD
center of excellence (26826) ................... 480,000
For services and expenses of the health and
social services sexuality-related programs
(26832) ..................................... 12,000,000
For services and expenses of a statewide
public health campaign for screening and
education activities regarding sexually
transmitted diseases, provided that any
funds allocated under this appropriation
shall not supplant existing local funds or
state funds allocated to county health
departments under article 6 of the public
health law (26834) ............................. 778,000
For services and expenses for workforce
development for transgender, gender non-
conforming, non-binary, & intersex people
within the state. A portion of these funds
may be suballocated to other state agen-
cies (59085) ................................. 1,000,000
For services and expenses of the Transgender
and Gender Non-Conforming Wellness and
Equity Fund to be distributed pursuant to
a plan developed by the commissioner of
health and approved by the director of the
budget (59170) ................................. 500,000
For services and expenses related to miti-
gating the impact of opioid addiction,

807 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
including harm reduction and patient-cen-
tered services overseen by the AIDS insti-
tute of the state department of health,
and initiatives to assist individuals who
are uninsured or underinsured afford
treatment, appointments, and medications.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
available for payment of obligations here-
tofore accrued or hereafter to accrue and
are to be distributed pursuant to a plan
developed by the commissioner of health
and approved by the director of the budg-
et.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funding made available by this
appropriation may be transferred to health
research incorporated (HRI) with the
approval of the director of the budget ...... 10,400,000
For services and expenses of Aids Institute
for additional grants .......................... 262,500
For services and expenses of LGBT Health and
Human Services Network, Inc. Notwithstand-
ing any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation may be
suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency or authority to effec-
tuate the intent of this appropriation
with the approval of the temporary presi-
dent of senate and the director of the
division of the budget. Provided further,
notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation shall be allocated only pursuant to
a plan (i) approved by the temporary pres-
ident of the senate and the director of
the division of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or
the methodology for allocating such appro-
priation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling
for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate
upon a roll call vote .......................... 475,000
For services and expenses of the LGBTQ
Health Center ................................... 50,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees

808 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
providing Transgender Wellness and Equity
Fund (TWEF) programs to support health and
social services sexuality-related
programs. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agen-
cy or authority to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of
the temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............... 750,000
For services and expenses of the Transgender
and Gender Non-Conforming Wellness and
Equity Fund. Funds appropriated herein
shall not be subject to section 112 of the
state finance law and section 163 of the
state finance law .............................. 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 146,631,500
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
SAMHSA Account - 25170
For services and expenses, including grants,
to provide training and resources to first
responders and members of other key commu-
nity sectors at the state, tribal and
local governmental levels related to emer-
gency treatment of suspected opioid over-
dose (26847) ................................... 600,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 600,000
--------------

809 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM ...................... 2,031,216,150
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
State aid to municipalities for the opera-
tion of local health departments and labo-
ratories and for the provision of general
public health services pursuant to article
6 of the public health law for activities
under the jurisdiction of the commissioner
of health.
Notwithstanding any other provision of arti-
cle 6 of the public health law, a county
may obtain reimbursement pursuant to this
act, only after the county chief financial
officer certifies, in the state aid appli-
cation, that county tax levies used to
fund services carried out by the county
health department have not been added to
or supplanted directly or indirectly by
any funds obtained by the county pursuant
to the Master Settlement Agreement entered
into on November 23, 1998 by the state and
leading United States tobacco product
manufacturers, except in the case of a
public health emergency, as determined by
the commissioner of health.
Notwithstanding annual aggregate limits for
bad debt and charity care allowances and
any other provision of law, up to
$1,700,000 shall be transferred to the
medical assistance program general fund
local assistance account for eligible
publicly sponsored certified home health
agencies that demonstrate losses from a
disproportionate share of bad debt and
charity care, pursuant to chapter 884 of
the laws of 1990. Within the maximum
limits specified herein, the department
shall transfer only those funds which are
necessary to meet the state share require-
ments for disproportionate share adjust-
ments expected to be paid for the period
January 1, 2026 through December 31, 2027.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
available for payment of financial assist-
ance heretofore accrued (26815) ............ 288,242,000
For services and expenses related to public
health emergencies as declared by the
counties or the commissioner of the

810 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
department of health, and approved by the
director of the budget in accordance with
article 6 of the public health law.
Notwithstanding any provision of the law
to the contrary, a portion of these funds
may be transferred to any program, fund,
or account within the department to
respond to any identified emergency,
pursuant to approval by the director of
the budget (29975) .......................... 40,000,000
For services and expenses of a study of
racial disparities (29967) ..................... 148,000
For services and expenses of a minority male
wellness and screening program (29941) .......... 26,950
For services and expenses of a Latino health
outreach initiative (29940) ..................... 37,000
For services and expenses of a rabies
program, including but not limited to
reimbursement to counties for rabies
expense such as human post-exposure vacci-
nation, and research studies in the
control of wildlife rabies, pursuant to
United States department of agriculture
approval if necessary, to control the
spread of rabies (29973) ..................... 1,456,000
For grants-in-aid to contract for hyperten-
sion prevention, screening, and treatment
programs (29965) ............................... 186,000
For services and expenses including an
education program related to a children's
asthma program. The department shall make
grants within the amounts appropriated
therefor to local health agencies, health
care providers, school, school-based
health centers and community-based organ-
izations and other organizations with
demonstrated interest and expertise in
serving persons with asthma to develop and
implement regional or community plans
which may include the following activ-
ities: self-management programs in elemen-
tary schools, conducting public and
provider education programs and implement-
ing protocols for collection of data on
asthma-related school absenteeism and
emergency room visits. In making grants
the commissioner may give priority consid-
eration to entities serving areas of the
state with high incidence and prevalence
of asthma (29962) .............................. 170,000
For services and expenses related to state-

811 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
wide health broadcasts involving local,
state and federal agencies (26830) .............. 32,000
For services and expenses of a universal
prenatal and postpartum home visitation
program (29939) .............................. 1,847,000
For services and expenses for childhood
asthma coalitions (29936) ...................... 930,000
For services and expenses related to obesity
and diabetes programs (26925) ................ 5,970,000
For services and expenses of the public
health management leaders of tomorrow
program, provided a portion of this appro-
priation shall be suballocated to univer-
sity at Albany College of Integrated
Health Sciences (29968) ........................ 262,000
For services and expenses to promote infant
safe sleep (29964) .............................. 15,000
For services and expenses of research and
prevention, and detection of Lyme disease
and other tick-borne illnesses .................. 69,400
For services and expenses of a safe mother-
hood initiative to prevent maternal deaths
in New York state (29942) ....................... 28,000
For services and expenses of health
promotions initiative .......................... 430,000
For services and expenses for statewide
maternal mortality reviews and the devel-
opment of protocols to reduce incidents of
death during childbirth (29938) ................. 25,000
For services and expenses of a statewide
public health campaign for tuberculosis
control, provided that any funds allocated
under this appropriation shall not
supplant existing local funds or state
funds allocated to county health depart-
ments under article 6 of the public health
law (26839) .................................. 3,845,000
For services and expenses of the prenatal
care assistance program. Up to 100 percent
of this appropriation may be suballocated
to the medical assistance program general
fund - local assistance account to be
matched by federal funds (26841) ............. 1,835,000
For grants in aid to contract for hyperten-
sion prevention, screening and treatment
programs (29564) ............................... 506,000
For services and expenses of tuberculosis
treatment, detection and prevention
(29912) ........................................ 566,000
For services and expenses to implement the
early intervention program act of 1992.

812 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
available for payment of financial assist-
ance heretofore accrued or hereafter to
accrue. Notwithstanding the provisions of
any other law to the contrary, for state
fiscal year 2026-27 the liability of the
state and the amount to be distributed or
otherwise expended by the state pursuant
to section 2557 of the public health law
shall be determined by first calculating
the amount of the expenditure or other
liability pursuant to such law, and then
reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, up
to $40,000,000 of the funds appropriated
herein may, at the discretion of the
director of the budget, be transferred to
the early intervention program state
escrow account for use by municipalities
and the State for the delivery of early
intervention services pursuant to chapter
820 of the laws of 2021 (26825) ............ 204,999,000
For services and expenses related to the
Indian health program pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of health and
approved by the director of the budget.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
for payment of financial assistance here-
tofore accrued or hereafter to accrue
(26840) ..................................... 36,742,000
State grants for a program of family plan-
ning services pursuant to article 2 of the
public health law. A portion of these
funds may be suballocated to other state
agencies (26824) ............................ 10,356,000
State grants for abortion access, including
the Reproductive Freedom and Equity Grant
program, in order to expand capacity and
ensure access for patients. The money
hereby appropriated is available for
payment of aid heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued. Funds appropriated herein
shall not be subject to section 112 of the
state finance law or section 163 of the
state finance law (59053) ................... 25,000,000
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
available for respite services for fami-
lies of eligible children. Such moneys
shall be allocated to each municipality by
the department of health as determined by
the department, to reimburse such munici-

813 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
palities in the amount of 50 percent of
the costs of respite services provided to
eligible children and their families with
the approval of the early intervention
official, in accordance with section 2547
of the public health law, section 69-4.18
of title 10 of the New York codes, rules
and regulation and standards established
by the department for the provision of
respite services. The moneys allocated to
each municipality by the department shall
be the total amount of respite funds
available for such purpose (29971) ........... 1,758,000
For services and expenses of a comprehensive
adolescent pregnancy prevention program
(26827) ...................................... 8,505,000
For services and expenses associated with
new and existing school based health
centers (26922) ............................. 13,320,000
For services and expenses related to the
school based health clinics program,
notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, funds shall be
available for the statewide school based
health clinics program to provide grants
to certain school based health centers
pursuant to the following:
Anthony Jordan Health Center (29960) .............. 22,000
Montefiore Medical Center (29737) ................. 90,000
East Harlem Council for Human Services
(29957) ......................................... 10,000
Family Health Network (29956) ...................... 7,000
Kaleida Health (29955) ........................... 135,000
Sunset Park Health Council, Inc. d/b/a NYU
Lutheran Family Health Centers (29954) .......... 45,000
Long Island Federally Qualified Health
Center (29596) ................................... 9,000
NY Presbyterian Hospital (29952) ................. 158,000
Sisters of Charity (29950) ........................ 27,000
University of Rochester (29947) ................... 38,000
Via Health-Rochester General Hospital
(29946) ......................................... 13,000
William F. Ryan Community Health Center
(29945) ......................................... 14,000
For services and expenses to support grants
to community health centers and comprehen-
sive diagnostic and treatment centers for
the purpose of furnishing primary health
care services, including outreach, health
education and dental care, to migrant and
seasonal farmworkers and their families,

814 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of which no less than 70 percent shall be
dedicated to community health centers
receiving federal funding for such purpose
pursuant to section 330(g) of the federal
public health service act (29944) .............. 406,000
For services and expenses related to provid-
ing nutritional services and to provide
nutritional education to pregnant women,
infants, and children, including suballo-
cations to the department of agriculture
and markets for the farmer's market nutri-
tion program and migrant worker services
and the office of temporary and disability
assistance for prenatal care assistance
program activities. A portion of these
funds may be suballocated to other state
agencies (26821) ............................ 26,395,000
For services and expenses, including operat-
ing expenses related to providing nutri-
tional services and nutrition education
for hunger prevention and nutrition
assistance. A portion of this appropri-
ation may be suballocated to other state
agencies (26822) ............................ 34,547,000
For services and expenses of the Nourish NY
program. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the moneys hereby appro-
priated may be increased or decreased by
interchange or transfer with any appropri-
ation of the department of health or any
other state agency, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget
(59032) ..................................... 50,000,000
For services and expenses related to
evidence based cancer services programs
(26926) ..................................... 19,825,000
For services and expenses related to the
tobacco use prevention and control program
including grants to support cancer
research (29549) ............................ 33,144,000
State aid to municipalities for medical
services for the rehabilitation of chil-
dren and youth with special health care
needs, pursuant to article 6 of the public
health law (29917) ............................. 170,000
For services and expenses of the Nurse-Fami-
ly Partnership program (26838) ............... 3,000,000
For services and expenses of a sickle cell
program (26820) ................................ 170,000
For services and expenses for regional peri-
natal centers and their affiliate birthing
hospitals/centers (59033) .................... 4,500,000

815 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses for abortion
service providers, including costs associ-
ated with medication abortion care pursu-
ant to a plan prepared by the commissioner
of health and approved by the director of
the budget. Notwithstanding the provisions
of sections 112 and 163 of the state
finance law, and sections 142 and 143 of
the economic development law, or any
contrary provision of law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
or transfer with any appropriation of the
department of health or any other state
agency, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget (59122) .............. 20,000,000
For services and expenses for housing and
healthcare programs for children with
asthma. A portion of this appropriation
may be transferred to state operations
appropriations (59086) ....................... 2,140,000
For services and expenses related to reduc-
ing infant mortality within the state. The
funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred to state operations (59087) ............. 690,000
For services and expenses related to
increasing perinatal quality within the
state. A portion of this appropriation may
be transferred to state operations appro-
priations (59088) .............................. 700,000
For services and expenses for dental care
for Native Americans within the state
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commis-
sioner of health and approved by the
director of the budget (59089) ............... 4,500,000
For services and expenses of the Children
with Special Health Care Needs program
(59097) ...................................... 3,000,000
For additional services and expenses related
to the Hunger Prevention and Nutrition
Assistance program pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget
(59099) ..................................... 38,250,000
For additional services and expenses related
to the Nourish NY program pursuant to a
plan prepared by the commissioner of
health and approved by the director of the
budget(59100) ................................ 5,000,000
For services and expenses of Choose Healthy
Life ......................................... 6,500,000

816 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of United Way of
New York City to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of
health and approved by the director of the
budget ....................................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of SOMOS Health-
care Providers, Inc. (SOMOS Innovation) to
be distributed pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of health and
approved by the director of the budget ....... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of Albert Einstein
College of Medicine to be distributed
pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of health and approved by the
director of the budget ....................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of a maternal
health grant program. Funds appropriated
herein shall not be subject to section 112
of the state finance law, section 163 of
the state finance law, or section 142 of
the economic development law ................ 10,000,000
For services and expenses of Adelphi Univer-
sity (Adelphi NY Statewide Breast Cancer
Hotline) ....................................... 283,300
For services and expenses of AFYA Founda-
tion, Inc ...................................... 350,000
For services and expenses of AIDS Community
Resource Health Q Center Inc. (ACR Health
Q Center) ...................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Albert
Einstein College of Medicine ................... 500,000
For services and expenses of ALS Association
Greater New York Chapter (ALS United
Greater New York, Inc.) ........................ 200,000
For services and expenses of the American
Parkinson's Disease Association ................ 100,000
For services and expenses for Comunilife,
Inc ............................................ 125,000
For services and expenses of Council of
Senior Centers and Services of New York,
Inc. (LiveOn Rise Program) ..................... 200,000
For services and expenses of Crisis Services
Foundation, Inc. of Buffalo and Erie Coun-
ty ............................................. 200,000
For services and expenses of the Community
Doula Expansion Grant Program. Funds
appropriated herein shall not be subject
to section 112 of the state finance law or
section 163 of the state finance law ........... 250,000
For additional state grants for a program of
Family Planning services pursuant to arti-
cle 2 of the public health law ................. 500,000

817 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses including payment
of health insurance premiums and
reimbursement of health care providers for
services rendered to individuals enrolled
in the Cystic Fibrosis program adminis-
tered by the HealthWell Foundation ............. 200,000
For services and expenses of Julia Dyckman
Andrus Memorial, Inc. (Andrus) ................. 150,000
For services and expenses of New York
University College of Dentistry (Veterans
Oral Care Access Resource - VOCARE,
VETSmile Dental Clinic) ........................ 150,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Nurse-Family Partnership program ............... 500,000
For services and expenses of Postpartum
Resource Center of New York, Inc. (Mater-
nal Depression Peer Support) ................... 100,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing community public health programs
and services. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency or authority to effectuate
the intent of this appropriation with the
approval of the temporary president of
senate and the director of the division of
the budget. Provided further, notwith-
standing any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the temporary president of
the senate and the director of the divi-
sion of the budget which sets forth either
an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling
for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate
upon a roll call vote ........................ 1,500,000
For additional services and expenses for
state grants for abortion access, includ-
ing the Reproductive Freedom and Equity
Grant program in order to expand capacity
and ensure access for patients. The money

818 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
hereby appropriated is available for
payment of aid heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued to support grants for access
to essential care. Funds appropriated
herein shall not be subject to section 112
of the state finance law or section 163 of
the state finance law ........................ 1,000,000
For services and expenses of School Based
Health Centers. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency or authority to effectuate
the intent of this appropriation with the
approval of the temporary president of
senate and the director of the division of
the budget. Provided further, notwith-
standing any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the temporary president of
the senate and the director of the divi-
sion of the budget which sets forth either
an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling
for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate
upon a roll call vote ........................ 1,912,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing Sickle Cell programs and
services. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agen-
cy or authority to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of
the temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget

819 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............... 500,000
For services and expenses of Feeding West-
chester ........................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of Metropolitan
New York Coordinating Council on Jewish
Poverty (Met Council) .......................... 100,000
For services and expenses of United Way
(Preventative Care) .......................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses related to exist-
ing and new school-based health clinics.
Funds appropriated herein shall not be
subject to section 112 of the state
finance law and section 163 of the state
finance law .................................. 1,912,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Nurse-Family Partnership program ............... 500,000
For services and expenses of the visiting
nursing services of Nassau County Nurse-
Family Partnership program ..................... 200,000
For additional state grants for a program of
Family Planning services pursuant to arti-
cle 2 of the public health law ................. 500,000
For services and expenses including payment
of health insurance premiums and
reimbursement of health care providers for
services rendered to individuals enrolled
in the Cystic Fibrosis program adminis-
tered by the HealthWell Foundation ............. 187,500
For services and expenses of ALS Association
Greater New York Chapter ........................ 50,000
For services and expenses of New Alterna-
tives for Children, Inc. ....................... 400,000
For services and expenses of New York State
Coalition for the School Based Health
Centers, Inc. ................................... 84,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Sickle Cell Anemia program. Funds appro-
priated herein shall not be subject to
section 112 of the state finance law and
section 163 of the state finance law ......... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of Spina Bifida
Association Albany Capital District Chap-
ter ............................................. 75,000

820 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Urban Health
Plan, Inc ...................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Breast Cancer
Coalition of Rochester, Inc. ................... 150,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Safe Motherhood Initiative .................... 250,000
For services and expenses of Academy of
Medical & Public Health Services, Inc. .......... 50,000
For services and expenses of Medicare Rights
Center, Inc ..................................... 25,000
For services and expenses of AFYA Foundation
of America, Inc. ............................... 175,000
For services and expenses for Comunilife, Inc. ... 225,000
For services and expenses of Island Harvest
Ltd ............................................. 50,000
For services and expenses of New York Common
Pantry, Inc. ................................... 975,000
For services and expenses of Westchester
Coalition for Legal Abortion - Choice
Matters, Inc .................................... 30,000
For services and expenses of GMHC Health
Services, Inc .................................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Caribbean
Women's Health Association, Inc ............... 100,000
For services and expenses of Morris Heights
Health Center, Inc ............................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Broome County
Council of Churches, Inc ........................ 50,000
For services and expenses of Rockland County
Pride Center, Inc ............................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Capital
District Parkinson's Center YMCA ............... 100,000
For services and expenses of James V. and
Fay P. Ryan Paramedic Foundation, Inc .......... 100,000
For services and expenses of Albert Einstein
College of Medicine ............................ 500,000
For services and expenses of The Campaign
Against Hunger, Inc ............................. 50,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 939,920,150
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Individuals with Disabilities-Part C Account - 25214
For activities related to a handicapped
infants and toddlers program (26837) ........ 48,578,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 48,578,000
--------------

821 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Block Grant Account - 25183
For various health prevention, diagnostic,
detection and treatment services.
The commissioner of health is hereby author-
ized to waive any provisions of the public
health law and regulations, to issue
appropriate operating certificates, and to
enter into contracts with article 28
facilities, to provide funds, to estab-
lish, support and conduct projects to
provide improved and expanded school
health services for preschool and schoo-
lage children. No more than 10 per centum
of the amount appropriated for such
purpose shall be expended for services and
expenses in connection with the adminis-
tration and evaluation of such grants.
Grants awarded under this appropriation
shall be distributed and administered in
accordance with regulations established by
the commissioner of health.
The amounts appropriated pursuant to such
appropriation may be suballocated to other
state agencies or accounts for expendi-
tures incurred in the operation of
programs funded by such appropriation
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget (26989) .......................... 57,475,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 57,475,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health, Education, and Human Services Account -
25148
For various health prevention, diagnostic,
detection and treatment services. The
amounts appropriated pursuant to such
appropriation may be suballocated to other
state agencies or accounts for expendi-
tures incurred in the operation of
programs funded by such appropriation
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget (26988) .......................... 94,602,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 94,602,000
--------------

822 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Child and Adult Care Food Account - 25022
For various federal food and nutritional
services. The moneys hereby appropriated
shall be available for payment of finan-
cial assistance heretofore accrued. The
state comptroller is hereby authorized to
receive funds from the Department of
Health that were returned in the current
fiscal year in respect of a settlement of
local assistance funds from prior fiscal
years and is authorized to refund such
moneys to the credit of the Child and
Adult Care Food Account of the Federal
USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund for
the purpose of reimbursing the 2026-27
appropriation. (26985) ..................... 326,294,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 326,294,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022
For various federal food and nutritional
services. The moneys hereby appropriated
shall be available for payment of finan-
cial assistance heretofore accrued (26986) . 556,970,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 556,970,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
New York State Prostate and Testicular Cancer Research
and Education Account - 20183
For prostate cancer research, detection and
education pursuant to chapter 273 of the
laws of 2004 (26813) ........................... 840,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 840,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
New York State Women's Cancers Education and Prevention
Account - 20206

823 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For women's cancer prevention and education
pursuant to section 97-llll of state
finance law as added by chapter 420 of the
laws of 2015 (26786) ........................... 100,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Lyme and Tick-Borne Disease Education Research and
Prevention - 23820
For services and expenses related to lyme
and tick-borne disease education,
research, and prevention, pursuant to
section 95-k of the state finance law
(59125) ......................................... 25,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ...................... 25,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
School-Based Health Centers Fund - 23811
For services and expenses related to school-
based health centers, pursuant to section
99-bb of the state finance law (59126) .......... 28,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ...................... 28,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Lupus Research and Education License Plates Account -
23804
For services and expenses related to lupus
research and education pursuant to section
97-pppp of the state finance law (59127) ....... 366,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 366,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Leukemia, Lymphoma, and Myeloma Fund - 23813
For services and expenses related to leuke-
mia, lymphoma, and myeloma research,

824 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
education, and treatment pursuant to
section 97-ssss of the state finance law,
including outreach and education expenses
(59128) ........................................ 343,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 343,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Cure Childhood Cancer Research Account - 23802
For services and expenses related to child-
hood cancer research pursuant to section
404-cc of the vehicle and traffic law and
section 99-z of the state finance law, as
added by chapter 443 of the laws of 2016
(26783) ........................................ 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Gifts to Food Banks Account - 23808
For services and expenses related to food
bank gifts pursuant to section 82 of state
finance law. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, amounts appropri-
ated herein may be transferred or suballo-
cated to the department of health for
expenses related to food bank gifts
(29619) ........................................ 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Local Public Health Services Account - 22097
For services and expenses of the local
public health services program. Notwith-
standing section 607 of the public health
law these funds shall be allocated for
state aid to municipalities for a program
of immunization against German measles,
and other communicable diseases, pursuant
to article 6 of the public health law
(29910) ...................................... 1,095,000

825 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For state aid to municipalities, notwith-
standing section 607 of the public health
law, for the operation of local health
departments and for the provision of
general public health services pursuant to
article 6 of the public health law for
activities under the jurisdiction of the
commissioner of health. The money hereby
appropriated is available for payment of
aid heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued (29909) .............................. 3,036,000
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, this appropriation is
available for transfer to the state oper-
ations miscellaneous special revenue fund
- local public health services program
account, in the administration and execu-
tive direction program fiscal management
group (29908) .................................. 285,000
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, this appropriation is
available for contractual audits of local-
ities to supplement the audits performed
by the department of health (29907) ............ 209,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 4,625,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
The New York State Dental Foundation Fund - 20185
For services and expenses related to the
benefit of the dental education and public
access programs of the the New York State
Dental Foundation pursuant to section
97-www of state finance law, as added by
chapter 586 of the laws of 2000 ................. 50,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000
--------------
CENTER FOR ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM .................... 131,300,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to the
water supply protection program (29813) ...... 5,017,000
For services and expenses of the healthy
neighborhood program (29893) ................. 1,495,000

826 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses related to
programs for the reduction of the risk of
lead exposure in rental properties. The
amounts appropriated pursuant to such
appropriation may be suballocated to other
state agencies or accounts for expendi-
tures incurred in the operation of
programs funded by such appropriation
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget (59129) .......................... 16,816,000
For services and expenses related to tobacco
enforcement, education and related activ-
ities, pursuant to chapter 433 of the laws
of 1997. Of amounts appropriated herein,
up to $500,000 may be used for educational
programs ..................................... 2,175,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 25,503,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Block Grant Account - 25183
For services and expenses of various health
prevention, diagnostic, detection and
treatment services (26991) ................... 5,797,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,797,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Environmental Protection Agency Grants Account
25467
For various environmental projects including
suballocation for the department of envi-
ronmental conservation (26992) .............. 85,440,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 85,440,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Occupational Health Clinics Account - 22177
For services and expenses of implementing
and operating a statewide network of occu-
pational health clinics for diagnostic,
screening, treatment, referral, and educa-
tion services (26844) ....................... 14,560,000

827 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 14,560,000
--------------
CHILD HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ........................... 3,851,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Children's Health Insurance Account - 25148
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation to appropriations of the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, for the reimbursement of local
district administrative costs related to
children newly enrolled in medicaid whose
household income is between 100 percent
and 133 percent of the federal poverty
level.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein
shall be net of refunds, rebates,
reimbursements, credits, repayments,
and/or disallowances.
For services and expenses related to the
children's health insurance program,
pursuant to title XXI of the federal
social security act (26931) .............. 2,201,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 2,201,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
Children's Health Insurance Account - 20810
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation to appropriations of the
office of temporary and disability assist-
ance, for the reimbursement of local
district administrative costs related to

828 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
children newly enrolled in medicaid whose
household income is between 100 percent
and 133 percent of the federal poverty
level.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein
shall be net of refunds, rebates,
reimbursements, credits, repayments,
and/or disallowances.
For services and expenses related to the
children's health insurance program
authorized pursuant to title 1-A of arti-
cle 25 of the public health law (26931) .. 1,650,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 1,650,000,000
--------------
ELDERLY PHARMACEUTICAL INSURANCE COVERAGE PROGRAM ........... 93,217,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
EPIC Premium Account - 20818
For services and expenses of the program for
elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage,
including reimbursement to pharmacies
participating in such program.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
available for payment of financial assist-
ance heretofore accrued (26803) ............. 93,217,000
--------------
ESSENTIAL PLAN PROGRAM .................................. 14,886,218,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to the
essential plan program, as authorized by
Sections 1331 and 1332 of the federal
patient protection and affordable care
act, and as defined under sections 369-gg
and 369-ii of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of the law, the moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer with any appropriation
of the department of health, or for trans-
fer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).

829 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein
shall be net of refunds, rebates,
reimbursements, credits, repayments,
and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (26940) .................. 386,218,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 386,218,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Essential Plan Account - 25184
For services and expenses related to the
essential plan program. For contribution
to the essential plan trust fund for
providing benefits for, eligible individ-
uals enrolled in the basic health program
pursuant to section 1331 of the federal
patient protection and affordable care
act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
or transfer with any appropriation of the
department of health, or for transfer to
Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein
shall be net of refunds, rebates,
reimbursements, credits, repayments,
and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (26940) ................ 8,500,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 8,500,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Essential Plan Account - 25186
For services and expenses related to the
essential plan program, in accordance
State Innovation Waiver provisions author-
ized by Section 1332 of the federal
patient protection and affordable care
act.

830 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may
be increased or decreased by interchange
or transfer with any appropriation of the
department of health or for transfer to
Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein
shall be net of refunds, rebates,
reimbursements, credits, repayments,
and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (59054) ................ 6,000,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 6,000,000,000
--------------
HEALTH CARE REFORM ACT PROGRAM ............................. 466,570,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
HCRA Program Account - 20807
For services, expenses, grants and transfers
necessary to implement the health care
reform act program in accordance with
sections 2807-j, 2807-k, 2807-l, 2807-m,
2807-p, 2807-s and 2807-v of the public
health law. The moneys hereby appropriated
shall be available for payments heretofore
accrued or hereafter to accrue. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of
law, the moneys hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer with any appropriation of the
department of health or by transfer or
suballocation to any appropriation of the
department of financial services, the
office of mental health, office for people
with developmental disabilities and the
state office for the aging subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies
thereof with the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee. With
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, up to 5 percent of this appropriation
may be used for state operations purposes.

831 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
At the direction of the director of the
budget, funds may also be transferred
directly to the general fund for the
purpose of repaying a draw on the tobacco
revenue guarantee fund.
For transfer to the pool administrator for
the purposes of making empire clinical
research investigator program (ECRIP)
payments ..................................... 3,445,000
For transfer to the Roswell Park Cancer
Institute including support for the oper-
ating costs for cancer research (29882) ..... 55,463,000
For services and expenses of the physician
loan repayment and physician practice
support programs pursuant to subdivisions
5-a and 12 of section 2807-m of the public
health law (29886) .......................... 15,865,000
For services and expenses related to physi-
cian workforce studies pursuant to subdi-
vision 5-a of section 2807-m of the public
health law (29884) ............................. 487,000
For services and expenses of the Associated
Medical Schools of New York Scholars in
Medicine and Science pursuant to subdivi-
sion 5-a of section 2807-m of the public
health law (29883) ........................... 1,244,000
For services and expenses of the nurse loan
repayment program pursuant to section
2807-aa of the public health law (59035) ..... 3,000,000
For services and expenses related to the New
York State Workforce Innovation Center
(59031) ..................................... 10,000,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, rule or regulation to the contra-
ry, funds hereby appropriated shall be
made available for excess insurance cover-
age or equivalent excess coverage for
physicians or dentists that is eligible to
be paid for from funds available in the
hospital excess liability pool.
For suballocation to the department of
financial services for services and
expenses related to the physicians excess
medical malpractice program. A portion of
this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations appropriations (29881) ..... 78,500,000
For transfer to health research incorporated
(HRI) for the AIDS drug assistance program
(29880) ..................................... 41,050,000
For state grants for rural health care
access and network development (29597) ....... 9,410,000

832 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses, including grants,
related to emergency assistance distrib-
utions as designated by the commissioner
of health. Notwithstanding section 112 or
163 of the state finance law or any other
contrary provision of law, such distrib-
utions shall be limited to providers or
programs where, as determined by the
commissioner of health, emergency assist-
ance is vital to protect the life or safe-
ty of patients, to ensure the retention of
facility caregivers or other staff, or in
instances where health facility operations
are jeopardized, or where the public
health is jeopardized or other emergency
situations exist (29874) ..................... 2,900,000
For transfer to the pool administrator for
distributions related to school based
health clinics (29873) ....................... 4,230,000
For services and expenses related to school
based health centers. The total amount of
funds provided herein shall be distributed
to school-based health center providers
based on the ratio of each provider's
total enrollment for all sites to the
total enrollment of all providers. This
formula shall be applied to the total
amount made available herein, provided,
however, that notwithstanding any contrary
provision of law, the commissioner of
health may establish minimum and maximum
awards for providers (29867) ................. 2,115,000
For transfer to the pool administrator for
state grants for poison control centers. A
portion of this appropriation may be
transferred to state operations appropri-
ations (29870) ............................... 2,400,000
For payments to eligible diagnostic and
treatment centers under the clinic safety
net program (29866) ......................... 54,400,000
For transfer to the dormitory authority of
the state of New York for the health
facility restructuring program (29865) ...... 19,600,000
For state grants to improve access to infer-
tility services, treatments, and proce-
dures (29868) ................................ 1,911,000
For the purpose of supporting the New York
state medical indemnity fund established
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011
(29736) .................................... 155,500,000

833 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Area Health
Education Centers (AHEC) as awarded to and
adminstered by the Research Foundation for
the State University of New York on behalf
of the University at Buffalo (29877) ......... 2,200,000
For additional services and expenses of Area
Health Education Centers (AHEC) (The
Research Foundation for the State Univer-
sity of New York) .............................. 500,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Associated Medical Schools of New York
Scholars in Medicine and Science ............... 750,000
For services and expenses of Rural Health
Care Access Development and Rural Health
Network Development (New York State Asso-
ciation for Rural Health) .................... 1,100,000
For additional expenses and services of
Associated Medical Schools of New York
(Scholars In Medicine And Science) ............. 500,000
--------------
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ................ 2,042,200,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For reimbursement of local administrative
expenses for medical assistance programs
and for state administration of medical
assistance programs, notwithstanding
section 153 of the social services law, to
include the performance of eligibility and
enrollment determinations by the state or
third-party entities designated by the
state to perform such services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, subject to the approval of the
director of budget, up to $23,000,000 of
the amount appropriated herein shall be
available for the purpose of providing
payments to local social services
districts for medical assistance adminis-
tration claims that exceed an administra-
tive ceiling established by the commis-
sioner of health.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law and subject to the approval of the
director of budget, moneys hereby appro-
priated may be increased or decreased by
transfer or interchange between these
appropriated amounts and appropriations of

834 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the medical assistance administration
program, the medical assistance program,
and the office of health insurance
programs. Funding authority from this
account used for state administration of
the medical assistance program may be
transferred to state operations appropri-
ations within the aforementioned programs
at amounts agreed upon by the commissioner
of health, and the New York state division
of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, subject to federal approval,
department of health state funds medicaid
spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities
operated by the office of mental health,
the office for people with developmental
disabilities and the office of addiction
services and supports and further exclud-
ing any payments which are not appropri-
ated within the department of health, in
the aggregate, for the period April 1,
2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not
exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided
below provided, however, such aggregate
limits may be adjusted by the director of
the budget to account for any changes in
the New York state federal medical assist-
ance percentage amount established pursu-
ant to the federal social security act,
increases in provider revenues, reductions
in local social services district payments
for medical assistance administration,
minimum wage increases, and beginning
April 1, 2012 the operational costs of the
New York state medical indemnity fund,
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of
2011, and state costs or savings from the
essential plan program. Such projections
may be adjusted by the director of the
budget to account for increased or expe-
dited department of health state funds
medicaid expenditures as a result of a
natural or other type of disaster, includ-
ing a governmental declaration of emergen-
cy.
The director of the budget, in consultation
with the commissioner of health, shall
assess on a quarterly basis known and
projected medicaid expenditures by catego-

835 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ry of service and by geographic region, as
determined by the commissioner of health,
incurred both prior to and subsequent to
such assessment for each such period, and
if the director of the budget determines
that such expenditures are expected to
cause medicaid spending for such period to
exceed the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the direc-
tor of the budget and the commissioner of
health, shall develop a medicaid savings
allocation adjustment to limit such spend-
ing to the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment
shall be designed, to reduce the expendi-
tures authorized by the appropriations
herein in compliance with the following
guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made
in compliance with applicable federal law,
including the provisions of the Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and
Education Reconciliation Act of 2010,
Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively
"Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent
amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be
made in a manner that complies with the
state medicaid plan approved by the feder-
al centers for medicare and medicaid
services, provided, however, that the
commissioner of health is authorized to
submit any state plan amendment or seek
other federal approval, including waiver
authority, to implement the provisions of
the medicaid savings allocation adjustment
that meets the other criteria set forth
herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a
manner that maximizes federal financial
participation, to the extent practicable,
including any federal financial partic-
ipation that is available or is reasonably
expected to become available, in the
discretion of the commissioner, under the
Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall
be made uniformly among categories of
services and geographic regions of the
state, to the extent practicable, and
shall be made uniformly within a category
of service, to the extent practicable,

836 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
except where the commissioner determines
that there are sufficient grounds for
non-uniformity, including but not limited
to: the extent to which specific catego-
ries of services contributed to department
of health medicaid state funds spending in
excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in
underserved communities; or the potential
benefits of pursuing innovative payment
models contemplated by the Affordable Care
Act, in which case such grounds shall be
set forth in the medicaid savings allo-
cation adjustment; and (5) reductions
shall be made in a manner that does not
unnecessarily create administrative
burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi-
ents or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the
legislature, as well as organizations
representing health care providers,
consumers, businesses, workers, health
insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, to the extent that
all or part of such adjustment, in the
discretion of the commissioner, is likely
to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of
service or particular geographic regions
of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment on the
department of health's website and shall
provide written copies of such adjustment
to the chairs of the senate finance and
the assembly ways and means committees at
least 30 days before the date on which
implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment subsequent
to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new
notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph only if the commissioner
determines, in his or her discretion, that
such revisions materially alter the
adjustment.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs
(a) and (b) of this subdivision, the
commissioner need not seek the input
described in paragraph (a) of this subdi-

837 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
vision or provide notice pursuant to para-
graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the
discretion of the commissioner, expedited
development and implementation of a medi-
caid savings allocation adjustment is
necessary due to a public health emergen-
cy.
For purposes of this section, a public
health emergency is defined as: (i) a
disaster, natural or otherwise, that
significantly increases the immediate need
for health care personnel in an area of
the state; (ii) an event or condition that
creates a widespread risk of exposure to a
serious communicable disease, or the
potential for such widespread risk of
exposure; or (iii) any other event or
condition determined by the commissioner
to constitute an imminent threat to public
health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to
prevent all or part of such medicaid
savings allocation adjustment from taking
effect retroactively to the extent permit-
ted by the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, the commissioner of
the department of health shall reduce
department of health state funds medicaid
spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including,
but not limited to modifying or suspending
reimbursement methods, including but not
limited to all fees, premium levels and
rates of payment, notwithstanding any
provision of law that sets a specific
amount or methodology for any such
payments or rates of payment; modifying
medicaid program benefits; seeking all
necessary federal approvals, including,
but not limited to waivers, waiver amend-
ments; and suspending time frames for
notice, approval or certification of rate
requirements, notwithstanding any
provision of law, rule or regulation to
the contrary, including but not limited to
sections 2807 and 3614 of the public
health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the
laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a
quarterly report that sets forth: (a)

838 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
known and projected department of health
medicaid expenditures as described in
subdivision (1) of this section, and
factors that could result in medicaid
disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected
department of health state funds disburse-
ments in the enacted budget financial plan
pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of
the state finance law, including spending
increases or decreases due to: enrollment
fluctuations, rate changes, utilization
changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and vari-
ations in offline medicaid payments; and
(b) the actions taken to implement any
medicaid savings allocation adjustment
implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of
this section, including information
concerning the impact of such actions on
each category of service and each
geographic region of the state. Each such
quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees and
shall be posted on the department of
health's website in a timely manner.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of liabilities heretofore and
hereafter accrued and shall be available
to the department net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer, with any appropriation of the
department of health, and may be increased
or decreased by transfer or suballocation
between these appropriated amounts and
appropriations of the office of mental
health, the office for people with devel-
opmental disabilities, the office of
addiction services and supports, the
department of family assistance office of
temporary and disability assistance, the
department of corrections and community
supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university
of New York, the state office for the
aging, the office of the medicaid inspec-
tor general, the state education depart-
ment, and office of children and family

839 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner of temporary and
disability assistance or the state commis-
sioner of health as due from local social
services districts each month as their
share of payments made pursuant to section
367-b of the social services law may be
set aside by the state comptroller in an
interest-bearing account in order to
ensure the orderly and prompt payment of
providers under section 367-b of the
social services law pursuant to an esti-
mate provided by the commissioner of
health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant
to section 367-b of the social services
law (26963) ................................ 545,050,000
For contractual services related to medical
necessity and quality of care reviews
related to medicaid patients. Subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, all or part of this appropriation may
be transferred to the health care stand-
ards and surveillance program, general
fund - local assistance account (29863) ...... 3,700,000
The amount appropriated herein, together
with any federal matching funds obtained,
may be available to the department,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, for contractual services
related to a third party entity responsi-
ble for education of persons eligible for
medical assistance regarding their options
for enrollment in managed care plans.
Subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, all or a part of this appro-
priation may be transferred to the office

840 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of managed care, general fund - state
purposes account (29777) ................... 132,800,000
For state reimbursement of administrative
expenses for the medical assistance
program provided by the office of mental
health, office for people with develop-
mental disabilities and office of
addiction services and supports.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation of the department
of health with the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (26995) ................... 90,000,000
For payments and expenses related to the
global hospital budget initiative:
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation of the department
of health with the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (59130) .................. 275,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 1,046,550,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Medicaid Administration Transfer Account - 25107
For reimbursement of local administrative
expenses of medical assistance programs
and for state administration of medical
assistance programs provided pursuant to
title XIX of the federal social security
act or its successor program. Notwith-
standing section 153 of the social
services law, to include the performance
of eligibility and enrollment determi-
nations by the state or third-party enti-
ties designated by the state to perform
such services.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law and subject to the approval of the
director of budget, moneys hereby appro-
priated may be increased or decreased by

841 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
transfer or interchange between these
appropriated amounts and appropriations of
the medical assistance administration
program, the medical assistance program,
and the office of health insurance
programs. Funding authority from this
account used for state administration of
the medical assistance program may be
transferred to state operations appropri-
ations within the aforementioned programs
at amounts agreed upon by the commissioner
of health, and the New York state division
of the budget.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of liabilities heretofore and
hereafter accrued and shall be available
to the department net of disallowances,
refunds, reimbursements, and credits.
The amounts appropriated herein may be
available for costs associated with a
common benefit identification card, and
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, these funds may be transferred
to the credit of the state operations
account medicaid management information
systems program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange,
with any appropriation of the department
of health, and may be increased or
decreased by transfer or suballocation
between these appropriated amounts and
appropriations of the office of mental
health, the office for people with devel-
opmental disabilities, the office of
addiction services and supports, the
department of family assistance, office of
temporary and disability assistance, the
department of corrections and community
supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university
of New York, the state office for the
aging, the office of the medicaid inspec-
tor general, the state education depart-
ment, and office of children and family
services with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and

842 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner of temporary and
disability assistance or the state commis-
sioner of health as due from local social
services districts each month as their
share of payments made pursuant to section
367-b of the social services law may be
set aside by the state comptroller in an
interest-bearing account in order to
ensure the orderly and prompt payment of
providers under section 367-b of the
social services law pursuant to an esti-
mate provided by the commissioner of
health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant
to section 367-b of the social services
law (26993) ................................ 630,650,000
For reimbursement of administrative expenses
of the medical assistance program provided
by the office of mental health, office for
people with developmental disabilities,
and office of addiction services and
supports provided pursuant to title XIX of
the federal social security act. The money
hereby appropriated is available for
payment of aid heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the money hereby appro-
priated may be increased or decreased by
interchange with any other appropriation
of the department of health with the
approval of the director of budget (26994) .. 90,000,000
For payments and expenses related to the
global hospital budget initiative:
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of aid heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange with
any other appropriation of the department
of health with the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (59130) .................. 275,000,000

843 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 995,650,000
--------------
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ............................. 117,857,882,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For the medical assistance program, includ-
ing administrative expenses, for local
social services districts, and for medical
care rates for authorized child care agen-
cies.
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, subject to federal approval,
department of health state funds medicaid
spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities
operated by the office of mental health,
the office for people with developmental
disabilities and the office of addiction
services and supports and further exclud-
ing any payments which are not appropri-
ated within the department of health, in
the aggregate, for the period April 1,
2026 through March 31, 2027 shall not
exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided
below provided, however, such aggregate
limits may be adjusted by the director of
the budget to account for any changes in
the New York state federal medical assist-
ance percentage amount established pursu-
ant to the federal social security act,
increases in provider revenues, reductions
in local social services district payments
for medical assistance administration,
minimum wage increases, and beginning
April 1, 2012 the operational costs of the
New York state medical indemnity fund,
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of
2011, and state costs or savings from the
essential plan program. Such projections
may be adjusted by the director of the
budget to account for increased or expe-
dited department of health state funds
medicaid expenditures as a result of a
natural or other type of disaster, includ-
ing a governmental declaration of emergen-
cy.

844 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
The director of the budget, in consultation
with the commissioner of health, shall
assess on a quarterly basis known and
projected medicaid expenditures by catego-
ry of service and by geographic region, as
defined by the commissioner, incurred both
prior to and subsequent to such assessment
for each such period, and if the director
of the budget determines that such expend-
itures are expected to cause medicaid
spending for such period to exceed the
aggregate limit specified herein for such
period, the state medicaid director, in
consultation with the director of the
budget and the commissioner of health,
shall develop a medicaid savings allo-
cation adjustment to limit such spending
to the aggregate limit specified herein
for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment
shall be designed, to reduce the expendi-
tures authorized by the appropriations
herein in compliance with the following
guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made
in compliance with applicable federal law,
including the provisions of the Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and
Education Reconciliation Act of 2010,
Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively
"Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent
amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be
made in a manner that complies with the
state medicaid plan approved by the feder-
al centers for medicare and medicaid
services, provided, however, that the
commissioner of health is authorized to
submit any state plan amendment or seek
other federal approval, including waiver
authority, to implement the provisions of
the medicaid savings allocation adjustment
that meets the other criteria set forth
herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a
manner that maximizes federal financial
participation, to the extent practicable,
including any federal financial partic-
ipation that is available or is reasonably
expected to become available, in the
discretion of the commissioner, under the
Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall
be made uniformly among categories of

845 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services and geographic regions of the
state, to the extent practicable, and
shall be made uniformly within a category
of service, to the extent practicable,
except where the commissioner determines
that there are sufficient grounds for
non-uniformity, including but not limited
to: the extent to which specific catego-
ries of services contributed to department
of health medicaid state funds spending in
excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in
underserved communities; or the potential
benefits of pursuing innovative payment
models contemplated by the Affordable Care
Act, in which case such grounds shall be
set forth in the medicaid savings allo-
cation adjustment; and (5) reductions
shall be made in a manner that does not
unnecessarily create administrative
burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi-
ents or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the
legislature, as well as organizations
representing health care providers,
consumers, businesses, workers, health
insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, to the extent that
all or part of such adjustment, in the
discretion of the commissioner, is likely
to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of
service or particular geographic regions
of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment on the
department of health's website and shall
provide written copies of such adjustment
to the chairs of the senate finance and
the assembly ways and means committees at
least 30 days before the date on which
implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment subsequent
to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new
notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph only if the commissioner
determines, in his or her discretion, that
such revisions materially alter the
adjustment.

846 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs
(a) and (b) of this subdivision, the
commissioner need not seek the input
described in paragraph (a) of this subdi-
vision or provide notice pursuant to para-
graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the
discretion of the commissioner, expedited
development and implementation of a medi-
caid savings allocation adjustment is
necessary due to a public health emergen-
cy.
For purposes of this section, a public
health emergency is defined as: (i) a
disaster, natural or otherwise, that
significantly increases the immediate need
for health care personnel in an area of
the state; (ii) an event or condition that
creates a widespread risk of exposure to a
serious communicable disease, or the
potential for such widespread risk of
exposure; or (iii) any other event or
condition determined by the commissioner
to constitute an imminent threat to public
health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to
prevent all or part of such medicaid
savings allocation adjustment from taking
effect retroactively to the extent permit-
ted by the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, the commissioner of
the department of health shall reduce
department of health state funds medicaid
spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including,
but not limited to modifying or suspending
reimbursement methods, including but not
limited to all fees, premium levels and
rates of payment, notwithstanding any
provision of law that sets a specific
amount or methodology for any such
payments or rates of payment; modifying or
discontinuing medicaid program benefits;
seeking all necessary federal approvals,
including, but not limited to waivers,
waiver amendments; and suspending time
frames for notice, approval or certif-
ication of rate requirements, notwith-
standing any provision of law, rule or
regulation to the contrary, including but
not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of

847 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the public health law, section 18 of chap-
ter 2 of the laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR
505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a
quarterly report that sets forth: (a)
known and projected department of health
medicaid expenditures as described in
subdivision (1) of this section, and
factors that could result in medicaid
disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected
department of health state funds disburse-
ments in the enacted budget financial plan
pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of
the state finance law, including spending
increases or decreases due to: enrollment
fluctuations, rate changes, utilization
changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and vari-
ations in offline medicaid payments; and
(b) the actions taken to implement any
medicaid savings allocation adjustment
implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of
this section, including information
concerning the impact of such actions on
each category of service and each
geographic region of the state. Each such
quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees and
shall be posted on the department of
health's website in a timely manner.
The money hereby appropriated is to be
available for payment of aid heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued to munici-
palities, and to providers of medical
services pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law, and for payment of
state aid to municipalities and to provid-
ers of family care where payment systems
through the fiscal intermediaries are not
operational.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, funds may be used
by the department for outside legal
assistance on issues involving the federal
government, the conduct of preadmission
screening and annual resident reviews
required by the state's medicaid program,
computer matching with insurance carriers
to insure that medicaid is the payer of
last resort and activities related to the

848 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
management of the pharmacy benefit avail-
able under the medicaid program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner of temporary and
disability assistance or the state commis-
sioner of health as due from local social
services districts each month as their
share of payments made pursuant to section
367-b of the social services law may be
set aside by the state comptroller in an
interest-bearing account in order to
ensure the orderly and prompt payment of
providers under section 367-b of the
social services law pursuant to an esti-
mate provided by the commissioner of
health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant
to section 367-b of the social services
law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funding made available by these
appropriations shall support direct salary
costs and related fringe benefits within
the medical assistance program associated
with any minimum wage increase that takes
effect during the timeframe of these
appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of
the labor law. Each eligible organization
in receipt of funding made available by
these appropriations may be required to
submit written certification, in such form
and at such time the commissioner may
prescribe, attesting to the total amount
of funds used by the eligible organiza-
tion, how such funding will be or was used
for purposes eligible under these appro-
priations and any other reporting deemed
necessary by the commissioner. The amounts
appropriated herein may include advances
to organizations authorized to receive
such funds to accomplish this purpose.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer, with any appropriation of the

849 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
department of health and the office of
medicaid inspector general and may be
increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation between these appropriated
amounts and appropriations of the depart-
ment of health state purpose account, the
office of mental health, office for people
with developmental disabilities, the
office of addiction services and supports,
the department of family assistance office
of temporary and disability assistance,
the department of corrections and communi-
ty supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university
of New York, and office of children and
family services, the office of medicaid
inspector general, the state education
department, and the state office for the
aging with the approval of the director of
the budget, who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control
and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the
chairman of the assembly ways and means
committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be used for payments to
the centers for medicaid and medicare
services for obligations incurred related
to the pharmaceutical costs of dually
eligible medicare/medicaid beneficiaries
participating in the medicare drug benefit
authorized by P.L. 108-173.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the moneys hereby appropriated
shall not be used for any existing rates,
fees, fee schedule, or procedures which
may affect the cost of care and services
provided by personal care providers, case
managers, health maintenance organiza-
tions, out of state medical facilities
which provide care and services to resi-
dents of the state, providers of transpor-
tation services, that are altered,
amended, adjusted or otherwise changed by
a local social services district unless
previously approved by the department of
health and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, funds shall be
made available to the commissioner of the

850 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
office of mental health or the commission-
er of the office of addiction services and
supports, in consultation with the commis-
sioner of health and approved by the
director of the budget, and consistent
with appropriations made therefor, to
implement allocation adjustment developed
by each such commissioner which shall
describe mental health or substance use
disorder services that should be developed
to meet service needs resulting from the
reduction of inpatient behavioral health
services provided under the medicaid
program, by programs licensed pursuant to
article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene
law. Such programs may include programs
that are licensed pursuant to both article
31 of the mental hygiene law and article
28 of the public health law, or certified
under both article 32 of the mental
hygiene law and article 28 of the public
health law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may
be available for payments associated with
the resolution by settlement agreement or
judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation
where the department of health is a party.
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including hospital
inpatient services and general hospitals
that are safety-net providers that evince
severe financial distress, pursuant to
criteria determined by the commissioner,
shall be eligible for awards for amounts
appropriated herein, to enable such
providers to maintain operations and vital
services while establishing long term
solutions to achieve sustainable health
services.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions
of law, no expenditures shall be used for
the medical assistance program for any
expenses not explicitly authorized in law
without the approval of the director of
the budget (26947) ....................... 1,218,447,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including hospital
outpatient and emergency room services
(26948) .................................... 376,901,000
For services and expenses of the medical

851 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
assistance program including clinic
services (26949) ........................... 738,289,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including nursing home
services (26950) ......................... 1,806,358,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including other long
term care services (26951) ............... 8,764,912,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including managed care
services including regional planning
activities of the finger lakes health
systems agency, including statewide coor-
dination and demonstration of best prac-
tices. The department shall make grants
within amounts appropriated therefor, to
assure high-quality and accessible primary
care, to provide technical assistance to
support financial and business planning
for integrated systems of care, and to
assist primary care providers in the
adoption, implementation, and meaningful
use of electronic health record technology
(26952) .................................. 5,901,680,000
For services and expenses for health homes
including grants to health homes (29548) ... 196,024,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including pharmacy
services provided, however, that no funds
shall be made available pursuant to this
appropriation for any drug not explicitly
authorized in any enacted law, rule, or
regulation without approval from the
director of the budget (26953) ........... 3,740,122,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including transporta-
tion services (26954) ...................... 537,237,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including dental
services (26955) ............................. 4,092,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including non-institu-
tional and other spending.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the money hereby appropriated may
be available for payments to any county or
public school districts associated with
additional claims for school supportive
health services (26956) .................. 1,248,802,000

852 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including payments to
the Area Agencies on Aging, making
improvements in the long term care system
for the point of entry initiatives, for
the purposes of expanding and promoting a
more coordinated level of care for the
delivery of quality services in the commu-
nity (29572) ................................ 22,881,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including payments to
Independent Living Centers, making
improvements in the long term care system
for the point of entry initiatives, for
the purposes of expanding and promoting a
more coordinated level of care for the
delivery of quality services in the commu-
nity (29573) ................................. 7,000,000
Notwithstanding section 112 or 163 of the
state finance law, or any other law to the
contrary, for grants for services and
expenses of independent living centers for
payment according to the following sub-
schedule (59131) ............................ 20,000,000
sub-schedule
Corning Council for Assistance
and Information for the
Disabled, Inc. dba AIM Inde-
pendent Living Center .......... 1,460,000
ARISE Child and Family
Service, Inc ..................... 540,000
Rockland Independent Living
Center, Inc. dba BRIDGES ....... 1,240,000
Center for Disability Rights,
Inc. ........................... 4,380,000
Finger Lakes Independence
Center ........................... 660,000
Long Island Center for Inde-
pendent Living, Inc. ........... 1,340,000
Independent Living, Inc .......... 1,460,000
Independent Living Center of
the Hudson Valley, Inc ........... 310,000
Resource Center for Independ-
ent Living, Inc ................ 2,690,000
Southern Tier Independence
Center, Inc. ................... 1,070,000
Western New York Independent
Living, Inc. ................... 4,850,000
--------------
Total of sub-schedule ......... 20,000,000

853 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including payments to
promote women's health and reduce the
adverse effects of multiple births (26793) ... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including the managed
long term care ombudsman program (26800) ..... 5,350,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including facilitated
enrollment for aged, blind and disabled
(26818) ...................................... 4,000,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, upon submission of
an allocation adjustment from the commis-
sioner of health, the amount appropriated
herein, together with any available feder-
al matching funds, may be transferred or
suballocated to the office of mental
health, office of addiction services and
supports, office for people with develop-
mental disabilities, division of housing
and community renewal, New York state
housing trust fund corporation, and office
of temporary and disability assistance for
services and expenses related to providing
affordable housing. Any such spending
shall consider the geographical location
of the grants (29521) ....................... 93,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including essential
community provider network and vital
access provider services (29562) ............ 81,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including vital access
provider services to preserve critical
access to essential behavioral health and
other services in targeted areas of the
state (26615) ............................... 25,000,000
For services and expenses related to reduc-
ing maternal mortality within the state,
including, but not limited to creating a
maternal mortality review board, develop-
ing a training curriculum on implicit
racial bias, expanding community health
workers, and building a data warehouse for
analysis of maternal outcomes to support
quality improvement (26855) .................. 4,000,000
For services and expenses for DC37 and Team-
ster Local 858 health insurance coverage

854 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
under the family health plus (FHPlus),
medicaid or for payments to participating
health insurance plans in the New York
state health benefit exchange (26856) ........ 2,810,000
The monies hereby appropriated shall be
available for the cost of housing subsi-
dies to certain participants in the nurs-
ing home transition and diversion waiver
program as authorized by chapters 615 and
627 of the laws of 2004. A portion of such
funds may be used for administration of
the housing subsidies, either by state
staff or a not-for-profit agency. Up to
100 percent of this appropriation may be
suballocated to the division of housing
and community renewal (26857) ................ 1,842,000
For services and expenses related to trau-
matic brain injury including but not
limited to services rendered to individ-
uals enrolled in the federally approved
home and community based services (HCBS)
waiver and including personal and nonper-
sonal services spending originally author-
ized by appropriations and reappropri-
ations enacted prior to 1996 (26858) ........ 11,465,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program general hospitals that
are safety-net providers, including, with-
out limitation, public benefit corpo-
rations, hospitals that are part of the
State University of New York, Critical
Access Hospitals and Sole Community Hospi-
tals as those terms are defined under
federal law, that evince severe financial
distress, residential health care facili-
ties, independent practice associations,
accountable care organizations, and for
the healthcare safety net transformation
program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, rule or regulation to the contra-
ry, all funds available for distribution
pursuant to subdivision (g) of section
2826 of the public health law shall be
distributed in accordance with the follow-
ing provisions. Pursuant to criteria, an
application, and an evaluation process,
acceptable to the commissioner of health
in consultation with the director of the
division of the budget, the commissioner
of the department of health may award a
temporary adjustment to the non-capital

855 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
components of rates, or make temporary
lump-sum Medicaid payments for services
and expenses of medical assistance
programs to eligible providers with seri-
ous financial instability and requiring
extraordinary financial assistance that
are safety-net providers, and which are
eligible facilities as defined in para-
graph (i) of subdivision (g) of section
2826 of the public health law, to enable
such facilities to maintain operations and
vital services while such facilities
establish long term solutions to achieve
sustainable health services. Provided,
however, if this chapter appropriates
funds which the director of the budget
deems insufficient to maintain such
payments as described in subdivision (g)
of section 2826 of the public health law,
then the provisions of this paragraph
shall be deemed null and void (26891) ...... 824,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including patient
centered medical homes (26859) ............. 116,000,000
For additional services and expenses of the
medical assistance program related to
disproportionate share hospital payments
to eligible hospitals operated by the
state university of New York, provided
further the eligible hospitals provide
sufficient financial information to evalu-
ate the need to support current and future
payments (26860) ........................... 429,225,000
For services and expenses associated with
ending the AIDS epidemic, including but
not limited to expanding the use of preex-
posure prophylaxis, enhancement of target-
ed prevention activities, support for
linkage and retention services and the
development of a peer credentialing proc-
ess (26923) ................................. 15,000,000
For services and expenses related to expand-
ing existing caregiver support services
for persons with Alzheimer's and other
dementias including additional respite and
expansion of the department of health
caregiver support services programs
(26930) ..................................... 26,367,000
For grants to the civil service employees
association, Local 1000, AFSCME, AFL-CIO
to allow child care workers represented by

856 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the union to reduce the cost of purchasing
coverage under the exchange (29808) .......... 4,750,000
For grants to the United Federation of
Teachers, Local 2, AFT, AFL-CIO to allow
child care workers represented by the
union to reduce the cost of purchasing
coverage under the exchange (29807) .......... 5,500,000
For the state share of medical assistance
services expenses incurred by the depart-
ment of health for the provision of
medical assistance including services to
people with developmental disabilities for
mental hygiene stabilization (29561) ..... 1,443,584,000
For payments to eligible certified community
behavioral health clinics under the certi-
fied community behavioral health clinics
indigent care program (59056) ............... 22,500,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including payments to
Ryan White Centers. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of the law, the
moneys hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer with any appropriation of the
department of health for the purpose of
supporting the Ryan White Centers (59057) ... 50,000,000
For services and expenses related to the New
York medicaid section 1115 demonstration
waiver (59091) ............................. 190,420,000
For services and expenses for continuous
eligibility for children enrolled in New
York State insurance programs (59092) ....... 30,300,000
For services and expenses of Children's
Rehabilitation Center, Inc. (Elizabeth
Seton Children's Rehabilitation Center) ...... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including medical
services provided at state facilities
operated by the office of mental health,
the office for people with developmental
disabilities and the office of addiction
services and supports (26961) ............ 5,000,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .............. 32,965,858,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Medicaid Direct Account - 25106
For services and expenses for the medical
assistance program, including administra-

857 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
tive expenses for local social services
districts, pursuant to title XIX of the
federal social security act or its succes-
sor program.
The moneys hereby appropriated are to be
available for payment of aid heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued to munici-
palities, and to providers of medical
services pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law, and for payment of
state aid to municipalities and to provid-
ers of family care where payment systems
through the fiscal intermediaries are not
operational.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funding made available by these
appropriations shall support direct salary
costs and related fringe benefits within
the medical assistance program associated
with any minimum wage increase that takes
effect during the timeframe of these
appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of
the labor law. Each eligible organization
in receipt of funding made available by
these appropriations may be required to
submit written certification, in such form
and at such time the commissioner may
prescribe, attesting to the total amount
of funds used by the eligible organiza-
tion, how such funding will be or was used
for purposes eligible under these appro-
priations and any other reporting deemed
necessary by the commissioner. The amounts
appropriated herein may include advances
to organizations authorized to receive
such funds to accomplish this purpose.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer, with any appropriation of the
department of health and the office of
medicaid inspector general and may be
increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation between these appropriated
amounts and appropriations of the office
of mental health, office for people with
developmental disabilities, the office of
addiction services and supports, the
department of family assistance office of
temporary and disability assistance,
office of children and family services,
the department of financial services,

858 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
department of corrections and community
supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university
of New York, the state education depart-
ment, and the state office for the aging
with the approval of the director of the
budget, who shall file such approval with
the department of audit and control and
copies thereof with the chairman of the
senate finance committee and the chairman
of the assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, in lieu of payments authorized by
the social services law, or payments of
federal funds otherwise due to the local
social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security
act or the federal food stamp act, funds
herein appropriated, in amounts certified
by the state commissioner of temporary and
disability assistance or the state commis-
sioner of health as due from local social
services districts each month as their
share of payments made pursuant to section
367-b of the social services law may be
set aside by the state comptroller in an
interest-bearing account in order to
ensure the orderly and prompt payment of
providers under section 367-b of the
social services law pursuant to an esti-
mate provided by the commissioner of
health of each local social services
district's share of payments made pursuant
to section 367-b of the social services
law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, funds shall be
made available to the commissioner of the
office of mental health or the commission-
er of the office of addiction services and
supports, in consultation with the commis-
sioner of health and approved by the
director of the budget, and consistent
with appropriations made therefor, to
implement allocation adjustment developed
by each such commissioner which shall
describe mental health or substance use
disorder services that should be developed
to meet service needs resulting from the
reduction of inpatient behavioral health
services provided under the medicaid
program, by programs licensed pursuant to

859 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene
law. Such programs may include programs
that are licensed pursuant to both article
31 of the mental hygiene law and article
28 of the public health law, or certified
under both article 32 of the mental
hygiene law and article 28 of the public
health law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may
be available for payments associated with
the resolution by settlement agreement or
judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation
where the department of health is a party.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provisions of law, no expenditures shall
be used for the medical assistance program
for any expenses not explicitly authorized
in law without the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget.
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including hospital
inpatient services (26947) ............... 3,945,972,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including hospital
outpatient and emergency room services
(26948) .................................... 703,207,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including clinic
services (26949) ......................... 1,138,623,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including nursing home
services (26950) ......................... 5,862,457,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including other long
term care services (26951) .............. 16,723,634,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including managed care
services including regional planning
activities of the finger lakes health
systems agency, including statewide coor-
dination and demonstration of best prac-
tices. The department shall make grants
within amounts appropriated therefor, to
assure high-quality and accessible primary
care, to provide technical assistance to
support financial and business planning
for integrated systems of care, and to
assist primary care providers in the
adoption, implementation, and meaningful
use of electronic health record technology
(26952) ................................. 21,586,309,000

860 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including pharmacy
services, provided, however, that no funds
shall be made available pursuant to this
appropriation for any drug not explicitly
authorized in any heretofore enacted law,
rule, or regulation without approval from
the director of the budget (26953) ....... 6,147,351,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including transporta-
tion services (26954) ...................... 825,813,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including dental
services (26955) ............................ 95,442,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including noninstitu-
tional and other spending.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued (26956) ..... 9,518,734,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, upon submission of
an allocation adjustment from the commis-
sioner of health, the amount appropriated
herein, together with any available feder-
al matching funds, may be transferred or
suballocated to the office of mental
health, office of addiction services and
supports, office for people with develop-
mental disabilities, division of housing
and community renewal, New York state
housing trust fund corporation, and office
of temporary and disability assistance for
services and expenses related to providing
affordable housing. Any such spending
shall consider the geographical location
of the grants (29521) ....................... 80,750,000
For additional services and expenses of the
medical assistance program related to
disproportionate share hospital payments
to eligible hospitals operated by the
state university of New York, provided
further the eligible hospitals provide
sufficient financial information to evalu-
ate the need to support current and future
payments (26860) ........................... 391,000,000
For payments to eligible certified community
behavioral health clinics under the certi-
fied community behavioral health clinics
indigent care program (59056) ............... 22,500,000

861 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses for the New York
medicaid redesign team section 1115 demon-
stration waiver for the purpose of rein-
vesting savings resulting from the rede-
sign of the medical assistance program,
the money hereby appropriated may be used
to make funds or payments authorized
pursuant to such waiver, including funds
or payments described in subdivisions 20
and 21 of section 2807 of the public
health law (26616) ....................... 2,100,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including medical
services provided at state facilities
operated by the office of mental health,
the office for people with developmental
disabilities and the office of addiction
services and supports (26961) ............ 5,000,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .............. 74,141,792,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
Indigent Care Account - 20817
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, subject to federal approval,
department of health state funds medicaid
spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities
operated by the office of mental health,
the office for people with developmental
disabilities and the office of addiction
services and supports and further exclud-
ing any payments which are not appropri-
ated within the department of health, in
the aggregate, for the period April 1,
2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not
exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided
below provided, however, such aggregate
limits may be adjusted by the director of
the budget to account for any changes in
the New York state federal medical assist-
ance percentage amount established pursu-
ant to the federal social security act,
increases in provider revenues, reductions
in local social services district payments
for medical assistance administration,
minimum wage increases and beginning April
1, 2012 the operational costs of the New

862 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
York state medical indemnity fund, pursu-
ant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and
state costs or savings from the essential
plan program. Such projections may be
adjusted by the director of the budget to
account for increased or expedited depart-
ment of health state funds medicaid
expenditures as a result of a natural or
other type of disaster, including a
governmental declaration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation
with the commissioner of health, shall
assess on a quarterly basis known and
projected medicaid expenditures by catego-
ry of service and by geographic region, as
determined by the commissioner of health,
incurred both prior to and subsequent to
such assessment for each such period, and
if the director of the budget determines
that such expenditures are expected to
cause medicaid spending for such period to
exceed the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the direc-
tor of the budget and the commissioner of
health, shall develop a medicaid savings
allocation adjustment to limit such spend-
ing to the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment
shall be designed, to reduce the expendi-
tures authorized by the appropriations
herein in compliance with the following
guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made
in compliance with applicable federal law,
including the provisions of the Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and
Education Reconciliation Act of 2010,
Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively
"Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent
amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be
made in a manner that complies with the
state medicaid plan approved by the feder-
al centers for medicare and medicaid
services, provided, however, that the
commissioner of health is authorized to
submit any state plan amendment or seek
other federal approval, including waiver
authority, to implement the provisions of
the medicaid savings allocation adjustment

863 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
that meets the other criteria set forth
herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a
manner that maximizes federal financial
participation, to the extent practicable,
including any federal financial partic-
ipation that is available or is reasonably
expected to become available, in the
discretion of the commissioner, under the
Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall
be made uniformly among categories of
services and geographic regions of the
state, to the extent practicable, and
shall be made uniformly within a category
of service, to the extent practicable,
except where the commissioner determines
that there are sufficient grounds for
non-uniformity, including but not limited
to: the extent to which specific catego-
ries of services contributed to department
of health medicaid state funds spending in
excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in
underserved communities; or the potential
benefits of pursuing innovative payment
models contemplated by the Affordable Care
Act, in which case such grounds shall be
set forth in the medicaid savings allo-
cation adjustment; and (5) reductions
shall be made in a manner that does not
unnecessarily create administrative
burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi-
ents or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the
legislature, as well as organizations
representing health care providers,
consumers, businesses, workers, health
insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, to the extent that
all or part of such adjustment, in the
discretion of the commissioner, is likely
to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of
service or particular geographic regions
of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment on the
department of health's website and shall
provide written copies of such plan to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees at

864 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
least 30 days before the date on which
implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment subsequent
to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new
notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph only if the commissioner
determines, in his or her discretion, that
such revisions materially alter the plan.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs
(a) and (b) of this subdivision, the
commissioner need not seek the input
described in paragraph (a) of this subdi-
vision or provide notice pursuant to para-
graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the
discretion of the commissioner, expedited
development and implementation of a medi-
caid savings allocation adjustment is
necessary due to a public health emergen-
cy.
For purposes of this section, a public
health emergency is defined as: (i) a
disaster, natural or otherwise, that
significantly increases the immediate need
for health care personnel in an area of
the state; (ii) an event or condition that
creates a widespread risk of exposure to a
serious communicable disease, or the
potential for such widespread risk of
exposure; or (iii) any other event or
condition determined by the commissioner
to constitute an imminent threat to public
health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to
prevent all or part of such medicaid
savings allocation adjustment from taking
effect retroactively to the extent permit-
ted by the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, the commissioner of
the department of health shall reduce
department of health state funds medicaid
spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including,
but not limited to modifying or suspending
reimbursement methods, including but not
limited to all fees, premium levels and
rates of payment, notwithstanding any
provision of law that sets a specific
amount or methodology for any such

865 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
payments or rates of payment; modifying
medicaid program benefits; seeking all
necessary federal approvals, including,
but not limited to waivers, waiver amend-
ments; and suspending time frames for
notice, approval or certification of rate
requirements, notwithstanding any
provision of law, rule or regulation to
the contrary, including but not limited to
sections 2807 and 3614 of the public
health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the
laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a
quarterly report that sets forth: (a)
known and projected department of health
medicaid expenditures as described in
subdivision (1) of this section, and
factors that could result in medicaid
disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected
department of health state funds disburse-
ments in the enacted budget financial plan
pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of
the state finance law, including spending
increases or decreases due to: enrollment
fluctuations, rate changes, utilization
changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and vari-
ations in offline medicaid payments; and
(b) the actions taken to implement any
medicaid savings allocation adjustment
implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of
this section, including information
concerning the impact of such actions on
each category of service and each
geographic region of the state. Each such
quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees and
shall be posted on the department of
health's website in a timely manner.
For the purpose of making payments to
providers of medical care pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law,
and for payment of state aid to munici-
palities where payment systems through
fiscal intermediaries are not operational,
to reimburse such providers for costs
attributable to the provision of care to
patients eligible for medical assistance.
Payments from this appropriation to gener-
al hospitals related to indigent care

866 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
pursuant to article 28 of the public
health law respectively, when combined
with federal funds for services and
expenses for the medical assistance
program pursuant to title XIX of the
federal social security act or its succes-
sor program, shall equal the amount of the
funds received related to health care
reform act allowances and surcharges
pursuant to article 28 of the public
health law and deposited to this account
less any such amounts withheld pursuant to
subdivision 21 of section 2807-c of the
public health law. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, the moneys
hereby appropriated may be increased or
decreased by interchange or transfer with
any appropriation of the department of
health with the approval of the director
of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
Notwithstanding section 2807-k of the Public
Health Law, or any inconsistent provision
of law, and subject to the availability of
federal financial participation, for peri-
ods on and after January 1, 2020 through
March 31, 2027, all funds available for
distribution pursuant to subdivision 5-d
of section 2807-k of the public health law
shall be distributed in accordance with
the provisions below.
The commissioner of the department of health
shall establish methodologies for deter-
mining each facility's relative uncompen-
sated care need amount based on uninsured
inpatient and outpatient units of service
from the cost reporting year two years
prior to the distribution year, multiplied
by the applicable medicaid rates in effect
January first of the distribution year, as
summed and adjusted by a statewide cost
adjustment factor and reduced by the sum
of all payment amounts collected from such
uninsured patients, and as further
adjusted by application of a nominal need
computation that shall take into account
each facility's medicaid inpatient share.

867 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Annual distributions pursuant to such regu-
lations for the 2026-2028 calendar years
shall be in accord with the following:
$82,700,000 shall be distributed as Medi-
caid DSH payments to major general public
hospitals, and $969,900,000 shall be
distributed as Medicaid DSH payments to
eligible general hospitals, other than
major public general hospitals, for each
of the calendar years 2026-2028, provided
that the total distributions to eligible
general hospitals, other than major public
general hospitals, shall be subject to a
reduction of $235,400,000 annually, and
further provided that eligible general
hospitals other than public general hospi-
tals who qualify as enhanced safety net
hospitals under section 2807-k of the
public health law shall not be subject to
such reduction.
Such reduction shall be determined by a
methodology to be established by the
department of health which may take into
account the payor mix of each non-public
general hospital, including the percentage
of inpatient days paid by the medical
assistance program.
For calendar years 2026-2028, eligible
general hospitals other than major public
general hospitals that qualify as enhanced
safety net hospitals under sections 2087-c
and section 2807-k of the public health
law which experience a reduction in
payments pursuant to section 2807-k of the
public health law shall receive a distrib-
ution of $64,600,000 annually proportional
to the reduction experienced by the facil-
ity and pursuant to a methodology deter-
mined to the commissioner (29797) .......... 631,100,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 631,100,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
Medical Assistance Account - 20804
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, subject to federal approval,
department of health state funds medicaid
spending, excluding payments for medical

868 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services provided at state facilities
operated by the office of mental health,
the office for people with developmental
disabilities and the office of addiction
services and supports and further exclud-
ing any payments which are not appropri-
ated within the department of health, in
the aggregate, for the period April 1,
2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not
exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided
below provided, however, such aggregate
limits may be adjusted by the director of
the budget to account for any changes in
the New York state federal medical assist-
ance percentage amount established pursu-
ant to the federal social security act,
increases in provider revenues, reductions
in local social services district payments
for medical assistance administration,
minimum wage increases and beginning April
1, 2012 the operational costs of the New
York state medical indemnity fund, pursu-
ant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and
state costs or savings from the essential
plan. Such projections may be adjusted by
the director of the budget to account for
increased or expedited department of
health state funds medicaid expenditures
as a result of a natural or other type of
disaster, including a governmental decla-
ration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation
with the commissioner of health, shall
assess on a quarterly basis known and
projected medicaid expenditures by catego-
ry of service and by geographic region, as
determined by the commissioner of health,
incurred both prior to and subsequent to
such assessment for each such period, and
if the director of the budget determines
that such expenditures are expected to
cause medicaid spending for such period to
exceed the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the direc-
tor of the budget and the commissioner of
health, shall develop a medicaid savings
allocation adjustment to limit such spend-
ing to the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment
shall be designed, to reduce the expendi-

869 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
tures authorized by the appropriations
herein in compliance with the following
guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made
in compliance with applicable federal law,
including the provisions of the Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and
Education Reconciliation Act of 2010,
Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively
"Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent
amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be
made in a manner that complies with the
state medicaid plan approved by the feder-
al centers for medicare and medicaid
services, provided, however, that the
commissioner of health is authorized to
submit any state plan amendment or seek
other federal approval, including waiver
authority, to implement the provisions of
the medicaid savings allocation adjustment
that meets the other criteria set forth
herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a
manner that maximizes federal financial
participation, to the extent practicable,
including any federal financial partic-
ipation that is available or is reasonably
expected to become available, in the
discretion of the commissioner, under the
Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall
be made uniformly among categories of
services and geographic regions of the
state, to the extent practicable, and
shall be made uniformly within a category
of service, to the extent practicable,
except where the commissioner determines
that there are sufficient grounds for
non-uniformity, including but not limited
to: the extent to which specific catego-
ries of services contributed to department
of health medicaid state funds spending in
excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in
underserved communities; or the potential
benefits of pursuing innovative payment
models contemplated by the Affordable Care
Act, in which case such grounds shall be
set forth in the medicaid savings allo-
cation adjustment; and (5) reductions
shall be made in a manner that does not
unnecessarily create administrative

870 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi-
ents or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the
legislature, as well as organizations
representing health care providers,
consumers, businesses, workers, health
insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, to the extent that
all or part of such adjustment, in the
discretion of the commissioner, is likely
to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of
service or particular geographic regions
of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment on the
department of health's website and shall
provide written copies of such plan to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees at
least 30 days before the date on which
implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment subsequent
to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new
notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph only if the commissioner
determines, in his or her discretion, that
such revisions materially alter the plan.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs
(a) and (b) of this subdivision, the
commissioner need not seek the input
described in paragraph (a) of this subdi-
vision or provide notice pursuant to para-
graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the
discretion of the commissioner, expedited
development and implementation of a medi-
caid savings allocation adjustment is
necessary due to a public health emergen-
cy.
For purposes of this section, a public
health emergency is defined as: (i) a
disaster, natural or otherwise, that
significantly increases the immediate need
for health care personnel in an area of
the state; (ii) an event or condition that
creates a widespread risk of exposure to a
serious communicable disease, or the
potential for such widespread risk of
exposure; or (iii) any other event or

871 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
condition determined by the commissioner
to constitute an imminent threat to public
health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to
prevent all or part of such medicaid
savings allocation adjustment from taking
effect retroactively to the extent permit-
ted by the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, the commissioner of
the department of health shall reduce
department of health state funds medicaid
spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including,
but not limited to modifying or suspending
reimbursement methods, including but not
limited to all fees, premium levels and
rates of payment, notwithstanding any
provision of law that sets a specific
amount or methodology for any such
payments or rates of payment; modifying
medicaid program benefits; seeking all
necessary federal approvals, including,
but not limited to waivers, waiver amend-
ments; and suspending time frames for
notice, approval or certification of rate
requirements, notwithstanding any
provision of law, rule or regulation to
the contrary, including but not limited to
sections 2807 and 3614 of the public
health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the
laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a
quarterly report that sets forth: (a)
known and projected department of health
medicaid expenditures as described in
subdivision (1) of this section, and
factors that could result in medicaid
disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected
department of health state funds disburse-
ments in the enacted budget financial plan
pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of
the state finance law, including spending
increases or decreases due to: enrollment
fluctuations, rate changes, utilization
changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and vari-
ations in offline medicaid payments; and
(b) the actions taken to implement any
medicaid savings allocation adjustment

872 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of
this section, including information
concerning the impact of such actions on
each category of service and each
geographic region of the state. Each such
quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees and
shall be posted on the department of
health's website in a timely manner.
For the purpose of making payments, the
money hereby appropriated is available for
payment of aid heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued, to providers of medical
care pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law, and for payment of
state aid to municipalities and the feder-
al government where payment systems
through fiscal intermediaries are not
operational, to reimburse such providers
for costs attributable to the provision of
care to patients eligible for medical
assistance. Notwithstanding any inconsist-
ent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased
by interchange or transfer with any appro-
priation of the department of health with
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, who shall file such approval with the
department of audit and control and copies
thereof with the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee
(29800) .................................. 5,209,772,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program related to supporting
workforce recruitment and retention of
personal care services or any worker with
direct patient care responsibility for
local social service districts which
include a city with a population of over
one million persons (29848) ................ 136,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program related to supporting
workforce recruitment and retention of
personal care services for local social
service districts that do not include a
city with a population of over one million
persons (29847) ............................. 11,200,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program related to supporting
rate increases for certified home health

873 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
agencies, long term home health care
programs, AIDS home care programs, hospice
programs, managed long term care plans and
approved managed long term care operating
demonstrations for recruitment and
retention of health care workers (29798) .... 50,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 5,406,972,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Medical Assistance Account - 22187
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the
contrary, subject to federal approval,
department of health state funds medicaid
spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities
operated by the office of mental health,
the office for people with developmental
disabilities and the office of addiction
services and supports and further exclud-
ing any payments which are not appropri-
ated within the department of health, in
the aggregate, for the period April 1,
2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not
exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided
below provided, however, such aggregate
limits may be adjusted by the director of
the budget to account for any changes in
the New York state federal medical assist-
ance percentage amount established pursu-
ant to the federal social security act,
increases in provider revenues, reductions
in local social services district payments
for medical assistance administration,
minimum wage increases and beginning April
1, 2012 the operational costs of the New
York state medical indemnity fund, pursu-
ant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and
state costs or savings from the essential
plan. Such projections may be adjusted by
the director of the budget to account for
increased or expedited department of
health state funds medicaid expenditures
as a result of a natural or other type of
disaster, including a governmental decla-
ration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation
with the commissioner of health, shall

874 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
assess on a quarterly basis known and
projected medicaid expenditures by catego-
ry of service and by geographic region, as
determined by the commissioner of health,
incurred both prior to and subsequent to
such assessment for each such period, and
if the director of the budget determines
that such expenditures are expected to
cause medicaid spending for such period to
exceed the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the direc-
tor of the budget and the commissioner of
health, shall develop a medicaid savings
allocation adjustment to limit such spend-
ing to the aggregate limit specified here-
in for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment
shall be designed, to reduce the expendi-
tures authorized by the appropriations
herein in compliance with the following
guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made
in compliance with applicable federal law,
including the provisions of the Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and
Education Reconciliation Act of 2010,
Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively
"Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent
amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be
made in a manner that complies with the
state medicaid plan approved by the feder-
al centers for medicare and medicaid
services, provided, however, that the
commissioner of health is authorized to
submit any state plan amendment or seek
other federal approval, including waiver
authority, to implement the provisions of
the medicaid savings allocation adjustment
that meets the other criteria set forth
herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a
manner that maximizes federal financial
participation, to the extent practicable,
including any federal financial partic-
ipation that is available or is reasonably
expected to become available, in the
discretion of the commissioner, under the
Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall
be made uniformly among categories of
services and geographic regions of the
state, to the extent practicable, and

875 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
shall be made uniformly within a category
of service, to the extent practicable,
except where the commissioner determines
that there are sufficient grounds for
non-uniformity, including but not limited
to: the extent to which specific catego-
ries of services contributed to department
of health medicaid state funds spending in
excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in
underserved communities; or the potential
benefits of pursuing innovative payment
models contemplated by the Affordable Care
Act, in which case such grounds shall be
set forth in the medicaid savings allo-
cation adjustment; and (5) reductions
shall be made in a manner that does not
unnecessarily create administrative
burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi-
ents or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the
legislature, as well as organizations
representing health care providers,
consumers, businesses, workers, health
insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, to the extent that
all or part of such adjustment, in the
discretion of the commissioner, is likely
to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of
service or particular geographic regions
of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment on the
department of health's website and shall
provide written copies of such plan to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees at
least 30 days before the date on which
implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid
savings allocation adjustment subsequent
to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new
notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph only if the commissioner
determines, in his or her discretion, that
such revisions materially alter the plan.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs
(a) and (b) of this subdivision, the
commissioner need not seek the input

876 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
described in paragraph (a) of this subdi-
vision or provide notice pursuant to para-
graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the
discretion of the commissioner, expedited
development and implementation of a medi-
caid savings allocation adjustment is
necessary due to a public health emergen-
cy.
For purposes of this section, a public
health emergency is defined as: (i) a
disaster, natural or otherwise, that
significantly increases the immediate need
for health care personnel in an area of
the state; (ii) an event or condition that
creates a widespread risk of exposure to a
serious communicable disease, or the
potential for such widespread risk of
exposure; or (iii) any other event or
condition determined by the commissioner
to constitute an imminent threat to public
health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to
prevent all or part of such medicaid
savings allocation adjustment from taking
effect retroactively to the extent permit-
ted by the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings
allocation adjustment, the commissioner of
the department of health shall reduce
department of health state funds medicaid
spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including,
but not limited to modifying or suspending
reimbursement methods, including but not
limited to all fees, premium levels and
rates of payment, notwithstanding any
provision of law that sets a specific
amount or methodology for any such
payments or rates of payment; modifying
medicaid program benefits; seeking all
necessary federal approvals, including,
but not limited to waivers, waiver amend-
ments; and suspending time frames for
notice, approval or certification of rate
requirements, notwithstanding any
provision of law, rule or regulation to
the contrary, including but not limited to
sections 2807 and 3614 of the public
health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the
laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 505.14(h).

877 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
The department of health shall prepare a
quarterly report that sets forth: (a)
known and projected department of health
medicaid expenditures as described in
subdivision (1) of this section, and
factors that could result in medicaid
disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected
department of health state funds disburse-
ments in the enacted budget financial plan
pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of
the state finance law, including spending
increases or decreases due to: enrollment
fluctuations, rate changes, utilization
changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and vari-
ations in offline medicaid payments; and
(b) the actions taken to implement any
medicaid savings allocation adjustment
implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of
this section, including information
concerning the impact of such actions on
each category of service and each
geographic region of the state. Each such
quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the
assembly ways and means committees and
shall be posted on the department of
health's website in a timely manner.
For the purpose of making payments to
providers of medical care pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law,
and for payment of state aid to munici-
palities and the federal government where
payment systems through fiscal interme-
diaries are not operational, to reimburse
the provision of care to patients eligible
for medical assistance.
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including nursing home,
personal care, certified home health agen-
cy, long term home health care program and
hospital services (29846) ................ 1,080,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 1,080,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Healthcare Stability Fund
Healthcare Stability Fund Account - 22267

878 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer, with any appropriation of the
department of health and the office of
medicaid inspector general and may be
increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation between these appropriated
amounts and appropriations of the depart-
ment of health state purpose account, the
office of mental health, office for people
with developmental disabilities, the
office of addiction services and supports,
the department of family assistance office
of temporary and disability assistance,
the department of corrections and communi-
ty supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university
of New York, and office of children and
family services, the office of medicaid
inspector general, the state education
department, and the state office for the
aging with the approval of the director of
the budget, who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control
and copies thereof with the chairman of
the senate finance committee and the
chairman of the assembly ways and means
committee.
The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued.
For payments, services, and expenses from
the Healthcare Stability Fund established
pursuant to section 99-ss of the of state
finance law, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, including
services and expense of the medical
assistance program, including but not
limited to hospital services, nursing home
services, clinic service, other long term
care services, managed care services and
the safety net transformation program
established pursuant to section 2825-i of
the public health law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, payments made pursuant to this
appropriation shall not exceed the value
of actual deposits or transfers to the
Healthcare Stability Fund (59114) ........ 3,632,160,000
--------------

879 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Program account subtotal ............... 3,632,160,000
--------------
OFFICE OF HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAMS ........................ 332,309,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange,
transfer or suballocation between this
appropriated amount and appropriations of
the department of health medical assist-
ance program and the department of health
medical assistance administration program.
For additional services and expenses related
to the annual hospital institutional cost
report (26617) ................................. 120,000
Notwithstanding section 112 and 163 of the
state finance law, section 142 of the
economic development law, and any other
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan developed by the
director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with
the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation. All or portion of this appropri-
ation may be transferred to the medical
assistance program ........................... 7,000,000
For services and expenses of Alzheimer's
Disease Resource Center, Inc. .................. 240,000
For services and expenses of the Brain Inju-
ry Association of New York State (Concus-
sion Outreach Prevention and Education -
COPE) ........................................... 87,500
For services and expenses of the Brain Inju-
ry Association of New York State, Inc
(brain injury alliance for continuum of
care program) ................................... 87,500
For services and expenses of Community
Service Society of New York (Community
Health Advocates Consortium) ................. 1,000,000
For services and expenses of the Alzheimer's
Disease Resource Center, Inc. .................. 125,000
For services and expenses of Community
Service Society of New York for Community
Health Advocates Consortium Health ............. 719,000
--------------

880 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Program account subtotal ................... 9,379,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Medical Assistance and Survey Account - 25107
For services and expenses for the medical
assistance program and administration of
the medical assistance program and survey
and certification program, provided pursu-
ant to title XIX and title XVIII of the
federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law and subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased
by transfer or suballocation between these
appropriated amounts and appropriations of
other state agencies and appropriations of
the department of health. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law and
subject to approval of the director of the
budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be
transferred or suballocated to other state
agencies for reimbursement to local
government entities for services and
expenses related to administration of the
medical assistance program (26872) ......... 320,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 320,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Alzheimer's Research Account - 20143
For Alzheimer's disease research and assist-
ance pursuant to chapter 590 of the laws
of 1999 (26870) ................................ 820,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 820,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Assisted Living Residence Quality Oversight Account -
22110
For services and expenses related to the
oversight and licensing activities for
assisted living facilities. Subject to the

881 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
approval of the director of the budget,
moneys appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated to the state office for the aging, a
portion of which may be transferred to
state operations and aid to localities
(26870) ...................................... 2,110,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,110,000
--------------
OFFICE OF PRIMARY CARE AND HEALTH SYSTEMS MANAGEMENT
PROGRAM .................................................. 228,770,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses to support the
alliance for donation (26805) .................. 100,000
For services and expenses to support the
center for liver transplant (26806) ............ 252,000
For services and expenses of a quality
program for adult care facilities. Such
program shall be targeted at facilities
with a high population of individuals who
receive supplemental security income, as
defined in subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of
title 42 of the United States Code, state
supplemental payments, Medicaid (with
respect to residents in an assisted living
program), or safety net assistance, as
defined in section 159 of the social
services law. Such program shall support
improvements to the quality of life for
adult care facility residents by funding
projects including clothing allowances,
resident training to support independent
living skills, improvements in food quali-
ty, outdoor leisure projects, and
cultural, recreational and other leisure
events, in accordance with a plan approved
by the residents' council, the department,
and the director of the division of the
budget, provided however that such expend-
iture shall not be used to supplant the
obligations of the facility operator to
provide a safe comfortable living environ-
ment for residents in a good state of
repair and sanitation. The department,
subject to approval of the director of the
budget, shall develop an allocation meth-
odology taking into account financial

882 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
status of the facility, resident needs,
and the population of residents who
receive supplemental security income, as
defined in subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of
title 42 of the United States Code, state
supplemental payments, Medicaid (with
respect to residents in an assisted living
program), or safety net assistance. Such
allocation shall serve as the basis of
distribution to eligible facilities .......... 3,266,000
For an operating assistance subprogram for
enriched housing. To the extent that funds
are appropriated for such purposes, the
department is authorized to pay an operat-
ing subsidy for SSI recipients who are
residents in certified not-for-profit or
public enriched housing programs. Such
subsidy shall not exceed $115 per month
per each SSI recipient and will be paid
directly to the certified operator. If
appropriations are not sufficient to meet
such maximum monthly payments, such subsi-
dy shall be reduced proportionately ............ 380,000
For services and expenses of the coalition
for the institutionalized aged and disa-
bled ............................................ 75,000
For services and expenses, including grants,
of the long term care community coalition
for an advocacy program on behalf of
seniors with long term care needs (29531) ....... 26,000
For services and expenses related to provid-
ing care teams at home for low-income
older adults (59093) ......................... 6,300,000
Notwithstanding section 112 or 163 of the
state finance law or any contrary
provision of law, for services and
expenses related to providing relief to
high-need family caregivers in respite
care at Adult Care Facilities (59094) ........ 7,200,000
For services and expenses of Alliance for
Donation. A portion of this appropriation
may be transferred to state operations
appropriations (59117) ......................... 250,000
For services and expenses related to
strengthening cardiac emergency readiness
within New York State. A portion of this
appropriation may be transferred to state
operations appropriations .................... 1,600,000
For services and expenses of Alliance for
Donation, Inc. (Donate Life New York
State) ......................................... 500,000

883 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the coalition
of institutionalized aged and disabled ......... 150,000
For services and expenses of Alliance for
Donation, Inc (Donate Life New York State) ..... 400,000
For services and expenses of Primary Care
Development Corporation ........................ 450,000
For services and expenses of Finger Lakes
Health Systems Agency .......................... 409,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 21,358,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Loan Repayment Account - 25144
For expenses and services related to the
health resources and services adminis-
tration grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, and subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased
by transfer or suballocation to the higher
education services corporation (26876) ....... 1,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Rural Health Transformation Account
For services and expenses, grants, or
contracts related to the Rural Health
Transformation Program. The money hereby
appropriated is available for payment of
aid heretofore accrued and hereafter
accrued pursuant to a plan prepared by the
commissioner of health and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, moneys
hereby appropriated may be increased or
decreased by transfer, interchange, or
suballocation to any department, agency,
or public authority. Funds appropriated
hereunder shall not be subject to the
provisions of sections 112 and 163 of the
state finance law, article 4-c of the
economic development law, and any other
contrary provision of law to the contrary,
and shall be made available without a

884 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
competitive bid or request for proposal
process .................................... 190,852,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 190,852,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Emergency Medical Services Account - 20809
For services and expenses related to emer-
gency medical services (EMS) adminis-
tration including but not limited to,
expenses related to training courses and
instructor development, expenses of the
state EMS councils and program agencies
(26876) ..................................... 10,570,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 10,570,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Quality of Care Improvement Account - 22147
For services and expenses related to the
protection of the health or property of
residents of residential health care
facilities that are found to be deficient
including, but not limited to, payment for
the cost of relocation of residents to
other facilities and the maintenance and
operation of a facility pending correction
of deficiencies or closure. A portion of
this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations appropriations. Notwith-
standing any provision of law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein
shall be net of refunds, rebates,
reimbursements, credits, repayments,
and/or disallowances (26876) ................. 4,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 4,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Professional Medical Conduct Account - 22088
For services and expenses of the medical
society contract authorized pursuant to
chapter 582 of the laws of 1984 (29835) ........ 990,000

885 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 990,000
--------------
WADSWORTH CENTER FOR LABORATORIES AND RESEARCH PROGRAM ...... 16,732,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of a genetic
disease screening program (29824) .............. 487,000
For services and expenses related to rare
disease research, treatment, education,
programming, and related activities. Of
amounts appropriated herein, notwithstand-
ing section 163 of the state finance law,
a portion of this appropriation may be
awarded to Empire State ALS Alliance to
support Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis
(ALS) research and treatment. A portion of
this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations appropriations (59095) ...... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of International
Lymphatic Disease and Lymphedema Patient
Registry and Biorepository ...................... 90,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 5,577,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
ALS Research and Education Account - 23809
For services and expenses related to ALS
research and education pursuant to section
95-I of the state finance law (59063) ........... 75,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ...................... 75,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Breast Cancer Research and Education Account - 20155
For services and expenses related to breast
cancer research and education pursuant to
section 97-yy of the state finance law
(26884) ...................................... 2,580,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,580,000
--------------

886 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Spinal Cord Injury Research Fund Account - 21987
For services and expenses, including grants,
related to spinal cord injury research
pursuant to chapter 338 of the laws of
1998 (26622) ................................. 8,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 8,500,000
--------------

887 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the office of minority health including
competitive grants to promote community strategic planning or new or
improved health care delivery systems and networks in minority areas
(29995) ... 266,000 ................................. (re. $137,000)
AIDS INSTITUTE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses for regional and targeted HIV, STD, and
hepatitis C services. To ensure organizational viability, agency
administration may be supported subject to the review and approval
of the department of health.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of health shall be authorized to continue contracts with community
service programs, multiservice agencies and community development
initiatives for all such contracts which were executed on or before
March 31, 2025, without any additional requirements that such
contracts be subject to competitive bidding or a request for
proposals process (29819) ... 29,009,000 ......... (re. $21,887,000)
For services and expenses for HIV health care and supportive services.
A portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
agencies, or authorities (26924) ...................................
32,173,826 ........................................ (re. $8,363,000)
For services and expenses relating to the New York/New York III
supportive housing agreement A portion of this appropriation may be
suballocated to other state agencies, or authorities (59052) .......
12,900,000 ....................................... (re. $12,900,000)
For services and expenses for hepatitis C programs (29817) ...........
3,980,370 ......................................... (re. $2,206,000)
For services and expenses for HIV, STD, and hepatitis C prevention. A
portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state agencies
(29818) ... 30,585,800 ........................... (re. $21,675,000)
For services and expenses for HIV clinical and provider education
programs (29816) ... 2,716,000 .................... (re. $1,789,000)
For services and expenses of an opioid drug addiction, prevention and
treatment program (26936) ... 7,785,000 ........... (re. $3,975,000)
For services and expenses to support the STD center of excellence
(26826) ... 480,000 ................................. (re. $311,000)
For services and expenses of the health and social services sexuali-
ty-related programs (26832) ... 12,000,000 ........ (re. $8,952,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide public health campaign for
screening and education activities regarding sexually transmitted
diseases, provided that any funds allocated under this appropriation

888 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall not supplant existing local funds or state funds allocated to
county health departments under article 6 of the public health law
(26834) ... 777,700 ................................. (re. $541,000)
For services and expenses for workforce development for transgender,
gender non-conforming, non-binary, & intersex people within the
state. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
agencies (59085) ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Transgender and Gender Non-Conforming
Wellness and Equity Fund to be distributed pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of health and approved by the director of
the budget (59170) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Aids Institute for additional grants
(59066) ... 262,500 ................................. (re. $262,500)
For services and expenses of the Transgender and Gender Non-Conforming
Wellness and Equity Fund (59065) ... 500,000 ........ (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing Transgender and non-binary (TGNB) Wellness and Equity
Program to support health and social services sexuality-related
programs. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to
any state department, agency or authority to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of the temporary president
of senate and the director of the budget. Provided further, notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (59064) ................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses for HIV health care and supportive services.
A portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
agencies, or authorities (26924) ...................................
29,187,000 ........................................ (re. $8,363,000)
For services and expenses relating to the New York/New York III
supportive housing agreement A portion of this appropriation may be
suballocated to other state agencies, or authorities (59052) .......
12,900,000 ........................................ (re. $6,657,000)
For services and expenses for hepatitis C programs (29817) ...........
2,980,370 ......................................... (re. $1,209,000)
For services and expenses for HIV clinical and provider education
programs (29816) ... 2,716,000 ...................... (re. $449,000)
For services and expenses for workforce development for transgender,
gender non-conforming, non-binary, & intersex people within the

889 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state. A portion of these funds may be suballocated to other state
agencies (59085) ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing Transgender and non-binary (TGNB) Wellness and Equity
Program to support health and social services sexuality-related
programs. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (59064) ........
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of the Transgender and Gender Non-Conforming
Wellness and Equity Fund (59065) ... 500,000 ........ (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses for HIV health care and supportive services.
A portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state
agencies, or authorities (26924) ...................................
25,187,000 ........................................ (re. $6,132,000)
For additional services and expenses of the transgender and gender
nonconforming wellness and equity fund program to support health and
social services sexuality-related programs. Notwithstanding section
24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the Senate upon a roll call vote (59064) ........
500,000 .............................................. (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of the Transgender and Gender Non-Conforming
Wellness and Equity Fund (59065) ... 500,000 ......... (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses of LGBT Health and Human Service Network
Inc. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote (59067) ...........................
475,000 .............................................. (re. $57,000)

890 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For additional services and expenses of the health and social services
sexuality-related programs (26698) .................................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $364,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
SAMHSA Account - 25170
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses, including grants, to provide training and
resources to first responders and members of other key community
sectors at the state, tribal and local governmental levels related
to emergency treatment of suspected opioid overdose (26847) ........
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses, including grants, to provide training and
resources to first responders and members of other key community
sectors at the state, tribal and local governmental levels related
to emergency treatment of suspected opioid overdose (26847) ........
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses, including grants, to provide training and
resources to first responders and members of other key community
sectors at the state, tribal and local governmental levels related
to emergency treatment of suspected opioid overdose (26847) ........
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses, including grants, to provide training and
resources to first responders and members of other key community
sectors at the state, tribal and local governmental levels related
to emergency treatment of suspected opioid overdose (26847) ........
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
State aid to municipalities for the operation of local health depart-
ments and laboratories and for the provision of general public
health services pursuant to article 6 of the public health law for
activities under the jurisdiction of the commissioner of health.
Notwithstanding any other provision of article 6 of the public health
law, a county may obtain reimbursement pursuant to this act, only
after the county chief financial officer certifies, in the state aid
application, that county tax levies used to fund services carried

891 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
out by the county health department have not been added to or
supplanted directly or indirectly by any funds obtained by the coun-
ty pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement entered into on
November 23, 1998 by the state and leading United States tobacco
product manufacturers, except in the case of a public health emer-
gency, as determined by the commissioner of health.
Notwithstanding annual aggregate limits for bad debt and charity care
allowances and any other provision of law, up to $1,700,000 shall be
transferred to the medical assistance program general fund local
assistance account for eligible publicly sponsored certified home
health agencies that demonstrate losses from a disproportionate
share of bad debt and charity care, pursuant to chapter 884 of the
laws of 1990. Within the maximum limits specified herein, the
department shall transfer only those funds which are necessary to
meet the state share requirements for disproportionate share adjust-
ments expected to be paid for the period January 1, 2025 through
December 31, 2026.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for payment of
financial assistance heretofore accrued (26815) ....................
230,042,000 ..................................... (re. $156,477,000)
For services and expenses related to public health emergencies as
declared by the counties or the commissioner of the department of
health, and approved by the director of the budget in accordance
with article 6 of the public health law. Notwithstanding any
provision of the law to the contrary, a portion of these funds may
be transferred to any program, fund, or account within the depart-
ment to respond to any identified emergency, pursuant to approval by
the director of the budget (29975) .................................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,000,000)
For services and expenses of a study of racial disparities (29967) ...
147,500 .............................................. (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of a Latino health outreach initiative
(29940) ... 36,750 ................................... (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses of a rabies program, including but not
limited to reimbursement to counties for rabies expense such as
human post-exposure vaccination, and research studies in the control
of wildlife rabies, pursuant to United States department of agricul-
ture approval if necessary, to control the spread of rabies (29973)
... 1,456,000 ....................................... (re. $859,000)
For grants-in-aid to contract for hypertension prevention, screening,
and treatment programs (29965) ... 186,000 .......... (re. $186,000)
For services and expenses including an education program related to a
children's asthma program. The department shall make grants within
the amounts appropriated therefor to local health agencies, health
care providers, school, school-based health centers and community-
based organizations and other organizations with demonstrated inter-
est and expertise in serving persons with asthma to develop and
implement regional or community plans which may include the follow-
ing activities: self-management programs in elementary schools,
conducting public and provider education programs and implementing
protocols for collection of data on asthma-related school absentee-
ism and emergency room visits. In making grants the commissioner may

892 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
give priority consideration to entities serving areas of the state
with high incidence and prevalence of asthma (29962) ...............
170,000 ............................................. (re. $170,000)
For services and expenses of a universal prenatal and postpartum home
visitation program (29939) ... 1,847,000 .......... (re. $1,575,000)
For services and expenses for childhood asthma coalitions (29936) ....
930,000 ............................................. (re. $349,000)
For services and expenses related to obesity and diabetes programs
(26925) ... 5,970,000 ............................. (re. $4,172,000)
For services and expenses related to statewide health broadcasts
involving local, state and federal agencies (26830) ................
32,000 ............................................... (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses to promote infant safe sleep (29964) .......
15,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of research and prevention, and detection of
Lyme disease and other tick-borne illnesses ........................
69,400 ............................................... (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of a safe motherhood initiative to prevent
maternal deaths in New York state (29942) ..........................
28,000 ............................................... (re. $28,000)
For services and expenses of health promotions initiative ............
430,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses for statewide maternal mortality reviews and
the development of protocols to reduce incidents of death during
childbirth (29938) ... 25,000 ........................ (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of a statewide public health campaign for
tuberculosis control, provided that any funds allocated under this
appropriation shall not supplant existing local funds or state funds
allocated to county health departments under article 6 of the public
health law (26839) ... 3,845,000 .................. (re. $2,696,000)
For services and expenses of the prenatal care assistance program. Up
to 100 percent of this appropriation may be suballocated to the
medical assistance program general fund - local assistance account
to be matched by federal funds (26841) .............................
1,835,000 ......................................... (re. $1,377,000)
For services and expenses related to tobacco enforcement, education
and related activities, pursuant to chapter 433 of the laws of 1997.
Of amounts appropriated herein, up to $500,000 may be used for
educational programs (29916) ... 2,174,600 ........ (re. $1,377,000)
For grants in aid to contract for hypertension prevention, screening
and treatment programs (29564) ... 506,000 .......... (re. $292,000)
For services and expenses of tuberculosis treatment, detection and
prevention (29912) ... 565,600 ...................... (re. $492,000)
For services and expenses to implement the early intervention program
act of 1992.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for payment of
financial assistance heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, for
state fiscal year 2025-26 the liability of the state and the amount
to be distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to
section 2557 of the public health law shall be determined by first
calculating the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursu-

893 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ant to such law, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, up to $40,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein may, at
the discretion of the director of the budget, be transferred to the
early intervention program state escrow account for use by munici-
palities and the State for the delivery of early intervention
services pursuant to chapter 820 of the laws of 2021. (26825) ......
204,999,000 ..................................... (re. $204,999,000)
For services and expenses related to the Indian health program. The
moneys hereby appropriated shall be for payment of financial assist-
ance heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue (26840) .............
36,742,000 ....................................... (re. $19,308,000)
State grants for a program of family planning services pursuant to
article 2 of the public health law. A portion of these funds may be
suballocated to other state agencies (26824) .......................
10,355,300 ........................................ (re. $7,702,000)
State grants for abortion access, including the Reproductive Freedom
and Equity Grant program, in order to expand capacity and ensure
access for patients. The money hereby appropriated is available for
payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued. Funds appro-
priated herein shall not be subject to section 112 of the state
finance law or section 163 of the state finance law (59053) ........
25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $18,201,000)
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for respite services
for families of eligible children. Such moneys shall be allocated to
each municipality by the department of health as determined by the
department, to reimburse such municipalities in the amount of 50
percent of the costs of respite services provided to eligible chil-
dren and their families with the approval of the early intervention
official, in accordance with section 2547 of the public health law,
section 69-4.18 of title 10 of the New York codes, rules and regu-
lation and standards established by the department for the provision
of respite services. The moneys allocated to each municipality by
the department shall be the total amount of respite funds available
for such purpose (29971) ...........................................
1,758,000 ......................................... (re. $1,758,000)
For services and expenses of a comprehensive adolescent pregnancy
prevention program (26827) ... 8,505,000 .......... (re. $6,185,000)
For services and expenses associated with new and existing school
based health centers (26922) ... 13,320,000 ...... (re. $11,359,000)
For services and expenses related to the school based health clinics
program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the
contrary, funds shall be available for the statewide school based
health clinics program to provide grants to certain school based
health centers pursuant to the following:
Anthony Jordan Health Center (29960) ... 22,000 ........ (re. $17,000)
Montefiore Medical Center (29737) ... 90,000 ........... (re. $68,000)
East Harlem Council for Human Services (29957) .......................
10,000 ................................................ (re. $8,000)
Family Health Network (29956) ... 7,000 ................. (re. $6,000)
Kaleida Health (29955) ... 135,000 .................... (re. $102,000)

894 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Sunset Park Health Council, Inc. d/b/a NYU Lutheran Family Health
Centers (29954) ... 45,000 ........................... (re. $33,000)
Long Island Federally Qualified Health Center (29596) ................
9,000 ................................................. (re. $7,000)
NY Presbyterian Hospital (29952) ... 158,000 .......... (re. $120,000)
Sisters of Charity (29950) ... 27,000 .................. (re. $21,000)
University of Rochester (29947) ... 38,000 ............. (re. $27,000)
Via Health-Rochester General Hospital (29946) ........................
13,000 ............................................... (re. $13,000)
William F. Ryan Community Health Center (29945) ......................
14,000 ............................................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses to support grants to community health
centers and comprehensive diagnostic and treatment centers for the
purpose of furnishing primary health care services, including
outreach, health education and dental care, to migrant and seasonal
farmworkers and their families, of which no less than 70 percent
shall be dedicated to community health centers receiving federal
funding for such purpose pursuant to section 330(g) of the federal
public health service act (29944) ... 406,000 ....... (re. $406,000)
For services and expenses related to providing nutritional services
and to provide nutritional education to pregnant women, infants, and
children, including suballocations to the department of agriculture
and markets for the farmer's market nutrition program and migrant
worker services and the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance for prenatal care assistance program activities. A portion of
these funds may be suballocated to other state agencies (26821) ...
26,395,000 ....................................... (re. $19,376,000)
For services and expenses, including operating expenses related to
providing nutritional services and nutrition education for hunger
prevention and nutrition assistance. A portion of this appropriation
may be suballocated to other state agencies (26822) ................
34,547,000 ....................................... (re. $15,030,000)
For services and expenses of the Nourish NY program. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with any
appropriation of the department of health or any other state agency,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget (59032) ......
50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $27,610,000)
For services and expenses related to evidence based cancer services
programs (26926) ... 19,825,000 .................. (re. $13,181,000)
For services and expenses related to the tobacco use prevention and
control program including grants to support cancer research (29549)
... 33,144,000 ................................... (re. $28,782,000)
State aid to municipalities for medical services for the rehabili-
tation of children and youth with special health care needs, pursu-
ant to article 6 of the public health law (29917) ..................
170,000 ............................................. (re. $170,000)
For services and expenses of the Nurse-Family Partnership program
(26838) ... 3,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,901,000)
For services and expenses of a sickle cell program (26820) ...........
170,000 ............................................. (re. $145,000)

895 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses for regional perinatal centers and their
affiliate birthing hospitals/centers (59033) .......................
4,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,489,000)
For services and expenses for housing and healthcare programs for
children with asthma. A portion of this appropriation may be trans-
ferred to state operations appropriations (59086) ..................
2,140,000 ......................................... (re. $2,140,000)
For services and expenses related to reducing infant mortality within
the state. The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to state
operations (59087) ... 690,000 ...................... (re. $690,000)
For services and expenses related to increasing perinatal quality
within the state. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred
to state operations appropriations (59088) .........................
700,000 ............................................. (re. $700,000)
For services and expenses for dental care for Native Americans within
the state (59089) ... 4,500,000 ................... (re. $3,784,000)
For services and expenses of the Children with Special Health Care
Needs program (59097) ... 3,000,000 ............... (re. $3,000,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the Hunger Prevention
and Nutrition Assistance program (59099) ...........................
23,250,000 ....................................... (re. $23,250,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the Nourish NY program
(59100) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000)
For additional services and expenses for state grants for abortion
access, including but not limited to the Reproductive Freedom and
Equity Grant program, in order to expand capacity and ensure access
for patients and to support abortion clinical training programs. The
money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued. Funds appropriated herein shall not be
subject to section 112 of the state finance law or section 163 of
the state finance law (59132) ... 4,000,000 ....... (re. $4,000,000)
For services and expenses of a maternal health grant program. Funds
appropriated herein shall not be subject to section 112 of the state
finance law, section 163 of the state finance law, or section 142 of
the economic development law (59077) ...............................
7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $7,000,000)
For additional services and expenses for abortion service providers,
including costs associated with medication abortion care. The money
hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued to support grants for access to essen-
tial care. Funds appropriated herein shall not be subject to section
112 of the state finance law or section 163 of the state finance law
(59133) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of United Way of Greater New York (59075)
... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Community Doula Expansion Grant
Program. Funds appropriated herein shall not be subject to section
112 of the state finance law or section 163 of the state finance law
(59108) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For additional state grants for a program of Family Planning services
pursuant to article 2 of the public health law (29609) .............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $458,000)

896 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For additional state grants for a program of Family Planning services
pursuant to article 2 of the public health law (29935) .............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $458,000)
For services and expenses of Morris Heights Health Center (59109) ....
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of New York Common Pantry (59068) ..........
679,000 ............................................. (re. $679,000)
For additional services and expenses for state grants for abortion
access, including but not limited to the Reproductive Freedom and
Equity Grant program in order to expand capacity and ensure access
for patients. The money hereby appropriated is available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued to support grants for
access to essential care. Funds appropriated herein shall not be
subject to section 112 of the state finance law or section 163 of
the state finance law (59110) ... 1,000,000 ....... (re. $1,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Safe Motherhood Initiative
(29565) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025 as amended by chapter 172,
section 3, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of United Way of Greater New York (59134)
... 5,900,000 ..................................... (re. $5,900,000)
For services and expenses of United Way of New York City (Preventative
Care Access Initiative) (59136) ... 1,000,000 ..... (re. $1,000,000)
The appropriations made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025,
are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses for abortion service providers, including
costs associated with medication abortion care pursuant to a plan
submitted by the commissioner of health and approved by the director
of the budget. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 112 and
163 of the state finance law, and 142 and 143 of the economic devel-
opment law, or any contrary provision of law
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans-
fer with any appropriation of the department of health or any other
state agency, subject to the approval of the director of the budget
(59122) ............................................................
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000)
For services and expenses related to providing swimming instruction
for children [under the age of four] twelve years of age or younger
pursuant to a plan submitted by the commissioner of health and
approved by the director of the division of the budget. A portion of
this appropriation may be transferred to state operations appropri-
ations (59124) ... 5,000,000 ...................... (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to public health emergencies as
declared by the counties or the commissioner of the department of
health, and approved by the director of the budget in accordance
with article 6 of the public health law. Notwithstanding any
provision of the law to the contrary, a portion of these funds may

897 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be transferred to any program, fund, or account within the depart-
ment to respond to any identified emergency, pursuant to approval by
the director of the budget (29975) .................................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $39,957,000)
For services and expenses including an education program related to a
children's asthma program. The department shall make grants within
the amounts appropriated therefor to local health agencies, health
care providers, school, school-based health centers and community-
based organizations and other organizations with demonstrated inter-
est and expertise in serving persons with asthma to develop and
implement regional or community plans which may include the follow-
ing activities: self-management programs in elementary schools,
conducting public and provider education programs and implementing
protocols for collection of data on asthma-related school absentee-
ism and emergency room visits. In making grants the commissioner may
give priority consideration to entities serving areas of the state
with high incidence and prevalence of asthma (29962) ...............
170,000 .............................................. (re. $46,000)
For services and expenses to promote infant safe sleep (29964) .......
15,000 ................................................ (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of a safe motherhood initiative to prevent
maternal deaths in New York state (29942) ..........................
28,000 ................................................ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of health promotion initiatives (26833) ....
430,000 ............................................. (re. $102,000)
For services and expenses related to tobacco enforcement, education
and related activities, pursuant to chapter 433 of the laws of 1997.
Of amounts appropriated herein, up to $500,000 may be used for
educational programs (29916) ... 2,174,600 .......... (re. $161,000)
For services and expenses of tuberculosis treatment, detection and
prevention (29912) ... 565,600 ...................... (re. $136,000)
For services and expenses to implement the early intervention program
act of 1992.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for payment of
financial assistance heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, for
state fiscal year 2024-25 the liability of the state and the amount
to be distributed or otherwise expended by the state pursuant to
section 2557 of the public health law shall be determined by first
calculating the amount of the expenditure or other liability pursu-
ant to such law, and then reducing the amount so calculated by two
percent of such amount. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, up to $40,000,000 of the funds appropriated herein may, at
the discretion of the director of the budget, be transferred to the
early intervention program state escrow account for use by munici-
palities and the State for the delivery of early intervention
services pursuant to chapter 820 of the laws of 2021. (26825) ......
204,999,000 ...................................... (re. $79,253,000)
For services and expenses related to the Indian health program. The
moneys hereby appropriated shall be for payment of financial assist-
ance heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue (26840) .............
36,742,000 ........................................ (re. $3,579,000)

898 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
State grants for abortion access, including the Reproductive Freedom
and Equity Grant program, in order to expand capacity and ensure
access for patients. The money hereby appropriated is available for
payment of aid heretofore accrued or here-after accrued. Funds
appropriated herein shall not be subject to section 112 of the state
finance law or section 163 of the state finance law (59053) ........
25,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,401,000)
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for respite services
for families of eligible children. Such moneys shall be allocated to
each municipality by the department of health as determined by the
department, to reimburse such municipalities in the amount of 50
percent of the costs of respite services provided to eligible chil-
dren and their families with the approval of the early intervention
official, in accordance with section 2547 of the public health law,
section 69-4.18 of title 10 of the New York codes, rules and regu-
lation and standards established by the department for the provision
of respite services. The moneys allocated to each municipality by
the department shall be the total amount of respite funds available
for such purpose (29971) ...........................................
1,758,000 ......................................... (re. $1,754,000)
For services and expenses associated with new and existing school
based health centers (26922) ... 11,320,000 ....... (re. $2,343,000)
For services and expenses related to the school based health clinics
program, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the
contrary, funds shall be available for the statewide school based
health clinics program to provide grants to certain school based
health centers pursuant to the following:
Anthony Jordan Health Center (29960) ... 22,000 ......... (re. $9,000)
Kaleida Health (29955) ... 135,000 ..................... (re. $16,000)
University of Rochester (29947) ... 38,000 ............. (re. $27,000)
For services and expenses to support grants to community health
centers and comprehensive diagnostic and treatment centers for the
purpose of furnishing primary health care services, including
outreach, health education and dental care, to migrant and seasonal
farmworkers and their families, of which no less than 70 percent
shall be dedicated to community health centers receiving federal
funding for such purpose pursuant to section 330(g) of the federal
public health service act (29944) ... 406,000 ........ (re. $80,000)
For services and expenses related to providing nutritional services
and to provide nutritional education to pregnant women, infants, and
children, including suballocations to the department of agriculture
and markets for the farmer's market nutrition program and migrant
worker services and the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance for prenatal care assistance program activities. A portion of
these funds may be suballocated to other state agencies (26821) ...
26,395,000 ....................................... (re. $18,029,000)
For services and expenses, including operating expenses related to
providing nutritional services and nutrition education for hunger
prevention and nutrition assistance. A portion of this appropriation
may be suballocated to other state agencies (26822) ................
34,547,000 ........................................ (re. $7,650,000)

899 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the tobacco use prevention and
control program including grants to support cancer research (29549)
... 33,144,000 .................................... (re. $4,112,000)
State aid to municipalities for medical services for the rehabili-
tation of children and youth with special health care needs, pursu-
ant to article 6 of the public health law (29917) ..................
170,000 ............................................. (re. $168,000)
For services and expenses for housing and healthcare programs for
children with asthma. A portion of this appropriation may be trans-
ferred to state operations appropriations (59086) ..................
2,130,000 ........................................... (re. $194,000)
For services and expenses related to reducing infant mortality within
the state. The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to state
operations (59087) ... 320,000 ...................... (re. $320,000)
For services and expenses related to increasing perinatal quality
within the state. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred
to state operations appropriations (59088) .........................
700,000 ............................................. (re. $700,000)
For services and expenses for dental care for Native Americans within
the state (59089) ... 2,500,000 ................... (re. $1,599,000)
For services and expenses related to programs for the reduction of the
risk of lead exposure in rental properties. The amounts appropriated
pursuant to such appropriation may be suballocated to other state
agencies or accounts for expenditures incurred in the operation of
programs funded by such appropriation subject to the approval of the
director of the budget (59090) ... 16,816,000 .... (re. $11,810,000)
For services and expenses of United Way of Greater New York (59075)
... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $3,613,000)
For services and expenses of United Way of Greater New York (59098)
... 2,500,000 ..................................... (re. $1,764,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the Indian health
program, including Native American Health Clinics (59101) ..........
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,970,000)
For services and expenses of a maternal health grant program. Funds
appropriated herein shall not be subject to section 112 of the state
finance law, section 163 of the state finance law, or section 142 of
the economic development law (59077) ...............................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,178,000)
For services and expenses of Hispanic Federation, Inc (59103) ........
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,750,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of research and prevention, and detection of
Lyme disease and other tick-borne illnesses (29963) ................
69,400 ............................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of health promotion initiatives (26833) ....
430,000 .............................................. (re. $41,000)
For services and expenses of the Maternity and Early Childhood Founda-
tion (29915) ... 227,000 ............................ (re. $141,000)
State grants for abortion access, in order to expand capacity and
ensure access for patients. The money hereby appropriated is avail-

900 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
able for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(59053) ... 25,000,000 ............................ (re. $2,401,000)
For services and expenses related to providing nutritional services
and to provide nutritional education to pregnant women, infants, and
children, including suballocations to the department of agriculture
and markets for the farmer's market nutrition program and migrant
worker services and the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance for prenatal care assistance program activities. A portion of
these funds may be suballocated to other state agencies (26821)
26,395,000 ....................................... (re. $17,349,000)
For services and expenses of United Way of Greater New York (59075)
... 5,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,649,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of a minority male wellness and screening
program (29941) ... 26,950 ........................... (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of research and prevention, and detection of
Lyme disease and other tick-borne illnesses (29963) ................
69,400 ............................................... (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses to support grants to community health
centers and comprehensive diagnostic and treatment centers for the
purpose of furnishing primary health care services, including
outreach, health education and dental care, to migrant and seasonal
farmworkers and their families, of which no less than 70 percent
shall be dedicated to community health centers receiving federal
funding for such purpose pursuant to section 330(g) of the federal
public health service act (29944) ... 406,000 ......... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses related to providing nutritional services
and to provide nutritional education to pregnant women, infants, and
children, including suballocations to the department of agriculture
and markets for the farmer's market nutrition program and migrant
worker services and the office of temporary and disability assist-
ance for prenatal care assistance program activities. A portion of
these funds may be suballocated to other state agencies (26821) ...
26,255,000 ....................................... (re. $12,369,772)
For services and expenses of a genetic disease screening program
(26699) ... 487,000 ................................. (re. $165,000)
For services and expenses of county-wide EMS support for those coun-
ties, outside of the City of New York (59034) ......................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of social service crisis intervention
programs and providers disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19
pandemic pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the division
of the budget. A portion or all of these funds may be transferred or
suballocated to other state agencies. Provided that, notwithstanding
sections 112 and 163 of the state finance law, section 142 of the
economic development law, or any other law to the contrary, such
funds may be made available by non-competitive grant or contract in
accordance with criteria established by the commissioner of health,
subject to the approval of the director of the budget (29620) ......
13,380,000 ........................................... (re. $52,000)

901 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to public education, communication
efforts, and outreach to communities disproportionately impacted by
the COVID-19 pandemic and in communities with vaccine hesitancy
pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the division of the
budget. Funds shall be used to disseminate public information
regarding health and safety measures, warnings about risks and
hazards, and to promote vaccine confidence related to the COVID-19
pandemic. Provided that, notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the
state finance law, section 142 of the economic development law, or
any other law to the contrary, such funds may be made available by
non-competitive grant or contract in accordance with criteria estab-
lished by the commissioner of health, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget (59024) .....................................
7,500,000 ............................................ (re. $82,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the Maternity and Early Childhood Founda-
tion (29915) ... 227,000 ............................. (re. $54,000)
For services and expenses related to state grants for a program of
family planning services pursuant to article 2 of the public health
law pursuant to the following:
The Door - A Center of Alternatives (29590) ..........................
901,980 ............................................. (re. $123,000)
William F. Ryan Community Health Center (29591) ......................
571,500 .............................................. (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of social service crisis intervention
programs and providers disproportionately impacted by the COVID-19
pandemic pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the division
of the budget. A portion or all of these funds may be transferred or
suballocated to other state agencies (29620) .......................
10,000,000 .......................................... (re. $967,000)
For services and expenses related to public education, communication
efforts, and outreach to communities disproportionately impacted by
the COVID-19 pandemic and in communities with vaccine hesitancy.
Funds shall be used to disseminate public information regarding
health and safety measures, warnings about risks and hazards, and to
promote vaccine confidence related to the COVID-19 pandemic.
Provided that, notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the state
finance law, section 142 of the economic development law, or any
other law to the contrary, such funds may be made available by
noncompetitive grant or contract in accordance with criteria estab-
lished by the commissioner of health, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget (59024) .....................................
15,000,000 .......................................... (re. $593,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Education Fund
Individuals with Disabilities-Part C Account - 25214
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For activities related to a handicapped infants and toddlers program
(26837) ... 48,578,000 ........................... (re. $48,578,000)

902 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For activities related to a handicapped infants and toddlers program
(26837) ... 48,578,000 ........................... (re. $41,385,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For activities related to a handicapped infants and toddlers program
(26837) ... 48,578,000 ............................... (re. $39,536)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Block Grant Account - 25183
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services.
The commissioner of health is hereby authorized to waive any
provisions of the public health law and regulations, to issue appro-
priate operating certificates, and to enter into contracts with
article 28 facilities, to provide funds, to establish, support and
conduct projects to provide improved and expanded school health
services for preschool and schoolage children. No more than 10 per
centum of the amount appropriated for such purpose shall be expended
for services and expenses in connection with the administration and
evaluation of such grants. Grants awarded under this appropriation
shall be distributed and administered in accordance with regulations
established by the commissioner of health.
The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation may be subal-
located to other state agencies or accounts for expenditures
incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropriation
subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26989) ......
57,475,000 ....................................... (re. $57,475,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services.
The commissioner of health is hereby authorized to waive any
provisions of the public health law and regulations, to issue appro-
priate operating certificates, and to enter into contracts with
article 28 facilities, to provide funds, to establish, support and
conduct projects to provide improved and expanded school health
services for preschool and schoolage children. No more than 10 per
centum of the amount appropriated for such purpose shall be expended
for services and expenses in connection with the administration and
evaluation of such grants. Grants awarded under this appropriation
shall be distributed and administered in accordance with regulations
established by the commissioner of health.
The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation may be subal-
located to other state agencies or accounts for expenditures
incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropriation
subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26989) ......
57,475,000 ....................................... (re. $57,225,000)

903 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services.
The commissioner of health is hereby authorized to waive any
provisions of the public health law and regulations, to issue appro-
priate operating certificates, and to enter into contracts with
article 28 facilities, to provide funds, to establish, support and
conduct projects to provide improved and expanded school health
services for preschool and schoolage children. No more than 10 per
centum of the amount appropriated for such purpose shall be expended
for services and expenses in connection with the administration and
evaluation of such grants. Grants awarded under this appropriation
shall be distributed and administered in accordance with regulations
established by the commissioner of health.
The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation may be subal-
located to other state agencies or accounts for expenditures
incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropriation
subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26989) ......
57,475,000 ....................................... (re. $46,855,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services. The commissioner of health is hereby authorized to waive
any provisions of the public health law and regulations, to issue
appropriate operating certificates, and to enter into contracts with
article 28 facilities, to provide funds, to establish, support and
conduct projects to provide improved and expanded school health
services for preschool and schoolage children. No more than 10 per
centum of the amount appropriated for such purpose shall be expended
for services and expenses in connection with the administration and
evaluation of such grants. Grants awarded under this appropriation
shall be distributed and administered in accordance with regulations
established by the commissioner of health.
The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation may be subal-
located to other state agencies or accounts for expenditures
incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropriation
subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26989) ......
57,475,000 ....................................... (re. $42,831,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health, Education, and Human Services Account - 25148
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation
may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi-
tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri-
ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26988)
... 94,601,945 ................................... (re. $89,911,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:

904 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation
may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi-
tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri-
ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26988)
... 94,601,945 ................................... (re. $78,178,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation
may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi-
tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri-
ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26988)
... 94,601,945 ................................... (re. $74,208,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment
services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation
may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi-
tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri-
ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26988)
... 46,815,000 ................................... (re. $21,272,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Child and Adult Care Food Account - 25022
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued. The state comptroller is hereby authorized to
receive funds from the Department of Health that were returned in
the current fiscal year in respect of a settlement of local assist-
ance funds from prior fiscal years and is authorized to refund such
moneys to the credit of the Child and Adult Care Food Account of the
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund for the purpose of
reimbursing the 2025-26 appropriation. (26985) .....................
326,294,000 ..................................... (re. $326,294,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26985) ... 326,294,000 ....... (re. $57,743,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26985) ... 326,294,000 ....... (re. $66,489,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:

905 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26985) ... 326,294,000 ....... (re. $88,261,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26985) ... 326,294,000 ...... (re. $132,313,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 3, of the laws of 2020:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26985) ... 253,694,000 ....... (re. $78,483,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26985) ... 253,694,000 ...... (re. $126,594,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund
Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26986) ... 556,970,000 ...... (re. $524,721,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26986) ... 556,970,000 ....... (re. $29,107,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26986) ... 556,970,000 ........ (re. $9,935,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26986) ... 556,970,000 ...... (re. $114,769,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26986) ... 502,970,000 ....... (re. $61,177,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 3, of the laws of 2020:

906 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For various federal food and nutritional services. The moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for payment of financial assistance
heretofore accrued (26986) ... 502,970,000 ...... (re. $164,711,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
New York State Prostate and Testicular Cancer Research and Education
Account - 20183
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For prostate cancer research, detection and education pursuant to
chapter 273 of the laws of 2004 (26813) ............................
840,000 ............................................. (re. $731,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For prostate cancer research, detection and education pursuant to
chapter 273 of the laws of 2004 (26813) ............................
840,000 ............................................. (re. $389,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
New York State Women's Cancers Education and Prevention Account -
20206
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For women's cancer prevention and education pursuant to section
97-llll of state finance law as added by chapter 420 of the laws of
2015 (26786) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Cure Childhood Cancer Research Account - 23802
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to childhood cancer research pursu-
ant to section 404-cc of the vehicle and traffic law and section
99-z of the state finance law, as added by chapter 443 of the laws
of 2016 (26783) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Gifts to Food Banks Account - 23808
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to food bank gifts pursuant to
section 82 of state finance law. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, amounts appropriated herein may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health for expenses related to
food bank gifts (29619) ... 500,000 ................. (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:

907 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to food bank gifts pursuant to
section 82 of state finance law. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, amounts appropriated herein may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health for expenses related to
food bank gifts (29619) ... 500,000 ................. (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to food bank gifts pursuant to
section 82 of state finance law. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, amounts appropriated herein may be transferred
or suballocated to the department of health for expenses related to
food bank gifts (29619) ... 500,000 ................. (re. $500,000)
CENTER FOR ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the water supply protection
program (29813) ... 5,017,000 ..................... (re. $3,417,000)
For services and expenses of the healthy neighborhood program (29893)
... 1,495,000 ....................................... (re. $116,000)
For services and expenses related to programs for the reduction of the
risk of lead exposure in rental properties. The amounts appropriated
pursuant to such appropriation may be suballocated to other state
agencies or accounts for expenditures incurred in the operation of
programs funded by such appropriation subject to the approval of the
director of the budget (59090) ... 16,816,000 .... (re. $11,810,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the healthy neighborhood program (29893)
... 1,495,000 ....................................... (re. $109,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the healthy neighborhood program (29893)
... 1,495,000 ....................................... (re. $146,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the healthy neighborhood program (29893)
... 1,495,000 ....................................... (re. $263,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the healthy neighborhood program (29893)
... 1,495,000 ........................................ (re. $56,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 3, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of the healthy neighborhood program. All or
a portion of this appropriation may be reduced, transferred, or
interchanged to the federal health and human services fund chil-
dren's health insurance account for services and expenditures for

908 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
health services initiatives for improving the health of children,
including targeted low-income children and other low-income chil-
dren, as permitted under clause ii of subparagraph D of paragraph 1
of subsection a of section 2105 of the social security act and
defined in the regulations at 42 CFR 457.10. Such reduction, trans-
fer, and or interchange shall be in accordance with an approved
state plan amendment submitted by the commissioner of health and
approved by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services
(29893) ... 1,495,000 ................................ (re. $41,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Block Grant Account - 25183
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of various health prevention, diagnostic,
detection and treatment services (26991) ...........................
5,797,000 ......................................... (re. $5,797,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of various health prevention, diagnostic,
detection and treatment services (26991) ...........................
4,487,000 ......................................... (re. $4,487,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of various health prevention, diagnostic,
detection and treatment services (26991) ...........................
4,487,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of various health prevention, diagnostic,
detection and treatment services (26991) ...........................
4,487,000 ......................................... (re. $1,747,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Environmental Protection Agency Grants Account - 25467
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For various environmental projects including suballocation for the
department of environmental conservation (26992) ...................
85,440,000 ....................................... (re. $85,440,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For various environmental projects including suballocation for the
department of environmental conservation (26992) ...................
85,440,000 ....................................... (re. $85,440,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For various environmental projects including suballocation for the
department of environmental conservation (26992) ...................
1,740,000 ......................................... (re. $1,740,000)

909 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For various environmental projects including suballocation for the
department of environmental conservation (26992) ...................
1,740,000 ......................................... (re. $1,421,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Occupational Health Clinics Account - 22177
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of implementing and operating a statewide
network of occupational health clinics for diagnostic, screening,
treatment, referral, and education services (26844) ................
9,560,000 ......................................... (re. $9,349,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of implementing and operating a statewide
network of occupational health clinics for diagnostic, screening,
treatment, referral, and education services (26844) ................
9,560,000 ......................................... (re. $2,930,000)
For additional services and expenses of implementing and operating a
statewide network of occupational health clinics for diagnostic,
screening, treatment, referral, and education services .............
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
CHILD HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Children's Health Insurance Account - 25148
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to
appropriations of the office of temporary and disability assistance,
for the reimbursement of local district administrative costs related
to children newly enrolled in medicaid whose household income is
between 100 percent and 133 percent of the federal poverty level.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
For services and expenses related to the children's health insurance
program, pursuant to title XXI of the federal social security act
(26931) ... 1,550,268,000 ..................... (re. $1,550,268,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to

910 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriations of the office of temporary and disability assistance,
for the reimbursement of local district administrative costs related
to children newly enrolled in medicaid whose household income is
between 100 percent and 133 percent of the federal poverty level.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
For services and expenses related to the children's health insurance
program, pursuant to title XXI of the federal social security act
(26931) ... 1,537,954,000 ....................... (re. $584,337,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to
appropriations of the office of temporary and disability assistance,
for the reimbursement of local district administrative costs related
to children newly enrolled in medicaid whose household income is
between 100 percent and 133 percent of the federal poverty level.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
For services and expenses related to the children's health insurance
program, pursuant to title XXI of the federal social security act
(26931) ... 1,764,098,000 ......................... (re. $7,456,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to
appropriations of the office of temporary and disability assistance,
for the reimbursement of local district administrative costs related
to children newly enrolled in medicaid whose household income is
between 100 percent and 133 percent of the federal poverty level.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
For services and expenses related to the children's health insurance
program, pursuant to title XXI of the federal social security act
(26931) ... 1,764,098,000 ....................... (re. $256,210,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
Children's Health Insurance Account - 20810
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to

911 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriations of the office of temporary and disability assistance,
for the reimbursement of local district administrative costs related
to children newly enrolled in medicaid whose household income is
between 100 percent and 133 percent of the federal poverty level.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
For services and expenses related to the children's health insurance
program authorized pursuant to title 1-A of article 25 of the public
health law (26931) ... 1,312,385,000 ............ (re. $612,977,000)
ELDERLY PHARMACEUTICAL INSURANCE COVERAGE PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
EPIC Premium Account - 20818
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the program for elderly pharmaceutical
insurance coverage, including reimbursement to pharmacies partic-
ipating in such program.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for payment of
financial assistance heretofore accrued (26803) ....................
93,217,000 ....................................... (re. $93,217,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the program for elderly pharmaceutical
insurance coverage, including reimbursement to pharmacies partic-
ipating in such program.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for payment of
financial assistance heretofore accrued (26803) ....................
93,217,000 ....................................... (re. $47,827,000)
ESSENTIAL PLAN PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program, as
authorized by Sections 1331 and 1332 of the federal patient
protection and affordable care act, and as defined under sections
369-gg and 369-ii of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the moneys
hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer with any appropriation of the department of health, or for
transfer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.

912 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program, as
authorized by Sections 1331 or and 1332 of the federal patient
protection and affordable care act, and as defined under sections
369-gg or and 369-ii of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the moneys
hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer with any appropriation of the department of health or for
transfer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program, as
authorized by Sections 1331 or and 1332 of the federal patient
protection and affordable care act, and as defined under sections
369-gg or and 369-ii of the social services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the moneys
hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer with any appropriation of the department of health or for
transfer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
386,218,000 ..................................... (re. $382,966,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program,
including for contribution to the essential plan trust fund for the
purpose of reducing the premiums and cost-sharing of, or providing
benefits for, eligible individuals enrolled in the essential plan
program authorized pursuant to section 369-gg of the social services
law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the moneys
hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer with any appropriation of the department of health or for
transfer to health research incorporated (HRI).

913 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
386,218,000 ..................................... (re. $386,218,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program,
including for contribution to the essential plan trust fund for the
purpose of reducing the premiums and cost-sharing of, or providing
benefits for, eligible individuals enrolled in the essential plan
program authorized pursuant to section 369-gg of the social services
law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the moneys
hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer with any appropriation of the department of health or for
transfer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
386,218,000 ..................................... (re. $386,218,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Essential Plan Account - 25184
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program. For
contribution to the essential plan trust fund for providing benefits
for, eligible individuals enrolled in the basic health program
pursuant to section 1331 of the federal patient protection and
affordable care act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans-
fer with any appropriation of the department of health, or for
transfer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $701,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program. For
contribution to the essential plan trust fund for providing benefits
for, eligible individuals enrolled in the basic health program

914 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
pursuant to section 1331 of the federal patient protection and
affordable care act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans-
fer with any appropriation of the department of health or for trans-
fer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $62,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any other
provision of law to the contrary, the sum of $1,995,289,000 for
purposes herein is available for obligations incurred on or prior to
March 31, 2026, and available for expenditure until September 15,
2027.
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program. For
contribution to the essential plan trust fund for providing benefits
for, eligible individuals enrolled in the basic health program
pursuant to section 1331 of the federal patient protection and
affordable care act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans-
fer with any appropriation of the department of health.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (26940) ..........................
6,087,552,000 ................................. (re. $1,995,289,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Essential Plan Account - 25186
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program, in
accordance State Innovation Waiver provisions authorized by Section
1332 of the federal patient protection and affordable care act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans-
fer with any appropriation of the department of health or for trans-
fer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.

915 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (59054) ..........................
13,097,000,000 ................................ (re. $6,682,255,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the essential plan program, in
accordance State Innovation Waiver provisions authorized by Section
1332 of the federal patient protection and affordable care act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans-
fer with any appropriation of the department of health or for trans-
fer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowances.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued (59054) ..........................
2,500,000,000 ................................. (re. $2,500,000,000)
HEALTH CARE REFORM ACT PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
HCRA Program Account - 20807
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For transfer to the Roswell Park Cancer Institute including support
for the operating costs for cancer research (29882) ................
55,463,000 ....................................... (re. $13,866,000)
For services and expenses of the physician loan repayment and physi-
cian practice support programs pursuant to subdivisions 5-a and 12
of section 2807-m of the public health law (29886) .................
15,865,000 ....................................... (re. $15,865,000)
For services and expenses related to physician workforce studies
pursuant to subdivision 5-a of section 2807-m of the public health
law (29884) ... 487,000 ............................. (re. $244,000)
For services and expenses of the nurse loan repayment program pursuant
to section 2807-aa of the public health law (59035) ................
3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the New York State Workforce
Innovation Center (59031) ... 10,000,000 .......... (re. $9,628,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, rule or regulation
to the contrary, funds hereby appropriated shall be made available
for excess insurance coverage or equivalent excess coverage for
physicians or dentists that is eligible to be paid for from funds
available in the hospital excess liability pool.
For suballocation to the department of financial services for services
and expenses related to the physicians excess medical malpractice
program. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to state
operations appropriations (29881) ..................................
78,500,000 ....................................... (re. $39,250,000)

916 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For transfer to health research incorporated (HRI) for the AIDS drug
assistance program (29880) ... 41,050,000 ........ (re. $41,050,000)
For state grants for rural health care access and network development
(29597) ... 9,410,000 ............................. (re. $7,537,000)
For services and expenses, including grants, related to emergency
assistance distributions as designated by the commissioner of
health. Notwithstanding section 112 or 163 of the state finance law
or any other contrary provision of law, such distributions shall be
limited to providers or programs where, as determined by the commis-
sioner of health, emergency assistance is vital to protect the life
or safety of patients, to ensure the retention of facility caregiv-
ers or other staff, or in instances where health facility operations
are jeopardized, or where the public health is jeopardized or other
emergency situations exist (29874) .................................
2,900,000 ......................................... (re. $2,900,000)
For transfer to the pool administrator for distributions related to
school based health clinics (29873) ................................
4,230,000 ......................................... (re. $4,230,000)
For services and expenses related to school based health centers. The
total amount of funds provided herein shall be distributed to
school-based health center providers based on the ratio of each
provider's total enrollment for all sites to the total enrollment of
all providers. This formula shall be applied to the total amount
made available herein, provided, however, that notwithstanding any
contrary provision of law, the commissioner of health may establish
minimum and maximum awards for providers (29867) ...................
2,115,000 ......................................... (re. $2,115,000)
For transfer to the pool administrator for state grants for poison
control centers. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred
to state operations appropriations (29870) .........................
2,400,000 ......................................... (re. $2,400,000)
For payments to eligible diagnostic and treatment centers under the
clinic safety net program (29866) ..................................
54,400,000 ....................................... (re. $54,400,000)
For the purpose of supporting the New York state medical indemnity
fund established pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011 (29736)
211,000,000 ..................................... (re. $211,000,000)
The appropriations made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025,
are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of Area Health Education Centers (AHEC) as
awarded to and [adminstered]administered by the Research Foundation
for the State University of New York on behalf of the University at
Buffalo (29877) ... 2,200,000 ..................... (re. $2,200,000)
For services and expenses of the [diversity in
medicine/postbaccalaureate program] Associated Medical Schools of
New York Scholars in Medicine and Science pursuant to subdivision
5-a of section 2807-m of the public health law (29883) .............
1,244,000 ......................................... (re. $1,244,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:

917 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services, expenses, grants and transfers necessary to implement
the health care reform act program in accordance with sections
2807-j, 2807-k, 2807-l, 2807-m, 2807-p, 2807-s and 2807-v of the
public health law. The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available
for payments heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby appro-
priated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer
with any appropriation of the department of health or by transfer or
suballocation to any appropriation of the department of financial
services, the office of mental health, office for people with devel-
opmental disabilities and the state office for the aging subject to
the approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and control and copies thereof
with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman
of the assembly ways and means committee. With the approval of the
director of the budget, up to 5 percent of this appropriation may be
used for state operations purposes. At the direction of the director
of the budget, funds may also be transferred directly to the general
fund for the purpose of repaying a draw on the tobacco revenue guar-
antee fund.
For transfer to the pool administrator for the purposes of making
empire clinical research investigator program (ECRIP) payments .....
3,445,000 ......................................... (re. $3,445,000)
For services and expenses of the physician loan repayment and physi-
cian practice support programs pursuant to subdivisions 5-a and 12
of section 2807-m of the public health law (29886) .................
15,865,000 ....................................... (re. $11,626,000)
For services and expenses of the nurse loan repayment program pursuant
to section 2807-aa of the public health law (59035) ................
3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,052,000)
For services and expenses related to the New York State Workforce
Innovation Center (59031) ... 10,000,000 .......... (re. $9,814,000)
For transfer to health research incorporated (HRI) for the AIDS drug
assistance program (29880) ... 41,050,000 ........ (re. $41,050,000)
For state grants for rural health care access and network development
(29597) ... 9,410,000 ............................. (re. $1,056,000)
For services and expenses, including grants, related to emergency
assistance distributions as designated by the commissioner of
health. Notwithstanding section 112 or 163 of the state finance law
or any other contrary provision of law, such distributions shall be
limited to providers or programs where, as determined by the commis-
sioner of health, emergency assistance is vital to protect the life
or safety of patients, to ensure the retention of facility caregiv-
ers or other staff, or in instances where health facility operations
are jeopardized, or where the public health is jeopardized or other
emergency situations exist (29874) .................................
2,900,000 ......................................... (re. $2,900,000)
For transfer to the pool administrator for state grants for poison
control centers. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred
to state operations appropriations (29870) .........................
2,400,000 ........................................... (re. $701,000)

918 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For state grants to improve access to infertility services, treat-
ments, and procedures (29868) ......................................
1,911,000 ......................................... (re. $1,232,000)
The appropriations made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2024,
are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of Area Health Education Centers (AHEC) as
awarded to and [adminstered]administered by the Research Foundation
for the State University of New York on behalf of the University at
Buffalo (29877) ... 2,200,000 ....................... (re. $333,000)
For services and expenses of the [diversity in
medicine/postbaccalaureate program] Associated Medical Schools of
New York Scholars in Medicine and Science pursuant to subdivision
5-a of section 2807-m of the public health law (29883) .............
1,244,000 ......................................... (re. $1,045,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services, expenses, grants and transfers necessary to implement
the health care reform act program in accordance with sections
2807-j, 2807-k, 2807-l, 2807-m, 2807-p, 2807-s and 2807-v of the
public health law. The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available
for payments heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby appro-
priated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer
with any appropriation of the department of health or by transfer or
suballocation to any appropriation of the department of financial
services, the office of mental health, office for people with devel-
opmental disabilities and the state office for the aging subject to
the approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and control and copies thereof
with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman
of the assembly ways and means committee. With the approval of the
director of the budget, up to 5 percent of this appropriation may be
used for state operations purposes. At the direction of the director
of the budget, funds may also be transferred directly to the general
fund for the purpose of repaying a draw on the tobacco revenue guar-
antee fund.
For transfer to the pool administrator for the purposes of making
empire clinical research investigator program (ECRIP) payments .....
3,445,000 ......................................... (re. $3,445,000)
For services and expenses of the physician loan repayment and physi-
cian practice support programs pursuant to subdivisions 5-a and 12
of section 2807-m of the public health law (29886) .................
15,865,000 ....................................... (re. $11,516,000)
For services and expenses related to the New York State Workforce
Innovation Center (59031) ... 10,000,000 .......... (re. $9,515,000)
For transfer to health research incorporated (HRI) for the AIDS drug
assistance program (29880) ... 41,050,000 ........... (re. $519,000)
For transfer to the pool administrator for state grants for poison
control centers. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred
to state operations appropriations (29870) .........................
2,400,000 ........................................... (re. $701,000)

919 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For transfer to the dormitory authority of the state of New York for
the health facility restructuring program (29865) ..................
19,600,000 ....................................... (re. $19,600,000)
For state grants to improve access to infertility services, treat-
ments, and procedures (29868) ......................................
1,911,000 ......................................... (re. $1,224,000)
For the purpose of supporting the New York state medical indemnity
fund established pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011 (29736)
... 52,000,000 ................................... (re. $52,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of Area Health Education Centers (AHEC)
(29877) ... 2,200,000 ............................... (re. $234,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
HCRA Transition Account - 20808
By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 54,
section 1, of the laws of 2006:
For services, expenses, grants and transfers necessary to continue
existing or planned contracts or other financing arrangements for
the purposes of implementing the health care reform act program in
accordance with section 2807-j, 2807-k, 2807-l, 2807-m, 2807-s, and
2807-v of the public health law and utilizing allocations authorized
prior to July 1, 2005. The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
available for payments heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans-
fer with any appropriation of the department of health or by trans-
fer or suballocation to any appropriation of the department of
insurance, the office of mental health or the state office for the
aging subject to the approval of the director of the budget, who
shall file such approval with the department of audit and control
and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee
and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee (29864)
... 600,000,000 ................................. (re. $272,417,000)
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriations made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025,
are hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For reimbursement of local administrative expenses for medical assist-
ance programs and for state administration of medical assistance
programs, notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law, to
include the performance of eligibility and enrollment determinations
by the state or third-party entities designated by the state to
perform such services.

920 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, subject to the
approval of the director of budget, up to $23,000,000 of the amount
appropriated herein shall be available for the purpose of providing
payments to local social services districts for medical assistance
administration claims that exceed an administrative ceiling estab-
lished by the commissioner of health.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of budget, moneys hereby appropriated may
be increased or decreased by transfer or interchange between these
appropriated amounts and appropriations of the medical assistance
administration program, the medical assistance program, and the
office of health insurance programs. Funding authority from this
account used for state administration of the medical assistance
program may be transferred to state operations appropriations within
the aforementioned programs at amounts agreed upon by the commis-
sioner of health, and the New York state division of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, subject to federal approval, department of
health state funds medicaid spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities operated by the office of
mental health, the office for people with developmental disabilities
and the office of addiction services and supports and further
excluding any payments which are not appropriated within the depart-
ment of health, in the aggregate, for the period April 1, 2025
through [March 31, 2026]September 15, 2026, shall not exceed
$33,417,285,000 except as provided below provided, however, such
aggregate limits may be adjusted by the director of the budget to
account for any changes in the New York state federal medical
assistance percentage amount established pursuant to the federal
social security act, increases in provider revenues, reductions in
local social services district payments for medical assistance
administration, minimum wage increases, and beginning April 1, 2012
the operational costs of the New York state medical indemnity fund,
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and state costs or
savings from the essential plan program. Such projections may be
adjusted by the director of the budget to account for increased or
expedited department of health state funds medicaid expenditures as
a result of a natural or other type of disaster, including a govern-
mental declaration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation with the commissioner of
health, shall assess on a quarterly basis known and projected medi-
caid expenditures by category of service and by geographic region,
as determined by the commissioner of health, incurred both prior to
and subsequent to such assessment for each such period, and if the
director of the budget determines that such expenditures are
expected to cause medicaid spending for such period to exceed the
aggregate limit specified herein for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the director of the budget and the
commissioner of health, shall develop a medicaid savings allocation
adjustment to limit such spending to the aggregate limit specified
herein for such period.

921 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment shall be designed, to
reduce the expenditures authorized by the appropriations herein in
compliance with the following guidelines: (1) reductions shall be
made in compliance with applicable federal law, including the
provisions of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation
Act of 2010, Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively "Affordable Care
Act") and any subsequent amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be made in a manner that
complies with the state medicaid plan approved by the federal
centers for medicare and medicaid services, provided, however, that
the commissioner of health is authorized to submit any state plan
amendment or seek other federal approval, including waiver authori-
ty, to implement the provisions of the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment that meets the other criteria set forth herein; (3)
reductions shall be made in a manner that maximizes federal finan-
cial participation, to the extent practicable, including any federal
financial participation that is available or is reasonably expected
to become available, in the discretion of the commissioner, under
the Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall be made uniformly
among categories of services and geographic regions of the state, to
the extent practicable, and shall be made uniformly within a catego-
ry of service, to the extent practicable, except where the commis-
sioner determines that there are sufficient grounds for non-uniform-
ity, including but not limited to: the extent to which specific
categories of services contributed to department of health medicaid
state funds spending in excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in underserved communities; or
the potential benefits of pursuing innovative payment models contem-
plated by the Affordable Care Act, in which case such grounds shall
be set forth in the medicaid savings allocation adjustment; and (5)
reductions shall be made in a manner that does not unnecessarily
create administrative burdens to medicaid applicants and recipients
or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the legislature, as well as
organizations representing health care providers, consumers, busi-
nesses, workers, health insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings allocation adjustment, to
the extent that all or part of such adjustment, in the discretion of
the commissioner, is likely to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of service or particular
geographic regions of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment on the department of health's website and shall provide
written copies of such adjustment to the chairs of the senate
finance and the assembly ways and means committees at least 30 days
before the date on which implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment subsequent to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new notice pursuant to subpar-
agraph (i) of this paragraph only if the commissioner determines, in

922 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
his or her discretion, that such revisions materially alter the
adjustment.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subdivision, the commissioner need not seek the input described in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision or provide notice pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision if, in the discretion of the
commissioner, expedited development and implementation of a medicaid
savings allocation adjustment is necessary due to a public health
emergency.
For purposes of this section, a public health emergency is defined as:
(i) a disaster, natural or otherwise, that significantly increases
the immediate need for health care personnel in an area of the
state; (ii) an event or condition that creates a widespread risk of
exposure to a serious communicable disease, or the potential for
such widespread risk of exposure; or (iii) any other event or condi-
tion determined by the commissioner to constitute an imminent threat
to public health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to prevent all or part of
such medicaid savings allocation adjustment from taking effect
retroactively to the extent permitted by the federal centers for
medicare and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings allocation adjustment, the
commissioner of the department of health shall reduce department of
health state funds medicaid spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including, but not limited to modify-
ing or suspending reimbursement methods, including but not limited
to all fees, premium levels and rates of payment, notwithstanding
any provision of law that sets a specific amount or methodology for
any such payments or rates of payment; modifying medicaid program
benefits; seeking all necessary federal approvals, including, but
not limited to waivers, waiver amendments; and suspending time
frames for notice, approval or certification of rate requirements,
notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, including but not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of the
public health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the laws of 1988, and
18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a quarterly report that sets
forth: (a) known and projected department of health medicaid expend-
itures as described in subdivision (1) of this section, and factors
that could result in medicaid disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected department of health state funds
disbursements in the enacted budget financial plan pursuant to
subdivision 3 of section 23 of the state finance law, including
spending increases or decreases due to: enrollment fluctuations,
rate changes, utilization changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and variations in offline medicaid
payments; and (b) the actions taken to implement any medicaid
savings allocation adjustment implemented pursuant to subdivision
(4) of this section, including information concerning the impact of
such actions on each category of service and each geographic region
of the state. Each such quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means commit-

923 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tees and shall be posted on the department of health's website in a
timely manner.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities
heretofore and hereafter accrued and shall be available to the
department net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and cred-
its.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer, with
any appropriation of the department of health, and may be increased
or decreased by transfer or suballocation between these appropriated
amounts and appropriations of the office of mental health, the
office for people with developmental disabilities, the office of
addiction services and supports, the department of family assistance
office of temporary and disability assistance, the department of
corrections and community supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university of New York, the state
office for the aging, the office of the medicaid inspector general,
the state education department, and office of children and family
services with the approval of the director of the budget, who shall
file such approval with the department of audit and control and
copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner of temporary and disability assistance or the
state commissioner of health as due from local social services
districts each month as their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law may be set aside by the
state comptroller in an interest-bearing account in order to ensure
the orderly and prompt payment of providers under section 367-b of
the social services law pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local social services district's
share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social
services law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26963) ... 545,050,000 ......................... (re. $545,050,000)
For contractual services related to medical necessity and quality of
care reviews related to medicaid patients. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, all or part of this appropriation may
be transferred to the health care standards and surveillance
program, general fund - local assistance account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering

924 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29863) ... 3,700,000 ............................. (re. $3,700,000)
The amount appropriated herein, together with any federal matching
funds obtained, may be available to the department, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, for contractual services
related to a third party entity responsible for education of persons
eligible for medical assistance regarding their options for enroll-
ment in managed care plans. Subject to the approval of the director
of the budget, all or a part of this appropriation may be trans-
ferred to the office of managed care, general fund - state purposes
account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29777) ... 132,800,000 ......................... (re. $132,800,000)
For state reimbursement of administrative expenses for the medical
assistance program provided by the office of mental health, office
for people with developmental disabilities and office of addiction
services and supports.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation of the department of health with the approval of the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26995) ... 90,000,000 ........................... (re. $90,000,000)
For payments and expenses related to the global hospital budget initi-
ative:
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation of the department of health with the approval of the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(59130) ... 275,000,000 ......................... (re. $275,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Medicaid Administration Transfer Account - 25107

925 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For reimbursement of local administrative expenses of medical assist-
ance programs and for state administration of medical assistance
programs provided pursuant to title XIX of the federal social secu-
rity act or its successor program. Notwithstanding section 153 of
the social services law, to include the performance of eligibility
and enrollment determinations by the state or third-party entities
designated by the state to perform such services.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of budget, moneys hereby appropriated may
be increased or decreased by transfer or interchange between these
appropriated amounts and appropriations of the medical assistance
administration program, the medical assistance program, and the
office of health insurance programs. Funding authority from this
account used for state administration of the medical assistance
program may be transferred to state operations appropriations within
the aforementioned programs at amounts agreed upon by the commis-
sioner of health, and the New York state division of the budget.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities
heretofore and hereafter accrued and shall be available to the
department net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and cred-
its.
The amounts appropriated herein may be available for costs associated
with a common benefit identification card, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, these funds may be trans-
ferred to the credit of the state operations account medicaid
management information systems program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro-
priation of the department of health, and may be increased or
decreased by transfer or suballocation between these appropriated
amounts and appropriations of the office of mental health, the
office for people with developmental disabilities, the office of
addiction services and supports, the department of family assist-
ance, office of temporary and disability assistance, the department
of corrections and community supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university of New York, the state
office for the aging, the office of the medicaid inspector general,
the state education department, and office of children and family
services with the approval of the director of the budget, who shall
file such approval with the department of audit and control and
copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner of temporary and disability assistance or the
state commissioner of health as due from local social services
districts each month as their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law may be set aside by the

926 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state comptroller in an interest-bearing account in order to ensure
the orderly and prompt payment of providers under section 367-b of
the social services law pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local social services district's
share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social
services law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26993) ... 630,650,000 ......................... (re. $630,650,000)
For reimbursement of administrative expenses of the medical assistance
program provided by the office of mental health, office for people
with developmental disabilities, and office of addiction services
and supports provided pursuant to title XIX of the federal social
security act. The money hereby appropriated is available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation
of the department of health with the approval of the director of
budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26994) ... 90,000,000 ........................... (re. $90,000,000)
For payments and expenses related to the global hospital budget initi-
ative:
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto-
fore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other
appropriation of the department of health with the approval of the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(59130) ... 275,000,000 ......................... (re. $275,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For reimbursement of local administrative expenses of medical assist-
ance programs and for state administration of medical assistance
programs provided pursuant to title XIX of the federal social secu-
rity act or its successor program. Notwithstanding section 153 of
the social services law, to include the performance of eligibility
and enrollment determinations by the state or third-party entities
designated by the state to perform such services.

927 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of budget, moneys hereby appropriated may
be increased or decreased by transfer or interchange between these
appropriated amounts and appropriations of the medical assistance
administration program, the medical assistance program, and the
office of health insurance programs. Funding authority from this
account used for state administration of the medical assistance
program may be transferred to state operations appropriations within
the aforementioned programs at amounts agreed upon by the commis-
sioner of health, and the New York state division of the budget.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities
heretofore and hereafter accrued and shall be available to the
department net of disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, and cred-
its.
The amounts appropriated herein may be available for costs associated
with a common benefit identification card, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, these funds may be trans-
ferred to the credit of the state operations account medicaid
management information systems program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro-
priation of the department of health, and may be increased or
decreased by transfer or suballocation between these appropriated
amounts and appropriations of the office of mental health, the
office for people with developmental disabilities, the office of
addiction services and supports, the department of family assist-
ance, office of temporary and disability assistance, the department
of corrections and community supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university of New York, the state
office for the aging, the office of the medicaid inspector general,
the state education department, and office of children and family
services with the approval of the director of the budget, who shall
file such approval with the department of audit and control and
copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner of temporary and disability assistance or the
state commissioner of health as due from local social services
districts each month as their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law may be set aside by the
state comptroller in an interest-bearing account in order to ensure
the orderly and prompt payment of providers under section 367-b of
the social services law pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local social services district's
share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social
services law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and

928 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26993) ... 630,650,000 ......................... (re. $630,650,000)
For reimbursement of administrative expenses of the medical assistance
program provided by the office of mental health, office for people
with developmental disabilities, and office of addiction services
and supports provided pursuant to title XIX of the federal social
security act. The money hereby appropriated is available for payment
of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation
of the department of health with the approval of the director of
budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26994) ... 90,000,000 ........................... (re. $90,000,000)
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For the medical assistance program, including administrative expenses,
for local social services districts, and for medical care rates for
authorized child care agencies.
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, subject to federal approval, department of
health state funds medicaid spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities operated by the office of
mental health, the office for people with developmental disabilities
and the office of addiction services and supports and further
excluding any payments which are not appropriated within the depart-
ment of health, in the aggregate, for the period April 1, 2025
through [March 31, 2026]September 15, 2026, shall not exceed
$33,417,285,000 except as provided below provided, however, such
aggregate limits may be adjusted by the director of the budget to
account for any changes in the New York state federal medical
assistance percentage amount established pursuant to the federal
social security act, increases in provider revenues, reductions in
local social services district payments for medical assistance
administration, minimum wage increases, and beginning April 1, 2012
the operational costs of the New York state medical indemnity fund,
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and state costs or
savings from the essential plan program. Such projections may be
adjusted by the director of the budget to account for increased or

929 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
expedited department of health state funds medicaid expenditures as
a result of a natural or other type of disaster, including a govern-
mental declaration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation with the commissioner of
health, shall assess on a quarterly basis known and projected medi-
caid expenditures by category of service and by geographic region,
as defined by the commissioner, incurred both prior to and subse-
quent to such assessment for each such period, and if the director
of the budget determines that such expenditures are expected to
cause medicaid spending for such period to exceed the aggregate
limit specified herein for such period, the state medicaid director,
in consultation with the director of the budget and the commissioner
of health, shall develop a medicaid savings allocation adjustment to
limit such spending to the aggregate limit specified herein for such
period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment shall be designed, to
reduce the expenditures authorized by the appropriations herein in
compliance with the following guidelines: (1) reductions shall be
made in compliance with applicable federal law, including the
provisions of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation
Act of 2010, Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively "Affordable Care
Act") and any subsequent amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be made in a manner that
complies with the state medicaid plan approved by the federal
centers for medicare and medicaid services, provided, however, that
the commissioner of health is authorized to submit any state plan
amendment or seek other federal approval, including waiver authori-
ty, to implement the provisions of the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment that meets the other criteria set forth herein; (3)
reductions shall be made in a manner that maximizes federal finan-
cial participation, to the extent practicable, including any federal
financial participation that is available or is reasonably expected
to become available, in the discretion of the commissioner, under
the Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall be made uniformly
among categories of services and geographic regions of the state, to
the extent practicable, and shall be made uniformly within a catego-
ry of service, to the extent practicable, except where the commis-
sioner determines that there are sufficient grounds for non-uniform-
ity, including but not limited to: the extent to which specific
categories of services contributed to department of health medicaid
state funds spending in excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in underserved communities; or
the potential benefits of pursuing innovative payment models contem-
plated by the Affordable Care Act, in which case such grounds shall
be set forth in the medicaid savings allocation adjustment; and (5)
reductions shall be made in a manner that does not unnecessarily
create administrative burdens to medicaid applicants and recipients
or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the legislature, as well as
organizations representing health care providers, consumers, busi-
nesses, workers, health insurers, and others with relevant exper-

930 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tise, in developing such medicaid savings allocation adjustment, to
the extent that all or part of such adjustment, in the discretion of
the commissioner, is likely to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of service or particular
geographic regions of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment on the department of health's website and shall provide
written copies of such adjustment to the chairs of the senate
finance and the assembly ways and means committees at least 30 days
before the date on which implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment subsequent to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new notice pursuant to subpar-
agraph (i) of this paragraph only if the commissioner determines, in
his or her discretion, that such revisions materially alter the
adjustment.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subdivision, the commissioner need not seek the input described in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision or provide notice pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision if, in the discretion of the
commissioner, expedited development and implementation of a medicaid
savings allocation adjustment is necessary due to a public health
emergency.
For purposes of this section, a public health emergency is defined as:
(i) a disaster, natural or otherwise, that significantly increases
the immediate need for health care personnel in an area of the
state; (ii) an event or condition that creates a widespread risk of
exposure to a serious communicable disease, or the potential for
such widespread risk of exposure; or (iii) any other event or condi-
tion determined by the commissioner to constitute an imminent threat
to public health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to prevent all or part of
such medicaid savings allocation adjustment from taking effect
retroactively to the extent permitted by the federal centers for
medicare and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings allocation adjustment, the
commissioner of the department of health shall reduce department of
health state funds medicaid spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including, but not limited to modify-
ing or suspending reimbursement methods, including but not limited
to all fees, premium levels and rates of payment, notwithstanding
any provision of law that sets a specific amount or methodology for
any such payments or rates of payment; modifying or discontinuing
medicaid program benefits; seeking all necessary federal approvals,
including, but not limited to waivers, waiver amendments; and
suspending time frames for notice, approval or certification of rate
requirements, notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, including but not limited to sections 2807
and 3614 of the public health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the
laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a quarterly report that sets
forth: (a) known and projected department of health medicaid expend-

931 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
itures as described in subdivision (1) of this section, and factors
that could result in medicaid disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected department of health state funds
disbursements in the enacted budget financial plan pursuant to
subdivision 3 of section 23 of the state finance law, including
spending increases or decreases due to: enrollment fluctuations,
rate changes, utilization changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and variations in offline medicaid
payments; and (b) the actions taken to implement any medicaid
savings allocation adjustment implemented pursuant to subdivision
(4) of this section, including information concerning the impact of
such actions on each category of service and each geographic region
of the state. Each such quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means commit-
tees and shall be posted on the department of health's website in a
timely manner.
The money hereby appropriated is to be available for payment of aid
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued to municipalities, and to
providers of medical services pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law, and for payment of state aid to municipalities
and to providers of family care where payment systems through the
fiscal intermediaries are not operational.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
funds may be used by the department for outside legal assistance on
issues involving the federal government, the conduct of preadmission
screening and annual resident reviews required by the state's medi-
caid program, computer matching with insurance carriers to insure
that medicaid is the payer of last resort and activities related to
the management of the pharmacy benefit available under the medicaid
program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner of temporary and disability assistance or the
state commissioner of health as due from local social services
districts each month as their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law may be set aside by the
state comptroller in an interest-bearing account in order to ensure
the orderly and prompt payment of providers under section 367-b of
the social services law pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local social services district's
share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social
services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funding made avail-
able by these appropriations shall support direct salary costs and
related fringe benefits within the medical assistance program asso-
ciated with any minimum wage increase that takes effect during the
timeframe of these appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of the
labor law. Each eligible organization in receipt of funding made
available by these appropriations may be required to submit written

932 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
certification, in such form and at such time the commissioner may
prescribe, attesting to the total amount of funds used by the eligi-
ble organization, how such funding will be or was used for purposes
eligible under these appropriations and any other reporting deemed
necessary by the commissioner. The amounts appropriated herein may
include advances to organizations authorized to receive such funds
to accomplish this purpose.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer, with
any appropriation of the department of health and the office of
medicaid inspector general and may be increased or decreased by
transfer or suballocation between these appropriated amounts and
appropriations of the department of health state purpose account,
the office of mental health, office for people with developmental
disabilities, the office of addiction services and supports, the
department of family assistance office of temporary and disability
assistance, the department of corrections and community supervision,
the office of information technology services, the state university
of New York, and office of children and family services, the office
of medicaid inspector general, the state education department, and
the state office for the aging with the approval of the director of
the budget, who shall file such approval with the department of
audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means
committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary, the
moneys hereby appropriated may be used for payments to the centers
for medicaid and medicare services for obligations incurred related
to the pharmaceutical costs of dually eligible medicare/medicaid
beneficiaries participating in the medicare drug benefit authorized
by P.L. 108-173.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated shall not be used for any existing rates, fees, fee
schedule, or procedures which may affect the cost of care and
services provided by personal care providers, case managers, health
maintenance organizations, out of state medical facilities which
provide care and services to residents of the state, providers of
transportation services, that are altered, amended, adjusted or
otherwise changed by a local social services district unless previ-
ously approved by the department of health and the director of the
budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
funds shall be made available to the commissioner of the office of
mental health or the commissioner of the office of addiction
services and supports, in consultation with the commissioner of
health and approved by the director of the budget, and consistent
with appropriations made therefor, to implement allocation adjust-
ment developed by each such commissioner which shall describe mental
health or substance use disorder services that should be developed
to meet service needs resulting from the reduction of inpatient
behavioral health services provided under the medicaid program, by
programs licensed pursuant to article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene

933 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
law. Such programs may include programs that are licensed pursuant
to both article 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 28 of the
public health law, or certified under both article 32 of the mental
hygiene law and article 28 of the public health law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be available for payments associated with the
resolution by settlement agreement or judgment of rate appeals
and/or litigation where the department of health is a party.
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
hospital inpatient services and general hospitals that are safety-
net providers that evince severe financial distress, pursuant to
criteria determined by the commissioner, shall be eligible for
awards for amounts appropriated herein, to enable such providers to
maintain operations and vital services while establishing long term
solutions to achieve sustainable health services.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, no expenditures
shall be used for the medical assistance program for any expenses
not explicitly authorized in law without the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26947) ... 1,317,865,000 ..................... (re. $1,317,865,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
hospital outpatient and emergency room services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26948) ... 350,953,000 ......................... (re. $350,953,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
clinic services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26949) ... 683,240,000 ......................... (re. $683,240,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
nursing home services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26950) ... 1,772,373,000 ..................... (re. $1,772,373,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
other long term care services.

934 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26951) ... 8,329,256,000 ..................... (re. $8,329,256,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
managed care services including regional planning activities of the
finger lakes health systems agency, including statewide coordination
and demonstration of best practices. The department shall make
grants within amounts appropriated therefor, to assure high-quality
and accessible primary care, to provide technical assistance to
support financial and business planning for integrated systems of
care, and to assist primary care providers in the adoption, imple-
mentation, and meaningful use of electronic health record technolo-
gy.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26952) ... 5,286,136,000 ..................... (re. $5,286,136,000)
For services and expenses for health homes including grants to health
homes.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29548) ... 196,024,000 ......................... (re. $196,024,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
pharmacy services provided, however, that no funds shall be made
available pursuant to this appropriation for any drug not explicitly
authorized in any enacted law, rule, or regulation without approval
from the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26953) ... 3,147,229,000 ..................... (re. $3,147,229,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
transportation services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26954) ... 470,133,000 ......................... (re. $470,133,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
dental services.

935 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26955) ... 5,295,000 ............................. (re. $5,295,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
non-institutional and other spending.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby
appropriated may be available for payments to any county or public
school districts associated with additional claims for school
supportive health services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26956) ... 1,078,502,000 ..................... (re. $1,078,502,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
payments to the Area Agencies on Aging, making improvements in the
long term care system for the point of entry initiatives, for the
purposes of expanding and promoting a more coordinated level of care
for the delivery of quality services in the community.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29572) ... 22,881,000 ........................... (re. $22,881,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
payments to Independent Living Centers, making improvements in the
long term care system for the point of entry initiatives, for the
purposes of expanding and promoting a more coordinated level of care
for the delivery of quality services in the community.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29573) ... 7,000,000 ............................. (re. $7,000,000)
Notwithstanding section 112 or 163 of the state finance law, or any
other law to the contrary, for grants for services and expenses of
independent living centers for payment according to the following
sub-schedule (59131) ... 20,000,000 .............. (re. $20,000,000)
sub-schedule
Corning Council for Assistance
and Information for the
Disabled, Inc. dba AIM Inde-

936 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
pendent Living Center .......... 1,460,000
ARISE Child and Family
Service, Inc ..................... 540,000
Rockland Independent Living
Center, Inc. dba BRIDGES ....... 1,240,000
Center for Disability Rights,
Inc. ........................... 4,380,000
Finger Lakes Independence
Center ........................... 660,000
Long Island Center for Inde-
pendent Living, Inc. ........... 1,340,000
Independent Living, Inc .......... 1,460,000
Independent Living Center of
the Hudson Valley, Inc ........... 310,000
Resource Center for Independ-
ent Living, Inc ................ 2,690,000
Southern Tier Independence
Center, Inc. ................... 1,070,000
Western New York Independent
Living, Inc. ................... 4,850,000
--------------
Total of sub-schedule ......... 20,000,000
--------------
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
payments to promote women's health and reduce the adverse effects of
multiple births.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26793) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
the managed long term care ombudsman program.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26800) ... 5,350,000 ............................. (re. $5,350,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
facilitated enrollment for aged, blind and disabled.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26818) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,000,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, upon submission of an allo-
cation adjustment from the commissioner of health, the amount appro-

937 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
priated herein, together with any available federal matching funds,
may be transferred or suballocated to the office of mental health,
office of addiction services and supports, office for people with
developmental disabilities, division of housing and community
renewal, New York state housing trust fund corporation, and office
of temporary and disability assistance for services and expenses
related to providing affordable housing. Any such spending shall
consider the geographical location of the grants.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-2026, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29521) ... 93,000,000 ........................... (re. $93,000,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
essential community provider network and vital access provider
services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29562) ... 81,000,000 ........................... (re. $81,000,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
vital access provider services to preserve critical access to essen-
tial behavioral health and other services in targeted areas of the
state.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26615) ... 25,000,000 ........................... (re. $25,000,000)
For services and expenses related to reducing maternal mortality with-
in the state, including, but not limited to creating a maternal
mortality review board, developing a training curriculum on implicit
racial bias, expanding community health workers, and building a data
warehouse for analysis of maternal outcomes to support quality
improvement.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26855) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,000,000)
For services and expenses for DC37 and Teamster Local 858 health
insurance coverage under the family health plus (FHPlus), medicaid
or for payments to participating health insurance plans in the New
York state health benefit exchange.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering

938 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26856) ... 2,810,000 ............................. (re. $2,810,000)
The monies hereby appropriated shall be available for the cost of
housing subsidies to certain participants in the nursing home tran-
sition and diversion waiver program as authorized by chapters 615
and 627 of the laws of 2004. A portion of such funds may be used for
administration of the housing subsidies, either by state staff or a
not-for-profit agency. Up to 100 percent of this appropriation may
be suballocated to the division of housing and community renewal.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26857) ... 1,842,000 ............................. (re. $1,842,000)
For services and expenses related to traumatic brain injury including
but not limited to services rendered to individuals enrolled in the
federally approved home and community based services (HCBS) waiver
and including personal and nonpersonal services spending originally
authorized by appropriations and reappropriations enacted prior to
1996.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26858) ... 11,465,000 ........................... (re. $11,465,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program general
hospitals that are safety-net providers, including, without limita-
tion, public benefit corporations, hospitals that are part of the
State University of New York, Critical Access Hospitals and Sole
Community Hospitals as those terms are defined under federal law,
that evince severe financial distress, residential health care
facilities, independent practice associations, accountable care
organizations, and for the healthcare safety net transformation
program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, rule or regulation
to the contrary, all funds available for distribution pursuant to
subdivision (g) of section 2826 of the public health law shall be
distributed in accordance with the following provisions. Pursuant to
criteria, an application, and an evaluation process, acceptable to
the commissioner of health in consultation with the director of the
division of the budget, the commissioner of the department of health
may award a temporary adjustment to the non-capital components of
rates, or make temporary lump-sum Medicaid payments for services and
expenses of medical assistance programs to eligible providers with
serious financial instability and requiring extraordinary financial
assistance that are safety-net providers, and which are eligible
facilities as defined in paragraph (i) of subdivision (g) of section
2826 of the public health law, to enable such facilities to maintain
operations and vital services while such facilities establish long

939 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
term solutions to achieve sustainable health services. Provided,
however, if this chapter appropriates funds which the director of
the budget deems insufficient to maintain such payments as described
in subdivision (g) of section 2826 of the public health law, then
the provisions of this paragraph shall be deemed null and void.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26891) ... 844,000,000 ......................... (re. $844,000,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
patient centered medical homes.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26859) ... 116,000,000 ......................... (re. $116,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of the medical assistance program
related to disproportionate share hospital payments to eligible
hospitals operated by the state university of New York, provided
further the eligible hospitals provide sufficient financial informa-
tion to evaluate the need to support current and future payments.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26860) ... 429,225,000 ......................... (re. $429,225,000)
For services and expenses associated with ending the AIDS epidemic,
including but not limited to expanding the use of preexposure
prophylaxis, enhancement of targeted prevention activities, support
for linkage and retention services and the development of a peer
credentialing process.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-2026 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26923) ... 15,000,000 ........................... (re. $15,000,000)
For services and expenses related to expanding existing caregiver
support services for persons with Alzheimer's and other dementias
including additional respite and expansion of the department of
health caregiver support services programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26930) ... 26,367,000 ........................... (re. $26,367,000)

940 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For grants to the civil service employees association, Local 1000,
AFSCME, AFL-CIO to allow child care workers represented by the union
to reduce the cost of purchasing coverage under the exchange.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29808) ... 4,750,000 ............................. (re. $4,750,000)
For grants to the United Federation of Teachers, Local 2, AFT, AFL-CIO
to allow child care workers represented by the union to reduce the
cost of purchasing coverage under the exchange.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29807) ... 5,500,000 ............................. (re. $5,500,000)
For the state share of medical assistance services expenses incurred
by the department of health for the provision of medical assistance
including services to people with developmental disabilities for
mental hygiene stabilization.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29561) ... 719,598,000 ......................... (re. $719,598,000)
For payments to eligible certified community behavioral health clinics
under the certified community behavioral health clinics indigent
care program (59056) ... 22,500,000 .............. (re. $22,500,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
payments to Ryan White Centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of the law, the moneys hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with any appropri-
ation of the department of health for the purpose of supporting the
Ryan White Centers (59057) .........................................
50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $50,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the New York medicaid section
1115 demonstration waiver (59091) ..................................
190,420,000 ..................................... (re. $190,420,000)
For services and expenses for continuous eligibility for children
enrolled in New York State insurance programs (59092) ..............
30,300,000 ....................................... (re. $30,300,000)
For services and expenses to facilities that are fully accredited
acute care specialty hospitals and designated by the federal depart-
ment of health and human services as an exempt extended neoplastic
disease care hospital as of December thirty-first, two thousand
twenty-three, for which a discrete institutional cost report was
filed for the two thousand twenty-three calendar year. Notwithstand-
ing any provision or law to the contrary and subject to approval of
the director of the budget, payments made from this appropriation

941 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
may take the form of increased rates of payment in Medicaid fee-for-
service and/or Medicaid managed care, lump sum payments, or state
directed payments under 42 CFR 438.6(c) (59137) ....................
6,900,000 ......................................... (re. $6,900,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
medical services provided at state facilities operated by the office
of mental health, the office for people with developmental disabili-
ties and the office of addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26961) ... 5,000,000,000 ..................... (re. $5,000,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, pursuant to a
plan approved by the director of the budget, payments made from this
appropriation shall be available pursuant to subdivision (g) of
section 2826 of the public health law and for the healthcare safety
net transformation program (59112) .................................
300,000,000 ..................................... (re. $180,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to providing healthcare and mental
hygiene worker bonuses. The money hereby appropriated is available
for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued
(59036) ... 922,748,000 .......................... (re. $21,651,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Medicaid Direct Account - 25106
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses for the medical assistance program, includ-
ing administrative expenses for local social services districts,
pursuant to title XIX of the federal social security act or its
successor program.
The moneys hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of aid
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued to municipalities, and to
providers of medical services pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law, and for payment of state aid to municipalities
and to providers of family care where payment systems through the
fiscal intermediaries are not operational.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funding made avail-
able by these appropriations shall support direct salary costs and
related fringe benefits within the medical assistance program asso-
ciated with any minimum wage increase that takes effect during the
timeframe of these appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of the
labor law. Each eligible organization in receipt of funding made

942 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
available by these appropriations may be required to submit written
certification, in such form and at such time the commissioner may
prescribe, attesting to the total amount of funds used by the eligi-
ble organization, how such funding will be or was used for purposes
eligible under these appropriations and any other reporting deemed
necessary by the commissioner. The amounts appropriated herein may
include advances to organizations authorized to receive such funds
to accomplish this purpose.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer, with
any appropriation of the department of health and the office of
medicaid inspector general and may be increased or decreased by
transfer or suballocation between these appropriated amounts and
appropriations of the office of mental health, office for people
with developmental disabilities, the office of addiction services
and supports, the department of family assistance office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance, office of children and family
services, the department of financial services, department of
corrections and community supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university of New York, the state
education department, and the state office for the aging with the
approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the
state commissioner of temporary and disability assistance or the
state commissioner of health as due from local social services
districts each month as their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law may be set aside by the
state comptroller in an interest-bearing account in order to ensure
the orderly and prompt payment of providers under section 367-b of
the social services law pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local social services district's
share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social
services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
funds shall be made available to the commissioner of the office of
mental health or the commissioner of the office of addiction
services and supports, in consultation with the commissioner of
health and approved by the director of the budget, and consistent
with appropriations made therefor, to implement allocation adjust-
ment developed by each such commissioner which shall describe mental
health or substance use disorder services that should be developed
to meet service needs resulting from the reduction of inpatient
behavioral health services provided under the medicaid program, by
programs licensed pursuant to article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene
law. Such programs may include programs that are licensed pursuant

943 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to both article 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 28 of the
public health law, or certified under both article 32 of the mental
hygiene law and article 28 of the public health law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be available for payments associated with the
resolution by settlement agreement or judgment of rate appeals
and/or litigation where the department of health is a party.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, no expenditures
shall be used for the medical assistance program for any expenses
not explicitly authorized in law without the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget.
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
hospital inpatient services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26947) ... 4,815,074,000 ..................... (re. $4,815,074,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
hospital outpatient and emergency room services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26948) ... 674,180,000 ......................... (re. $674,180,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
clinic services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26949) ... 1,127,822,000 ..................... (re. $1,127,822,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
nursing home services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of
2024(26950) ... 5,188,289,000 ................. (re. $5,188,289,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
other long term care services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26951) ... 16,977,330,000 ................... (re. $16,977,330,000)

944 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
managed care services including regional planning activities of the
finger lakes health systems agency, including statewide coordination
and demonstration of best practices. The department shall make
grants within amounts appropriated therefor, to assure high-quality
and accessible primary care, to provide technical assistance to
support financial and business planning for integrated systems of
care, and to assist primary care providers in the adoption, imple-
mentation, and meaningful use of electronic health record technolo-
gy.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26952) ... 18,297,411,000 ................... (re. $18,297,411,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
pharmacy services, provided, however, that no funds shall be made
available pursuant to this appropriation for any drug not explicitly
authorized in any heretofore enacted law, rule, or regulation with-
out approval from the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26953) ... 5,234,621,000 ..................... (re. $5,234,621,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
transportation services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26954) ... 795,223,000 ......................... (re. $795,223,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
dental services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26955) ... 92,423,000 ........................... (re. $92,423,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
noninstitutional and other spending.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering

945 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26956) ... 8,987,565,000 ..................... (re. $8,987,565,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, upon submission of an allo-
cation adjustment from the commissioner of health, the amount appro-
priated herein, together with any available federal matching funds,
may be transferred or suballocated to the office of mental health,
office of addiction services and supports, office for people with
developmental disabilities, division of housing and community
renewal, New York state housing trust fund corporation, and office
of temporary and disability assistance for services and expenses
related to providing affordable housing. Any such spending shall
consider the geographical location of the grants.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29521) ... 80,750,000 ........................... (re. $80,750,000)
For additional services and expenses of the medical assistance program
related to disproportionate share hospital payments to eligible
hospitals operated by the state university of New York, provided
further the eligible hospitals provide sufficient financial informa-
tion to evaluate the need to support current and future payments.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26860) ... 391,000,000 ......................... (re. $391,000,000)
For payments to eligible certified community behavioral health clinics
under the certified community behavioral health clinics indigent
care program (59056) ... 22,500,000 .............. (re. $22,500,000)
For services and expenses for the New York medicaid redesign team
section 1115 demonstration waiver for the purpose of reinvesting
savings resulting from the redesign of the medical assistance
program, the money hereby appropriated may be used to make funds or
payments authorized pursuant to such waiver, including funds or
payments described in subdivisions 20 and 21 of section 2807 of the
public health law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26616) ... 2,100,000,000 ..................... (re. $2,100,000,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
medical services provided at state facilities operated by the office
of mental health, the office for people with developmental disabili-
ties and the office of addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and

946 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(26961) ... 5,000,000,000 ..................... (re. $5,000,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses for the medical assistance program, includ-
ing administrative expenses for local social services districts,
pursuant to title XIX of the federal social security act or its
successor program.
The moneys hereby appropriated are to be available for payment of aid
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued to municipalities, and to
providers of medical services pursuant to section 367-b of the
social services law, and for payment of state aid to municipalities
and to providers of family care where payment systems through the
fiscal intermediaries are not operational.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funding made avail-
able by these appropriations shall support direct salary costs and
related fringe benefits within the medical assistance program asso-
ciated with any minimum wage increase that takes effect during the
timeframe of these appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of the
labor law. Each eligible organization in receipt of funding made
available by these appropriations may be required to submit written
certification, in such form and at such time the commissioner may
prescribe, attesting to the total amount of funds used by the eligi-
ble organization, how such funding will be or was used for purposes
eligible under these appropriations and any other reporting deemed
necessary by the commissioner. The amounts appropriated herein may
include advances to organizations authorized to receive such funds
to accomplish this purpose.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer, with
any appropriation of the department of health and the office of
medicaid inspector general and may be increased or decreased by
transfer or suballocation between these appropriated amounts and
appropriations of the office of mental health, office for people
with developmental disabilities, the office of addiction services
and supports, the department of family assistance office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance, office of children and family
services, the department of financial services, department of
corrections and community supervision, the office of information
technology services, the state university of New York, the state
education department, and the state office for the aging with the
approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, in lieu of payments
authorized by the social services law, or payments of federal funds
otherwise due to the local social services districts for programs
provided under the federal social security act or the federal food
stamp act, funds herein appropriated, in amounts certified by the

947 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state commissioner of temporary and disability assistance or the
state commissioner of health as due from local social services
districts each month as their share of payments made pursuant to
section 367-b of the social services law may be set aside by the
state comptroller in an interest-bearing account in order to ensure
the orderly and prompt payment of providers under section 367-b of
the social services law pursuant to an estimate provided by the
commissioner of health of each local social services district's
share of payments made pursuant to section 367-b of the social
services law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary,
funds shall be made available to the commissioner of the office of
mental health or the commissioner of the office of addiction
services and supports, in consultation with the commissioner of
health and approved by the director of the budget, and consistent
with appropriations made therefor, to implement allocation adjust-
ment developed by each such commissioner which shall describe mental
health or substance use disorder services that should be developed
to meet service needs resulting from the reduction of inpatient
behavioral health services provided under the medicaid program, by
programs licensed pursuant to article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene
law. Such programs may include programs that are licensed pursuant
to both article 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 28 of the
public health law, or certified under both article 32 of the mental
hygiene law and article 28 of the public health law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby
appropriated may be available for payments associated with the
resolution by settlement agreement or judgment of rate appeals
and/or litigation where the department of health is a party.
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
hospital inpatient services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26947) ... 3,857,426,000 ..................... (re. $3,857,426,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
hospital outpatient and emergency room services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26948) ... 646,471,000 ......................... (re. $646,471,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
clinic services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering

948 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26949) ... 1,053,034,000 ..................... (re. $1,053,034,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
nursing home services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2023-24 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26950) ... 4,847,184,000 ..................... (re. $4,847,184,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
other long term care services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26951) ... 16,189,250,000 ................... (re. $16,189,250,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
managed care services including regional planning activities of the
finger lakes health systems agency, including statewide coordination
and demonstration of best practices. The department shall make
grants within amounts appropriated therefor, to assure high-quality
and accessible primary care, to provide technical assistance to
support financial and business planning for integrated systems of
care, and to assist primary care providers in the adoption, imple-
mentation, and meaningful use of electronic health record technolo-
gy.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26952) ... 16,920,043,000 ................... (re. $16,920,043,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
pharmacy services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26953) ... 5,911,002,000 ..................... (re. $5,911,002,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
transportation services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26954) ... 776,170,000 ......................... (re. $776,170,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
dental services.

949 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26955) ... 83,351,000 ........................... (re. $83,351,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
noninstitutional and other spending.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26956) ... 8,403,642,000 ..................... (re. $8,403,642,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, upon submission of an allo-
cation adjustment from the commissioner of health, the amount appro-
priated herein, together with any available federal matching funds,
may be transferred or suballocated to the office of mental health,
office of addiction services and supports, office for people with
developmental disabilities, division of housing and community
renewal, New York state housing trust fund corporation, and office
of temporary and disability assistance for services and expenses
related to providing affordable housing. Any such spending shall
consider the geographical location of the grants.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(29521) ... 80,750,000 ........................... (re. $80,750,000)
For additional services and expenses of the medical assistance program
related to disproportionate share hospital payments to eligible
hospitals operated by the state university of New York, provided
further the eligible hospitals provide sufficient financial informa-
tion to evaluate the need to support current and future payments.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26860) ... 391,000,000 ......................... (re. $391,000,000)
For payments to eligible certified community behavioral health clinics
under the certified community behavioral health clinics indigent
care program (59056) ... 22,500,000 .............. (re. $22,500,000)
For services and expenses for the New York medicaid redesign team
section 1115 demonstration waiver for the purpose of reinvesting
savings resulting from the redesign of the medical assistance
program, the money hereby appropriated may be used to make funds or
payments authorized pursuant to such waiver, including funds or

950 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
payments described in subdivisions 20 and 21 of section 2807 of the
public health law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26616) ... 2,000,000,000 ..................... (re. $2,000,000,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
medical services provided at state facilities operated by the office
of mental health, the office for people with developmental disabili-
ties and the office of addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
(26961) ... 5,000,000,000 ..................... (re. $5,000,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
Indigent Care Account - 20817
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, subject to federal approval, department of
health state funds medicaid spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities operated by the office of
mental health, the office for people with developmental disabilities
and the office of addiction services and supports and further
excluding any payments which are not appropriated within the depart-
ment of health, in the aggregate, for the period April 1, 2025
through [March 31, 2026]September 15, 2026, shall not exceed
$33,417,285,000 except as provided below provided, however, such
aggregate limits may be adjusted by the director of the budget to
account for any changes in the New York state federal medical
assistance percentage amount established pursuant to the federal
social security act, increases in provider revenues, reductions in
local social services district payments for medical assistance
administration, minimum wage increases and beginning April 1, 2012
the operational costs of the New York state medical indemnity fund,
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and state costs or
savings from the essential plan program. Such projections may be
adjusted by the director of the budget to account for increased or
expedited department of health state funds medicaid expenditures as
a result of a natural or other type of disaster, including a govern-
mental declaration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation with the commissioner of
health, shall assess on a quarterly basis known and projected medi-
caid expenditures by category of service and by geographic region,
as determined by the commissioner of health, incurred both prior to

951 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and subsequent to such assessment for each such period, and if the
director of the budget determines that such expenditures are
expected to cause medicaid spending for such period to exceed the
aggregate limit specified herein for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the director of the budget and the
commissioner of health, shall develop a medicaid savings allocation
adjustment to limit such spending to the aggregate limit specified
herein for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment shall be designed, to
reduce the expenditures authorized by the appropriations herein in
compliance with the following guidelines: (1) reductions shall be
made in compliance with applicable federal law, including the
provisions of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation
Act of 2010, Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively "Affordable Care
Act") and any subsequent amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be made in a manner that
complies with the state medicaid plan approved by the federal
centers for medicare and medicaid services, provided, however, that
the commissioner of health is authorized to submit any state plan
amendment or seek other federal approval, including waiver authori-
ty, to implement the provisions of the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment that meets the other criteria set forth herein; (3)
reductions shall be made in a manner that maximizes federal finan-
cial participation, to the extent practicable, including any federal
financial participation that is available or is reasonably expected
to become available, in the discretion of the commissioner, under
the Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall be made uniformly
among categories of services and geographic regions of the state, to
the extent practicable, and shall be made uniformly within a catego-
ry of service, to the extent practicable, except where the commis-
sioner determines that there are sufficient grounds for non-uniform-
ity, including but not limited to: the extent to which specific
categories of services contributed to department of health medicaid
state funds spending in excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in underserved communities; or
the potential benefits of pursuing innovative payment models contem-
plated by the Affordable Care Act, in which case such grounds shall
be set forth in the medicaid savings allocation adjustment; and (5)
reductions shall be made in a manner that does not unnecessarily
create administrative burdens to medicaid applicants and recipients
or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the legislature, as well as
organizations representing health care providers, consumers, busi-
nesses, workers, health insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings allocation adjustment, to
the extent that all or part of such adjustment, in the discretion of
the commissioner, is likely to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of service or particular
geographic regions of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment on the department of health's website and shall provide

952 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
written copies of such plan to the chairs of the senate finance and
the assembly ways and means committees at least 30 days before the
date on which implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment subsequent to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new notice pursuant to subpar-
agraph (i) of this paragraph only if the commissioner determines, in
his or her discretion, that such revisions materially alter the
plan.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subdivision, the commissioner need not seek the input described in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision or provide notice pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision if, in the discretion of the
commissioner, expedited development and implementation of a medicaid
savings allocation adjustment is necessary due to a public health
emergency.
For purposes of this section, a public health emergency is defined as:
(i) a disaster, natural or otherwise, that significantly increases
the immediate need for health care personnel in an area of the
state; (ii) an event or condition that creates a widespread risk of
exposure to a serious communicable disease, or the potential for
such widespread risk of exposure; or (iii) any other event or condi-
tion determined by the commissioner to constitute an imminent threat
to public health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to prevent all or part of
such medicaid savings allocation adjustment from taking effect
retroactively to the extent permitted by the federal centers for
medicare and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings allocation adjustment, the
commissioner of the department of health shall reduce department of
health state funds medicaid spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including, but not limited to modify-
ing or suspending reimbursement methods, including but not limited
to all fees, premium levels and rates of payment, notwithstanding
any provision of law that sets a specific amount or methodology for
any such payments or rates of payment; modifying medicaid program
benefits; seeking all necessary federal approvals, including, but
not limited to waivers, waiver amendments; and suspending time
frames for notice, approval or certification of rate requirements,
notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, including but not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of the
public health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the laws of 1988, and
18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a quarterly report that sets
forth: (a) known and projected department of health medicaid expend-
itures as described in subdivision (1) of this section, and factors
that could result in medicaid disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected department of health state funds
disbursements in the enacted budget financial plan pursuant to
subdivision 3 of section 23 of the state finance law, including
spending increases or decreases due to: enrollment fluctuations,
rate changes, utilization changes, MRT investments, and shift of

953 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
beneficiaries to managed care; and variations in offline medicaid
payments; and (b) the actions taken to implement any medicaid
savings allocation adjustment implemented pursuant to subdivision
(4) of this section, including information concerning the impact of
such actions on each category of service and each geographic region
of the state. Each such quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means commit-
tees and shall be posted on the department of health's website in a
timely manner.
For the purpose of making payments to providers of medical care pursu-
ant to section 367-b of the social services law, and for payment of
state aid to municipalities where payment systems through fiscal
intermediaries are not operational, to reimburse such providers for
costs attributable to the provision of care to patients eligible for
medical assistance. Payments from this appropriation to general
hospitals related to indigent care pursuant to article 28 of the
public health law respectively, when combined with federal funds for
services and expenses for the medical assistance program pursuant to
title XIX of the federal social security act or its successor
program, shall equal the amount of the funds received related to
health care reform act allowances and surcharges pursuant to article
28 of the public health law and deposited to this account less any
such amounts withheld pursuant to subdivision 21 of section 2807-c
of the public health law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased
by interchange or transfer with any appropriation of the department
of health with the approval of the director of the budget, who shall
file such approval with the department of audit and control and
copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding section 2807-k of the Public Health Law, or any incon-
sistent provision of law, and subject to the availability of federal
financial participation, for periods on and after January 1, 2020
through March 31, 2026, all funds available for distribution pursu-
ant to subdivision 5-d of section 2807-k of the public health law
shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions below.
The commissioner of the department of health shall establish methodol-
ogies for determining each facility's relative uncompensated care
need amount based on uninsured inpatient and outpatient units of
service from the cost reporting year two years prior to the distrib-
ution year, multiplied by the applicable medicaid rates in effect
January first of the distribution year, as summed and adjusted by a
statewide cost adjustment factor and reduced by the sum of all
payment amounts collected from such uninsured patients, and as
further adjusted by application of a nominal need computation that
shall take into account each facility's medicaid inpatient share.
Annual distributions pursuant to such regulations for the 2025-2027
calendar years shall be in accord with the following: $82,700,000
shall be distributed as Medicaid DSH payments to major general
public hospitals, and $969,900,000 shall be distributed as Medicaid
DSH payments to eligible general hospitals, other than major public
general hospitals, for each of the calendar years 2025-2027,

954 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
provided that the total distributions to eligible general hospitals,
other than major public general hospitals, shall be subject to a
reduction of $235,400,000 annually, and further provided that eligi-
ble general hospitals other than public general hospitals who quali-
fy as enhanced safety net hospitals under section 2807-k of the
public health law shall not be subject to such reduction.
Such reduction shall be determined by a methodology to be established
by the department of health which may take into account the payor
mix of each non-public general hospital, including the percentage of
inpatient days paid by the medical assistance program.
For calendar years 2025-2027, eligible general hospitals other than
major public general hospitals that qualify as enhanced safety net
hospitals under sections 2087-c and section 2807-k of the public
health law which experience a reduction in payments pursuant to
section 2807-k of the public health law shall receive a distribution
of $64,600,000 annually proportional to the reduction experienced by
the facility and pursuant to a methodology determined to the commis-
sioner.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29797) ... 631,100,000 ......................... (re. $631,100,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
HCRA Resources Fund
Medical Assistance Account - 20804
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, subject to federal approval, department of
health state funds medicaid spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities operated by the office of
mental health, the office for people with developmental disabilities
and the office of addiction services and supports and further
excluding any payments which are not appropriated within the depart-
ment of health, in the aggregate, for the period April 1, 2025
through [March 31, 2026]September 15, 2026, shall not exceed
$33,417,285,000 except as provided below provided, however, such
aggregate limits may be adjusted by the director of the budget to
account for any changes in the New York state federal medical
assistance percentage amount established pursuant to the federal
social security act, increases in provider revenues, reductions in
local social services district payments for medical assistance
administration, minimum wage increases and beginning April 1, 2012
the operational costs of the New York state medical indemnity fund,
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and state costs or
savings from the essential plan. Such projections may be adjusted by
the director of the budget to account for increased or expedited
department of health state funds medicaid expenditures as a result

955 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of a natural or other type of disaster, including a governmental
declaration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation with the commissioner of
health, shall assess on a quarterly basis known and projected medi-
caid expenditures by category of service and by geographic region,
as determined by the commissioner of health, incurred both prior to
and subsequent to such assessment for each such period, and if the
director of the budget determines that such expenditures are
expected to cause medicaid spending for such period to exceed the
aggregate limit specified herein for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the director of the budget and the
commissioner of health, shall develop a medicaid savings allocation
adjustment to limit such spending to the aggregate limit specified
herein for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment shall be designed, to
reduce the expenditures authorized by the appropriations herein in
compliance with the following guidelines: (1) reductions shall be
made in compliance with applicable federal law, including the
provisions of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation
Act of 2010, Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively "Affordable Care
Act") and any subsequent amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be made in a manner that
complies with the state medicaid plan approved by the federal
centers for medicare and medicaid services, provided, however, that
the commissioner of health is authorized to submit any state plan
amendment or seek other federal approval, including waiver authori-
ty, to implement the provisions of the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment that meets the other criteria set forth herein; (3)
reductions shall be made in a manner that maximizes federal finan-
cial participation, to the extent practicable, including any federal
financial participation that is available or is reasonably expected
to become available, in the discretion of the commissioner, under
the Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall be made uniformly
among categories of services and geographic regions of the state, to
the extent practicable, and shall be made uniformly within a catego-
ry of service, to the extent practicable, except where the commis-
sioner determines that there are sufficient grounds for non-uniform-
ity, including but not limited to: the extent to which specific
categories of services contributed to department of health medicaid
state funds spending in excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in underserved communities; or
the potential benefits of pursuing innovative payment models contem-
plated by the Affordable Care Act, in which case such grounds shall
be set forth in the medicaid savings allocation adjustment; and (5)
reductions shall be made in a manner that does not unnecessarily
create administrative burdens to medicaid applicants and recipients
or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the legislature, as well as
organizations representing health care providers, consumers, busi-
nesses, workers, health insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings allocation adjustment, to

956 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the extent that all or part of such adjustment, in the discretion of
the commissioner, is likely to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of service or particular
geographic regions of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment on the department of health's website and shall provide
written copies of such plan to the chairs of the senate finance and
the assembly ways and means committees at least 30 days before the
date on which implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment subsequent to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new notice pursuant to subpar-
agraph (i) of this paragraph only if the commissioner determines, in
his or her discretion, that such revisions materially alter the
plan.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subdivision, the commissioner need not seek the input described in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision or provide notice pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision if, in the discretion of the
commissioner, expedited development and implementation of a medicaid
savings allocation adjustment is necessary due to a public health
emergency.
For purposes of this section, a public health emergency is defined as:
(i) a disaster, natural or otherwise, that significantly increases
the immediate need for health care personnel in an area of the
state; (ii) an event or condition that creates a widespread risk of
exposure to a serious communicable disease, or the potential for
such widespread risk of exposure; or (iii) any other event or condi-
tion determined by the commissioner to constitute an imminent threat
to public health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to prevent all or part of
such medicaid savings allocation adjustment from taking effect
retroactively to the extent permitted by the federal centers for
medicare and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings allocation adjustment, the
commissioner of the department of health shall reduce department of
health state funds medicaid spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including, but not limited to modify-
ing or suspending reimbursement methods, including but not limited
to all fees, premium levels and rates of payment, notwithstanding
any provision of law that sets a specific amount or methodology for
any such payments or rates of payment; modifying medicaid program
benefits; seeking all necessary federal approvals, including, but
not limited to waivers, waiver amendments; and suspending time
frames for notice, approval or certification of rate requirements,
notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, including but not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of the
public health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the laws of 1988, and
18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a quarterly report that sets
forth: (a) known and projected department of health medicaid expend-
itures as described in subdivision (1) of this section, and factors

957 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
that could result in medicaid disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected department of health state funds
disbursements in the enacted budget financial plan pursuant to
subdivision 3 of section 23 of the state finance law, including
spending increases or decreases due to: enrollment fluctuations,
rate changes, utilization changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and variations in offline medicaid
payments; and (b) the actions taken to implement any medicaid
savings allocation adjustment implemented pursuant to subdivision
(4) of this section, including information concerning the impact of
such actions on each category of service and each geographic region
of the state. Each such quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means commit-
tees and shall be posted on the department of health's website in a
timely manner.
For the purpose of making payments, the money hereby appropriated is
available for payment of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued, to providers of medical care pursuant to section 367-b of
the social services law, and for payment of state aid to munici-
palities and the federal government where payment systems through
fiscal intermediaries are not operational, to reimburse such provid-
ers for costs attributable to the provision of care to patients
eligible for medical assistance. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may be increased or
decreased by interchange or transfer with any appropriation of the
department of health with the approval of the director of the budg-
et, who shall file such approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate finance
committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means committee.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29800) ... 4,859,660,000 ..................... (re. $2,709,660,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program related to
supporting workforce recruitment and retention of personal care
services or any worker with direct patient care responsibility for
local social service districts which include a city with a popu-
lation of over one million persons.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29848) ... 136,000,000 ......................... (re. $136,000,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program related to
supporting workforce recruitment and retention of personal care
services for local social service districts that do not include a
city with a population of over one million persons.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and

958 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29847) ... 11,200,000 ........................... (re. $11,200,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program related to
supporting rate increases for certified home health agencies, long
term home health care programs, AIDS home care programs, hospice
programs, managed long term care plans and approved managed long
term care operating demonstrations for recruitment and retention of
health care workers.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29798) ... 50,000,000 ........................... (re. $50,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Medical Assistance Account - 22187
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, subject to federal approval, department of
health state funds medicaid spending, excluding payments for medical
services provided at state facilities operated by the office of
mental health, the office for people with developmental disabilities
and the office of addiction services and supports and further
excluding any payments which are not appropriated within the depart-
ment of health, in the aggregate, for the period April 1, 2025
through [March 31, 2026]September 15, 2026, shall not exceed
$33,417,285,000 except as provided below provided, however, such
aggregate limits may be adjusted by the director of the budget to
account for any changes in the New York state federal medical
assistance percentage amount established pursuant to the federal
social security act, increases in provider revenues, reductions in
local social services district payments for medical assistance
administration, minimum wage increases and beginning April 1, 2012
the operational costs of the New York state medical indemnity fund,
pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011, and state costs or
savings from the essential plan. Such projections may be adjusted by
the director of the budget to account for increased or expedited
department of health state funds medicaid expenditures as a result
of a natural or other type of disaster, including a governmental
declaration of emergency.
The director of the budget, in consultation with the commissioner of
health, shall assess on a quarterly basis known and projected medi-
caid expenditures by category of service and by geographic region,
as determined by the commissioner of health, incurred both prior to
and subsequent to such assessment for each such period, and if the
director of the budget determines that such expenditures are

959 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
expected to cause medicaid spending for such period to exceed the
aggregate limit specified herein for such period, the state medicaid
director, in consultation with the director of the budget and the
commissioner of health, shall develop a medicaid savings allocation
adjustment to limit such spending to the aggregate limit specified
herein for such period.
Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment shall be designed, to
reduce the expenditures authorized by the appropriations herein in
compliance with the following guidelines: (1) reductions shall be
made in compliance with applicable federal law, including the
provisions of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation
Act of 2010, Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively "Affordable Care
Act") and any subsequent amendments thereto or regulations promul-
gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be made in a manner that
complies with the state medicaid plan approved by the federal
centers for medicare and medicaid services, provided, however, that
the commissioner of health is authorized to submit any state plan
amendment or seek other federal approval, including waiver authori-
ty, to implement the provisions of the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment that meets the other criteria set forth herein; (3)
reductions shall be made in a manner that maximizes federal finan-
cial participation, to the extent practicable, including any federal
financial participation that is available or is reasonably expected
to become available, in the discretion of the commissioner, under
the Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall be made uniformly
among categories of services and geographic regions of the state, to
the extent practicable, and shall be made uniformly within a catego-
ry of service, to the extent practicable, except where the commis-
sioner determines that there are sufficient grounds for non-uniform-
ity, including but not limited to: the extent to which specific
categories of services contributed to department of health medicaid
state funds spending in excess of the limits specified herein; the
need to maintain safety net services in underserved communities; or
the potential benefits of pursuing innovative payment models contem-
plated by the Affordable Care Act, in which case such grounds shall
be set forth in the medicaid savings allocation adjustment; and (5)
reductions shall be made in a manner that does not unnecessarily
create administrative burdens to medicaid applicants and recipients
or providers.
The commissioner shall seek the input of the legislature, as well as
organizations representing health care providers, consumers, busi-
nesses, workers, health insurers, and others with relevant exper-
tise, in developing such medicaid savings allocation adjustment, to
the extent that all or part of such adjustment, in the discretion of
the commissioner, is likely to have a material impact on the overall
medicaid program, particular categories of service or particular
geographic regions of the state.
(a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment on the department of health's website and shall provide
written copies of such plan to the chairs of the senate finance and

960 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the assembly ways and means committees at least 30 days before the
date on which implementation is expected to begin.
(b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid savings allocation
adjustment subsequent to the provisions of notice and prior to
implementation but needs to provide a new notice pursuant to subpar-
agraph (i) of this paragraph only if the commissioner determines, in
his or her discretion, that such revisions materially alter the
plan.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subdivision, the commissioner need not seek the input described in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision or provide notice pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subdivision if, in the discretion of the
commissioner, expedited development and implementation of a medicaid
savings allocation adjustment is necessary due to a public health
emergency.
For purposes of this section, a public health emergency is defined as:
(i) a disaster, natural or otherwise, that significantly increases
the immediate need for health care personnel in an area of the
state; (ii) an event or condition that creates a widespread risk of
exposure to a serious communicable disease, or the potential for
such widespread risk of exposure; or (iii) any other event or condi-
tion determined by the commissioner to constitute an imminent threat
to public health.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to prevent all or part of
such medicaid savings allocation adjustment from taking effect
retroactively to the extent permitted by the federal centers for
medicare and medicaid services.
In accordance with the medicaid savings allocation adjustment, the
commissioner of the department of health shall reduce department of
health state funds medicaid spending by the amount of the projected
overspending through, actions including, but not limited to modify-
ing or suspending reimbursement methods, including but not limited
to all fees, premium levels and rates of payment, notwithstanding
any provision of law that sets a specific amount or methodology for
any such payments or rates of payment; modifying medicaid program
benefits; seeking all necessary federal approvals, including, but
not limited to waivers, waiver amendments; and suspending time
frames for notice, approval or certification of rate requirements,
notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, including but not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of the
public health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the laws of 1988, and
18 NYCRR 505.14(h).
The department of health shall prepare a quarterly report that sets
forth: (a) known and projected department of health medicaid expend-
itures as described in subdivision (1) of this section, and factors
that could result in medicaid disbursements for the relevant state
fiscal year to exceed the projected department of health state funds
disbursements in the enacted budget financial plan pursuant to
subdivision 3 of section 23 of the state finance law, including
spending increases or decreases due to: enrollment fluctuations,
rate changes, utilization changes, MRT investments, and shift of
beneficiaries to managed care; and variations in offline medicaid

961 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
payments; and (b) the actions taken to implement any medicaid
savings allocation adjustment implemented pursuant to subdivision
(4) of this section, including information concerning the impact of
such actions on each category of service and each geographic region
of the state. Each such quarterly report shall be provided to the
chairs of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means commit-
tees and shall be posted on the department of health's website in a
timely manner.
For the purpose of making payments to providers of medical care pursu-
ant to section 367-b of the social services law, and for payment of
state aid to municipalities and the federal government where payment
systems through fiscal intermediaries are not operational, to reim-
burse the provision of care to patients eligible for medical assist-
ance.
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
nursing home, personal care, certified home health agency, long term
home health care program and hospital services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of
this appropriation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall supersede and
replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering
fiscal year 2025-26 set forth in chapter 53 of the laws of 2024
(29846) ... 1,080,000,000 ..................... (re. $1,080,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Healthcare Stability Fund
Healthcare Stability Fund Account - 22267
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer, with
any appropriation of the department of health and the office of
medicaid inspector general and may be increased or decreased by
transfer or suballocation between these appropriated amounts and
appropriations of the department of health state purpose account,
the office of mental health, office for people with developmental
disabilities, the office of addiction services and supports, the
department of family assistance office of temporary and disability
assistance, the department of corrections and community supervision,
the office of information technology services, the state university
of New York, and office of children and family services, the office
of medicaid inspector general, the state education department, and
the state office for the aging with the approval of the director of
the budget, who shall file such approval with the department of
audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means
committee.
The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities
heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued.
For payments, services, and expenses from the Healthcare Stability
Fund established pursuant to section 99-ss of the of state finance
law, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, includ-

962 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ing services and expense of the medical assistance program, includ-
ing but not limited to hospital services, nursing home services,
clinic service, other long term care services, managed care services
and the safety net transformation program established pursuant to
section 2825-I of the public health law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, payments made
pursuant to this appropriation shall not exceed the value of actual
deposits or transfers to the Healthcare Stability Fund (59114) .....
2,687,000,000 ................................. (re. $2,687,000,000)
OFFICE OF HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAMS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding section 112 and 163 of the state finance law, section
142 of the economic development law, and any other provision of law
to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan developed by the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation. All or portion of this appropriation may be trans-
ferred to the medical assistance program (59115) ...................
7,000,000 ......................................... (re. $7,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or
suballocation between this appropriated amount and appropriations of
the department of health medical assistance program and the depart-
ment of health medical assistance administration program.
For additional services and expenses related to the annual hospital
institutional cost report (26617) ... 120,000 ....... (re. $120,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of Alzheimer's disease assistance centers as
established pursuant to chapter 586 of the laws of 1987 (29527) ....
471,000 ............................................. (re. $313,000)
For a grant to the Coalition of New York State Alzheimer's Chapter,
Inc. in support of and for distribution to a statewide network of
not-for-profit corporations established and dedicated to responding
at the local level to the needs of the New York State Alzheimer's
community pursuant to subdivision 2 of section 2005 of the public
health law (29524) ... 233,000 ....................... (re. $34,000)
For services and expenses for the Alzheimer's community assistance
program as established pursuant to chapter 657 of the laws of 1997
(29522) ... 47,000 .................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses for Alzheimer's community service programs
(29525) ... 279,000 .................................. (re. $10,000)

963 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses, including suballocation to the state office
for the aging, for coordinating patient care Alzheimer's disease
program (29526) ... 340,000 ......................... (re. $225,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Medical Assistance and Survey Account - 25107
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses for the medical assistance program and
administration of the medical assistance program and survey and
certification program, provided pursuant to title XIX and title
XVIII of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between
these appropriated amounts and appropriations of other state agen-
cies and appropriations of the department of health. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law and subject to approval of the
director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for reimbursement to
local government entities for services and expenses related to
administration of the medical assistance program (26872) ...........
320,000,000 ..................................... (re. $305,758,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses for the medical assistance program and
administration of the medical assistance program and survey and
certification program, provided pursuant to title XIX and title
XVIII of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between
these appropriated amounts and appropriations of other state agen-
cies and appropriations of the department of health. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law and subject to approval of the
director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for reimbursement to
local government entities for services and expenses related to
administration of the medical assistance program (26872) ...........
320,000,000 ....................................... (re. $7,970,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses for the medical assistance program and
administration of the medical assistance program and survey and
certification program, provided pursuant to title XIX and title
XVIII of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between
these appropriated amounts and appropriations of other state agen-
cies and appropriations of the department of health. Notwithstanding

964 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
any inconsistent provision of law and subject to approval of the
director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for reimbursement to
local government entities for services and expenses related to
administration of the medical assistance program (26872) ...........
320,000,000 ...................................... (re. $48,356,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses for the medical assistance program and
administration of the medical assistance program and survey and
certification program, provided pursuant to title XIX and title
XVIII of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between
these appropriated amounts and appropriations of other state agen-
cies and appropriations of the department of health. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law and subject to approval of the
director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for reimbursement to
local government entities for services and expenses related to
administration of the medical assistance program (26872) ...........
320,000,000 ..................................... (re. $133,038,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses for the medical assistance program and
administration of the medical assistance program and survey and
certification program, provided pursuant to title XIX and title
XVIII of the federal social security act.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between
these appropriated amounts and appropriations of other state agen-
cies and appropriations of the department of health. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law and subject to approval of the
director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for reimbursement to
local government entities for services and expenses related to
administration of the medical assistance program (26872) ...........
320,000,000 ...................................... (re. $90,250,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Alzheimer's Research Account - 20143
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For Alzheimer's disease research and assistance pursuant to chapter
590 of the laws of 1999 (26870) ... 820,000 ......... (re. $820,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For Alzheimer's disease research and assistance pursuant to chapter
590 of the laws of 1999 (26870) ... 820,000 ......... (re. $326,000)

965 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For Alzheimer's disease research and assistance pursuant to chapter
590 of the laws of 1999 (26870) ... 820,000 ......... (re. $316,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For Alzheimer's disease research and assistance pursuant to chapter
590 of the laws of 1999 (26870) ... 820,000 ......... (re. $421,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For Alzheimer's disease research and assistance pursuant to chapter
590 of the laws of 1999 (26870) ... 820,000 ......... (re. $445,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Assisted Living Residence Quality Oversight Account - 22110
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the oversight and licensing
activities for assisted living facilities. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, moneys appropriated herein may be
suballocated to the state office for the aging, a portion of which
may be transferred to state operations and aid to localities (26870)
... 2,110,000 ..................................... (re. $2,110,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the oversight and licensing
activities for assisted living facilities. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, moneys appropriated herein may be
suballocated to the state office for the aging, a portion of which
may be transferred to state operations and aid to localities (26870)
... 2,110,000 ..................................... (re. $1,860,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the oversight and licensing
activities for assisted living facilities. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, moneys appropriated herein may be
suballocated to the state office for the aging, a portion of which
may be transferred to state operations and aid to localities (26870)
... 2,110,000 ..................................... (re. $1,860,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to the oversight and licensing
activities for assisted living facilities. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, moneys appropriated herein may be
suballocated to the state office for the aging, a portion of which
may be transferred to state operations and aid to localities (26870)
... 2,110,000 ..................................... (re. $1,860,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the oversight and licensing
activities for assisted living facilities. Subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, moneys appropriated herein may be

966 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
suballocated to the state office for the aging, a portion of which
may be transferred to state operations and aid to localities (26870)
... 2,110,000 ..................................... (re. $1,860,000)
OFFICE OF PRIMARY CARE AND HEALTH SYSTEMS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses to support the alliance for donation (26805)
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses to support the center for liver transplant
(26806) ... 252,000 ................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of a quality program for adult care facili-
ties. Such program shall be targeted at facilities with a high popu-
lation of individuals who receive supplemental security income, as
defined in subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of title 42 of the United
States Code, state supplemental payments, Medicaid (with respect to
residents in an assisted living program), or safety net assistance,
as defined in section 159 of the social services law. Such program
shall support improvements to the quality of life for adult care
facility residents by funding projects including clothing allow-
ances, resident training to support independent living skills,
improvements in food quality, outdoor leisure projects, and
cultural, recreational and other leisure events, in accordance with
a plan approved by the residents' council, the department, and the
director of the division of the budget, provided however that such
expenditure shall not be used to supplant the obligations of the
facility operator to provide a safe comfortable living environment
for residents in a good state or repair and sanitation. The depart-
ment, subject to approval of the director of the budget, shall
develop an allocation methodology taking into account financial
status of the facility, resident needs, and the population of resi-
dents who receive supplemental security income, as defined in
subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of title of the United States Code,
state supplemental payments, Medicaid (with respect to residents in
an assisted living program), or safety net assistance. Such allo-
cation shall serve as the basis of distribution to eligible facili-
ties ... 3,266,000 .................................. (re. $195,000)
For an operating assistance subprogram for enriched housing. To the
extent that funds are appropriated for such purposes, the department
is authorized to pay an operating subsidy for SSI recipients who are
residents in certified not-for-profit or public enriched housing
programs. Such subsidy shall not exceed $115 per month per each SSI
recipient and will be paid directly to the certified operator. If
appropriations are not sufficient to meet such maximum monthly
payments, such subsidy shall be reduced proportionately ............
380,000 ............................................. (re. $380,000)
For services and expenses of the coalition for the institutionalized
aged and disabled ... 75,000 ......................... (re. $37,000)

967 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to providing care teams at home for
low-income older adults (59093) ... 6,300,000 ..... (re. $6,300,000)
Notwithstanding section 112 or 163 of the state finance law or any
contrary provision of law, for services and expenses related to
providing relief to high-need family caregivers in respite care at
Adult Care Facilities (59094) ... 7,200,000 ....... (re. $7,200,000)
For services and expenses of Alliance for Donation. A portion of this
appropriation may be transferred to state operations appropriations
(59117) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Alliance for Donation (Donate Life New
York State) (59119) ... 500,000 ..................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Alliance for Donation, Inc
(59118) ... 400,000 ................................. (re. $400,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses to support the alliance for donation (26805)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of a quality program for adult care facili-
ties. Such program shall be targeted at facilities with a high popu-
lation of individuals who receive supplemental security income, as
defined in subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of title 42 of the United
States Code, state supplemental payments, Medicaid (with respect to
residents in an assisted living program), or safety net assistance,
as defined in section 159 of the social services law. Such program
shall support improvements to the quality of life for adult care
facility residents by funding projects including clothing allow-
ances, resident training to support independent living skills,
improvements in food quality, outdoor leisure projects, and
cultural, recreational and other leisure events, in accordance with
a plan approved by the residents' council, the department, and the
director of the division of the budget, provided however that such
expenditure shall not be used to supplant the obligations of the
facility operator to provide a safe comfortable living environment
for residents in a good state or repair and sanitation. The depart-
ment, subject to approval of the director of the budget, shall
develop an allocation methodology taking into account financial
status of the facility, resident needs, and the population of resi-
dents who receive supplemental security income, as defined in
subchapter XVI of chapter 7 of title of the United States Code,
state supplemental payments, Medicaid (with respect to residents in
an assisted living program), or safety net assistance. Such allo-
cation shall serve as the basis of distribution to eligible facili-
ties ... 3,266,000 ................................... (re. $39,000)
For services and expenses of the coalition for the institutionalized
aged and disabled (26845) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $24,000)
For services and expenses, including grants, of the long term care
community coalition for an advocacy program on behalf of seniors
with long term care needs (29531) ... 26,000 .......... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses related to providing care teams at home for
low-income older adults (59093) ... 6,300,000 ..... (re. $6,300,000)

968 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to providing relief to high-need
family caregivers in respite care at Adult Care Facilities (59094)
... 7,200,000 ..................................... (re. $7,200,000)
For services and expenses of the Donate Life Campaign (59119) ........
250,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses to support the center for liver transplant
(26806) ... 252,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses, including grants, of the long term care
community coalition for an advocacy program on behalf of seniors
with long term care needs (29531) ... 26,000 ......... (re. $23,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses to support the alliance for donation (26805)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For additional services and expenses of Alliance for Donation (26885)
... 650,000 ........................................... (re. $3,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses to support the alliance for donation (26805)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For additional services and expenses to support the Alliance for
Donation (26885) ... 500,000 ......................... (re. $14,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Loan Repayment Account - 25144
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For expenses and services related to the health resources and services
administration grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to the
higher education services corporation (26876) ......................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $190,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For expenses and services related to the health resources and services
administration grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to the
higher education services corporation (26876) ......................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For expenses and services related to the health resources and services
administration grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated

969 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to the
higher education services corporation (26876) ......................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $668,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For expenses and services related to the health resources and services
administration grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to the
higher education services corporation (26876) ......................
1,000,000 ............................................. (re. $5,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For expenses and services related to the health resources and services
administration grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to the
higher education services corporation (26876) ......................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $169,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 3, of the laws of 2020:
For expenses and services related to the health resources and services
administration grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated
may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation to the
higher education services corporation (26876) ......................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $116,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Emergency Medical Services Account - 20809
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to emergency medical services (EMS)
administration including but not limited to, expenses related to
training courses and instructor development, expenses of the state
EMS councils and program agencies (26876) ..........................
10,570,000 ........................................ (re. $7,898,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to emergency medical services (EMS)
administration including but not limited to, expenses related to
training courses and instructor development, expenses of the state
EMS councils and program agencies (26876) ..........................
10,570,000 ........................................ (re. $4,080,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund

970 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Professional Medical Conduct Account - 22088
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the medical society contract authorized
pursuant to chapter 582 of the laws of 1984 (29835) ................
990,000 ............................................. (re. $652,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the medical society contract authorized
pursuant to chapter 582 of the laws of 1984 (29835) ................
990,000 ............................................... (re. $7,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the medical society contract authorized
pursuant to chapter 582 of the laws of 1984 (29835) ................
990,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Quality of Care Improvement Account - 22147
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the protection of the health or
property of residents of residential health care facilities that are
found to be deficient including, but not limited to, payment for the
cost of relocation of residents to other facilities and the mainte-
nance and operation of a facility pending correction of deficiencies
or closure (26876) ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the protection of the health or
property of residents of residential health care facilities that are
found to be deficient including, but not limited to, payment for the
cost of relocation of residents to other facilities and the mainte-
nance and operation of a facility pending correction of deficiencies
or closure (26876) ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000)
WADSWORTH CENTER FOR LABORATORIES AND RESEARCH PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a genetic disease screening program
(29824) ... 487,000 ................................. (re. $487,000)
For services and expenses related to rare disease research, treatment,
education, programming, and related activities. Of amounts appropri-
ated herein, notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law, a
portion of this appropriation may be awarded to Empire State ALS
Alliance to support Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS) research and
treatment. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to

971 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state operations appropriations (59095) ............................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of a genetic disease screening program
(29824) ... 487,000 ................................. (re. $381,000)
For services and expenses related to rare disease research, treatment,
education, programming, and related activities. Of amounts appropri-
ated herein, notwithstanding section one hundred sixty-three of the
state finance law, a portion of this appropriation may be awarded to
Empire State ALS Alliance to support Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis
(ALS) research and treatment. A portion of this appropriation may be
transferred to state operations appropriations (59095) .............
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,750,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of a genetic disease screening program
(29824) ... 487,000 ................................. (re. $267,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Block Grant Account - 25183
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the various health prevention, diagnos-
tic, detection and treatment services (26981) ......................
3,682,000 ......................................... (re. $3,682,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 3, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of the various health prevention, diagnos-
tic, detection and treatment services (26981) ......................
3,682,000 ......................................... (re. $3,682,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Breast Cancer Research and Education Account - 20155
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to breast cancer research and educa-
tion pursuant to section 97-yy of the state finance law (26884) ....
2,580,000 ......................................... (re. $2,580,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to breast cancer research and educa-
tion pursuant to section 97-yy of the state finance law (26884) ....
2,580,000 ......................................... (re. $2,436,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to breast cancer research and educa-
tion pursuant to section 97-yy of the state finance law (26884) ....
2,580,000 ......................................... (re. $1,478,000)

972 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Spinal Cord Injury Research Fund Account - 21987
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses, including grants, related to spinal cord
injury research pursuant to chapter 338 of the laws of 1998 (26622)
... 8,500,000 ..................................... (re. $8,475,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses, including grants, related to spinal cord
injury research pursuant to chapter 338 of the laws of 1998 (26622)
... 8,500,000 ..................................... (re. $8,451,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses, including grants, related to spinal cord
injury research For services and expenses related to spinal cord
injury research pursuant to chapter 338 of the laws of 1998 (26622)
... 8,500,000 ..................................... (re. $5,889,000)

973 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 1,014,769,000 26,336,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 1,500,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 1,016,269,000 26,336,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
STUDENT GRANT AND AWARD PROGRAMS ......................... 1,016,269,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For tuition assistance awards, including
part-time tuition assistance program
awards, provided to eligible students as
defined in sections 667 and 667-c of the
education law and as further defined in
rules and regulations adopted by the
regents upon the recommendation of the
commissioner of education and distributed
in accordance with rules and regulations
adopted by the trustees of the higher
education services corporation upon the
recommendation of the president and
approval of the director of the budget.
Provided, however, notwithstanding any law,
rule or regulation to the contrary, an
applicant for an award funded by this
appropriation must either (a) have been a
legal resident of New York state for at
least one year immediately preceding the
beginning of the semester, quarter or term
of attendance for which application for
assistance is made, or (b) be a legal
resident of New York state and have been a
legal resident during his or her last two
semesters of high school either prior to
graduation, or prior to admission to
college.
Provided, further, that an applicant for an
award funded by this appropriation who is
not a legal resident of New York state
eligible pursuant to the preceding para-
graph, but is a United States citizen, a
permanent lawful resident, an individual
who is granted U or T nonimmigrant status

974 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
pursuant to the Victims of Trafficking and
Violence Protection Act of 2000, a person
granted temporary protected status pursu-
ant to the Federal Immigration Act of
1990, an individual of a class of refugees
paroled by the attorney general of the
United States under his or her parole
authority pertaining to the admission of
aliens to the United States, or an appli-
cant without lawful immigration status
shall be eligible for an award funded by
this appropriation provided that the
applicant: (a) attended a registered New
York state high school for two or more
years, graduated from a registered New
York state high school and applied for
attendance at the institution of higher
education for the undergraduate study for
which an award is sought within five years
of receiving a New York state high school
diploma; or (b) attended an approved New
York state program for a state high school
equivalency diploma, received a state high
school equivalency diploma and applied for
attendance at the institution of higher
education for the undergraduate study for
which an award is sought within five years
of receiving a state high school equiv-
alency diploma; or (c) is otherwise eligi-
ble for the payment of tuition and fees at
a rate no greater than that imposed for
resident students of the state university
of New York, the city university of New
York or community colleges. Provided,
further, that an applicant without lawful
immigration status shall also be required
to file an affidavit with such institution
of higher education stating that the
student has filed an application to legal-
ize his or her immigration status, or will
file such an application as soon as he or
she is eligible to do so.
Provided, further, that recipients of an
award funded by this appropriation shall
comply with all requirements promulgated
by the corporation for the administration
of an award including, but not limited to,
an application form and procedures estab-
lished by the president of the corporation
that shall allow an applicant who meets
the requirements set forth in the preced-
ing paragraph to apply directly to the

975 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
corporation for an award without having to
submit information to any other state or
federal agency; provided, all information
contained with the applications filed with
such corporation shall be deemed confiden-
tial, except that the corporation shall be
entitled to release information to partic-
ipating institutions as necessary for the
administration of an award to the extent
required pursuant to article 6 of the
public officers law or otherwise required
by law.
The moneys hereby appropriated shall be
available for expenses already accrued or
to accrue. Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, the amounts appro-
priated herein shall be net of refunds,
rebates, reimbursements, credits, repay-
ments, and/or disallowances received by
the higher education services corporation
as repayments of past tuition assistance
program disbursements in accordance with
audit allowances, upon approval of the
director of the budget, for transfer to
the federal department of education fund
appropriation of the state grant programs
in order to reduce state cost should addi-
tional federal assistance become available
in the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
Provided, however, notwithstanding any law,
rule or regulation to the contrary, up to
$107,300,000 of the moneys hereby appro-
priated shall be available for the payment
of excelsior scholarship program awards.
A portion of these funds may be paid to the
City University of New York to reimburse
the tuition credit provided pursuant to
section 669-h of the education law.
Provided, however, notwithstanding any
law, rule or regulation to the contrary,
up to $2,000,000 of the moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for the
payment of enhanced tuition awards. A
portion of the funds appropriated herein
may be transferred to the miscellaneous
special revenue fund - state university
revenue offset account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, no applicant shall be denied an
award provided pursuant to this appropri-
ation solely due to his or her (a) incar-
ceration in a federal, state, or other

976 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
penal institution, (b) not having earned
at least 12 credits in each of two consec-
utive semesters at one of the institutions
named in paragraph a of subdivision 2 of
section 667-c of the education law, or (c)
part-time enrollment at a community
college or a public agricultural and tech-
nical college in a non-degree workforce
credential program directly leading to the
employment or advancement of a student in
a "significant industry" as identified by
the department of labor in its three most
recent statewide significant industries
reports published preceding the student's
enrollment in such non-degree workforce
credential program (30014) ................. 937,094,000
For the payment of scholarship awards
including New York state math and science
teaching initiative scholarship pursuant
to section 669-d of the education law,
veteran's tuition assistance program
pursuant to section 669-a of the education
law, military enhanced recognition, incen-
tive and tribute (MERIT) scholarships
pursuant to section 668-e of the education
law, world trade center memorial scholar-
ships pursuant to section 668-d of the
education law, memorial scholarships for
children and spouses of deceased fire-
fighters, volunteer firefighters and
police officers, peace officers and emer-
gency medical service workers pursuant to
section 668-b of the education law, Ameri-
can airlines flight 587 memorial scholar-
ships and program grants pursuant to
section 668-f of the education law, schol-
arships for academic excellence pursuant
to section 670-b of the education law,
regents health care opportunity scholar-
ships pursuant to section 678 of the
education law, regents professional oppor-
tunity scholarships pursuant to section
679 of the education law, regents awards
for children of deceased and disabled
veterans pursuant to section 668 of the
education law, regents physician loan
forgiveness awards pursuant to section 677
of the education law, and Continental
Airline flight 3407 memorial scholarships
pursuant to section 668-g of the education
law.

977 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a portion of the moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for the
payment of New York state science, tech-
nology, engineering and mathematics incen-
tive program awards; provided, however,
that eligibility for an award under this
appropriation shall be limited to under-
graduate students who (1) received such
award in or after the 2014-15 academic
year and remain eligible for such award in
the 2026-27 academic year or (2) are
matriculated in an approved undergraduate
program leading to a career in science,
technology, engineering or mathematics at
a New York state public institution of
higher education, provided further that
such eligibility for new awards granted
during the 2026-27 academic year shall
also be limited to an applicant who: (a)
graduates from a high school located in
New York state during the 2025-26 school
year; (b) graduates within the top ten
percent of his or her high school class;
(c) enrolls in full time study beginning
in the fall term after his or her high
school graduation in an approved under-
graduate program in science, technology,
engineering or mathematics, as defined by
the corporation, at a New York state
public institution of higher education;
(d) signs a contract with the corporation
agreeing that his or her award will be
converted to a student loan in the event
the student fails to comply with the terms
of such contract and the requirements set
forth in this appropriation; and (e)
complies with the applicable provisions of
this appropriation and all requirements
promulgated by the corporation for the
administration of the program.
Provided further that, such awards shall be
granted by the corporation: (a) for the
2026-27 academic year to applicants who
the corporation has determined are eligi-
ble to receive such awards; (b) in an
amount equal to the amount of undergradu-
ate tuition for residents of New York
state charged by the state university of
New York or actual tuition charged, which-
ever is less; provided, however, (i) a
student who receives educational grants

978 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
and/or scholarships that cover the
student's full cost of attendance shall
not be eligible for an award under this
program; (ii) for a student who receives
educational grants and/or scholarships
that cover less than the student's full
cost of attendance, such grants and/or
scholarships shall not be deemed duplica-
tive of this program and may be held
concurrently with an award under this
program, provided that the combined bene-
fits do not exceed the student's full cost
of attendance; and (iii) an award under
this program shall be applied to tuition
after the application of all other educa-
tional grants and scholarships limited to
tuition and shall be reduced in an amount
equal to such educational grants and/or
scholarships; provided, no award shall be
final until the recipient's successful
completion of a term has been certified by
the institution.
Provided further that awards granted pursu-
ant to this appropriation shall require a
contract between the award recipient and
the corporation to authorize the corpo-
ration to convert to a student loan the
full amount of the award given pursuant to
this appropriation, plus interest, accord-
ing to a schedule to be determined by the
corporation if: (a) a recipient fails to
complete an approved undergraduate program
in science, technology, engineering or
mathematics or changes majors to a program
of undergraduate study other than in
science, technology, engineering or math-
ematics; (b) upon completion of such
undergraduate degree program a recipient
fails to either (i) complete five years of
continuous full-time employment in the
science, technology, engineering or math-
ematics field with a public or private
entity located within New York state, or
(ii) maintain residency in New York state
for such period of employment; or (c) a
recipient fails to respond to requests by
the corporation for the status of his or
her academic or professional progress.
Provided further that such terms and condi-
tions of the preceding paragraph: (a)
shall be deferred for individuals who
graduate with a degree in an approved

979 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
undergraduate program in science, technol-
ogy, engineering or mathematics and enroll
on at least a half-time basis in a gradu-
ate or higher degree program or other
professional licensure degree program
until they are conferred a degree, and
shall also be deferred for any inter-
ruption in undergraduate study or employ-
ment as established by the rules and regu-
lations of the corporation; (b) may also
be deferred for a grace period, to be
established by the corporation, following
the completion of an approved undergradu-
ate program in science, technology, engi-
neering or mathematics, a graduate or
higher degree program or other profes-
sional licensure degree program; (c) shall
be cancelled upon the death of the recipi-
ent; and (d) notwithstanding any
provisions of this appropriation to the
contrary, authorize the corporation to
provide for the deferral, waiver or
suspension of any financial obligation
which would involve extreme hardship
pursuant to rules and regulations promul-
gated by the corporation.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a portion of the moneys hereby
appropriated shall be available for the
payment of get on your feet loan forgive-
ness program awards; provided, however,
that eligibility for an award under this
appropriation shall be limited to appli-
cants who: (a) have graduated from a high
school located in New York state or
attended an approved New York state
program for a state high school equivalen-
cy diploma and received such high school
equivalency diploma; (b) have graduated
and obtained an undergraduate degree from
a college or university with its headquar-
ters located in New York state in or after
the 2014-15 academic year; (c) apply for
this program within two years of obtaining
such degree; (d) are a participant in a
federal income-driven repayment plan whose
payment amount is generally 10 percent of
discretionary income; (e) have income of
less than $50,000, which for purposes of
this program shall be the total adjusted
gross income of the applicant and the
applicant's spouse, if applicable; (f)

980 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
comply with subdivision 5 of section 661
of the education law; and (g) work in New
York state, if employed.
Provided further, that an applicant whose
annual income is less than $50,000 shall
be eligible to receive an award equal to
100 percent of his or her monthly federal
income-driven repayment plan payments for
24 months of repayment under the federal
program, provided however, that awards
shall be deferred for recipients who have
been granted a deferment or forbearance
under the federal income-driven repayment
plan, provided further, that upon
completion of such deferment or forbear-
ance period, such recipient shall be
eligible to receive an award for the
remaining time period stated in the
preceding paragraph.
Provided further, that a recipient who is
not a resident of New York state at the
time any payment is made under this
program shall be required to refund such
payment to the state, provided further,
that the corporation shall be authorized
to recover such payments pursuant to rules
and regulations promulgated by the corpo-
ration.
Provided further, that a student who is
delinquent or in default on a student loan
made under any statutory New York state or
federal education loan program or has
failed to comply with the terms of a
service condition imposed by an award made
pursuant to article 14 of the education
law or has failed to repay an award made
pursuant to article 14 of education law
shall be ineligible to receive an award
under this program until such delinquency,
default or failure is cured.
Provided further that recipients of an award
shall comply with the applicable
provisions of this appropriation and all
requirements promulgated by the corpo-
ration for the administration of this
program.
A portion of the moneys hereby appropriated
shall be available for expenses already
accrued for payment of awards approved,
but not fully disbursed, prior to the
2026-27 academic year for the regents

981 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
physician loan forgiveness program pursu-
ant to section 677 of the education law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
no portion of this appropriation is avail-
able for payment of regents college schol-
arships, regents professional education in
nursing scholarships, empire state chal-
lenger scholarships for teachers, empire
state challenger fellowships for teachers,
or empire state scholarships of excel-
lence. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, no portion of this appropriation
is available for the payment of interest
on federal loans on behalf of students
ineligible to have such payment paid by
the federal government. A portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred to the miscellaneous special reven-
ue fund - state university revenue offset
account (30001) ............................. 65,514,000
For payment of scholarship and loan forgive-
ness awards of the senator Patricia K.
McGee nursing faculty scholarship program
and the nursing faculty loan forgiveness
incentive program awarded pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended
by chapters 161 and 746 of the laws of
2005; provided, up to $2,000,000 of this
appropriation shall be made available for
the senator Patricia K. McGee nursing
faculty scholarship program.
A portion of the moneys hereby appropriated
shall be available for expenses already
accrued for payment of awards approved,
but not fully disbursed, prior to the
2026-27 academic year for the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholar-
ship program pursuant to chapter 63 of the
laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161
and 746 of the laws of 2005. A portion of
the funds appropriated herein may be
transferred to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund - state university revenue
offset account (30012) ....................... 3,933,000
For additional payment of scholarship awards
of the senator Patricia K. McGee nursing
faculty scholarship program awarded pursu-
ant to chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as
amended by chapters 161 and 746 of the
laws of 2005. A portion of the moneys
hereby appropriated shall be available for
expenses already accrued for payment of

982 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
awards approved, but not fully disbursed,
prior to the 2026-27 academic year. A
portion of the funds appropriated herein
may be transferred to the miscellaneous
special revenue fund - state university
revenue offset account (30033) ............... 1,000,000
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of
the regents licensed social worker loan
forgiveness program awarded pursuant to
chapter 57 of the laws of 2005 as amended
by chapter 161 of the laws of 2005 (30016) ... 1,728,000
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of
the New York young farmers loan forgive-
ness incentive program (30006) ................. 150,000
For additional services and expenses of the
New York young farmers loan forgiveness
incentive program (30009) ....................... 50,000
For payment of scholarship awards of the New
York state child welfare worker incentive
scholarship program. A portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred to the miscellaneous special reven-
ue fund - state university revenue offset
account (30026) ................................. 50,000
For additional payment of scholarship awards
of the New York state child welfare worker
incentive scholarship program. A portion
of the funds appropriated herein may be
transferred to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund - state university revenue
offset account (30035) ......................... 100,000
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of
the New York state child welfare worker
loan forgiveness incentive program (30027) ...... 50,000
For payment of scholarship awards of the get
a shot to make your future vaccine incen-
tive and vaccinate, educate, graduate
vaccine incentive programs. A portion of
the funds appropriated herein may be
transferred to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund - state university revenue
offset account (30040) ....................... 1,100,000
For payment of scholarship awards of the New
York State masters-in-education teacher
incentive scholarship program, pursuant to
section 669-f of the education law. A
portion of the funds appropriated herein
may be transferred to the miscellaneous
special revenue fund - state university
revenue offset account ....................... 4,000,000
--------------

983 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Program account subtotal ............... 1,014,769,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Grants Account - 20199
For services and expenses in fulfillment of
donor bequests, grants, gifts, or other
contributions including but not limited to
those related to student financial aid
programs administered by the higher educa-
tion services corporation (30024) ............ 1,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
World Trade Center Memorial Scholarship Account - 23812
For the payment of world trade center memo-
rial scholarships awards pursuant to
section 668-d of the education law.
Provided, however, notwithstanding any
law, rule or regulation to the contrary,
monies shall be payable from the fund on
the audit and warrant of the comptroller
on vouchers approved and certified by the
president of the higher education services
corporation (30031) ............................ 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000
--------------

984 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
STUDENT GRANT AND AWARD PROGRAMS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of scholarship and loan forgiveness awards of the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program and the nurs-
ing faculty loan forgiveness incentive program awarded pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005; provided, up to $2,000,000 of this appropriation
shall be made available for the senator Patricia K. McGee nursing
faculty scholarship program.
A portion of the moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for
expenses already accrued for payment of awards approved, but not
fully disbursed, prior to the 2025-26 academic year for the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005. A portion of the funds appropriated herein may be
transferred to the miscellaneous special revenue fund - state
university revenue offset account (30012) ..........................
3,933,000 ......................................... (re. $3,933,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the regents licensed social
worker loan forgiveness program awarded pursuant to chapter 57 of
the laws of 2005 as amended by chapter 161 of the laws of 2005
(30016) ... 1,728,000 ............................. (re. $1,728,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York young farmers
loan forgiveness incentive program (30006) .........................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For payment of scholarship awards of the New York state child welfare
worker incentive scholarship program. A portion of the funds appro-
priated herein may be transferred to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund - state university revenue offset account (30026) .....
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York state child
welfare worker loan forgiveness incentive program (30027) ..........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For payment of scholarship awards of the get a shot to make your
future vaccine incentive and vaccinate, educate, graduate vaccine
incentive programs. A portion of the funds appropriated herein may
be transferred to the miscellaneous special revenue fund - state
university revenue offset account ..................................
2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of scholarship and loan forgiveness awards of the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program and the nurs-
ing faculty loan forgiveness incentive program awarded pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005; provided, up to $2,000,000 of this appropriation
shall be made available for the senator Patricia K. McGee nursing
faculty scholarship program.

985 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
A portion of the moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for
expenses already accrued for payment of awards approved, but not
fully disbursed, prior to the 2024-25 academic year for the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005. A portion of the funds appropriated herein may be
transferred to the miscellaneous special revenue fund - state
university revenue offset account (30012) ..........................
3,933,000 ......................................... (re. $2,252,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the regents licensed social
worker loan forgiveness program awarded pursuant to chapter 57 of
the laws of 2005 as amended by chapter 161 of the laws of 2005
(30016) ... 1,728,000 ............................. (re. $1,728,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York young farmers
loan forgiveness incentive program (30006) .........................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For payment of scholarship awards of the New York state child welfare
worker incentive scholarship program. A portion of the funds appro-
priated herein may be transferred to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund - state university revenue offset account (30026) .....
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York state child
welfare worker loan forgiveness incentive program (30027) ..........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For payment of scholarship awards of the New York state part-time
scholarship award program (30028) ... 3,129,000 ... (re. $2,806,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of scholarship and loan forgiveness awards of the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program and the nurs-
ing faculty loan forgiveness incentive program awarded pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005; provided, up to $2,000,000 of this appropriation
shall be made available for the senator Patricia K. McGee nursing
faculty scholarship program.
A portion of the moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for
expenses already accrued for payment of awards approved, but not
fully disbursed, prior to the 2023-24 academic year for the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005. A portion of the funds appropriated herein may be
transferred to the miscellaneous special revenue fund - state
university offset account (30012) ... 3,933,000 ... (re. $2,238,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the regents licensed social
worker loan forgiveness program awarded pursuant to chapter 57 of
the laws of 2005 as amended by chapter 161 of the laws of 2005
(30016) ... 1,728,000 ............................. (re. $1,365,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York young farmers
loan forgiveness incentive program (30006) .........................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $117,000)
For payment of scholarship awards of the New York state child welfare
worker incentive scholarship program. A portion of the funds appro-

986 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
priated herein may be transferred to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund - state university offset account (30026) .............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York state child
welfare worker loan forgiveness incentive program (30027) ..........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For payment of scholarship awards of the New York state part-time
scholarship award program (30028) ..................................
3,129,000 ......................................... (re. $2,828,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment of scholarship and loan forgiveness awards of the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program and the nurs-
ing faculty loan forgiveness incentive program awarded pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005; provided, up to $2,000,000 of this appropriation
shall be made available for the senator Patricia K. McGee nursing
faculty scholarship program.
A portion of the moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for
expenses already accrued for payment of awards approved, but not
fully disbursed, prior to the 2022-23 academic year for the senator
Patricia K. McGee nursing faculty scholarship program pursuant to
chapter 63 of the laws of 2005 as amended by chapters 161 and 746 of
the laws of 2005. A portion of the funds appropriated herein may be
transferred to the miscellaneous special revenue fund - state
university offset account (30012) ... 3,933,000 ... (re. $1,625,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the regents licensed social
worker loan forgiveness program awarded pursuant to chapter 57 of
the laws of 2005 as amended by chapter 161 of the laws of 2005
(30016) ... 1,728,000 ............................... (re. $616,000)
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York young farmers
loan forgiveness incentive program (30006) .........................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $67,000)
For payment of scholarship awards of the New York state child welfare
worker incentive scholarship program. A portion of the funds appro-
priated herein may be transferred to the miscellaneous special
revenue fund - state university offset account (30026) .............
50,000 ............................................... (re. $18,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York young farmers
loan forgiveness incentive program (30006) .........................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For the payment of loan forgiveness awards of the New York state
teacher loan forgiveness program, provided, however, notwithstanding
any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, up to $250,000 of the
moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for the 2018-19
academic year (30030) ... 1,000,000 ................. (re. $330,000)

987 12653-09-6
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For the payment of New York state science, technology, engineering and
mathematics incentive program awards at private degree granting
institutions of higher education (30029) ...........................
4,000,000 ........................................... (re. $140,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 54,
section 2, of the laws of 2015:
For payment of awards for the New York state achievement and invest-
ment in merit scholarship (30011) ... 5,000,000 ... (re. $1,330,000)

988 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 225,950,000 1,394,486,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 8,620,363,000 24,271,024,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 96,088,000 537,923,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 8,942,401,000 26,203,433,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
COUNTER-TERRORISM PROGRAM .................................. 575,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For the provision of grants to counties and
the city of New York for services and
expenses associated with the prevention of
domestic terrorism, homegrown violent
extremism and targeted violence, including
but not limited to threat assessment
management teams. Funds shall be allocated
from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of homeland security and emergency
services and approved by the director of
the budget (30326) .......................... 10,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 10,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Domestic Incident Preparedness Account - 25378
For services and expenses related to home-
land security grant programs to support
emergency preparedness and to combat
terrorism and weapons of mass destruction.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred
and/or interchanged to other state agen-
cies federal fund - state operations and
aid to localities appropriations to
support state agency and local expendi-
tures associated with the implementation
of a comprehensive statewide antiterrorism
program. Funds appropriated herein may be
transferred or suballocated to state agen-

989 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
cies or distributed to localities in
accordance with a plan developed by the
commissioner of the division of homeland
security and emergency services and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein that are trans-
ferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or
interchanged from this appropriation
(30326) .................................... 565,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 565,000,000
--------------
DISASTER ASSISTANCE PROGRAM .............................. 8,194,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of the state's share of costs
resulting from natural or man-made disas-
ters including aid requested by and
provided to member states of the emergency
management assistance compact, and includ-
ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1,
2026. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, the state comptroller
shall credit these appropriations with
federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant
program or any other federal program
providing disaster aid, in recognition
that the state was required to make
payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability
of federal reimbursement. The director of
the budget is hereby authorized to subal-
locate or transfer such amounts as are
necessary to any program in any eligible
state department or agency, including
transfers to the general fund - state
purposes account, special revenue funds -
state operations, or the capital projects
fund, to accomplish the purpose of this
appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the division of homeland security and
emergency services may intercept a portion
of the funds otherwise due to applicants
under this appropriation to use for repay-

990 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ment of funds owed by applicants to the
division of homeland security and emergen-
cy services resulting from any deobli-
gations or disallowances.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein that are trans-
ferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or
interchanged from this appropriation;
provided however, any amounts transferred
to the public safety communications
account for operating expenses shall lapse
on the same date as the appropriation to
which such funds were transferred (30315) .. 150,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 150,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Grants for Disaster Assistance Account - 25324
For payment of the federal government's
share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters, including liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2026. The
director of the budget is hereby author-
ized to suballocate, transfer and/or
interchange such amounts as are necessary
to any eligible state department or agen-
cy, including transfers to other federal
funds, to accomplish the purpose of this
appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the division of homeland security and
emergency services may intercept a portion
of the funds otherwise due to applicants
under this appropriation to use for repay-
ment of funds owed by applicants to the
division of homeland security and emergen-
cy services resulting from any deobli-
gations or disallowances.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein that are trans-
ferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or
interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) .................................. 8,000,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 8,000,000,000
--------------

991 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Hazard Mitigation Account - 25548
For payment of the federal share for the
hazard mitigation revolving loan program
to provide loans to local governments for
eligible hazard mitigation activities
pursuant to the safeguarding tomorrow
through ongoing risk mitigation act of
2020 and corresponding federal regu-
lations, to reduce disaster risks for
homeowners, businesses, non-profit organ-
izations, and communities. Funds appropri-
ated herein may be transferred to state
operations for administrative expenses
(30315) ..................................... 40,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 40,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Hazard Mitigation Revolving Loan Account - 22266
For payment of the state share for federal
capitalization grants for the hazard miti-
gation revolving loan program to provide
loans to local governments for eligible
hazard mitigation activities pursuant to
the safeguarding tomorrow through ongoing
risk mitigation act of 2020 and corre-
sponding federal regulations, to reduce
disaster risks for homeowners, businesses,
non-profit organizations, and communities.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred
to state operations for administrative
expenses (30315) ............................. 4,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 4,000,000
--------------
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ................................ 73,163,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For the provision of grants to counties
related to emergency services and
response, including but not limited to
supplies, equipment, vehicles, and other

992 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
items deemed essential to effective emer-
gency preparedness and response activ-
ities. Grants shall be available to any
county except a county wholly contained
within a city. No funds shall be expended
from this appropriation until the director
of the budget has approved a plan submit-
ted by the division of homeland security
and emergency services in such detail as
required by the director of the budget ...... 50,000,000
For services and expenses associated with
red cross emergency response preparedness,
including support for capital projects and
ensuring an adequate blood supply. Funds
shall be allocated from this appropriation
pursuant to a plan prepared by the commis-
sioner of the division of homeland securi-
ty and emergency services and approved by
the director of the budget (30317) ........... 3,300,000
For additional services and expenses associ-
ated with red cross emergency response
preparedness, including but not limited to
support for capital projects, ensuring an
adequate blood supply, and emergency
response vehicles (30300) ...................... 500,000
For additional services and expenses associ-
ated with red cross emergency response
preparedness, including but not limited to
support for capital projects, ensuring an
adequate blood supply, and emergency
response vehicles (30304) .................... 1,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 54,800,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Grants for Emergency Management Performance
Account - 25516
For costs associated with emergency manage-
ment (30317) ................................ 15,363,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 15,363,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Radiological Emergency Preparedness Account - 21944
For services and expenses of counties and
municipalities participating in radiologi-

993 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
cal preparedness activities related to
section 29-c of the executive law (30317) .... 3,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 3,000,000
--------------
FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL PROGRAM ......................... 15,238,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistant Account - 10000
For the provision of direct payments of
training stipends to volunteer firefight-
ers (30318) .................................. 6,500,000
For the provision of grants to munici-
palities to support local fire investi-
gations pursuant to a plan developed by
the commissioner of the division of home-
land security and emergency services and
approved by the director of the budget
(30807) ...................................... 3,300,000
For services and expenses of Firemen's Asso-
ciation of the State of New York (FASNY) ....... 200,000
For services and expenses associated with
the New York State Professional Fire
Fighters Association (NYSPFFA) ................. 750,000
For services and expenses related to the
City of Tonawanda Fire Department .............. 200,000
For services and expenses related to the
Oceanic Hook & Ladder Company 1 ................ 150,000
For services and expenses related to the
Maplewood Fire Department ....................... 50,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 11,150,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Emergency Services Revolving Loan Account - 20150
For services and expenses, including prior
year liabilities, of the emergency
services revolving loan account pursuant
to section 97-pp of the state finance law
(30318) ...................................... 3,788,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 3,788,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund

994 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Volunteer Firefighting Recruitment and Retention Account
- 22173
For services and expenses associated with
the volunteer firefighting and emergency
services recruitment and retention fund
pursuant to section 99-q of the state
finance law (30318) ............................ 300,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 300,000
--------------
INTEROPERABLE COMMUNICATIONS PROGRAM ........................ 85,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Statewide Public Safety Communications Account - 22123
For the provision of grants or reimbursement
to counties for the development, consol-
idation or operation of public safety
communications systems or networks
designed to support statewide interopera-
ble communications for first responders to
be distributed pursuant to a plan devel-
oped by the commissioner of homeland secu-
rity and emergency services and approved
by the director of the budget (30327) ....... 65,000,000
For the provision of grants to counties for
costs related to the operations of public
safety dispatch centers to be distributed
pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the
director of the budget. Such plan may
consider such factors as population densi-
ty and emergency call volume (30331) ........ 10,000,000
For services and expenses related to the
creation and operation of a fiberoptic
cable based network for public safety
answering point centers, to be distributed
pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the
director of the budget (30803) .............. 10,000,000
--------------

995 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
COUNTER-TERRORISM PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the provision of grants to counties and the city of New York for
services and expenses associated with the prevention of domestic
terrorism, homegrown violent extremism and targeted violence,
including but not limited to threat assessment management teams.
Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the division of homeland security
and emergency services and approved by the director of the budget
(30326) ... 10,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the provision of grants to counties and the city of New York for
services and expenses associated with the prevention of domestic
terrorism, homegrown violent extremism and targeted violence,
including but not limited to threat assessment management teams.
Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant to a plan
prepared by the commissioner of the division of homeland security
and emergency services and approved by the director of the budget
(30326) ... 10,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the provision of grants to counties and the city of New York for
services and expenses associated with domestic terrorism threat
assessment management teams. Funds shall be allocated from this
appropriation pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner of the
division of homeland security and emergency services and approved by
the director of the budget (30326) .................................
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,581,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Domestic Incident Preparedness Account - 25378
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to homeland security grant programs
to support emergency preparedness and to combat terrorism and weap-
ons of mass destruction. Funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred and/or interchanged to other state agencies federal fund -
state operations and aid to localities appropriations to support
state agency and local expenditures associated with the implementa-
tion of a comprehensive statewide antiterrorism program.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to state
agencies or distributed to localities in accordance with a plan
developed by the commissioner of the division of homeland security
and emergency services and approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as

996 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30326) ... 565,000,000 ......................... (re. $565,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to homeland security grant programs
to support emergency preparedness and to combat terrorism and weap-
ons of mass destruction. Funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred and/or interchanged to other state agencies federal fund -
state operations and aid to localities appropriations to support
state agency and local expenditures associated with the implementa-
tion of a comprehensive statewide antiterrorism program. Funds
appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to state
agencies or distributed to localities in accordance with a plan
developed by the commissioner of the division of homeland security
and emergency services and approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30326) ... 565,000,000 ......................... (re. $565,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to homeland security grant programs
to support emergency preparedness and to combat terrorism and weap-
ons of mass destruction. Funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred and/or interchanged to other state agencies federal fund -
state operations and aid to localities appropriations to support
state agency and local expenditures associated with the implementa-
tion of a comprehensive statewide antiterrorism program. Funds
appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to state
agencies or distributed to localities in accordance with a plan
developed by the commissioner of the division of homeland security
and emergency services and approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30326) ... 565,000,000 ......................... (re. $546,773,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to homeland security grant programs
to support emergency preparedness and to combat terrorism and weap-
ons of mass destruction.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred and/or interchanged to
other state agencies federal fund - state operations and aid to
localities appropriations to support state agency and local expendi-
tures associated with the implementation of a comprehensive state-
wide antiterrorism program. Funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to state agencies or distributed to
localities in accordance with a plan developed by the director of
the office of homeland security and approved by the director of the
budget. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same

997 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (30326) ... 600,000,000 ................... (re. $554,909,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to homeland security grant programs
to support emergency preparedness and to combat terrorism and weap-
ons of mass destruction.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred and/or interchanged to
other state agencies federal fund - state operations and aid to
localities appropriations to support state agency and local expendi-
tures associated with the implementation of a comprehensive state-
wide antiterrorism program. Funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to state agencies or distributed to
localities in accordance with a plan developed by the director of
the office of homeland security and approved by the director of the
budget. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (30326) ... 600,000,000 ................... (re. $407,895,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to homeland security grant programs
to support emergency preparedness and to combat terrorism and weap-
ons of mass destruction.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred and/or interchanged to
other state agencies federal fund - state operations and aid to
localities appropriations to support state agency and local expendi-
tures associated with the implementation of a comprehensive state-
wide antiterrorism program. Funds appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to state agencies or distributed to
localities in accordance with a plan developed by the director of
the office of homeland security and approved by the director of the
budget. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (30326) ... 600,000,000 ................... (re. $340,614,000)
DISASTER ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or

998 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to suballocate or
transfer such amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligi-
ble state department or agency, including transfers to the general
fund - state purposes account, special revenue funds - state oper-
ations, or the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of
this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the division of homeland
security and emergency services may intercept a portion of the funds
otherwise due to applicants under this appropriation to use for
repayment of funds owed by applicants to the division of homeland
security and emergency services resulting from any deobligations or
disallowances.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation;
provided however, any amounts transferred to the public safety
communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on the
same date as the appropriation to which such funds were transferred
(30315) ... 150,000,000 ......................... (re. $144,129,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the division of homeland
security and emergency services may intercept a portion of the funds
otherwise due to applicants under this appropriation to use for
repayment of funds owed by applicants to the division of homeland
security and emergency services resulting from any deobligations or
disallowances.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation;
provided however, any amounts transferred to the public safety
communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on the
same date as the appropriation to which such funds were transferred
(30315) ... 150,000,000 ......................... (re. $150,000,000)

999 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appro-
priation; provided however, any amounts transferred to the public
safety communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on
the same date as the appropriation to which such funds were trans-
ferred (30315) ... 150,000,000 .................. (re. $150,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appro-
priation; provided however, any amounts transferred to the public
safety communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on
the same date as the appropriation to which such funds were trans-
ferred (30315) ... 150,000,000 .................. (re. $150,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including

1000 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appro-
priation; provided however, any amounts transferred to the public
safety communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on
the same date as the appropriation to which such funds were trans-
ferred (30315) ... 150,000,000 .................. (re. $149,938,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appro-
priation; provided however, any amounts transferred to the public
safety communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on
the same date as the appropriation to which such funds were trans-
ferred (30315) ... 150,000,000 .................. (re. $150,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the

1001 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appro-
priation; provided however, any amounts transferred to the public
safety communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on
the same date as the appropriation to which such funds were trans-
ferred (30315) ... 150,000,000 .................. (re. $149,440,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appro-
priation; provided however, any amounts transferred to the public
safety communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on
the same date as the appropriation to which such funds were trans-
ferred (30315) ... 150,000,000 .................. (re. $145,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For payment of the state's share of costs resulting from natural or
man-made disasters including aid requested by and provided to member
states of the emergency management assistance compact, and including
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2017. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall credit
these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to the
federal community development block grant program or any other
federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the
state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or
activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement.

1002 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer such
amounts as are necessary to any program in any eligible state
department or agency, including transfers to the general fund -
state purposes account, special revenue funds - state operations, or
the capital projects fund, to accomplish the purpose of this appro-
priation. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appro-
priation; provided however, any amounts transferred to the public
safety communications account for operating expenses shall lapse on
the same date as the appropriation to which such funds were trans-
ferred (30315) ... 150,000,000 .................. (re. $148,140,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Grants for Disaster Assistance Account - 25324
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2025. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
suballocate, transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are neces-
sary to any eligible state department or agency, including transfers
to other federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropri-
ation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the division of homeland
security and emergency services may intercept a portion of the funds
otherwise due to applicants under this appropriation to use for
repayment of funds owed by applicants to the division of homeland
security and emergency services resulting from any deobligations or
disallowances.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 8,000,000,000 ..................... (re. $8,000,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2024. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the division of homeland
security and emergency services may intercept a portion of the funds
otherwise due to applicants under this appropriation to use for
repayment of funds owed by applicants to the division of homeland
security and emergency services resulting from any deobligations or
disallowances.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as

1003 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 8,000,000,000 ..................... (re. $7,991,888,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2023. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 8,000,000,000 ..................... (re. $3,316,301,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2022. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 4,000,000,000 ....................... (re. $170,651,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2021. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 4,000,000,000 ........................ (re. $12,315,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2020. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 600,000,000 ........................... (re. $1,160,000)

1004 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2019. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 600,000,000 ......................... (re. $415,954,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2018. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 600,000,000 ......................... (re. $552,832,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2017. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to
transfer and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any
eligible state department or agency, including transfers to other
federal funds, to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30315) ... 600,000,000 ......................... (re. $443,632,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
natural or man-made disasters, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2013. A portion of these funds may be used to support
development of a state-of-the-art weather detection system for New
York in collaboration with an academic partner and a private part-
ner. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer
and/or interchange such amounts as are necessary to any eligible
state department, agency or authority, including transfers to both
other federal funds and federal capital funds, to accomplish the
purpose of this appropriation. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein that are transferred or inter-
changed shall lapse on the same date as funds not transferred or
interchanged from this appropriation. Five business days after the

1005 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
close of each month, the division of the budget shall report to the
chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly
ways and means committee total disbursements from this appropri-
ation. Five business days after the close of each month, the divi-
sion of homeland security and emergency services shall provide the
chair of the senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly
ways and means committee with an accounting of all FEMA public
assistance project worksheets for Superstorm Sandy for which
payments have been made or are anticipated from this appropriation
(30315) ... 12,650,000,000 ...................... (re. $214,425,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Hazard Mitigation Account - 25548
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of the federal share for the hazard mitigation revolving
loan program to provide loans to local governments for eligible
hazard mitigation activities pursuant to the safeguarding tomorrow
through ongoing risk mitigation act of 2020 and corresponding feder-
al regulations, to reduce disaster risks for homeowners, businesses,
non-profit organizations, and communities. Funds appropriated herein
may be transferred to state operations for administrative expenses
(30315) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of the federal share for the hazard mitigation revolving
loan program to provide loans to local governments for eligible
hazard mitigation activities pursuant to the safeguarding tomorrow
through ongoing risk mitigation act of 2020 and corresponding feder-
al regulations, to reduce disaster risks for homeowners, businesses,
non-profit organizations, and communities. Funds appropriated herein
may be transferred to state operations for administrative expenses
(30315) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of the federal share for the hazard mitigation revolving
loan program to provide loans to local governments for eligible
hazard mitigation activities pursuant to the safeguarding tomorrow
through ongoing risk mitigation act of 2020 and corresponding feder-
al regulations, to reduce disaster risks for homeowners, businesses,
non-profit organizations, and communities. Funds appropriated herein
may be transferred to state operations for administrative expenses
(30315) ... 13,500,000 ........................... (re. $13,500,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Hazard Mitigation Revolving Loan Account - 22266
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of the state share for federal capitalization grants for
the hazard mitigation revolving loan program to provide loans to

1006 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
local governments for eligible hazard mitigation activities pursuant
to the safeguarding tomorrow through ongoing risk mitigation act of
2020 and corresponding federal regulations, to reduce disaster risks
for homeowners, businesses, non-profit organizations, and communi-
ties. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to state oper-
ations for administrative expenses (30315) .........................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of the state share for federal capitalization grants for
the hazard mitigation revolving loan program to provide loans to
local governments for eligible hazard mitigation activities pursuant
to the safeguarding tomorrow through ongoing risk mitigation act of
2020 and corresponding federal regulations, to reduce disaster risks
for homeowners, businesses, non-profit organizations, and communi-
ties. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to state oper-
ations for administrative expenses (30315) .........................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of the state share for federal capitalization grants for
the hazard mitigation revolving loan program to provide loans to
local governments for eligible hazard mitigation activities pursuant
to the safeguarding tomorrow through ongoing risk mitigation act of
2020 and corresponding federal regulations, to reduce disaster risks
for homeowners, businesses, non-profit organizations, and communi-
ties. Funds appropriated herein may be transferred to state oper-
ations for administrative expenses (30315) .........................
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Disaster Assistance Account - 25500
By chapter 296, section 1, of the laws of 2001, as amended by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For payment of the federal government's share of costs resulting from
the September 11, 2001 attack on the New York City World Trade
Center. The director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer
such amounts as are necessary to any eligible state department,
agency or public authority, including transfer to other federal
funds and accounts to accomplish the purpose of the appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation
(30322) ... 5,000,000,000 ......................... (re. $7,133,000)
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

1007 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses associated with red cross emergency response
preparedness, including support for capital projects and ensuring an
adequate blood supply. Funds shall be allocated from this appropri-
ation pursuant to a plan prepared by the commissioner of the divi-
sion of homeland security and emergency services and approved by the
director of the budget (30317) .....................................
3,300,000 ......................................... (re. $3,300,000)
For additional services and expenses associated with red cross emer-
gency response preparedness, including but not limited to support
for capital projects, ensuring an adequate blood supply, and emer-
gency response vehicles (30304) ....................................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For additional services and expenses associated with red cross emer-
gency response preparedness, including but not limited to support
for capital projects, ensuring an adequate blood supply, and emer-
gency response vehicles (30300) ... 500,000 ......... (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the Mohawk Valley Police Acade-
my's inclusion and diversity training (30301) ... 5,000 (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses associated with Ridgewood Volunteer Ambu-
lance Corp (30341) ... 5,000 .......................... (re. $5,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Grants for Emergency Management Performance Account - 25516
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For costs associated with emergency management (30317) ...............
15,363,000 ....................................... (re. $15,363,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the law of 2024:
For costs associated with emergency management (30317) ...............
15,363,000 ....................................... (re. $15,363,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For costs associated with emergency management (30317) ...............
18,363,000 ....................................... (re. $15,521,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For costs associated with emergency management (30317) ...............
18,363,000 ........................................ (re. $5,366,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For costs associated with emergency management (30317) ...............
18,363,000 ........................................ (re. $6,930,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For costs associated with emergency management (30317) ...............
18,363,000 ....................................... (re. $10,433,000)

1008 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For costs associated with emergency management (30317) ...............
18,363,000 ........................................ (re. $2,066,000)
FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the provision of direct payments of training stipends to volunteer
firefighters (30318) ... 6,500,000 ................ (re. $6,500,000)
For the provision of grants to municipalities to support local fire
investigations pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of
the division of homeland security and emergency services and
approved by the director of the budget (30807) .....................
3,300,000 ......................................... (re. $3,300,000)
For services and expenses associated with the New York State Profes-
sional Fire Fighters Association (NYSPFFA) (30802) .................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses related to the Maynard Fire Department
(30810) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the provision of direct payments of training stipends to volunteer
firefighters (30318) ... 6,500,000 ................ (re. $6,500,000)
For the provision of grants to municipalities to support local fire
investigations pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of
the division of homeland security and emergency services and
approved by the director of the budget (30807) .....................
3,300,000 ......................................... (re. $3,300,000)
For services and expenses associated with the New York State Profes-
sional Fire Fighters Association (NYSPFFA)(30802) ..................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses related to the Maynard Fire Department
(30810) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the provision of direct payments of training stipends to volunteer
firefighters (30318) ... 6,500,000 ................ (re. $1,968,000)
For services and expenses related to the Village of Woodridge Fire
Department (30806) ... 200,000 ...................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses associated with the New York State Profes-
sional Fire Fighters Association (NYSPFFA) (30802) .................
750,000 .............................................. (re. $70,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the Oneida County Fire Chiefs
(30345) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund

1009 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Emergency Services Revolving Loan Account - 20150
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ... 3,788,000 .... (re. $3,788,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ...................................
3,788,000 ......................................... (re. $3,788,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ... 3,788,000 .... (re. $3,788,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ... 3,788,000 .... (re. $3,788,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ... 3,788,000 .... (re. $3,788,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ... 3,788,000 .... (re. $3,788,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ... 3,788,000 .... (re. $3,788,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses, including prior year liabilities, of the
emergency services revolving loan account pursuant to section 97-pp
of the state finance law (30318) ... 3,788,000 .... (re. $3,413,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Volunteer Firefighting Recruitment and Retention Account - 22173
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)

1010 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses associated with the volunteer firefighting
and emergency services recruitment and retention fund pursuant to
section 99-q of the state finance law (30318) ......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
INTEROPERABLE COMMUNICATIONS PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Statewide Public Safety Communications Account - 22123
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-

1011 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget
(30327) ... 65,000,000 ........................... (re. $65,000,000)
For the provision of grants to counties for costs related to the oper-
ations of public safety dispatch centers to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget. Such
plan may consider such factors as population density and emergency
call volume (30331) ................................................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the creation and operation of a
fiberoptic cable based network for public safety answering point
centers, to be distributed pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of homeland security and emergency services and
approved by the director of the budget (30803) .....................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget
(30327) ... 65,000,000 ........................... (re. $65,000,000)
For the provision of grants to counties for costs related to the oper-
ations of public safety dispatch centers to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget. Such
plan may consider such factors as population density and emergency
call volume (30331) ... 10,000,000 ............... (re. $10,000,000)
For services and expenses related to the creation and operation of a
fiberoptic cable based network for public safety answering point
centers, to be distributed pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of homeland security and emergency services and
approved by the director of the budget (30803) .....................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget
(30327) ... 65,000,000 ........................... (re. $61,704,000)
For the provision of grants to counties for costs related to the oper-
ations of public safety dispatch centers to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget. Such

1012 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
plan may consider such factors as population density and emergency
call volume (30331) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $5,701,000)
For services and expenses related to the creation and operation of a
fiberoptic cable based network for public safety answering point
centers, to be distributed pursuant to a plan developed by the
commissioner of homeland security and emergency services and
approved by the director of the budget (30803) .....................
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget
(30327) ... 65,000,000 ........................... (re. $48,050,000)
For the provision of grants to counties for costs related to the oper-
ations of public safety dispatch centers to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget. Such
plan may consider such factors as population density and emergency
call volume (30331) ... 10,000,000 ................ (re. $1,599,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For the provision of grants to counties for costs related to the oper-
ations of public safety dispatch centers to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget. Such
plan may consider such factors as population density and emergency
call volume (30331) ... 10,000,000 .................. (re. $340,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget, as
adjusted by the impact of language contained in chapter 54 of the
laws of 2020 making appropriations for capital work purposes (30327)
... 65,000,000 ................................... (re. $38,533,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget, as

1013 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
adjusted by the impact of language contained in chapter 54 of the
laws of 2020 making appropriations for capital work purposes (30327)
... 65,000,000 ................................... (re. $30,638,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget, as
adjusted by the impact of language contained in chapter 54 of the
laws of 2019 making appropriations for capital work purposes (30327)
... 65,000,000 ................................... (re. $19,177,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget, as
adjusted by the impact of language contained in chapter 54 of the
laws of 2019 making appropriations for capital work purposes (30327)
... 65,000,000 ................................... (re. $19,876,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget, as
adjusted by the impact of language contained in chapter 54 of the
laws of 2019 making appropriations for capital work purposes (30327)
... 65,000,000 ................................... (re. $21,354,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget, as
adjusted by the impact of language contained in chapter 54 of the
laws of 2019 making appropriations for capital work purposes (30327)
... 65,000,000 ................................... (re. $31,987,000)

1014 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For the provision of grants or reimbursement to counties for the
development, consolidation or operation of public safety communi-
cations systems or networks designed to support statewide interoper-
able communications for first responders to be distributed pursuant
to a plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and
emergency services and approved by the director of the budget, as
adjusted by the impact of language contained in chapter 54 of the
laws of 2019 making appropriations for capital work purposes (30327)
... 50,000,000 ................................... (re. $27,135,000)

1015 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 151,500,000 202,585,500
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 72,500,000 659,111,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 15,000,000 111,375,000
Fiduciary Funds .................... 0 32,988,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 239,000,000 1,006,059,500
================ ================
SCHEDULE
BLUE BUFFERS VOLUNTARY BUYOUT PROGRAM ........................ 8,750,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the Blue Buff-
ers Voluntary Buyout Program. Notwith-
standing any other provision of the law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
may be suballocated or transferred to any
aid to localities, state operations, or
capital appropriation or any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31314) ............... 8,750,000
--------------
COMMUNITY CONTROLLED AFFORDABLE HOUSING ...................... 1,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of a community
controlled affordable housing program.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31496) ............... 1,000,000
--------------
F&D-HOUSING DEVELOPMENT FUND PROGRAM ........................ 15,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Housing Development Fund
Housing Development Account - 22950

1016 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For carrying out the provisions of article
XI of the private housing finance law, in
relation to providing assistance to not-
for-profit housing companies. No funds
shall be expended from this appropriation
until the director of the budget has
approved a spending plan submitted by the
division of housing and community renewal
in such detail as the director of the
budget may require (30901) .................. 15,000,000
--------------
FAIR HOUSING TESTING ......................................... 4,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of fair housing
testing and other fair housing compliance
purposes which include but are not limited
to, fair housing testing, outreach and
education on fair housing protections,
addressing and investigating fair housing
allegations and complaints, and addressing
discrimination in appraisals including new
appraisals and appraisal review. Notwith-
standing any other provision of the law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
may be suballocated or transferred to any
aid to localities, state operations, or
capital appropriation of any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31498) ............... 2,000,000
For additional funding for the services and
expenses of fair housing testing which
include but are not limited to, fair hous-
ing testing, outreach and education on
fair housing protections, addressing and
investigating fair housing allegations and
complaints, and addressing discrimination
in appraisals including new appraisals and
appraisal review.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the
law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated or transferred
to any aid to localities, state oper-
ations, or capital appropriation or any
state department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes stated herein ..... 2,000,000
--------------

1017 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
FAIR CHANCE HOUSING REFORMS .................................... 250,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of fair chance
credit check reform and improving access
to housing for people with prior arrests
or conviction records. Funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated or transferred
to any state department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes stated herein
(31500) ........................................ 250,000
--------------
FIRST-TIME HOMEOWNERS ....................................... 10,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of a program to
assist low and moderate income first-time
homeowners with closing costs and down
payments. Such program shall provide
grants to first-time homeowners with
incomes between 50 percent and 120 percent
of the area median income for costs asso-
ciated with home purchases including
single family homes, condominiums, and
cooperative for-owner occupancy in New
York state. Notwithstanding any other law
to the contrary, the amounts appropriated
herein may be transferred or suballocated
to any state department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes stated herein
(31304) ..................................... 10,000,000
--------------
LAND BANKS .................................................. 10,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For program and services of land banks.
Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein
may be transferred or suballocated to any
state department, agency, or public

1018 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
authority for the purposes stated herein
(31510) ..................................... 10,000,000
--------------
MITCHELL-LAMA ASSISTANCE .................................... 10,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For one-time services and expenses of Mitc-
hell-Lama properties pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the
law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated or transferred
to any state department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes stated herein
(64412) ..................................... 10,000,000
--------------
MITCHELL-LAMA AND PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITIES ASSISTANCE ..... 10,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For one-time services and expenses of Mitc-
hell-Lama properties or properties owned
by public housing authorities. Notwith-
standing section 24 of the state finance
law or any provision of the law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the speaker of the assem-
bly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by
each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in an Assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved
by a majority vote of all members elected
to the assembly upon a roll call vote.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the
law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated or transferred
to any state department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes stated herein .... 10,000,000
--------------

1019 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
HOMEOWNER PROTECTION PROGRAM ................................ 40,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the homeowner
protection program intended to avoid fore-
closures. Permissible purposes for allo-
cation of the funds include, but are not
limited to, providing funding for housing
counselors, state and local foreclosure
assistance hotlines, state and local fore-
closure mediation programs, legal assist-
ance, housing remediation and anti-blight
projects, and for the training and staff-
ing of, and capital expenditures required
by, financial fraud and consumer
protection efforts. Notwithstanding any
other law to the contrary, the amounts
appropriated herein may be transferred or
suballocated to any state department,
agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31504) .............. 40,000,000
--------------
HOUSING ACCESS VOUCHER PILOT PROGRAM ........................ 50,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the housing
access voucher pilot program. Notwith-
standing any other provision of the law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
may be suballocated or transferred to any
aid to localities, state operations, or
capital appropriation or any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (64410) .............. 50,000,000
--------------
MANUFACTURED HOMES PARK IMPROVEMENT REVOLVING LOAN FUND ...... 6,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the manufac-
tured homes park improvement revolving
loan fund program. Notwithstanding any

1020 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
other provision of the law to the contra-
ry, funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated or transferred to any aid to
localities, state operations, or capital
appropriation or any state department,
agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein ....................... 6,000,000
--------------
OCR-SMALL CITIES COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM .. 40,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
HUD Small Cities Community Development Account - 25300
For apportionment as follows: For direct
deposit of federal funds into the housing
trust fund account created pursuant to
section 59-a of the private housing
finance law for services and expenses of a
small cities community development block
grant program transferred to the state
pursuant to public law 106.74 to be admin-
istered in accordance with federal laws
and regulations by the housing trust fund
corporation created by section 45-a of the
private housing finance law (31437) ......... 40,000,000
--------------
OHP-LOW INCOME WEATHERIZATION PROGRAM ....................... 32,500,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Department of Energy Weatherization Account - 25499
For low income weatherization grants to be
apportioned in accordance with federal
rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any
other rule, regulation or law, moneys
hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations here-
tofore accrued or hereafter to accrue and
are subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be
transferred or suballocated to any state
department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes stated herein, with the

1021 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
approval of the director of the budget
(31446) ..................................... 32,500,000
--------------
SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM ..................................... 500,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the sustainable
future program. Notwithstanding any other
provision of the law the contrary, funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred to any aid to localities,
state operations, or capital appropriation
or any state department, agency or public
authority for the purposes stated herein
(64416) ........................................ 500,000
--------------
ASSOCIATION FOR NEIGHBORHOOD & HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ............. 250,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the association
for neighborhood & housing development ......... 250,000
--------------
HOUSING HELP INCORPORATED ....................................... 50,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of housing help
incorporated .................................... 50,000
--------------
PA'LANTE HARLEM, INC ........................................... 100,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of pa'lante
Harlem, inc .................................... 100,000
--------------

1022 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
JUSTFIX, INC ................................................... 100,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of justfix, inc ........ 100,000
--------------
SENATE PRIORITIES FOR HOUSING INITIATIVES ...................... 500,000
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of senate priori-
ties for housing initiatives.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of the law to
the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation shall be allocated only pursuant to
a plan (i) approved by the temporary pres-
ident of the senate and the director of
the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and
(ii) which is thereafter included in a
senate resolution calling for the expendi-
ture of such funds, which resolution must
be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll
call vote ...................................... 500,000
--------------

1023 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ASSOCIATION FOR NEIGHBORHOOD AND HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of association for neighborhood & housing
development (30920) ... 250,000 ..................... (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of association for neighborhood & housing
development (30920) ... 250,000 ..................... (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of association for neighborhood & housing
development (30920) ... 150,000 ...................... (re. $75,000)
BLUE BUFFERS VOLUNTARY BUYOUT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the Blue Buffers Voluntary Buyout
Program. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans-
ferred to any aid to localities, state operations, or capital appro-
priation or any state department, agency, or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31314) .................................
8,750,000 ......................................... (re. $8,750,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the Blue Buffers Voluntary Buyout
Program. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans-
ferred to any aid to localities, state operations, or capital appro-
priation or any state department, agency, or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31314) .................................
8,750,000 ......................................... (re. $8,750,000)
BRONXWOOD TOWERS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of bronxwood towers. Notwithstanding any
other provision of the law to the contrary, funds appropriated here-
in may be suballocated or transferred to any aid to localities,
state operations, or capital appropriation of any state department,

1024 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein (31337)
... 594,000 ......................................... (re. $594,000)
BROADWAY HOUSING COMMUNITIES
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of broadway housing communities (31487) ....
35,000 ............................................... (re. $17,500)
CITY OF NEWBURGH HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of a housing needs assessment for housing
located within the city of Newburgh (31376) ........................
60,000 ............................................... (re. $60,000)
CHURCHES UNITED FOR FAIR HOUSING
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of churches united for fair housing, afford-
able housing services (31394) ... 15,000 ............. (re. $15,000)
COMMUNITY CONTROLLED AFFORDABLE HOUSING
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of a community controlled affordable housing
program. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans-
ferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31496) .....................................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of a community controlled affordable housing
program. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans-
ferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31496) .....................................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:

1025 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of a community controlled affordable housing
program. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans-
ferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (31496) .....................................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $937,000)
CO-OP CITY RIVERBAY CORPORATION
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of co-op city riverbay corporation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any
aid to localities, state operations, or capital appropriation of any
state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stat-
ed herein (31335) ... 1,000,000 ..................... (re. $250,000)
CROWN HEIGHTS LOCAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of crown heights local development corpo-
ration (64420) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $100,000)
F&D-HOUSING DEVELOPMENT FUND PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Housing Development Fund
Housing Development Account - 22950
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...
15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000)

1026 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
15,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,618,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
8,227,000 ......................................... (re. $8,227,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such

1027 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
8,227,000 ......................................... (re. $3,506,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
8,227,000 ......................................... (re. $8,227,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For carrying out the provisions of article XI of the private housing
finance law, in relation to providing assistance to not-for-profit
housing companies. No funds shall be expended from this appropri-
ation until the director of the budget has approved a spending plan
submitted by the division of housing and community renewal in such
detail as the director of the budget may require (30901) ...........
8,227,000 ......................................... (re. $7,797,000)
FAIR HOUSING TESTING
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of fair housing testing and other fair hous-
ing compliance purposes which include but are not limited to, fair
housing testing, outreach and education on fair housing protections,
addressing and investigating fair housing allegations and
complaints, and addressing discrimination in appraisals including
new appraisals and appraisal review. Notwithstanding any other
provision of the law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein may
be suballocated or transferred to any aid to localities, state oper-
ations, or capital appropriation of any state department, agency, or
public authority for the purposes stated herein (31498) ...
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For additional funding for the services and expenses of fair housing
testing which include but are not limited to, fair housing testing,
outreach and education on fair housing protections, addressing and
investigating fair housing allegations and complaints, and address-
ing discrimination in appraisals including new appraisals and
appraisal review.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any aid to
localities, state operations, or capital appropriation or any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (31319) ... 2,000,000 ...................... (re. $2,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:

1028 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of fair housing testing. Notwithstanding any
other provision of the law to the contrary, funds appropriated here-
in may be suballocated or transferred to any aid to localities,
state operations, or capital appropriation of any state department,
agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein (31498)
... 2,000,000 ....................................... (re. $955,000)
For additional funding for the services and expenses of fair housing
testing. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the
contrary, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or trans-
ferred to any aid to localities, state operations, or capital appro-
priation of any state department, agency, or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31319) .................................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
FAIR CHANCE HOUSING REFORMS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of fair chance credit check reform and
improving access to housing for people with prior arrests or
conviction records. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31500) ... 250,000 ...... (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of fair chance credit check reform and
improving access to housing for people with prior arrests or
conviction records. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31500) .................................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $248,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of fair chance credit check reform and
improving access to housing for people with prior arrests or
conviction records. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31500) ... 250,000 ...... (re. $175,000)
FIRST-TIME HOMEOWNERS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of a program to assist low and moderate
income first-time homeowners with closing costs and down payments.
The division of housing and community renewal may allocate all or a
portion of such funds through neighborhood and rural preservation
companies. Such program shall provide grants to first-time homeown-

1029 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ers with incomes between 50 percent and 120 percent of area median
income for costs associated with home purchases including single
family homes, condominiums, and cooperative for owner-occupancy in
New York state. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the
amounts appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to
any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes
stated herein (31304) ... 25,000,000 ............. (re. $13,000,000)
FORECLOSURE AVOIDANCE AND AMELIORATION
Fiduciary Funds
Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund
Mortgage Settlement Proceeds Trust Fund Account - 60690
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2021:
To provide compensation to the state of New York and its communities
for harms purportedly caused by the allegedly unlawful conduct of
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC (f/k/a "Bear, Stearns & Co. Inc."),
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., EMC Mortgage LLC (f/k/a "EMC Mortgage
Corporation"), for purposes intended to avoid preventable foreclo-
sures, to ameliorate the effects of the foreclosure crisis, to
enhance law enforcement efforts to prevent and prosecute financial
fraud or unfair or deceptive acts or practices, and to otherwise
promote the interests of the investing public. Such permissible
purposes for allocation of the funds include, but are not limited
to, providing funding for housing counselors, state and local fore-
closure assistance hotlines, state and local foreclosure mediation
programs, legal assistance, housing remediation and anti-blight
projects, and for the training and staffing of, and capital expendi-
tures required by, financial fraud and consumer protection efforts,
and for any other purpose consistent with the terms of the Settle-
ment Agreement dated November 19, 2013 between J.P. Morgan Securi-
ties LLC (f/k/a "Bear, Stearns & Co. Inc."), JPMorgan Chase Bank,
N.A., EMC Mortgage LLC (f/k/a "EMC Mortgage Corporation") and the
people of the state of New York.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary set forth in section 99-v of
the state finance law, up to the following amounts of this appropri-
ation may be allocated and distributed as indicated below:
1. Up to $25,000,000 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses of a program to finance the construction and rehabilitation
of housing units for households of low and moderate income earning
up to 130 percent of the area median income; provided however,
notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that such allocation and
distribution is subject to the approval by the director of the budg-
et of a plan for such program submitted by the administering depart-
ment, agency, or public authority;
2. Up to $25,000,000 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses of a program to finance the rehabilitation of existing
limited profit housing companies pursuant to article 2 of the
private housing finance law; provided however, notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, that such allocation and distribution is

1030 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
subject to the approval by the director of the budget of a plan for
such program submitted by the administering department, agency, or
public authority;
3. Up to $21,689,965 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses of a program to finance a neighborhood revitalization
purchase program to be administered by the state of New York mort-
gage agency; provided however, notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, that such allocation and distribution is subject to the
approval by the director of the budget of a plan for such program
submitted by the administering department, agency, or public author-
ity;
4. Up to $19,601,000 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses of the access to home program pursuant to article 30 of the
private housing finance law for purposes that serve disabled veter-
ans as defined by section 1272 of the private housing finance law or
a veteran who is certified by the United States Department of Veter-
ans Affairs through a disability statement or the Department of
Defense through their DD214; provided however, notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, that such allocation and distribution is
subject to the approval by the director of the budget of a plan for
such program submitted by the administering department, agency, or
public authority;
5. Up to $5,000,000 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses of the housing opportunities program for the elderly
(RESTORE) to provide grants and loans in an amount not to exceed
$10,000 per unit for the cost of residential emergency services or
home repairs to correct any condition which poses a threat to the
life, health or safety of a low-income elderly homeowner; provided
however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that such allo-
cation and distribution is subject to the approval by the director
of the budget of a plan for such program submitted by the adminis-
tering department, agency, or public authority;
6. Up to $74,500,000 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses in support of a comprehensive multi-year program to prevent
and address homelessness across the State, funds appropriated herein
may be used in conjunction with other resources made available as
part of the state fiscal year 2016-17 and 2017-18 local assistance,
capital and state operations budget to support various programs to
support homeless individuals and youth or individuals and youth at
risk of becoming homeless, including but not limited to, a statewide
multiagency supportive housing program to provide housing and
support services for vulnerable New Yorkers including but not limit-
ed to seniors, veterans, victims of domestic violence, formerly
incarcerated individuals, individuals diagnosed with HIV/AIDS and
homeless individuals with co-presenting health conditions, eligible
services to runaway and homeless youth, and for services to meet the
emergency needs of homeless individuals and families; notwithstand-
ing any law to the contrary, that such allocation and distribution
is subject to the approval by the director of the budget of a plan
for such program submitted by the administering department, agency,
or public authority. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of a state agency or authority holding an

1031 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
empire state supportive housing initiative contract, shall be
authorized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
to continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31,
2021 with entities providing supportive housing services, without
any additional requirements that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for proposal process or other admin-
istrative procedures;
7. Up to $50,000,000 shall be available for enhanced rates for exist-
ing scattered site supportive housing units overseen by the office
of mental health, and provided further, however, notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, that such allocation and distribution is
subject to the approval by the director of the budget of a plan for
such program submitted by the administering department, agency, or
public authority;
8. Up to $25,000,000 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses of a homeowner protection program administered by the
department of law. Within the amounts available hereunder and in
conjunction with other remaining funds held by the attorney general
consistent with the terms of the Settlement Agreement dated November
19, 2013 between J.P. Morgan Securities LLC (f/k/a "Bear, Stearns &
Co. Inc."), JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., EMC Mortgage LLC (f/k/a "EMC
Mortgage Corporation") and the people of the state of New York,
$15,000,000 shall be made available through March 31, 2020; provided
further that $10,000,000 shall be made available beginning April 1,
2020;
9. Up to $5,500,000 may be allocated and distributed for contract with
not-for-profit corporations and municipalities to provide state
fiscal assistance to administer main street or downtown revitaliza-
tion projects for communities pursuant to article XXVI of the
private housing finance law; provided however, notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, that such allocation and distribution is
subject to the approval by the director of the budget of a plan for
such program submitted by the administering department, agency, or
public authority;
10. Up to $31,000,000 may be allocated and distributed for services
and expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue, of the
living in communities (LINC) 1 program to provide rental assistance
for families in New York city homeless shelters earning up to 200
percent of the federal poverty level and working at least 35 hours
per week; provided however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
that such allocation and distribution is subject to the approval by
the director of the budget of a plan for such program submitted by
the administering department, agency, or public authority;
11. Up to $36,000,000 may be allocated and distributed for services
and expenses of an initiative to cap the rent contribution of public
assistance recipients diagnosed with HIV/AIDS in New York city at 30
percent of the individual's earned and/or unearned income pursuant
to subdivision 14 of section 131-a of the social services law;
provided however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that such
allocation and distribution is subject to the approval by the direc-
tor of the budget of a plan for such program submitted by the admin-
istering department, agency, or public authority;

1032 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
12. Up to $20,259,000 may be allocated and distributed for services
and expenses of the neighborhood and rural preservation programs
pursuant to articles 16 and 17 of the private housing finance law;
provided however, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, that such
allocation and distribution is subject to the approval by the direc-
tor of the budget of a plan for such programs submitted by the
administering department, agency, or public authority;
13. Up to $100,000,000 shall be allocated and distributed for services
and expenses of a public housing modernization or improvement
program for housing developments owned or operated by the New York
city housing authority. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no
moneys shall be disbursed for this purpose until the commissioner of
the New York state division of housing and community renewal, in
consultation with the New York City housing authority chair, has
developed a capital revitalization plan for the use of such funds
and such plan has been approved by the director of the division of
the budget and submitted to the speaker and minority leader of the
assembly, and the temporary president and minority leader of the
senate. Such capital revitalization plan shall specifically detail
any current or projected capital revitalization projects that would
be funded, in whole or in part, by the state funds described herein.
Such detail shall include, but not be limited to: the estimated cost
of current or projected capital revitalization projects, revitaliza-
tion project scheduling, and the estimated duration of such
projects. The New York city housing authority shall enter into a
construction management agreement with the dormitory authority of
the state of New York for the scope, procurement, and administration
of all contracts associated with this funding, pursuant to subdivi-
sion 28 of section 1678 of the public authorities law, and provided
that such allocation and distribution is subject to approval by the
director of the budget, and provided further that the comptroller of
the city of New York shall immediately commence an audit of the New
York city housing authority management and contracting process for
repairs and maintenance and make recommendation on how to improve
the process; and
14. Up to $1,000,000 may be allocated and distributed for services and
expenses of the Adirondack community housing trust to reduce the
cost of home purchases for families making up to 120 percent of area
median income, provided however, notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, that such allocation and distribution is subject to the
approval by the director of the budget of a plan for such program
submitted by the administering department, agency, or public author-
ity.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated, transferred or otherwise made
available to the office of mental health, the office of addiction
services and supports, the office of temporary and disability
assistance, the office for persons with developmental disabilities,
the office of children and family services, the state office for the
aging, the department of health, the department of corrections and
community supervision, the dormitory authority of the state of New
York, the division of housing and community renewal, the housing

1033 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
trust fund corporation, the state of New York mortgage agency, the
New York state urban development corporation, the department of law
and/or the housing finance agency, as deemed appropriate by the
director of the budget. Funds suballocated, transferred or otherwise
made available to any state department, agency, or public authority
may be distributed to New York city, including the New York city
housing authority.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this appropri-
ation shall supersede and replace any appropriation for this item
covering or attributable to fiscal year 2015-16, or any portion
thereof, set forth in section 1 of chapter 53 of the laws of 2014
(31470) ... 439,549,965 .......................... (re. $32,988,000)
GOOD OLD LOWER EAST SIDE, INC
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of good old lower east side, inc (31384) ...
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
GRAND STREET SETTLEMENT
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of grand street settlement (31386) .........
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
HABITAT FOR HUMANITY NYC & WESTCHESTER
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of habitat for humanity NYC & westchester.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any
aid to localities, state operations, or capital appropriation of any
state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stat-
ed herein (31339) ... 142,000 ....................... (re. $142,000)
HABITAT FOR HUMANITY NYC & WESTCHESTER
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of habitat for humanity NYC & westchester.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary,

1034 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any
aid to localities, state operations, or capital appropriation of any
state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stat-
ed herein (31340) ... 25,000 ......................... (re. $25,000)
HOMEOWNER PROTECTION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the homeowner protection program intended
to avoid foreclosures. Permissible purposes for allocation of the
funds include, but are not limited to, providing funding for housing
counselors, state and local foreclosure assistance hotlines, state
and local foreclosure mediation programs, legal assistance, housing
remediation and anti-blight projects, and for the training and
staffing of, and capital expenditures required by, financial fraud
and consumer protection efforts. Notwithstanding any other law to
the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be transferred or
suballocated to any state department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes stated herein (31504) .............................
40,000,000 ....................................... (re. $33,593,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the homeowner protection program intended
to avoid foreclosures. Permissible purposes for allocation of the
funds include, but are not limited to, providing funding for housing
counselors, state and local foreclosure assistance hotlines, state
and local foreclosure mediation programs, legal assistance, housing
remediation and anti-blight projects, and for the training and
staffing of, and capital expenditures required by, financial fraud
and consumer protection efforts. Notwithstanding any other law to
the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be transferred or
suballocated to any state department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes stated herein (31511) .............................
40,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,616,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For one-time additional expenses of the homeowner protection program.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein(31511) ... 15,000,000 ...................... (re. $1,324,000)
For services and expenses of the homeowner protection program intended
to avoid foreclosures. Permissible purposes for allocation of the
funds include, but are not limited to, providing funding for housing
counselors, state and local foreclosure assistance hotlines, state
and local foreclosure mediation programs, legal assistance, housing
remediation and anti-blight projects, and for the training and
staffing of, and capital expenditures required by, financial fraud
and consumer protection efforts.

1035 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein,
with the approval of the director of the budget(31504) .............
20,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,804,000)
HOMEOWNERSHIP RELIEF AND PROTECTION PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Homeownership Relief and Protection Account - 25545
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For service and expenses of a Homeownership Relief and Protection
Program to be administered by the housing trust fund corporation
created by section 59 of the private housing finance law and admin-
istered through community development financial institutions
licensed by the New York state department of financial services or
domestic not-for-profit corporations that are certified by the
United States department of the treasury as community development
financial institutions, or for any other purpose authorized by
Section 3206 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Pub.L. 117-2.
Such program may provide assistance to homeowners of qualified prop-
erties for the purpose of preventing homeowner mortgage deficien-
cies, defaults, foreclosures, loss of utilities or home energy
services, and displacements of homeowners experiencing financial
hardship after January 21, 2020. Such assistance shall include mort-
gage payment assistance; financial assistance to allow a homeowner
to reinstate a mortgage or pay other housing related costs related
to period of forbearance, delinquency, or default; principal
reduction; facilitating interest rate reductions; and payment
assistance for ancillary homeownership expenses.
Of amounts appropriated herein, up to twenty million dollars shall be
available each year for three years for a total of up to sixty
million dollars for the Homeowner Protection Program to provide
homeowners of qualified properties with mortgage relief assistance,
assistance with applying for loan modifications or other types of
loss mitigation, direct representation in court proceedings and
settlement conferences, and homeownership counseling.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law, the amounts
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, public authority, or community development
financial institutions, or domestic not-for-profit corporations that
are certified by the United States department of the treasury as
community development financial institutions or licensed by the New
York state department of financial services for the purposes stated
herein. Notwithstanding any provision of state or local law to the
contrary, when real property tax payment assistance is provided,
with regard to a property with delinquent taxes, the enforcing offi-
cer shall accept such assistance as full or partial payment of the
delinquent taxes regardless of when the delinquency occurred and

1036 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
shall apply such assistance to any liens against the property
(31382) ... 600,000,000 .......................... (re. $60,541,000)
HOUSING ACCESS VOUCHER PILOT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the housing access voucher pilot program.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any
aid to localities, state operations, or capital appropriation or any
state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stat-
ed herein (64410) ... 50,000,000 ................. (re. $49,824,000)
HOUSING HELP INCORPORATED
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of housing help incorporated (31333) .......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of housing help incorporated (31333) .......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
HURRICANE IDA RELIEF PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
HUD Small Cities Community Development Account - 25300
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of a program to provide relief to those
impacted by hurricane Ida. Provided, however, if any allocation of
federal community development block grant - disaster recovery funds
is received by the governor's office of storm recovery for the
program funded herein, this appropriation shall be reduced by an
amount equal to such allocation (31513) ............................
41,000,000 ....................................... (re. $41,000,000)
JUSTFIX, INC
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of justfix, inc (64418) ....................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)

1037 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
LAND BANKS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For program and services of land banks. Notwithstanding any other law
to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be transferred
or suballocated to any state department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes stated herein (31510) .............................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For program and services of land banks. Notwithstanding any other law
to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be transferred
or suballocated to any state department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes stated herein (31510) .............................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For program and services of land banks. Notwithstanding any other law
to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be transferred
or suballocated to any state department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes stated herein (31510) .............................
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,811,000)
LEGAL REPRESENTATION FOR EVICTION
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses a program for legal services and represen-
tation for eviction cases outside of New York city. Funds appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein
(31506) ... 35,000,000 ............................ (re. $3,648,000)
MITCHELL-LAMA ASSISTANCE
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For one-time services and expenses of Mitchell-Lama properties pursu-
ant to a plan approved by the director of the budget. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of the law to the contrary, funds appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (64412) ... 10,000,000 .................... (re. $10,000,000)
MITCHELL-LAMA AND PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITIES ASSISTANCE

1038 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For one-time services and expenses of Mitchell-Lama properties or
properties owned by public housing authorities. Notwithstanding
section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of the law to
the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an Assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote. Notwith-
standing any other provision of the law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (64414) .....................................................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
NEW YORK CITY COMMUNITY LAND TRUSTS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the operations of community land
trusts in the city of New York. Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agency or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31346) .................................
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
NYCHA HOUSING IN SOUTH JAMAICA, BAISLEY AND THE ROCKAWAYS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of NYCHA housing in South Jamaica, Baisley
and the Rockaways (31477) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $50,000)
NYCHA TOMPKINS TENANT ASSOCIATION & 4 FUTURE GENERATIONS YOUTH PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the NYCHA tompkins tenant association & 4
future generations youth program (31481) ... 58,000 .. (re. $58,000)

1039 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
OCR-SMALL CITIES COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
HUD Small Cities Community Development Account - 25300
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For apportionment as follows: For direct deposit of federal funds into
the housing trust fund account created pursuant to section 59-a of
the private housing finance law for services and expenses of a small
cities community development block grant program transferred to the
state pursuant to public law 106.74 to be administered in accordance
with federal laws and regulations by the housing trust fund corpo-
ration created by section 45-a of the private housing finance law
(31437) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For apportionment as follows: For direct deposit of federal funds into
the housing trust fund account created pursuant to section 59-a of
the private housing finance law for services and expenses of a small
cities community development block grant program transferred to the
state pursuant to public law 106.74 to be administered in accordance
with federal laws and regulations by the housing trust fund corpo-
ration created by section 45-a of the private housing finance law
(31437) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For apportionment as follows: For direct deposit of federal funds into
the housing trust fund account created pursuant to section 59-a of
the private housing finance law for services and expenses of a small
cities community development block grant program transferred to the
state pursuant to public law 106.74 to be administered in accordance
with federal laws and regulations by the housing trust fund corpo-
ration created by section 45-a of the private housing finance law
(31437) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For apportionment as follows: For direct deposit of federal funds into
the housing trust fund account created pursuant to section 59-a of
the private housing finance law for services and expenses of a small
cities community development block grant program transferred to the
state pursuant to public law 106.74 to be administered in accordance
with federal laws and regulations by the housing trust fund corpo-
ration created by section 45-a of the private housing finance law
(31437) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For apportionment as follows: For direct deposit of federal funds into
the housing trust fund account created pursuant to section 59-a of
the private housing finance law for services and expenses of a small
cities community development block grant program transferred to the
state pursuant to public law 106.74 to be administered in accordance

1040 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
with federal laws and regulations by the housing trust fund corpo-
ration created by section 45-a of the private housing finance law
(31437) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For apportionment as follows: For direct deposit of federal funds into
the housing trust fund account created pursuant to section 59-a of
the private housing finance law for services and expenses of a small
cities community development block grant program transferred to the
state pursuant to public law 106.74 to be administered in accordance
with federal laws and regulations by the housing trust fund corpo-
ration created by section 45-a of the private housing finance law
(31437) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For apportionment as follows: For direct deposit of federal funds into
the housing trust fund account created pursuant to section 59-a of
the private housing finance law for services and expenses of a small
cities community development block grant program transferred to the
state pursuant to public law 106.74 to be administered in accordance
with federal laws and regulations by the housing trust fund corpo-
ration created by section 45-a of the private housing finance law
(31437) ... 40,000,000 ........................... (re. $40,000,000)
OHP-LOW INCOME WEATHERIZATION PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Department of Energy Weatherization Account - 25499
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For low income weatherization grants to be apportioned in accordance
with federal rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any other rule,
regulation or law, moneys hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue and are subject to the approval of the director of the
budget.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein,
with the approval of the director of the budget (31446) ............
32,500,000 ....................................... (re. $32,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For low income weatherization grants to be apportioned in accordance
with federal rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any other rule,
regulation or law, moneys hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue and are subject to the approval of the director of the
budget.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any state depart-

1041 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein,
with the approval of the director of the budget (31446) ............
32,500,000 ........................................ (re. $8,935,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For low income weatherization grants to be apportioned in accordance
with federal rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any other rule,
regulation or law, moneys hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue and are subject to the approval of the director of the
budget.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein,
with the approval of the director of the budget (31446) ............
32,500,000 ........................................ (re. $6,686,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For low income weatherization grants to be apportioned in accordance
with federal rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any other rule,
regulation or law, moneys hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue and are subject to the approval of the director of the
budget.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated herein,
with the approval of the director of the budget (31446) ............
282,500,000 ..................................... (re. $201,246,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For low income weatherization grants to be apportioned in accordance
with federal rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any other rule,
regulation or law, moneys hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue and are subject to the approval of the director of the
budget (31446) ... 32,500,000 ..................... (re. $9,731,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For low income weatherization grants to be apportioned in accordance
with federal rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any other rule,
regulation or law, moneys hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue and are subject to the approval of the director of the
budget (31446) ... 32,500,000 ..................... (re. $7,986,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For low income weatherization grants to be apportioned in accordance
with federal rules and regulations. Notwithstanding any other rule,
regulation or law, moneys hereby appropriated are to be available
for payment of contract obligations heretofore accrued or hereafter

1042 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to accrue and are subject to the approval of the director of the
budget (31446) ... 32,500,000 .................... (re. $10,486,000)
OHP-NEW YORK CITY HOUSING AUTHORITY TENANT PILOT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For payment to the New York city housing authority for a tenant pilot
program consistent with the public housing law (31429) .............
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For payment to the New York city housing authority for a tenant pilot
program consistent with the public housing law (31429) .............
742,000 ............................................. (re. $742,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For payment to the New York city housing authority for a tenant pilot
program consistent with the public housing law (31429) .............
742,000 ............................................. (re. $557,000)
PA'LANTE HARLEM INC
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of pa'lante Harlem, inc (31475) ............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of pa'lante Harlem, inc (31475) ............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $75,000)
PARKSIDE DEVELOPMENT COMPANY, INC
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of parkside development company, inc.
Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any aid to
localities, state operations, or capital appropriation of any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (31342) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $750,000)
PRO-HOUSING SUPPLY FUND

1043 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the pro-housing supply fund. Funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (31348) ... 5,250,000 ...................... (re. $5,250,000)
RIVERBAY CORPORATION
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the riverbay corporation (31479) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
RJ BRUNO INC. & GUN HILL HOUSES
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of rj bruno inc. & gun hill houses. Notwith-
standing any other provision of the law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any aid to
localities, state operations, or capital appropriation of any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (31344) ... 332,000 .......................... (re. $332,000)
SENATE PRIORITIES FOR HOUSING INITIATIVES
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of senate priorities for housing initi-
atives. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any
provision of the law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote (31517) ...........................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:

1044 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of senate priorities for housing initi-
atives. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (31517) ........
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $638,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of senate priorities for housing initi-
atives. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (31517) ........
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $373,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of senate priorities for housing initi-
atives. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a
plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the
director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of
grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology
for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such
funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (31517) ........
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $242,000)
SUSTAINABLE FUTURE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the sustainable future program. Notwith-
standing any other provision of the law the contrary, funds appro-
priated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any aid to
localities, state operations, or capital appropriation or any state
department, agency or public authority for the purposes stated here-
in (64416) ... 500,000 .............................. (re. $500,000)
TOWN OF HEMPSTEAD HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT

1045 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of a housing needs assessment for housing
located within the town of Hempstead (31374) .......................
215,000 ............................................. (re. $215,000)
UNITED NEIGHBORHOOD HOUSES SERVICES OF JAMAICA
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of united neighborhood houses services of
Jamaica (31489) ... 375,000 ......................... (re. $375,000)
VARIOUS ASSEMBLY INITIATIVES
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of various assembly initiatives. Notwith-
standing any provision of the law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)approved
by the speaker of the assembly and the director of the budget which
sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all member selected to the
assembly upon a roll call vote (31312) .............................
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $690,000)
WASHINGTON HOUSES COMMUNITY AND SENIOR CENTER
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses to support the renovation of the washington
houses community and senior center. Notwithstanding any other law to
the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for
the purposes stated herein (31350) ... 400,000 ...... (re. $400,000)
WILDCAT NEIGHBORHOOD IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

1046 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the wildcat neighborhood improvement
program (31483) ... 5,000 ............................. (re. $5,000)

1047 12653-09-6
STATE OF NEW YORK MORTGAGE AGENCY
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 142,110,383 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 142,110,383 0
================ ================
SCHEDULE
MORTGAGE INSURANCE FUND REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM .............. 142,110,383
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment subject to the provisions of
chapters 13 and 59 of the laws of 1987. No
expenditures shall be made from this
appropriation until a certificate of allo-
cation has been approved by the director
of the budget and copies thereof filed
with the state comptroller and with the
chairmen of the senate finance and assem-
bly ways and means committees. Notwith-
standing section 40 of the state finance
law, this appropriation shall remain in
effect until a subsequent appropriation is
made available (45605) ..................... 142,110,383
--------------

1048 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 92,000,000 81,929,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 394,870,000 1,263,294,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 486,870,000 1,345,223,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ASSIGNED COUNSEL PROGRAM .................................... 92,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law to the contrary, up to the amount
appropriated herein, this appropriation
supports 50 percent of eligible expendi-
tures related to the increased hourly rate
paid to attorneys under county law article
18-B. This funding shall reimburse coun-
ties and the city of New York, for costs
incurred on or after April 1, 2026 and on
or prior to March 31, 2027 and shall
represent the state's liability for the
2026-27 fiscal year.
The funding shall be disbursed to counties
and the city of New York upon submission
of a certification submitted to the office
of indigent legal services. Such costs
must be submitted by counties and the city
of New York, to the office of indigent
legal services on a quarterly basis, and
within 12 months of which the expenditures
were incurred. The office of indigent
legal services shall not reimburse any
claims unless they are submitted by coun-
ties and the city of New York within 12
months of the quarter in which the claimed
services were delivered (55520) ............. 92,000,000
--------------
ARTICLE 18-B FAMILY COURT REPRESENTATION .................... 30,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551

1049 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses related to improv-
ing the quality of representation provided
to persons who, under county law article
18-B, are entitled to counsel in family
court matters and are financially unable
to obtain counsel. A portion of these
funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other
state agencies (55518) ...................... 25,000,000
For additional services and expenses related
to improving the quality of representation
provided to persons who, under county law
article 18-B, are entitled to counsel in
family court matters and are financially
unable to obtain counsel (55521) ............. 5,000,000
--------------
HHS STATEWIDE IMPLEMENTATION ............................... 273,970,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551
For services and expenses related to the
implementation of the plans developed
pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 832
of the executive law. Such contracts shall
be extended for a period of not more than
twenty-four months. The office of indigent
legal services shall prepare an annual
report on the implementation of, and
compliance with, the plans in each county
and the city of New York, pursuant to
subdivision 4 of section 832 of the execu-
tive law. Such report shall be provided no
later than the last day of October of each
year for the preceding year and shall be
submitted to the division of budget. A
portion of these funds may be transferred
to state operations and may be suballo-
cated to other state agencies (55515) ...... 273,970,000
--------------
INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES PROGRAM ............................. 90,900,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551

1050 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payments to counties and the city of New
York related to indigent legal services
pursuant to section 98-b of the state
finance law and sections 832 and 833 of
the executive law. Such contracts shall be
extended for a period of not more than
twenty-four months (55502) .................. 81,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 81,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Title IV-E Parental Services Account - 22273
For services and expenses related to
parental representations in child welfare
matters (55502) .............................. 9,900,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 9,900,000
--------------

1051 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ASSIGNED COUNSEL PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law to the contrary, up
to the amount appropriated herein, this appropriation supports 50
percent of eligible expenditures related to the increased hourly
rate paid to attorneys under county law article 18-B. This funding
shall reimburse counties and the city of New York, for costs
incurred on or after April 1, 2025 and on or prior to March 31, 2026
and shall represent the state's liability for the 2025-26 fiscal
year.
The funding shall be disbursed to counties and the city of New York
upon submission of a certification submitted to the office of indi-
gent legal services. Such costs must be submitted by counties and
the city of New York, to the office of indigent legal services on a
quarterly basis, and within 12 months of which the expenditures were
incurred. The office of indigent legal services shall not reimburse
any claims unless they are submitted by counties and the city of New
York within 12 months of the quarter in which the claimed services
were delivered (55520) ... 92,000,000 ............ (re. $72,168,000)
ARTICLE 18-B FAMILY COURT REPRESENTATION
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For additional services and expenses related to improving the quality
of representation provided to persons who, under county law article
18-B, are entitled to counsel in family court matters and are finan-
cially unable to obtain counsel (55518) ............................
10,000,000 ........................................ (re. $9,761,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to improving the quality of repre-
sentation provided to persons who, under county law article 18-B,
are entitled to counsel in family court matters and are financially
unable to obtain counsel. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other state
agencies (55518) ... 19,500,000 .................. (re. $19,500,000)
For additional services and expenses related to improving the quality
of representation provided to persons who, under county law article
18-B, are entitled to counsel in family court matters and are finan-
cially unable to obtain counsel (55521) ............................
5,500,000 ......................................... (re. $5,500,000)

1052 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to improving the quality of repre-
sentation provided to persons who, under county law article 18-B,
are entitled to counsel in family court matters and are financially
unable to obtain counsel. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other state
agencies (55518) ... 4,500,000 .................... (re. $4,361,000)
For additional services and expenses related to improving the quality
of representation provided to persons who, under county law article
18-B, are entitled to counsel in family court matters and are finan-
cially unable to obtain counsel (55518) ............................
15,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to improving the quality of repre-
sentation provided to persons who, under county law article18-B, are
entitled to counsel in family court matters and are financially
unable to obtain counsel. A portion of these funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations and may be suballocated to other state
agencies (55518) ... 4,500,000 .................... (re. $3,236,000)
HHS STATEWIDE IMPLEMENTATION
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the plans
developed pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive
law. Such contracts shall be extended for a period of not more than
twenty-four months. The office of indigent legal services shall
prepare an annual report on the implementation of, and compliance
with, the plans in each county and the city of New York, pursuant to
subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive law. Such report shall
be provided no later than the last day of October of each year for
the preceding year and shall be submitted to the division of budget.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (55515) ................
273,970,000 ..................................... (re. $271,027,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the plans
developed pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive
law. Such contracts shall be extended for a period of not more than
twenty-four months. The office of indigent legal services shall
prepare an annual report on the implementation of, and compliance
with, the plans in each county and the city of New York, pursuant to
subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive law. Such report shall
be provided no later than the last day of October of each year for
the preceding year and shall be submitted to the division of budget.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and

1053 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
may be suballocated to other state agencies (55515) ................
250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $236,793,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the plans
developed pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive
law. Such contracts shall be extended for a period of not more than
twenty-four months. The office of indigent legal services shall
prepare an annual report on the implementation of, and compliance
with, the plans in each county and the city of New York, pursuant to
subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive law. Such report shall
be provided no later than the last day of October of each year for
the preceding year and shall be submitted to the division of budget.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (55515) ................
250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $121,364,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the plans
developed pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive
law. Such contracts shall be extended for a period of not more than
twenty-four months. The office of indigent legal services shall
prepare an annual report on the implementation of, and compliance
with, the plans in each county and the city of New York, pursuant to
subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive law. Such report shall
be provided no later than the last day of October of each year for
the preceding year and shall be submitted to the division of budget.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (55515) ................
250,000,000 ..................................... (re. $237,327,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the plans
developed pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive
law. Such contracts shall be extended for a period of not more than
twenty-four months. The office of indigent legal services shall
prepare an annual report on the implementation of, and compliance
with, the plans in each county and the city of New York, pursuant to
subdivision 4 of section 832 of the executive law. Such report shall
be provided no later than the last day of October of each year for
the preceding year and shall be submitted to the division of budget.
A portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agencies (55515) ................
200,000,000 ..................................... (re. $143,833,000)
HURRELL-HARRING SETTLEMENT PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:

1054 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the settle-
ment agreement in the matter of Hurrell-Harring, et al, v. State of
New York in accordance with paragraphs IX(C), V(C), and IX (D) of
such settlement agreement.
For the purposes of accomplishing the objectives set forth in para-
graph III(A)(1) of such settlement agreement in Ontario, Onondaga,
Schuyler, Suffolk and Washington counties. Any funds received by a
county under such appropriation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant any local funds that the county currently spends for the
provision of services pursuant to article 18-B of the county law
(55507) ... 2,800,000 ............................. (re. $2,634,000)
For the purposes of accomplishing the objectives set forth in para-
graph V(A) of such settlement agreement in Ontario, Onondaga,
Schuyler, Suffolk and Washington counties. Any funds received by a
county under such appropriation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant any local funds that the county currently spends for the
provision of services pursuant to article 18-B of the county law
(55508) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,000,000)
For the purpose of accomplishing the objectives set forth in paragraph
IV(C) of such settlement agreement in Ontario, Onondaga, Schuyler,
Suffolk and Washington counties. Any funds received by a county
under such appropriation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant any local funds that the county currently spends for the
provision of services pursuant to article 18-B of the county law
(55509) ... 19,170,000 ........................... (re. $13,802,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the implementation of the settle-
ment agreement in the matter of Hurrell-Harring, et al, v. State of
New York in accordance with paragraphs IX(C), V(C), and IX (D) of
such settlement agreement.
For the purposes of accomplishing the objectives set forth in para-
graph III(A)(1) of such settlement agreement in Ontario, Onondaga,
Schuyler, Suffolk and Washington counties. Any funds received by a
county under such appropriation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant any local funds that the county currently spends for the
provision of services pursuant to article 18-B of the county law
(55507) ... 2,800,000 ............................... (re. $864,000)
For the purposes of accomplishing the objectives set forth in para-
graph V(A) of such settlement agreement in Ontario, Onondaga,
Schuyler, Suffolk and Washington counties. Any funds received by a
county under such appropriation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant any local funds that the county currently spends for the
provision of services pursuant to article 18-B of the county law
(55508) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,000,000)
For the purpose of accomplishing the objectives set forth in paragraph
IV(C) of such settlement agreement in Ontario, Onondaga, Schuyler,
Suffolk and Washington counties. Any funds received by a county
under such appropriation shall be used to supplement and not
supplant any local funds that the county currently spends for the
provision of services pursuant to article 18-B of the county law
(55509) ... 19,010,000 ........................... (re. $17,428,000)

1055 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Indigent Legal Services Fund
Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payments to counties and the city of New York related to indigent
legal services pursuant to section 98-b of the state finance law and
sections 832 and 833 of the executive law. Such contracts shall be
extended for a period of not more than twenty-four months (55502)
... 81,000,000 ................................... (re. $80,905,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payments to counties and the city of New York related to indigent
legal services pursuant to section 98-b of the state finance law and
sections 832 and 833 of the executive law. Such contracts shall be
extended for a period of not more than twenty-four months (55502)
... 81,000,000 ................................... (re. $37,111,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payments to counties and the city of New York related to indigent
legal services pursuant to section 98-b of the state finance law and
sections 832 and 833 of the executive law. Such contracts shall be
extended for a period of not more than twenty-four months (55502)
... 81,000,000 ................................... (re. $18,667,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payments to counties and the city of New York related to indigent
legal services pursuant to section 98-b of the state finance law and
sections 832 and 833 of the executive law. Such contracts shall be
extended for a period of not more than twenty-four months (55502)
... 81,000,000 ................................... (re. $16,474,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payments to counties and the city of New York related to indigent
legal services pursuant to section 98-b of the state finance law and
sections 832 and 833 of the executive law. Such contracts shall be
extended for a period of not more than twenty-four months (55502)
... 81,000,000 ................................... (re. $13,468,000)

1056 12653-09-6
INTEREST ON LAWYER ACCOUNT
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
Fiduciary Funds .................... 102,500,000 17,314,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 102,500,000 17,314,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
NEW YORK INTEREST ON LAWYER ACCOUNT ........................ 102,500,000
--------------
Fiduciary Funds
New York Interest on Lawyer Fund
IOLA Private Contributions Account - 20301
For payment of grants pursuant to the
provisions of section 97-v of the state
finance law (32705) ........................ 102,500,000
--------------

1057 12653-09-6
INTEREST ON LAWYER ACCOUNT
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
HOMEOWNER PROTECTION PROGRAM
Fiduciary Funds
New York Interest on Lawyer Fund
IOLA Private Contributions Account - 20301
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024 as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding section 97-v of the state finance law or any provision
of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, funds appropriated here-
in shall be used for services and expenses of the homeowner
protection program intended to avoid foreclosures. Permissible
purposes for allocation of the funds include, but are not limited
to, providing funding for housing counselors, state and local fore-
closure assistance hotlines, state and local foreclosure mediation
programs, legal assistance, housing remediation and antiblight
projects, and for the training and staffing of, and capital expendi-
tures required by, financial fraud and consumer protection efforts.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, for the purposes stated herein. Notwith-
standing any law to the contrary, these funds may be used to support
existing contracts and multi-year contracts (31504) ................
40,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,099,000)
LEGAL REPRESENTATION FOR EVICTION
Fiduciary Funds
New York Interest on Lawyer Fund
IOLA Private Contributions Account - 20301
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding section 97-v of the state finance law or any other
provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, funds appro-
priated herein shall be used for legal representation services, as
follows: $4 million for Legal Services NYC, $4 million for the Legal
Aid Society, $2 million for the City of New York to distribute to
providers of legal services and representation for eviction cases,
excluding Legal Services NYC and the Legal Aid Society, in propor-
tion to the caseload of such providers, and $5 million to supplement
a program for legal services and representation for eviction cases
outside of New York City. Funds appropriated herein, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, may be transferred, suballo-
cated, or otherwise made available to any other state agency or
authority for purposes defined herein. Notwithstanding any law to
the contrary, these funds may be used to support existing contracts
and multi-year contracts (31506) ... 15,000,000 .. (re. $12,215,000)

1058 12653-09-6
JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION
OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 1,007,000 1,041,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 1,007,000 1,041,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
COMMUNITY SUPPORT PROGRAMS ................................... 1,007,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
increased or decreased by interchange,
with any appropriation of the justice
center for the protection of people with
special needs, and may be increased or
decreased by transfer or suballocation
between these appropriated amounts and
appropriations of the office of mental
health, office for people with develop-
mental disabilities, office of addiction
services and supports, department of
health, and the office of children and
family services with the approval of the
director of the budget who shall file such
approval with the department of audit and
control and copies thereof with the chair-
man of the senate finance committee and
the chairman of the assembly ways and
means committee.
For services and expenses related to the
adult homes advocacy program:
Mobilization for Justice, Inc. (63000) ........... 105,000
Legal Services of Long Island, Inc. (63001) ....... 65,000
For services and expenses related to the
adult homes resident council support
project:
Family Service League, Inc. (63003) ............... 60,000
For surrogate decision-making committee
program contracts with local service
providers (63002) .............................. 777,000
--------------

1059 12653-09-6
JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION
OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
COMMUNITY SUPPORT PROGRAMS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro-
priation of the justice center for the protection of people with
special needs, and may be increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations
of the office of mental health, office for people with developmental
disabilities, office of addiction services and supports, department
of health, and the office of children and family services with the
approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee.
For services and expenses related to the adult homes advocacy program:
Mobilization for Justice, Inc. (63000) ... 105,000 ..... (re. $53,000)
Legal Services of Long Island, Inc. (63001) ..........................
65,000 ............................................... (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses related to the adult homes resident council
support project:
Family Service League, Inc. (63003) ... 60,000 ......... (re. $30,000)
For surrogate decision-making committee program contracts with local
service providers (63002) ... 777,000 ............... (re. $568,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro-
priation of the justice center for the protection of people with
special needs, and may be increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations
of the office of mental health, office for people with developmental
disabilities, office of addiction services and supports, department
of health, and the office of children and family services with the
approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee.
For services and expenses related to the adult homes advocacy program:
Mobilization for Justice, Inc. (63000) ... 105,000 ... (re. $26,000)
Legal Services of Long Island, Inc. (63001) ..........................
65,000 ............................................... (re. $16,000)
For services and expenses related to the adult homes resident council
support project:
Family Service League, Inc. (63003) ..................................
60,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)

1060 12653-09-6
JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION
OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For surrogate decision-making committee program contracts with local
service providers (63002) ... 569,000 ................ (re. $45,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro-
priation of the justice center for the protection of people with
special needs, and may be increased or decreased by transfer or
suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations
of the office of mental health, office for people with developmental
disabilities, office of addiction services and supports, department
of health, and the office of children and family services with the
approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval
with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the
chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the
assembly ways and means committee.
For surrogate decision-making committee program contracts with local
service providers (63002) ... 569,000 ............... (re. $255,000)

1061 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 60,727,000 100,061,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 246,135,000 553,610,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 419,000 468,000
Enterprise Funds ................... 6,002,500,000 11,601,849,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 6,309,781,000 12,255,988,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 15,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund
Unemployment Insurance Administration Account - 25901
For services and expenses of administering
unemployment insurance programs, job
service programs, workforce investment act
programs, employability development
programs, other miscellaneous programs,
and a reserve for unanticipated funding,
pursuant to federal grants and contracts.
A portion of this appropriation may be
transferred to state operations. Notwith-
standing any other law to the contrary, a
portion of this appropriation may be
suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority
for the purposes stated herein (34218) ...... 15,000,000
--------------
CENSUS PLANNING COMMISSION ................................... 3,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to the
establishment of a state census planning
commission. Notwithstanding any other
provision of the law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any aid to locali-
ties, state operations, or capital appro-
priation or any state department, agency,

1062 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
or public authority for the purposes stat-
ed herein .................................... 3,000,000
--------------
CRIMINAL WAGE THEFT INVESTIGATIONS ........................... 5,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of a grant program
to support district attorneys in conduct-
ing criminal wage theft investigations.
The department may require offices receiv-
ing this funding to submit information
such as data detailing prosecutions,
convictions, restitution and other rele-
vant information ............................. 5,000,000
--------------
EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING PROGRAM ............................ 257,362,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the Jewish Home
Lifecare, for the purposes of the New
Jewish Home .................................. 2,500,000
For services and expenses of the Buffalo
Center for Arts and Technology ................. 200,000
For services and expenses of the Multi-Craft
Apprenticeship Preparation Program
(M.A.P.P.) / building trades pre-appren-
ticeship program (BTPAP) located in
Rochester ...................................... 200,000
For services and expenses of the Building
Trades Pre-Apprenticeship Program
(BTPAP)/Multi-Craft Apprenticeship Prepa-
ration Program (M.A.P.P.)located in Albany
................................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of the Center for
Employment Opportunities ....................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Collective
Food Works Inc ................................. 120,000
For services and expenses of the Cannabis
Workforce Initiative at the Cornell
University School of Industrial and Labor
Relations .................................... 3,025,000
For services and expenses of the Labor Lead-
ing on Climate Initiative at the Cornell

1063 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
University School of Industrial and Labor
Relations .................................... 3,000,000
For services and expenses of the Training
and Education, Criminal Records program at
the Industrial Labor Relations School of
Cornell University ............................. 125,000
For services and expenses of the Sexual
Harassment Prevention Program at the
Industrial Labor Relations School of
Cornell University ............................. 150,000
For services and expenses of the Crenulated
Company, LTD Young Adult Opportunity
Initiative (YAOI) .............................. 300,000
For services related to the continuation of
displaced homemaker services.
Funds made available herein may be used for
state agency contractors, or aid to local
social services districts, provided,
further, that no more than ten percent of
such funds may be used for program admin-
istration at each individual displaced
homemaker center. Each program administra-
tor shall prepare and submit an annual
report by December 1, 2026, to the depart-
ment of labor, the chairs of the senate
committee on social services, and the
senate committee on labor and the assembly
chair of the committee on social services
and the assembly chair of the committee on
labor, on the summary of activities,
including but not limited to the number of
eligible recipients, and the outcome for
each recipient together with a summary of
revenue and expenses, including all sala-
ries ......................................... 1,215,000
For services and expenses of the Girls
Building Trades Summer Camp ..................... 50,000
For services and expenses of the HOPE
Program for job training program related
expenses ....................................... 200,000
For services and expenses of NPOWER .............. 100,000
For services and expenses of New York
Committee on Occupational Safety and
Health (NYCOSH) ................................ 500,000
For services and expenses for the Workforce
Development Institute (WDI) to facilitate
childcare services for women in nontradi-
tional employment .............................. 375,000
For services and expenses of the Real Life
Rosies program administered by the Manu-
facturing Association of Central New York
(MACNY) ........................................ 500,000

1064 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Solar ONE ........... 200,000
For services and expenses of the Urban Leag-
ue of Rochester ................................. 50,000
For services and expenses of the Safety and
Mental Health Training Fund Program admin-
istered by the Workforce Development
Institute ...................................... 500,000
For services and expenses of the Statewide
Pre-Apprenticeship program (SPAP) admin-
stered by the Workforce Development Insti-
tute ........................................... 750,000
For services and expenses of the Workforce
Development Institute ........................ 4,000,000
For services and expenses of YouthBuild
Schenectady ..................................... 75,000
For services and expenses of the Building
Trades Pre-Apprentinceship Program located
in Nassau County ............................... 200,000
For services and expenses of the Buffalo
Co-Lab at the Industrial Labor Relations
School of Cornell University ................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Yang-Tan
Institute at the Industrial Labor
Relations School of Cornell University ......... 300,000
For services and expenses of the domestic
violence program at the Industrial Labor
Relations School of Cornell University ......... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Worker
Institute at the Cornell University School
of Industrial and Labor Relations .............. 300,000
For services and expenses of the Domestic
Worker Alliance ................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of the Eastern New
York Laborers Training Center .................. 200,000
For services and expenses of the Laborers
Training Center ................................ 200,000
For services and expenses of the Edward
Malloy Apprenticeship Program .................. 500,000
For services and expenses of the Freelancers
Union, Inc ..................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Future of
Work Initiative ................................ 150,000
For services and expenses of the Gay Men's
Health Crisis .................................. 180,000
For services and expenses of the LGBTQ Black
and Latino Institute for Leadership Train-
ing ............................................ 180,000
For services and expenses of LGBTQ Works ......... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Long Island
Coalition for Occupational Safety and
Health (NYCOSH) ................................ 200,000
For services and expenses of the Building

1065 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Trades Pre-Apprenticeship Program located
in Newburgh .................................... 200,000
For services and expenses of the Registered
Apprenticeship Programs administered by
the Manufacturers Association of Central
New York ..................................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of Nonprofit West-
chester ........................................ 135,000
For services and expenses of the Northeast
New York Coalition for Occupational Safety
and Health (NYCOSH) ............................. 85,000
For services and expenses of Building Trades
Apprenticeship Programs located in New
York City administered by the Workforce
Development Institute (WDI) .................... 600,000
For services and expenses of the New York
State AFL-CIO Cornell Union Leadership
Institute ...................................... 300,000
For services and expenses of the upstate New
York laborers training center .................. 200,000
For services and expenses of the building
trades pre-apprenticeship program (BTPAP)
located in Western New York .................... 200,000
For services and expenses of the Western New
York Coalition for Occupational Safety and
Health (NYCOSH) ................................ 200,000
For services and expenses of the manufactur-
ing institute at the Workforce Development
Institute (WDI) .............................. 2,500,000
For services and expenses of YouthBuild ........ 2,500,000
For services and expenses of the Manufactur-
ers Association of Central New York, inc ....... 750,000
For services and expenses of Teamsters Local
317 ............................................ 112,000
For services and expenses related to the
department of labor's office of just tran-
sition. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the funds appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer between state operations and aid
to localities. Funds appropriated herein
may be suballocated or transferred to any
state department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes stated herein
(34747) ..................................... 22,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 52,727,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Emergency Employment Act Fund
Federal Workforce Investment Act Account - 26001

1066 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For the administration and operation of
employment and training programs as funded
by grants under the workforce investment
act, public law 105-220, and the workforce
innovation and opportunity act, public law
113-128, including grants to other govern-
mental units, community-based organiza-
tions, non-profit and for profit organiza-
tions, suballocations to state departments
and agencies and a portion may be trans-
ferred to state operations, according to
the following:
For services and expenses of statewide
activities, including but not limited to
state administration and technical assist-
ance to local workforce investment areas,
pursuant to an expenditure plan approved
by the director of the budget. Of the
moneys appropriated herein for statewide
activities, the state workforce investment
board shall assist the governor in devel-
oping programs and identifying activities
to be funded through the statewide reserve
pursuant to section 134 of the federal
workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and
section 134 of the workforce innovation
and opportunity act, PL 113-128, and the
commissioner of labor shall periodically
report to the state workforce investment
board on such programs and activities
which shall be developed giving consider-
ation to the strategic training alliance
program and other existing programs.
Statewide employment and training activ-
ities may include one-to-one business
advisement and training for qualified
enrollees of the self-employment assist-
ance program which may be operated by the
state's small business development centers
or the entrepreneurial assistance program.
Services and expenses for workforce devel-
opment shall be administered in consulta-
tion with the state workforce investment
board established in article 24-A of the
labor law and state agencies responsible
for administration of workforce develop-
ment programs (34780) ........................ 2,988,000
For services and expenses of adult, youth
and dislocated worker employment and
training local workforce investment area
programs and statewide rapid response
activities (34779) ......................... 181,647,000

1067 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of miscellaneous
workforce investment act, public law 105-
220, and workforce innovation and opportu-
nity act, public law 113-128, national
reserve grants and other federal employ-
ment and training grants and federally
administered programs (34778) ............... 20,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 204,635,000
--------------
OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM ......................... 419,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Hazard Abatement Account - 22152
For payment of state aid to local govern-
ments pursuant to the provisions of chap-
ter 729 of the laws of 1980 for the
purposes of hazard abatement (34203) ........... 419,000
--------------
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM ................... 6,029,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Unemployment Insurance Occupational Training Fund
Unemployment Insurance Occupational Training Account -
25950
For the payment of expenses and allowances
to authorized enrollees under approved
employment and training programs or for
payment of unemployment insurance benefits
as authorized by the federal government
through the disaster unemployment assist-
ance program (34787) ........................ 26,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 26,500,000
--------------
Enterprise Funds
Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund
Unemployment Insurance Benefit Account - 50650
For payment of unemployment insurance bene-
fits pursuant to article 18 of the labor
law or as authorized by the federal
government through the disaster unemploy-
ment assistance program, the emergency

1068 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
unemployment compensation program, the
extended benefit program, the federal
additional compensation program or any
other federally funded unemployment bene-
fit program (34787) ...................... 6,000,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 6,000,000,000
--------------
Enterprise Funds
Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund
Additional Payments Account - 50652
For payment of additional payments of unem-
ployment insurance benefits pursuant to
article 18 of the labor law or as author-
ized by the federal government through the
disaster unemployment assistance program,
the emergency unemployment compensation
program, the extended benefit program, the
federal additional compensation program or
any other federally funded unemployment
benefit program (34787) ...................... 2,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,500,000
--------------

1069 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund
Unemployment Insurance Administration Account - 25901
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance
programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs,
employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs,
and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants
and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a
portion of this appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to
any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes
stated herein (34218) ... 15,000,000 ............. (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance
programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs,
employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs,
and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants
and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a
portion of this appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to
any state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes
stated herein (34218) ... 15,000,000 ............. (re. $15,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance
programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs,
employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs,
and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants
and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations (34218) ... 15,000,000 .......... (re. $14,991,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance
programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs,
employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs,
and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants
and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations (34218) ... 15,000,000 .......... (re. $14,542,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance
programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs,
employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs,
and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants
and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations (34218) ... 15,000,000 .......... (re. $14,212,000)

1070 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of Multi-Craft Apprenticeship Preparation
Program (M.A.P.P) / building trades pre-apprenticeship program
(BTPAP) located in Albany (34730) ... 200,000 ....... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Nassau County administered by the Work-
force Development Institute (WDI) (34205) ..........................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Cannabis Workforce Initiative at the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34735)
... 3,025,000 ..................................... (re. $3,025,000)
For services and expenses of the Training and Education, Criminal
Records program at the Industrial Labor Relations School of Cornell
University (34707) ... 125,000 ...................... (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell ILR Buffalo Co-Lab (34650) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell ILR Yang-Tan Institute (34651)
... 300,000 ......................................... (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell Industrial and Labor Relations
(ILR) Sexual Harassment Prevention Program (34713) .................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Domestic Violence Program of the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34230)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Worker Institute at the Cornell
University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34761) ........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services.
Funds made available herein may be used for state agency contractors,
or aid to local social services districts, provided, further, that
no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for program
administration at each individual displaced homemaker center. Each
program administrator shall prepare and submit an annual report by
December 1, 2025, to the department of labor, the chairs of the
senate committee on social services, and the senate committee on
labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social services and
the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the summary of
activities, including but not limited to the number of eligible
recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together with a
summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries (34799) ....
1,215,000 ......................................... (re. $1,215,000)
For services and expenses of the National Domestic Worker Alliance,
Inc (34652) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Eastern New York laborers Training Center
(34653) ... 200,000 ................................. (re. $200,000)

1071 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Edward J. Malloy Apprenticeship
Program (34748) ... 500,000 ......................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of the Freelancers Union, Inc (34661) ......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell ILR Future of Care Work
Initiative (34662) ... 150,000 ...................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Gay Men's Health Crisis (34744) .....
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell ILR Labor Leading on Climate
Jobs Initiative (34734) ... 3,000,000 ............. (re. $3,000,000)
For services and expenses of LGBTQ Black and Latino Institute for
Leadership Training (34728) ... 180,000 ............. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual & Transgender
Community Center (LGBTQ Works) (34709) .............................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Long Island Coalition for Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34233) ..........................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Manufacturers Association of Central
New York, Inc (34701) ... 750,000 ................... (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of the Manufacturers Intermediary Appren-
ticeship Program (MIAP) (34743) ....................................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Jewish Home Lifecare, for the
purposes of The New Jewish Home (34750) ............................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Coalition for Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34790) ... 500,000 ...... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Newburgh administered by the Workforce
Development Institute (WDI) (34719) ... 200,000 ..... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses for the Workforce Development Institute
(WDI) to facilitate employment and childcare services for disadvan-
taged groups in the building and construction trades (34663) ...
375,000 ............................................. (re. $375,000)
For services and expenses of Nonprofit Westchester (34700) ...........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Northeast New York Coalition for
Occupational Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34717) ....................
85,000 ............................................... (re. $85,000)
For services and expenses of building trades apprenticeship programs
located in New York City administered by the Workforce Development
Institute (WDI) (34664) ... 600,000 ................. (re. $600,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State AFL-CIO Cornell Union
Leadership Institute (34229) ... 300,000 ............ (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of Multi-Craft Apprenticeship Preparation
Program (M.A.P.P) / building trades pre-apprenticeship program
(BTPAP) located in Rochester (34774) ... 200,000 .... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of a Statewide Pre-Apprenticeship Program
(SPAP) administered by the Workforce Development Institute (WDI)
(34746) ... 750,000 ................................. (re. $750,000)

1072 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Teamsters Local 317 Training Fund
(34665) ... 112,000 ................................. (re. $112,000)
For services and expenses of the Upstate New York Laborers Training
Center (34655) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of safety training administered by the Work-
force Development Institute (WDI) (34666) ..........................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Western New York administered by the
Workforce Development Institute (WDI) (34766) ......................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) .........................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State American Federation of
Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) Workforce
Development Institute (WDI) (34237) ................................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000)
For services and expenses of a manufacturing initiative administered
by the New York State American Federation of Labor and Congress of
Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) Workforce Development Institute
(WDI) (34762) ... 2,500,000 ....................... (re. $2,500,000)
For services and expenses of Statewide YouthBuild Programs (34727) ...
2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $2,500,000)
For services and expenses of the Center for Employment Opportunities
(34656) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Collective Food Works Inc (34729) .......
120,000 ............................................. (re. $120,000)
For services and expenses of the Crenulated Company, LTD Young Adult
Opportunity Initiative (YAOI) (34740) ... 150,000 ... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the HOPE Program for job training program
related expenses (34718) ... 200,000 ................ (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of NPOWER (34732) ..........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Path for Healing Foundation - Rebound on
the Road (34667) ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of Real Life Rosies program administered by
the Manufacturing Association of Central New York (MACNY) (34668)
... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Solar ONE (34741) .......................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $181,000)
For services and expenses of Urban League Rochester (34742) ..........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of YouthBuild Schenectady (34733) ..........
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses related to the department of labor's office
of just transition. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the funds appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer between state operations and aid to localities. Funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (34747) ... 22,500,000 .................... (re. $22,500,000)

1073 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services. Funds made available herein may be used for state agency
contractors, or aid to local social services districts, provided,
further, that no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for
program administration at each individual displaced homemaker
center. Each program administrator shall prepare and submit an annu-
al report by December 1, 2024, to the department of labor, the
chairs of the senate committee on social services, and the senate
committee on labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social
services and the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the
summary of activities, including but not limited to the number of
eligible recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together
with a summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries
(34799) ... 1,620,000 ............................... (re. $442,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State American Federation of
Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) Workforce
Development Institute (WDI) (34237) ................................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,369,000)
For services and expenses of the Cannabis Workforce Initiative at the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34735)
... 3,025,000 ......................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the HOPE Program for job training program
related expenses (34718) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Coalition for Occupational
Safety and health (NYCOSH) (34790) ... 350,000 ....... (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses of the non-traditional employment for women
childcare program (34749) ... 375,000 ............... (re. $375,000)
For services and expenses of Collective Food Works Inc (34729) .......
120,000 ............................................. (re. $120,000)
For services and expenses of Solar ONE (34741) .......................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $34,000)
For services and expenses of YouthBuild Schenectady (34733) ..........
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Urban League Rochester (34742) ..........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell ILR Labor Leading on Climate
Jobs Initiative (34734) ... 3,000,000 ............... (re. $432,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Nassau County administered by the Work-
force Development Institute (WDI) (34205) ..........................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $67,000)
For services and expenses of Cornell ILR Yang-Tan Institute (34651)
... 300,000 .......................................... (re. $19,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State AFL-CIO Cornell Union
Leadership Institute (34229) ... 300,000 ............ (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the National Domestic Worker Alliance,
Inc. (34652) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of Eastern New York laborers Training Center
(34653) ... 200,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the Edward J. Malloy Apprenticeship
Program (34748) ... 500,000 .......................... (re. $89,000)

1074 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Gay Men's Health Crisis (34744) ...
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Rochester Chamber of Commerce
(34654) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of LGBTQ Black and Latino Institute for
Leadership Training (34728) ... 180,000 ............. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual & Transgender
Community Center (LGBTQ Works) (34709) .............................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Long Island Coalition for Occupa-
tional Safety and health (NYCOSH) (34233) ..........................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Manufacturers Association of Central
New York, Inc. (34701) .............................................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $415,000)
For services and expenses of the Manufacturers Intermediary Appren-
ticeship Program (MIAP) (34743) ....................................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $673,000)
For services and expenses of the New Jewish Home (34750) .............
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Newburgh administered by the Workforce
Development Institute (WDI) (34719) ... 200,000 ..... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Nonprofit Westchester (34700) ...........
100,000 .............................................. (re. $26,000)
For services and expenses of the Northeast New York Coalition for
Occupational Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34717) ....................
85,000 ............................................... (re. $85,000)
For services and expenses of the Upstate New York Laborers Training
Center (34655) ... 200,000 ........................... (re. $84,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) .........................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $81,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Western New York administered by the
Workforce Development Institute (WDI) (34766) ......................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $82,000)
For services and expenses of a manufacturing initiative administered
by the New York State American Federation of Labor and Congress of
Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) Workforce Development Institute
(WDI) (34762) ... 2,500,000 ....................... (re. $1,312,000)
For services and expenses of Statewide YouthBuild Programs (34727) ...
2,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,683,000)
For services and expenses of Multi-Craft Apprenticeship Preparation
Program (M.A.P.P) / building trades pre-apprenticeship program
(BTPAP) located in Albany (34730) ..................................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Multi-Craft Apprenticeship Preparation
Program (M.A.P.P) / building trades pre-apprenticeship program
(BTPAP) located in Rochester (34774) ...............................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)

1075 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Center for Employment Opportunities
(34656) ... 150,000 .................................. (re. $91,000)
For services and expenses of the North Country Chamber of Commerce
(34659) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Rochester Careers in Construction, Inc
(34660) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses related to the department of labor's office
of just transition. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of
law, the funds appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by
transfer between state operations and aid to localities. Funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated
herein (34747) ... 22,500,000 .................... (re. $21,691,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services.
Funds made available herein may be used for state agency contractors,
or aid to local social services districts, provided, further, that
no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for program
administration at each individual displaced homemaker center. Each
program administrator shall prepare and submit an annual report by
December 1, 2023, to the department of labor, the chairs of the
senate committee on social services, and the senate committee on
labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social services and
the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the summary of
activities, including but not limited to the number of eligible
recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together with a
summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries (34799) ...
1,620,000 ........................................... (re. $270,000)
For services and expenses of the Northeast New York Coalition for
Occupational Safety (34717) ... 85,000 ............... (re. $26,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Coalition for Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34790) ... 350,000 ........ (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the Gay Men's Health Crisis (34744) ...
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of LGBTQ Black and Latino Leadership Train-
ing (34728) ... 180,000 ............................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Newburgh administered by the Workforce
Development Institute (WDI) (34719) ... 200,000 ...... (re. $81,000)
For services and expenses of a building trades pre-apprenticeship
program (BTPAP) located in Western New York administered by the
Workforce Development Institute (WDI) (34766) ......................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34228) ..........................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $38,000)
For services and expenses of the Edward J. Malloy Initiative for
Construction Skills, Inc (34748) ... 500,000 .......... (re. $1,000)

1076 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the non-traditional employment for women
childcare program (34749) ... 375,000 ............... (re. $314,000)
For services and expenses of the Manufacturers Association of Central
New York, Inc (34701) ..............................................
750,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell ILR Labor Leading on Climate
Initiative (34734) ... 2,000,000 ...................... (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of Statewide YouthBuild Programs (34727) ...
2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $738,000)
For services and expenses of the Cannabis Workforce Initiative at the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34735)
... 3,000,000 ........................................ (re. $34,000)
For services and expenses of a Multi-Craft Apprenticeship Preparation
Program (M.A.P.P.) building trades pre-apprenticeship program
(BTPAP) located in Albany administered by the Workforce Development
Institute (WDI) (34730) ... 200,000 ................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Collective Food Works Inc (34729) .......
120,000 ............................................. (re. $120,000)
For services and expenses of the Urban League of Rochester (34742) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $26,000)
For services and expenses of NYU Law Employment Action Center (34751)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services.
Funds made available herein may be used for state agency contractors,
or aid to local social services districts, provided, further, that
no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for program
administration at each individual displaced homemaker center. Each
program administrator shall prepare and submit an annual report by
December 1, 2022, to the department of labor, the chairs of the
senate committee on social services, and the senate committee on
labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social services and
the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the summary of
activities, including but not limited to the number of eligible
recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together with a
summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries (34799) ...
1,620,000 ........................................... (re. $145,000)
For services and expenses of Multi-Craft Apprenticeship Preparation
Program (M.A.P.P.) - Rochester (34730) .............................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $27,000)
For services and expenses of Collective Food Works Inc. (34729) ......
120,000 ............................................. (re. $120,000)
For services and expenses of the Urban League of Rochester (34742) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of Statewide YouthBuild Programs (34727) ...
2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $571,000)
For services and expenses of the Cannabis Workforce Initiative at the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34735)
... 2,500,000 ........................................ (re. $79,000)

1077 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Cornell ILR Labor Leading on Climate
Initiative (34734) ... 800,000 ........................ (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) .........................
200,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of the Gay Men's Health Crisis (34744)
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of LGBTQ Black and Latino Leadership Train-
ing (34728) ... 180,000 ............................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of the Northeast New York Coalition for
Occupational Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34717) ....................
85,000 ............................................... (re. $12,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of a COVID-19 recovery workforce initiative
pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget. Such
funds shall support workers who have been most impacted by the
economic fallout due to the COVID-19 pandemic, including women,
minorities, and any workers that have received unemployment benefits
for an extended period of time.
Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any
other state agency or authority. Provided however, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be transferred to the miscellaneous
special revenue fund - state university offset account.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director
is hereby authorized transfer any amount appropriated herein to
state operations for workforce development and training activities
(34721) ... 50,000,000 ............................ (re. $9,883,000)
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services.
Funds made available herein may be used for state agency contractors,
or aid to local social services districts, provided, further, that
no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for program
administration at each individual displaced homemaker center. Each
program administrator shall prepare and submit an annual report by
December 1, 2021, to the department of labor, the chairs of the
senate committee on social services, and the senate committee on
labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social services and
the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the summary of
activities, including but not limited to the number of eligible
recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together with a
summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries (34799) ...
1,620,000 ........................................... (re. $267,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell Industrial and Labor
Relations School Sexual Harassment Prevention Program (34713) ......
150,000 .............................................. (re. $23,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State American Federation of
Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) Cornell
Leadership Institute (34229) ... 150,000 .............. (re. $8,000)

1078 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Worker Institute at the Cornell
University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34761) ........
300,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) .........................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $37,000)
For services and expenses of the Northeast New York Coalition for
Occupational Safety And Health (34717) ... 85,000 ..... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual & Transgender
Community Center (LQBTQ Works) (34709) .............................
100,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of Statewide YouthBuild Programs (34727) ...
2,500,000 ........................................... (re. $583,000)
For services and expenses of LGBTQ Black and Latino Leadership Train-
ing (34728) ... 180,000 .............................. (re. $57,000)
For services and expenses of Collective Food Works Inc. (34729) ......
120,000 ............................................. (re. $120,000)
For services and expenses of the Cannabis Workforce Initiative at the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34735)
... 250,000 ........................................... (re. $8,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
Funds made available herein may be used for state agency contractors,
or aid to local social services districts, provided, further, that
no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for program
administration at each individual displaced homemaker center. Each
program administrator shall prepare and submit an annual report by
December 1, 2020, to the department of labor, the chairs of the
senate committee on social services, and the senate committee on
labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social services and
the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the summary of
activities, including but not limited to the number of eligible
recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together with a
summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries (34799) ...
1,620,000 ........................................... (re. $302,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Committee on Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34790) ... 350,000 ........ (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Committee for Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH), located on Long Island (34233) .........
200,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the Worker Institute at the Cornell
University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34761) ........
300,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) .........................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $39,000)
For services and expenses of the Northeast New York Coalition for
Occupational Safety And Health (34717) ... 85,000 ..... (re. $1,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:

1079 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of LaGuardia Community College (34716) ...
100,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual & Transgender
Community Center (34709) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of the Newburgh LGBTQ Center (34715) .......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the DREAMS Youth Build & Young Adult
Training program (34764) ... 250,000 ................ (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services. Funds made available herein may be used for state agency
contractors, or aid to local social services districts, provided,
further, that no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for
program administration at each individual displaced homemaker
center. Each program administrator shall prepare and submit an annu-
al report by December 1, 2019, to the department of labor, the
chairs of the senate committee on social services, and the senate
committee on labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social
services and the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the
summary of activities, including but not limited to the number of
eligible recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together
with a summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries
(34799) ... 1,620,000 ............................... (re. $205,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Committee for Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH), located on Long Island (34233) .........
200,000 ............................................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of the Domestic Violence Program of the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations in part-
nership with the New York State American Federation of Labor and
Congress of Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) (34230) .............
150,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Committee on Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH) (34790) ... 350,000 ....... (re. $32,000)
For services and expenses of the Worker Institute at the Cornell
University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34761) ........
300,000 ............................................... (re. $3,000)
For services and expenses of the Training and Education, Criminal
Records Program at Industrial Labor Relations School of Cornell
University (34707) ... 50,000 ......................... (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) .........................
200,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Manufacturers Association of Central New
York, Inc (34701) ... 750,000 ........................ (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of the Newburgh LGBTQ Center (34715) .......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of LaGuardia Community College (34716) ...
100,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of The Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual & Transgender
Community Center (34709) ... 100,000 ................. (re. $19,000)

1080 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Northeast New York Coalition for
Occupational Safety and Health (34717) .............................
85,000 ................................................ (re. $7,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services. Funds made available herein may be used for state agency
contractors, or aid to local social services districts, provided,
further, that no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for
program administration at each individual displaced homemaker
center. Each program administrator shall prepare and submit an annu-
al report by December 1, 2018, to the department of labor, the
chairs of the senate committee on social services, and the senate
committee on labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social
services and the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the
summary of activities, including but not limited to the number of
eligible recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together
with a summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries
(34799) ... 1,620,000 ................................ (re. $32,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Committee for Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH), located on Long Island (34233) .........
200,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of the Domestic Violence Program of the
Cornell University School of Industrial and Labor Relations in part-
nership with the New York State American Federation of Labor and
Congress of Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) (34230) .............
150,000 .............................................. (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of the Worker Institute at the Cornell
University School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34761) ........
300,000 .............................................. (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of the Industrial Labor Relations School of
Cornell University (34707) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Build programs located in New York
state (34764) ... 400,000 ............................. (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Occupa-
tional Safety and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) .........................
200,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of Manufacturers Association of Central New
York, Inc (34701) ... 750,000 ......................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Pipe Trades Industry
United Association to establish solar thermal technology training
pilot programs in strategic locations across the state (34710) .....
140,000 ............................................. (re. $111,000)
For services and expenses of the Chamber on the Job Training program
to assist employers in providing occupational, hands-on training for
their current employees, according to the following sub-schedule
(34235) ... 980,000 ................................. (re. $182,000)
sub-schedule
Tioga County Chamber of Commerce ... 140,000
Greater Olean Chamber of
Commerce - Cattaraugus Coun-

1081 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ty ............................... 140,000
Hornell Chamber of Commerce -
Steuben County ................... 140,000
Plattsburgh North Country
Chamber of Commerce .............. 140,000
Tompkins County Chamber of
Commerce ......................... 140,000
Greater Binghamton Chamber of
Commerce - Broome County ......... 140,000
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce -
Kings County ..................... 140,000
--------------
Total of sub-schedule ............ 980,000
--------------
For services and expenses of The Solar Energy Consortium (TSEC)
(34214) ... 500,000 ................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of the Summer of Opportunity Youth Employ-
ment Program - Rochester (34783) ... 300,000 .......... (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses of the Cornell Industrial and Labor
Relations School Sexual Harassment Prevention Program (34713) ......
150,000 .............................................. (re. $43,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services. Funds made available herein may be used for state agency
contractors, or aid to local social services districts, provided,
further, that no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for
program administration at each individual displaced homemaker
center. Each program administrator shall prepare and submit an annu-
al report by December 1, 2017, to the department of labor, the
chairs of the senate committee on social services, and the senate
committee on labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social
services and the assembly chair of the committee on labor, on the
summary of activities, including but not limited to the number of
eligible recipients, and the outcome for each recipient together
with a summary of revenue and expenses, including all salaries
(34799) ... 1,620,000 ................................ (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Council on Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH), located on Long Island (34233) ...
200,000 .............................................. (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of a logger job training program adminis-
tered by the AFL-CIO Workforce Development Institute in partnership
with the North American Logger Training School at Paul Smith's
College and New York Logger Training (34206) .......................
400,000 .............................................. (re. $43,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State American Federation of
Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations (AFL-CIO) Cornell
Leadership Institute (34229) .......................................
150,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of the Domestic Violence Program of the
Cornell University Labor Extension School in Partnership with the

1082 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
New York State American Federation of Labor and Congress of Indus-
trial Organizations (AFL-CIO) (34230) ..............................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $17,000)
For services and expenses of the Worker Institute at the Cornell
School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34761) ...................
300,000 .............................................. (re. $48,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Build programs located in New York
state (34764) ... 300,000 ............................. (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Council on Safety
and Health (WNYCOSH) (34228) ... 200,000 .............. (re. $6,000)
For services and expenses of the Chamber on the Job Training program
to assist employers in providing occupational, hands-on training for
their current employees according to the following sub-schedule
(34235) ... 980,000 .................................. (re. $77,000)
sub-schedule
Tioga County Chamber of Commerce ... 140,000
Greater Olean Chamber of
Commerce - Cattaraugus County .... 140,000
Hornell Chamber of Commerce -
Steuben County ................... 140,000
Plattsburgh North Country
Chamber of Commerce .............. 140,000
Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce 140,000
Greater Binghamton Chamber of
Commerce - Broome County ......... 140,000
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce -
Kings County ..................... 140,000
For services and expenses of the Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual and Transgen-
der community center (34709) .......................................
100,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses of The Solar Energy Consortium (TSEC)(34214)
... 500,000 ........................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Pipe Trades Industry
United Association to establish solar thermal technology training
pilot programs in Rochester, Buffalo, the Southern Tier region and
on Long Island (34710) ... 140,000 ................... (re. $93,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services related to the continuation of displaced homemaker
services. Funds made available herein may be used for state agency
contractors, or aid to local social services districts, provided,
further, that no more than ten percent of such funds may be used for
program administration at each individual displaced homemaker
center. Each program administrator shall prepare and submit an annu-
al report by December 1, 2016, to the department of labor, the
chairs of the senate committee on social services, and the senate
committee on labor and the assembly chair of the committee on social
services, on the summary of activities, including but not limited to
the number of eligible recipients, and the outcome for each recipi-

1083 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ent together with a summary of revenue and expenses including all
salaries (34799) ... 975,000 ......................... (re. $38,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Council on Occupational
Safety and Health (NYCOSH), located on Long Island (34233) .........
155,000 ............................................... (re. $9,000)
For Services and expenses of the North American Logger Training School
to be hosted at Paul Smith's College (34206) .......................
300,000 .............................................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of the Domestic Violence Program of the
Cornell University Labor Extension School in Partnership with the
New York State American Federation of Labor and Congress of Indus-
trial Organizations (AFL-CIO) (34230) ..............................
150,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of the Worker Institute at the Cornell
School of Industrial and Labor Relations (34761) ...................
350,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Build programs located in New York
state (34764) ... 300,000 ............................. (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses of the Chamber on the Job Training program
to assist employers in providing occupational, hands-on training for
their current employees according to the following sub-schedule
(34235) ... 840,000 .................................. (re. $10,000)
Greater Olean Chamber of Commerce - Catta-
raugus County ................................ 140,000
Hornell Chamber of Commerce - Steuben County ... 140,000
Plattsburgh North Country Chamber of
Commerce ..................................... 140,000
Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce ............ 140,000
Greater Binghamton Chamber of Commerce -
Broome County ................................ 140,000
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce - Kings County .... 140,000
For services and expenses of the New York committee on occupational
safety and health (34790) ... 350,000 ................. (re. $8,000)
For services and expenses for the Pre-Apprenticeship Training Program
at the Construction Training Centers of New York State (CTCNYS)
located in Buffalo, Albany, Syracuse, Ronkonkoma and Rochester
(34702) ... 100,000 ................................... (re. $1,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses of the North American Logger Training School
to be hosted at Paul Smith's College (34206) .......................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $170,000)
For services and expenses of Youth Build (34764) .....................
300,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the Chamber On-the-Job training program
to assist employers in providing occupational, hands-on training for

1084 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
their current employees according to the following sub-schedule
(34235) ... 980,000 ................................... (re. $1,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
----------------------------------------------------------
Greater Olean Chamber of Commerce -
Cattaraugus County ............................. 140,000
Hornell Chamber of Commerce - Steuben County ..... 140,000
Plattsburgh North Country Chamber of
Commerce ....................................... 140,000
Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce .............. 140,000
Greater Binghamton Chamber of Commerce -
Broome County .................................. 140,000
Amherst Chamber of Commerce - Niagara County ..... 140,000
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce - Kings County ...... 140,000
--------------
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the Chamber On-the-Job training program
to assist employers in providing occupational, hands-on training for
their current employees according to the following sub-schedule
(34235) ... 750,000 ................................. (re. $136,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
----------------------------------------------------------
Greater Olean Chamber of Commerce -
Cattaraugus County ............................. 107,140
Hornell Chamber of Commerce - Steuben County ..... 107,140
Plattsburgh North Country Chamber of
Commerce ....................................... 107,140
Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce .............. 107,140
Greater Binghamton Chamber of Commerce -
Broome County .................................. 107,140
Amherst Chamber of Commerce - Niagara County ..... 107,140
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce - Kings County ...... 107,140
--------------
Total .......................................... 749,980
--------------
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the Chamber On-the-Job training program
to assist employers in providing occupational, hands-on training for
their current employees according to the following sub-schedule
(34235) ... 750,000 ................................... (re. $1,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT

1085 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
----------------------------------------------------------
Greater Olean Chamber of Commerce -
Cattaraugus County ............................. 107,140
Hornell Chamber of Commerce - Steuben County ..... 107,140
Plattsburgh North Country Chamber of
Commerce ....................................... 107,140
Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce .............. 107,140
Greater Binghamton Chamber of Commerce -
Broome County .................................. 107,140
Amherst Chamber of Commerce - Niagara County ..... 107,140
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce - Kings County ...... 107,140
--------------
Total .......................................... 749,980
--------------
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the chamber-on-the-job training program
according to the following sub-schedule (34235) ....................
750,000 ............................................... (re. $1,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
----------------------------------------------------------
Greater Olean Chamber of Commerce -
Cattaraugus County ............................. 107,140
Hornell Chamber of Commerce - Steuben County ..... 107,140
Plattsburgh North Country Chamber of
Commerce ....................................... 107,140
Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce .............. 107,140
Greater Binghamton Chamber of Commerce -
Broome County .................................. 107,140
Amherst Chamber of Commerce - Niagara County ..... 107,140
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce - Kings County ...... 107,140
--------------
Total .......................................... 749,980
--------------
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the On-the-Job training program to assist
employers in providing occupational, hands-on training for their
current employees, provided, however, that the amount of this appro-
priation available for expenditure and disbursement on and after
September 1, 2008 shall be reduced by six percent of the amount that
was undisbursed as of August 15, 2008 (34235) ......................
789,705 .............................................. (re. $66,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
Greater Olean Chamber of

1086 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Commerce - Cattaraugus County ..... 98,713
Hornell Chamber of Commerce -
Steuben County .................... 98,713
Plattsburgh North Country
Chamber of Commerce ............... 98,713
Tompkins County Chamber of
Commerce .......................... 98,713
Greater Binghamton Chamber of
Commerce - Broome County .......... 98,713
Tioga County Chamber of Com-
merce ............................ 140,000
Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce -
Kings County ...................... 98,713
---------------
Total ........................ 789,705
---------------
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For Senate Majority Labor Initiatives, of which up to $47,000 may be
used for the services and expenses of the Pre-Apprenticeship Train-
ing Program at the Construction Training Centers of New York State
(CTCNYS) located in Buffalo, Albany, Syracuse, Ronkonkomo and
Rochester and $50,000 used for the services and expenses of the
Worker Institute at the Cornell School of Industrial and Labor
Relations (34216) ... 1,800,000 ...................... (re. $46,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Emergency Employment Act Fund
Federal Workforce Investment Act Account - 26001
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the administration and operation of employment and training
programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity
act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental
units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit
organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and
a portion may be transferred to state operations, according to the
following:
For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not
limited to state administration and technical assistance to local
workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved
by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for
statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall
assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ-
ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section
134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section
134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, PL 113-128, and
the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to the state
workforce investment board on such programs and activities which
shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic training

1087 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
alliance program and other existing programs. Statewide employment
and training activities may include one-to-one business advisement
and training for qualified enrollees of the self-employment assist-
ance program which may be operated by the state's small business
development centers or the entrepreneurial assistance program.
Services and expenses for workforce development shall be adminis-
tered in consultation with the state workforce investment board
established in article 24-A of the labor law and state agencies
responsible for administration of workforce development programs
(34780) ... 3,444,000 ............................. (re. $3,444,000)
For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker
employment and training local workforce investment area programs and
statewide rapid response activities (34779) ........................
185,318,000 ..................................... (re. $177,804,000)
For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act,
public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal
employment and training grants and federally administered programs
(34778) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the administration and operation of employment and training
programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity
act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental
units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit
organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and
a portion may be transferred to state operations, according to the
following:
For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not
limited to state administration and technical assistance to local
workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved
by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for
statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall
assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ-
ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section
134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section
134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, PL 113-128, and
the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to the state
workforce investment board on such programs and activities which
shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic training
alliance program and other existing programs. Statewide employment
and training activities may include one-to-one business advisement
and training for qualified enrollees of the self-employment assist-
ance program which may be operated by the state's small business
development centers or the entrepreneurial assistance program.
Services and expenses for workforce development shall be adminis-
tered in consultation with the state workforce investment board
established in article 24-A of the labor law and state agencies
responsible for administration of workforce development programs
(34780) ... 3,585,000 ............................. (re. $3,585,000)

1088 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker
employment and training local workforce investment area programs and
statewide rapid response activities (34779) ........................
191,020,000 ...................................... (re. $88,325,000)
For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act,
public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal
employment and training grants and federally administered programs
(34778) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $20,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the administration and operation of employment and training
programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity
act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental
units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit
organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and
a portion may be transferred to state operations, according to the
following:
For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not
limited to state administration and technical assistance to local
workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved
by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for
statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall
assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ-
ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section
134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section
134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, PL 113-128, and
the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to the state
workforce investment board on such programs and activities which
shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic training
alliance program and other existing programs. Statewide employment
and training activities may include one-to-one business advisement
and training for qualified enrollees of the self-employment assist-
ance program which may be operated by the state's small business
development centers or the entrepreneurial assistance program.
Services and expenses for workforce development shall be adminis-
tered in consultation with the state workforce investment board
established in article 24-A of the labor law and state agencies
responsible for administration of workforce development programs
(34780) ... 3,678,000 ............................. (re. $1,529,000)
For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker
employment and training local workforce investment area programs and
statewide rapid response activities (34779) ........................
198,380,000 ....................................... (re. $5,967,000)
For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act,
public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal
employment and training grants and federally administered programs
(34778) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $19,172,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:

1089 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the administration and operation of employment and training
programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity
act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental
units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit
organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and
a portion may be transferred to state operations, according to the
following:
For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not
limited to state administration and technical assistance to local
workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved
by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for
statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall
assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ-
ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section
134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section
134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, PL 113-128, and
the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to the state
workforce investment board on such programs and activities which
shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic training
alliance program and other existing programs. Statewide employment
and training activities may include one-to-one business advisement
and training for qualified enrollees of the self-employment assist-
ance program which may be operated by the state's small business
development centers or the entrepreneurial assistance program.
Services and expenses for workforce development shall be adminis-
tered in consultation with the state workforce investment board
established in article 24-A of the labor law and state agencies
responsible for administration of workforce development programs
(34780) ... 3,498,000 ............................. (re. $3,498,000)
For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker
employment and training local workforce investment area programs and
statewide rapid response activities (34779) ........................
190,555,000 ...................................... (re. $11,838,000)
For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act,
public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal
employment and training grants and federally administered programs
(34778) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $19,992,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For the administration and operation of employment and training
programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity
act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental
units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit
organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and
a portion may be transferred to state operations, according to the
following:
For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not
limited to state administration and technical assistance to local
workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved

1090 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for
statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall
assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ-
ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section
134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section
134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, PL 113-128, and
the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to the state
workforce investment board on such programs and activities which
shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic training
alliance program and other existing programs. Statewide employment
and training activities may include one-to-one business advisement
and training for qualified enrollees of the self-employment assist-
ance program which may be operated by the state's small business
development centers or the entrepreneurial assistance program.
Services and expenses for workforce development shall be adminis-
tered in consultation with the state workforce investment board
established in article 24-A of the labor law and state agencies
responsible for administration of workforce development programs
(34780) ... 2,570,000 ............................. (re. $2,570,000)
For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker
employment and training local workforce investment area programs and
statewide rapid response activities (34779) ........................
147,616,000 ...................................... (re. $10,952,000)
For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act,
public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act,
public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal
employment and training grants and federally administered programs
(34778) ... 20,000,000 ........................... (re. $11,689,000)
OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Hazard Abatement Account - 22152
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of state aid to local governments pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 729 of the laws of 1980 for the purposes of
hazard abatement (34203) ... 419,000 ................ (re. $234,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of state aid to local governments pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 729 of the laws of 1980 for the purposes of
hazard abatement (34203) ... 419,000 ................ (re. $234,000)
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Unemployment Insurance Occupational Training Fund
Unemployment Insurance Occupational Training Account - 25950
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

1091 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the payment of expenses and allowances to authorized enrollees
under approved employment and training programs or for payment of
unemployment insurance benefits as authorized by the federal govern-
ment through the disaster unemployment assistance program (34787)
... 26,500,000 ................................... (re. $26,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the payment of expenses and allowances to authorized enrollees
under approved employment and training programs or for payment of
unemployment insurance benefits as authorized by the federal govern-
ment through the disaster unemployment assistance program (34787)
... 26,500,000 ................................... (re. $26,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For the payment of expenses and allowances to authorized enrollees
under approved employment and training programs or for payment of
unemployment insurance benefits as authorized by the federal govern-
ment through the disaster unemployment assistance program (34787)
... 26,500,000 ................................... (re. $26,500,000)
Enterprise Funds
Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund
Unemployment Insurance Benefit Account - 50650
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as amended by chapter
172, section 4, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of unemployment insurance benefits pursuant to article 18
of the labor law or as authorized by the federal government through
the disaster unemployment assistance program, the emergency unem-
ployment compensation program, the extended benefit program, the
federal additional compensation program or any other federally fund-
ed unemployment benefit program (34787) ............................
6,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $6,000,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of unemployment insurance benefits pursuant to article 18
of the labor law or as authorized by the federal government through
the disaster unemployment assistance program, the emergency unem-
ployment compensation program, the extended benefit program, the
federal additional compensation program or any other federally fund-
ed unemployment benefit program (34787) ............................
6,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $5,598,570,000)
Enterprise Funds
Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund
Additional Payments Account - 50652
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of additional payments of unemployment insurance benefits
pursuant to article 18 of the labor law or as authorized by the
federal government through the disaster unemployment assistance
program, the emergency unemployment compensation program, the

1092 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
extended benefit program, the federal additional compensation
program or any other federally funded unemployment benefit program
(34787) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of additional payments of unemployment insurance benefits
pursuant to article 18 of the labor law or as authorized by the
federal government through the disaster unemployment assistance
program, the emergency unemployment compensation program, the
extended benefit program, the federal additional compensation
program or any other federally funded unemployment benefit program
(34787) ... 2,000,000 ............................... (re. $779,000)

1093 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LAW
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 0 70,624,000
Fiduciary Funds .................... 0 377,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 0 71,001,000
================ ================
FORECLOSURE AVOIDANCE AND AMELIORATION
Fiduciary Funds
Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund
Mortgage Settlement Proceeds Trust Fund Account - 60690
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For allocation in accordance with a plan developed by the attorney
general intended to avoid foreclosures in accordance with a homeown-
er protection program, or to qualified grantees under such program,
in accordance with the requirements of such program. Permissible
purposes for allocation of the funds include, but are not limited
to, providing funding for housing counselors, state and local fore-
closure assistance hotlines, state and local foreclosure mediation
programs, legal assistance, housing remediation and anti-blight
projects, and for the training and staffing of, and capital expendi-
tures required by, financial fraud and consumer protection efforts.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated to any state department or agency
for the purposes stated herein, with the approval of the director of
the budget (35117) ... 10,000,000 ................... (re. $208,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For allocation as follows: In accordance with a plan developed by the
attorney general to provide compensation to the state of New York
and its communities for harms purportedly caused by the allegedly
unlawful conduct of J.P. Morgan Securities LLC (f/k/a "Bear, Stearns
& Co. Inc."), JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., EMC Mortgage LLC (f/k/a
"EMC Mortgage Corporation"), for purposes intended to avoid prevent-
able foreclosures, to ameliorate the effects of the foreclosure
crisis, to enhance law enforcement efforts to prevent and prosecute
financial fraud or unfair or deceptive acts or practices, and to
otherwise promote the interests of the investing public. Such
permissible purposes for allocation of the funds include, but are
not limited to, providing funding for housing counselors, state and
local foreclosure assistance hotlines, state and local foreclosure
mediation programs, legal assistance, housing remediation and antib-
light projects, and for the training and staffing of, and capital
expenditures required by, financial fraud and consumer protection
efforts, and for any other purpose consistent with the terms of the
Settlement Agreement dated November 19, 2013 between J.P. Morgan
Securities LLC (f/k/a "Bear, Stearns & Co. Inc."), JPMorgan Chase

1094 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF LAW
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Bank, N.A., EMC Mortgage LLC (f/k/a "EMC Mortgage Corporation") and
the people of the state of New York.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated to any state department or agency
for the purposes stated herein, with the approval of the director of
the budget, who shall file such approval with the department of
audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate
finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means
committee (35117) ... 81,500,234 .................... (re. $169,000)
SOCIAL JUSTICE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For allocation of monies received pursuant to the April 2023 Consent
Order and Judgment between The People of the State of New York and
JUUL Labs Inc., James Monsees, and Adam Bowen. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, such monies shall be allocated
pursuant to a plan developed by the attorney general and approved by
the budget director, provided that such monies shall only be used
for the purposes of public education campaigns to prevent e-cigar-
ette use among young people; community, school, and university-based
anti-vaping programs; vaping cessation services in communities,
schools and colleges; enforcement of vaping laws and regulations;
and/or public health research into e-cigarette use among young
people and the effectiveness of anti-vaping programs ...............
95,838,000 ....................................... (re. $70,624,000)

1095 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 641,649,000 117,202,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 265,160,000 170,459,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 166,129,000 384,551,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 1,072,938,000 672,212,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
COMMUNITY TREATMENT SERVICES PROGRAM ....................... 805,383,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment, net of disallowances, of state
financial assistance in accordance with
the mental hygiene law related to treat-
ment services.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law,
no payment shall be made from this appro-
priation until the recipient agency has
demonstrated that it has applied for and
received, or received formal notification
of refusal of, all forms of third-party
reimbursement, including federal aid and
patient fees. The moneys hereby appropri-
ated are available to reimburse or advance
to localities and voluntary nonprofit
agencies for expenditures heretofore
accrued or hereafter to accrue during
local fiscal periods commencing January 1,
2026 or July 1, 2026 and for advances for
the period beginning January 1, 2027.
The commissioner, pursuant to such contract
and/or funding authorization letter, may
pay from this appropriation all or a
portion of the expenses incurred by such
voluntary agencies arising out of loans
obtained from the proceeds of bonds and
notes issued by the dormitory authority of
the state of New York or another author-
ized entity approved by the division of
the budget. Such expenses may include, but
shall not be limited to, amounts relating

1096 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
to principal and interest and any other
fees and charges arising from such loans.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, a portion of the money appro-
priated herein may be made available for
obligations and payments heretofore or
hereafter accrued by the department of
health for substance use disorder treat-
ment services, including the state share
of medical assistance payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for expenses of localities,
nonprofit and for-profit agencies that may
arise from the assumption of operational
responsibilities for programs when operat-
ing certificates for such programs cease
to be in effect and/or programs are placed
into receivership pursuant to section
19.41 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office
of addiction services and supports shall
be authorized, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to continue
contracts which were executed on or before
March 31, 2026 with entities providing
services for problem gambling and
substance use disorder prevention, treat-
ment, harm reduction, and recovery
services, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative
procedures.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the commissioner
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be

1097 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized
to receive funds from the office of
addiction services and supports that were
returned from providers in the current
fiscal year in respect of a settlement of
local assistance funds from prior fiscal
years and is authorized to refund such
moneys to the credit of the local assist-
ance account of the general fund for the
purpose of reimbursing the 2026-27 appro-
priation.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
in accordance with the following:
For services and expenses related to the
administration of addiction services by
local governmental units (11834) ............. 4,121,000
For the state share of medical assistance
payments for outpatient services (11816) .... 32,344,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including reinvestment
in behavioral health services of general
fund savings directly related to savings
realized through the transition of popu-
lations from the medicaid fee-for service
system to a managed care model, including
savings resulting from the reduction of
inpatient and outpatient behavioral health
services provided under the medicaid
program (12012) ............................. 37,000,000
For services and expenses related to resi-
dential services (11822) ................... 138,256,000
For services and expenses related to crisis
services (11823) ............................ 13,999,000
For services and expenses related to problem
gambling, substance use disorder outpa-
tient, harm reduction, and treatment
support services (11815) ................... 184,201,000
For expenses related to debt service
payments for capital projects funded by
the proceeds of bonds and notes issued by
the dormitory authority of the state of
New York (11824) ............................ 39,983,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funding made available by this
appropriation shall support direct salary
costs and related fringe benefits associ-

1098 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
ated with any minimum wage increase that
takes effect on or after December 31,
2016, pursuant to section 652 of the labor
law. Organizations eligible for funding
made available by this appropriation shall
be limited to those that are required to
file a consolidated fiscal report with the
office of addiction services and supports.
Each eligible organization in receipt of
funding made available by this appropri-
ation shall submit written certification,
in such form and at such time as the
commissioner shall prescribe, attesting to
how such funding will be or was used for
purposes eligible under this appropri-
ation. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
the amounts appropriated herein may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer without limit to any local
assistance appropriation of the office of
addiction services and supports, and may
include advances to organizations author-
ized to receive such funds to accomplish
this purpose (11806) ......................... 6,870,000
For services and expenses of the office of
addiction services and supports to imple-
ment a chapter of the laws of 2026, to
provide funding for a targeted inflation-
ary increase for the purpose of establish-
ing rates of payments, contracts or any
other form of reimbursement for the period
April 1, 2026 through March 31, 2027.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
the amounts appropriated herein may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer without limit to any local
assistance appropriation, and may include
advances to local governments and volun-
tary agencies, to accomplish this purpose
(11836) ..................................... 17,555,000
For services and expenses for the develop-
ment and implementation of an adolescent
clubhouse (12094) .............................. 250,000
For services and expenses of the office of
the independent substance use disorder and
mental health ombudsman (12095) .............. 1,500,000

1099 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of jail-based
substance use disorder treatment and tran-
sition services. The commissioner, in
consultation with local governmental
units, county sheriffs and other stake-
holders, shall implement a jail-based
substance use disorder treatment and tran-
sition services program that supports the
initiation, operation and enhancement of
substance use disorder treatment and tran-
sition services for persons with substance
use disorder who are incarcerated in jails
in counties.
The services to be provided by such program,
subject to available appropriation, are to
ensure that the participating individuals
are receiving necessary supports and
services in addition to the medication
assisted treatment and shall be in accord-
ance with plans developed by participating
local governmental units, in collaboration
with county sheriffs and approved by the
commissioner. Such plans may, to the
extent that such services and forms of
medication assisted treatment are avail-
able in the county where the program is
operated, include, but not be limited to,
the following: (a) alcohol, heroin and
opioid withdrawal management; (b) every
form of medication assisted treatments
approved for the treatment of a substance
use disorder by the federal food and drug
administration necessary to ensure that
each individual participating in the
program receives the particular form found
to be most effective at treating and meet-
ing their individual needs, as determined
by the prescriber; (c) group and individ-
ual counseling and clinical support; (d)
peer support; (e) discharge planning; and
(f) re-entry and transitional supports.
Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the
state finance law and section 142 of the
economic development law, or any other
inconsistent provision of law, funds
available for expenditure pursuant to this
appropriation for the establishment of
this program, may be allocated and
distributed by the commissioner of the
office of addiction services and supports,

1100 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, without a competitive bid or
request for proposal process. Funding
shall be made available to local govern-
mental units pursuant to criteria estab-
lished by the office of addiction services
and supports, in consultation with local
governmental units, which shall take into
consideration the local needs and
resources as identified by local govern-
mental units, the average daily jail popu-
lation, the average number of persons
incarcerated in the jail that require
substance use disorder services and such
other factors as may be deemed necessary
(12096) ...................................... 9,084,000
For services and expenses relating to the
expanding and continuous support for
street outreach activities, including Safe
Options Support (SOS) teams, working with
addiction professionals, and utilizing
harm reduction approaches to support indi-
viduals facing a crisis during periods of
transition from homelessness to housing
(12035) ...................................... 1,500,000
For services and expenses related to a first
responder behavioral health center of
excellence ................................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of the following
organizations:
The Puerto Rican Organization to Motivate,
Enlighten and Serve Addicts, Inc. .............. 100,000
Camelot of Staten Island, Inc. ................... 100,000
Cazenovia Recovery Systems, Inc. ................. 100,000
Dynamic Youth Community, Inc ..................... 100,000
Helio Health, Inc. ............................... 100,000
Horizon Village, Inc ............................. 100,000
Odyssey House, Inc ............................... 100,000
Outreach Development Corporation ................. 100,000
Phoenix Houses of New York, Inc. ................. 100,000
Samaritan Daytop Village, Inc. ................... 100,000
St. Joseph's Rehabilitation Center, Inc. ......... 100,000
New York Therapeutic Communities, Inc.
(Stay'n Out Program) ........................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the New York
city department of education related to
the hiring of additional substance abuse
prevention and intervention specialists ...... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of Addiction

1101 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Recovery Supportive Transportation Demon-
stration Program ............................... 250,000
For services and expenses of Coalition of
Behavioral Health (InUnity Alliance Inc) ....... 250,000
For services and expenses of CUNY Graduate
School of Public Health and Health Policy
(Research Foundation of the City Universi-
ty of New York - CUNY RF for CUNY SPH
Harlem Strong Model Mental Health program) ..... 150,000
For services and expenses of Family and
Children's Association (Recovery Community
and Outreach Center) ........................... 500,000
For services and expenses of New York City
Department of Education related to
Substance Abuse Prevention and Inter-
vention Specialists - (SAPIS) ................ 1,000,000
For services and expenses of Samaritan
Daytop Village, Inc. ........................... 150,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 492,163,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Substance Use Prevention, Treatment, and Recovery
Services Block Grant (SUBG) Account - 25147
For services and expenses related to
prevention, intervention, treatment, and
recovery programs provided by the
substance use prevention, treatment and
recovery services block grant (SUBG).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of the funds hereby
appropriated may, subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, be trans-
ferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports consistent with the
terms and conditions of the SUBG award.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the commissioner
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of

1102 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, $5,000,000 of the funds hereby
appropriated may, subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, be used for
services and expenses associated with
federal grant awards yet to be allocated.
Appropriation authority contained herein
may be transferred to state operations
and/or any appropriation of the office of
addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office
of addiction services and supports shall
be authorized, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to continue
contracts which were executed on or before
March 31, 2026 with entities providing
services for problem gambling and
substance use disorder prevention, treat-
ment, harm reduction and recovery
services, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative
procedures.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
in accordance with the following:
For services and expenses related to problem
gambling, substance use disorder outpa-
tient, and treatment support services
(11815) ..................................... 31,789,000
For services and expenses related to resi-
dential services (11822) ................... 103,157,000
For services and expenses related to crisis
services (11823) ............................. 8,558,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 143,504,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Behavioral Health Parity Compliance Account - 22246
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction

1103 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget.
For services and expenses of initiatives
supporting parity implementation and
enforcement on behalf of consumers,
including the office of the independent
substance use disorder and mental health
ombudsman (12095) ............................ 8,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 8,500,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Designated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Opioid Settlement Fund Account - 23817
For payments of monies from the opioid
settlement fund in accordance with section
99-nn of the state finance law and the
following sub-schedule. At least
$26,709,000 of this appropriation shall be
held in reserve to be paid to local
governments pursuant to a plan or plans by
the office of addiction services and
supports which are consistent with state-
wide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, $35,000,000 of this appropri-
ation, which is attributable to the inter-
est earned to the opioid settlement fund
in accordance with section 98-a of the
state finance law, shall be held in
reserve to be allocated pursuant to a plan
submitted by the office of addiction
services and supports and approved by the
director of the budget for uses consistent
with statewide opioid settlement agree-
ments.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary and consistent with state-
wide opioid settlement agreements, the
money hereby appropriated may be trans-
ferred to state operations appropriations
of the office of addiction services and
supports for services and expenses associ-
ated with the administration of programs
and activities supported by the opioid
settlement fund and in accordance with the
terms of statewide opioid settlement

1104 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
agreements, with the approval of the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding sections 163 of the state
finance law and section 142 of the econom-
ic development law, or any other incon-
sistent provision of law, funds available
for expenditure pursuant to this appropri-
ation may be allocated and distributed by
the commissioner of the office of
addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a portion of the funds appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated to the
office of mental health, department of
health including transfers to the health
research institute (HRI), the higher
education services corporation, and/or
other agencies for use in accordance with
statewide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office
of addiction services and supports shall
be authorized, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to continue
contracts which were executed on or before
March 31, 2026 with entities providing
services for substance use disorder
prevention, treatment, harm reduction, and
recovery services, without any additional
requirements that such contracts be
subject to competitive bidding, a request
for proposal process or other administra-
tive procedures.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, payments made pursuant to this
appropriation shall not exceed the value
of actual deposits to the opioid settle-
ment fund as a result of statewide opioid
settlement agreements (11809) .............. 111,216,000
sub-schedule
Reserved for Municipalities ..... 26,709,000
Harm Reduction .................. 13,158,000
Recovery ......................... 7,040,000
Grassroots Organizations Work-
ing with Populations Dispro-
portionately Affected .......... 5,758,000
Treatment ........................ 4,669,000
Prevention ....................... 4,584,000

1105 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Special Populations .............. 4,134,000
Health-Related Social Needs ...... 3,842,000
Data and Outcomes ................ 3,678,000
Workforce and Workplace Diver-
sity, Equity, Inclusion, and
Belonging ...................... 2,644,000
Reserved for Allocation ......... 35,000,000
--------------
Total of sub-schedule ........ 111,216,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ... 111,216,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25100
For services and expenses associated with
federal grant awards yet to be allocated.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the director of the budget is
hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any
other federal fund or program within the
office of addiction services and supports
for aid to localities, administrative and
support services, including fringe bene-
fits.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of the funds appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated to other
agencies for use in accordance with feder-
al grant awards. (11817) .................... 50,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 50,000,000
--------------
PREVENTION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT ............................. 267,555,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment, net of disallowances, of state
financial assistance in accordance with
the mental hygiene law related to problem
gambling and substance use disorder school
and community-based prevention, education,
and recovery programs, including programs
targeted at youth, and program support.

1106 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law,
no payment shall be made from this appro-
priation until the recipient agency has
demonstrated it has applied for and
received, or received formal notification
of refusal of, all forms of third-party
reimbursement, including federal aid and
patient fees. The moneys hereby appropri-
ated are available to reimburse or advance
to localities and voluntary nonprofit
agencies for expenditures heretofore
accrued or hereafter to accrue during
local fiscal periods commencing January 1,
2026 or July 1, 2026 and for advances for
the period beginning January 1, 2027.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the commissioner
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office
of addiction services and supports shall
be authorized, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to continue
contracts which were executed on or before
March 31, 2026 with entities providing
services for problem gambling and
substance use disorder prevention, treat-
ment, harm reduction and recovery
services, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative
procedures. The state comptroller is
hereby authorized to receive funds from
the office of addiction services and

1107 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
supports that were returned from providers
in the current fiscal year in respect of a
settlement of local assistance funds from
prior fiscal years and is authorized to
refund such moneys to the credit of this
fund for the purpose of reimbursing the
2026-27 appropriation.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
in accordance with the following:
For services and expenses related to
prevention and program support (11825) ...... 84,880,000
For services and expenses related to recov-
ery services, including housing and recov-
ery centers (12097) ......................... 64,606,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 149,486,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Substance Use Prevention, Treatment, and Recovery
Services Block Grant (SUBG) Account - 25147
For services and expenses related to
prevention, intervention, treatment, and
recovery programs provided by the
substance use prevention, treatment and
recovery services block grant (SUBG).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, a portion of the funds hereby
appropriated may, subject to the approval
of the director of the budget, be trans-
ferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports consistent with the
terms and conditions of the SUBG award.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the commissioner
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office

1108 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of addiction services and supports shall
be authorized, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to continue
contracts which were executed on or before
March 31, 2026 with entities providing
services for problem gambling and
substance use disorder prevention, treat-
ment, harm reduction and recovery
services, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative
procedures (11825) .......................... 48,656,000
For services and expenses related to recov-
ery services including housing (12097) ...... 23,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 71,656,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Chemical Dependence Service Fund
Substance Abuse Services Fund Account - 22700
For services and expenses of community
substance use disorder treatment,
prevention, harm reduction, and recovery
services programs including services and
expenses related to staff training, evalu-
ation, and workforce development activ-
ities.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule
or regulation to the contrary, a portion
of this appropriation related to enforce-
ment action fine and/or levy moneys may be
made available to localities and nonprofit
and for-profit agencies for payment of
expenses for facilities operating under a
receivership pursuant to section 19.41 of
the mental hygiene law. Such funds may
also be transferred to state operations
and/or any appropriation of the office of
addiction services and supports with the
approval of the director of the budget
(11825) ...................................... 7,313,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 7,313,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Medical Cannabis Fund

1109 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Medical Cannabis Addiction Services - 23754
For services and expenses of substance use
disorder prevention, recovery, harm
reduction, and treatment services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule
or regulation to the contrary, a portion
of this appropriation may be made avail-
able to localities and nonprofit and for-
profit agencies for payment of expenses
for facilities operating under a receiver-
ship pursuant to section 19.41 of the
mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget (11825) ........ 2,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
New York State Commercial Gaming Fund
Problem Gambling Services Account - 23703
For services and expenses of problem gambl-
ing education, prevention, recovery, and
treatment services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule
or regulation to the contrary, a portion
of this appropriation may be made avail-
able to localities and nonprofit and for
profit agencies for payment of expenses
for facilities operating under a receiver-
ship pursuant to section 19.41 of the
mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office
of addiction services and supports shall
be authorized, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, to continue
contracts which were executed on or before
March 31, 2026 with entities providing
services for problem gambling and
substance use disorder prevention, treat-
ment, harm reduction, and recovery
services, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to

1110 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
competitive bidding, a request for
proposal process or other administrative
procedures.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget (11825) ....... 13,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 13,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Substance Use Disorder Education and Recovery Fund
Substance Use Disorder Education and Recovery Services
Account - 23818
For services and expenses of substance use
disorder treatment, prevention, education,
and recovery services.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule
or regulation to the contrary, a portion
of this appropriation may be made avail-
able to localities and nonprofit and for-
profit agencies for payment of expenses
for facilities operating under a receiver-
ship pursuant to section 19.41 of the
mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget (11825) .......... 100,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
NYS Drug Treatment and Education Fund
NYS Drug Treatment & Public Education Account - 24802
For services and expenses of substance use
disorder treatment, prevention, recovery,
and harm reduction services, including the
development, implementation, and evalu-
ation of public health education and
prevention campaigns focused on the health
effects and legal use of cannabis and the

1111 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
support of substance use disorder treat-
ment programs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget (11825) ....... 24,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 24,000,000
--------------

1112 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
COMMUNITY TREATMENT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment, net of disallowances, of state financial assistance in
accordance with the mental hygiene law related to treatment
services.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation until the recipient agency has demonstrated
that it has applied for and received, or received formal notifica-
tion of refusal of, all forms of third-party reimbursement, includ-
ing federal aid and patient fees. The moneys hereby appropriated are
available to reimburse or advance to localities and voluntary
nonprofit agencies for expenditures heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue during local fiscal periods commencing January 1, 2025 or
July 1, 2025 and for advances for the period beginning January 1,
2026.
The commissioner, pursuant to such contract and/or funding authori-
zation letter, may pay from this appropriation all or a portion of
the expenses incurred by such voluntary agencies arising out of
loans obtained from the proceeds of bonds and notes issued by the
dormitory authority of the state of New York or another authorized
entity approved by the division of the budget. Such expenses may
include, but shall not be limited to, amounts relating to principal
and interest and any other fees and charges arising from such loans.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, a portion of the money appropriated
herein may be made available for obligations and payments heretofore
or hereafter accrued by the department of health for substance use
disorder treatment services, including the state share of medical
assistance payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for expenses of localities, nonprofit and
for-profit agencies that may arise from the assumption of opera-
tional responsibilities for programs when operating certificates for
such programs cease to be in effect and/or programs are placed into
receivership pursuant to section 19.41 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of addiction services and supports shall be author-
ized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, to
continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31, 2025
with entities providing services for problem gambling and substance
use disorder prevention, treatment, harm reduction, and recovery
services, without any additional requirements that such contracts be
subject to competitive bidding, a request for proposal process or
other administrative procedures.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted

1113 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be transferred to state operations and/or any appropriation
of the office of addiction services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized to receive funds from the
office of addiction services and supports that were returned from
providers in the current fiscal year in respect of a settlement of
local assistance funds from prior fiscal years and is authorized to
refund such moneys to the credit of the local assistance account of
the general fund for the purpose of reimbursing the 2025-26 appro-
priation.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available in accordance with the
following:
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
reinvestment in behavioral health services of general fund savings
directly related to savings realized through the transition of popu-
lations from the medicaid fee-for service system to a managed care
model, including savings resulting from the reduction of inpatient
and outpatient behavioral health services provided under the medi-
caid program (12012) ... 37,000,000 .............. (re. $37,000,000)
For services and expenses for the development and implementation of an
adolescent clubhouse (12094) ... 250,000 ............ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses relating to the expanding and continuous
support for street outreach activities, including Safe Options
Support (SOS) teams, working with addiction professionals, and
utilizing harm reduction approaches to support individuals facing a
crisis during periods of transition from homelessness to housing
(12035) ... 1,500,000 ............................. (re. $1,500,000)
For services and expenses of the following organizations:
The Puerto Rican Organization to Motivate, Enlighten and Serve
Addicts, Inc. (PROMESA) (12021) ... 100,000 ......... (re. $100,000)
Camelot of Staten Island (11847) ... 100,000 ........... (re. $75,000)
Catholic Charities of Orange, Sullivan, and Ulster (12019) ...........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $188,000)
Cazenovia Recovery Systems, Inc. (12022) ... 100,000 . (re. $75,000)
Dynamic Youth Community, Inc (12003) ... 100,000 .... (re. $100,000)
Helio Health, Inc. (12023) ... 100,000 ................. (re. $75,000)
Horizon Village, Inc (12024) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $75,000)
Odyssey House, Inc (12025) ... 100,000 ................. (re. $75,000)
Outreach Development Corporation (12026) ... 100,000 . (re. $75,000)
Phoenix House (12027) ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $100,000)
Samaritan Daytop Village (12028) ... 100,000 .......... (re. $100,000)
St. Joseph's Rehabilitation Center, Inc. (12029) .....................
100,000 .............................................. (re. $75,000)

1114 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
New York Therapeutic Communities, Inc. (Stay'n Out Program) (12030)
... 100,000 .......................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of the New York city department of education
related to the hiring of additional substance abuse prevention and
intervention specialists (11800) ... 1,000,000 .... (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of Addiction Recovery Supportive Transporta-
tion Demonstration Program (12011) .................................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Coalition of Behavioral Health (InUnity
Alliance Inc) (12034) ... 250,000 ................... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of City University of New York (CUNY) School
of Public Health and Health Policy (Harlem Strong Model Mental
Health programs) (12037) ... 150,000 ................ (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Family and Children's Association (Recov-
ery Community and Outreach Center) (12052) .........................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of the New York city department of education
related to the hiring of additional substance abuse prevention and
intervention specialists (12032) ... 1,000,000 .... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of Samaritan Daytop Village, Inc (12031) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment, net of disallowances, of state financial assistance in
accordance with the mental hygiene law related to treatment
services.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation until the recipient agency has demonstrated
that it has applied for and received, or received formal notifica-
tion of refusal of, all forms of third-party reimbursement, includ-
ing federal aid and patient fees. The moneys hereby appropriated are
available to reimburse or advance to localities and voluntary
nonprofit agencies for expenditures heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue during local fiscal periods commencing January 1, 2024 or
July 1, 2024 and for advances for the period beginning January 1,
2025.
The commissioner, pursuant to such contract and/or funding authori-
zation letter, may pay from this appropriation all or a portion of
the expenses incurred by such voluntary agencies arising out of
loans obtained from the proceeds of bonds and notes issued by the
dormitory authority of the state of New York or another authorized
entity approved by the division of the budget. Such expenses may
include, but shall not be limited to, amounts relating to principal
and interest and any other fees and charges arising from such loans.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, a portion of the money appropriated
herein may be made available for obligations and payments heretofore
or hereafter accrued by the department of health for substance use

1115 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
disorder treatment services, including the state share of medical
assistance payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for expenses of localities, nonprofit and
for-profit agencies that may arise from the assumption of opera-
tional responsibilities for programs when operating certificates for
such programs cease to be in effect and/or programs are placed into
receivership pursuant to section 19.41 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the state finance law and
section 142 of the economic development law, or any other inconsist-
ent provision of law, funds appropriated to the department of health
in accordance with a schedule based upon approved Medicaid claims
for eligible home and community-based services, or other approved
services as defined in section nine thousand eight hundred and
seventeen of the American rescue plan act of 2021, from April 1,
2024 through March 31, 2025 and made available by the department of
health via sub-allocation or transfer of up to $33,200,000 may be
allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the office of
addiction services and supports, subject to approval of the director
of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for proposal
process for the services and expenses of qualified applicants. All
awards will be granted utilizing criteria established by the commis-
sioner of the office of addiction services and supports to strength-
en and enhance home and community-based services consistent with the
American rescue plan act of 2021.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of addiction services and supports shall be author-
ized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, to
continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31, 2024
with entities providing services for problem gambling and substance
use disorder prevention, treatment, harm reduction, and recovery
services, without any additional requirements that such contracts be
subject to competitive bidding, a request for proposal process or
other administrative procedures.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2024 authorizing a 2.84 percent cost of
living adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2024 and
ending March 31, 2025 the commissioner shall not apply any other
cost of living adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be transferred to state operations and/or any appropriation
of the office of addiction services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized to receive funds from the
office of addiction services and supports that were returned from
providers in the current fiscal year in respect of a settlement of
local assistance funds from prior fiscal years and is authorized to
refund such moneys to the credit of the local assistance account of

1116 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the general fund for the purpose of reimbursing the 2024-25 appro-
priation.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available in accordance with the
following:
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
reinvestment in behavioral health services of general fund savings
directly related to savings realized through the transition of popu-
lations from the medicaid fee-for service system to a managed care
model, including savings resulting from the reduction of inpatient
and outpatient behavioral health services provided under the medi-
caid program (12012) ... 37,000,000 .............. (re. $33,308,000)
For services and expenses of the following organizations:
The Puerto Rican Organization to Motivate, Enlighten and Serve
Addicts, Inc. (PROMESA) (12021) ... 100,000 ......... (re. $100,000)
Camelot of Staten Island (11847) ... 100,000 ........... (re. $17,000)
Catholic Charities of Orange, Sullivan, and Ulster (12019) ...........
250,000 ............................................. (re. $188,000)
Cazenovia Recovery Systems, Inc. (12022) .............................
100,000 .............................................. (re. $75,000)
Dynamic Youth Community, Inc. (12003) ... 100,000 ...... (re. $37,000)
Helio Health, Inc. (12023) ... 100,000 ................. (re. $75,000)
Horizon Village, Inc. (12024) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $75,000)
Outreach Development Corporation (12026) .............................
100,000 .............................................. (re. $75,000)
Phoenix House (12027) ... 100,000 ...................... (re. $75,000)
Samaritan Daytop Village, Inc. (12028) ... 100,000 ..... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Addiction Recovery Supportive Transporta-
tion Demonstration Program (12011) .................................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Coalition of Behavioral Health (InUnity
Alliance Inc) (12034) ... 250,000 ................... (re. $188,000)
For services and expenses of Family and Children's Association (Recov-
ery Community and Outreach Center) (12052) .........................
950,000 ............................................. (re. $581,000)
For services and expenses of Samaritan Daytop Village Inc. (12031) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $113,000)
For services and expenses of the New York City Department of Education
related to hiring additional Substance Abuse Prevention and Inter-
vention Specialists (12032) ... 1,000,000 ........... (re. $140,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment, net of disallowances, of state financial assistance in
accordance with the mental hygiene law related to treatment
services.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation until the recipient agency has demonstrated
that it has applied for and received, or received formal notifica-
tion of refusal of, all forms of third-party reimbursement, includ-
ing federal aid and patient fees. The moneys hereby appropriated are
available to reimburse or advance to localities and voluntary

1117 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
nonprofit agencies for expenditures heretofore accrued or hereafter
to accrue during local fiscal periods commencing January 1, 2023 or
July 1, 2023 and for advances for the period beginning January 1,
2024.
The commissioner, pursuant to such contract and/or funding authori-
zation letter, may pay from this appropriation all or a portion of
the expenses incurred by such voluntary agencies arising out of
loans obtained from the proceeds of bonds and notes issued by the
dormitory authority of the state of New York or another authorized
entity approved by the division of the budget. Such expenses may
include, but shall not be limited to, amounts relating to principal
and interest and any other fees and charges arising from such loans.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to the approval of
the director of the budget, a portion of the money appropriated
herein may be made available for obligations and payments heretofore
or hereafter accrued by the department of health for community alco-
holism, chemical dependence, and substance abuse treatment services,
including the state share of medical assistance payments.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for expenses of localities, nonprofit and
for-profit agencies that may arise from the assumption of opera-
tional responsibilities for programs when operating certificates for
such programs cease to be in effect and/or programs are placed into
receivership pursuant to section 19.41 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of the state finance law and
section 142 of the economic development law, or any other inconsist-
ent provision of law, funds appropriated to the department of health
in accordance with a schedule based upon approved Medicaid claims
for eligible home and community-based services, or other approved
services as defined in section nine thousand eight hundred and
seventeen of the American rescue plan act of 2021, from April 1,
2023 through March 31, 2024 and made available by the department of
health via sub-allocation or transfer of up to $33,200,000 may be
allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the office of
addiction services and supports, subject to approval of the director
of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for proposal
process for the services and expenses of qualified applicants. All
awards will be granted utilizing criteria established by the commis-
sioner of the office of addiction services and supports to strength-
en and enhance home and community-based services consistent with the
American rescue plan act of 2021.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of addiction services and supports shall be author-
ized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, to
continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31, 2023
with entities providing services for problem gambling and chemical
dependency prevention, treatment and recovery services, without any
additional requirements that such contracts be subject to compet-
itive bidding, a request for proposal process or other administra-
tive procedures.

1118 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2023 authorizing a 4.0 percent cost of living
adjustment, for the period commencing on April 1, 2023 and ending
March 31, 2024 the commissioner shall not apply any other cost of
living adjustment for the purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be transferred to state operations and/or any appropriation
of the office of addiction services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized to receive funds from the
office of addiction services and supports that were returned from
providers in the current fiscal year in respect of a settlement of
local assistance funds from prior fiscal years and is authorized to
refund such moneys to the credit of the local assistance account of
the general fund for the purpose of reimbursing the 2023-24 appro-
priation.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available in accordance with the
following:
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
reinvestment in behavioral health services of general fund savings
directly related to savings realized through the transition of popu-
lations from the medicaid fee-for service system to a managed care
model, including savings resulting from the reduction of inpatient
and outpatient behavioral health services provided under the medi-
caid program (12012) ... 37,000,000 .............. (re. $22,590,000)
For services and expenses of the following organizations:
Addiction Recovery Supportive Transportation Demonstration Program
(12011) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
New York State Association of Alcoholism & Substance Abuse Providers
(NYSAASAP) (12010) ... 250,000 ...................... (re. $183,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
Camelot of Staten Island (11847) ... 25,000 ............ (re. $19,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses to support efforts to develop, expand,
and/or operate substance abuse supports and services for treatment,
recovery, and prevention of heroin and opiate use and addiction
disorders including but not limited to the provision of housing
services for affected populations. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, the expenditures from this appro-
priation, and any portion of the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred from this appropriation to the local assistance, state
operations, and/or capital projects appropriations of the office of
addiction services and supports and/or any other appropriation of
the office of addiction services and supports. Notwithstanding
sections 112 and 163 of the state finance law and section 142 of the

1119 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
economic development law, or any other inconsistent provision of
law, funds available for expenditure pursuant to this appropriation
for the development, expansion, and/or operation of treatment,
recovery, prevention and/or housing services for persons with heroin
and opiate use and addiction disorders, may be allocated and
distributed by the commissioner of the office of addiction services
and supports, subject to the approval of the director of the budget,
without a competitive bid or request for proposal process. Prior to
an award being granted to an applicant pursuant to this process, the
commissioner shall formally notify in writing the chair of the
senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and
means committee of the intent to grant such an award. Such notice
shall include information regarding how the prospective recipient
meets objective criteria established by the commissioner (11803) ...
25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,800,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
[Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment (SAPT) Account - 25147]
Substance Use Prevention, Treatment, and Recovery Services Block Grant
(SUBG) Account - 25147
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses related to prevention, intervention, treat-
ment, and recovery programs provided by the substance use
prevention, treatment and recovery services [(SUPTRS)] (SUBG) block
grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the
funds hereby appropriated may, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, be transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction services and supports
consistent with the terms and conditions of the [SUPTRS block grant]
SUBG award.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, $5,000,000 of the
funds hereby appropriated may, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, be used for services and expenses associated with
federal grant awards yet to be allocated. Appropriation authority
contained herein may be transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of addiction services and supports shall be author-
ized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, to

1120 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31, 2025
with entities providing services for problem gambling and substance
use disorder prevention, treatment, harm reduction and recovery
services, without any additional requirements that such contracts be
subject to competitive bidding, a request for proposal process or
other administrative procedures.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available in accordance with the
following:
For services and expenses related to problem gambling, substance use
disorder outpatient, and treatment support services (11815) ........
31,789,000 ....................................... (re. $23,659,000)
For services and expenses related to residential services (11822)
103,157,000 ...................................... (re. $86,688,000)
For services and expenses related to crisis services (11823) .........
8,558,000 ......................................... (re. $4,742,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Designated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account
Opioid Settlement Fund Account - 23817
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payments of monies from the opioid settlement fund in accordance
with section 99-nn of the state finance law and the following sub-
schedule. At least $20,668,000 of this appropriation shall be held
in reserve to be paid to local governments pursuant to a plan or
plans by the office of addiction services and supports which are
consistent with statewide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and
consistent with statewide opioid settlement agreements, the money
hereby appropriated may be transferred to state operations appropri-
ations of the office of addiction services and supports for services
and expenses associated with the administration of programs and
activities supported by the opioid settlement fund and in accordance
with the terms of statewide opioid settlement agreements, with the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding sections 163 of the state finance law and section 142
of the economic development law, or any other inconsistent provision
of law, funds available for expenditure pursuant to this appropri-
ation may be allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the
office of addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the office of
mental health, department of health including transfers to the
health research institute (HRI), the higher education services
corporation, and/or other agencies for use in accordance with state-
wide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of addiction services and supports shall be author-
ized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, to
continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31, 2025

1121 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
with entities providing services for substance use disorder
prevention, treatment, harm reduction, and recovery services, with-
out any additional requirements that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for proposal process or other admin-
istrative procedures.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, payments made
pursuant to this appropriation shall not exceed the value of actual
deposits to the opioid settlement fund as a result of statewide
opioid settlement agreements (11809) ...............................
70,471,000 ....................................... (re. $51,013,000)
sub-schedule
Reserved for Municipalities ..... 20,668,000
Harm Reduction .................. 13,978,000
Treatment ........................ 5,976,000
Workforce, Diversity, Inclu-
sion, Equity, and Belonging .... 5,047,000
Health-Related Social Needs ...... 3,685,000
Data and Outcomes ................ 3,021,000
Recovery ......................... 3,885,000
Prevention ....................... 3,088,000
Co-Occurring Disorders and
Special Populations ............ 4,549,000
Grassroots Organizations Work-
ing with Populations Dispro-
portionately Affected .......... 6,574,000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payments of monies from the opioid settlement fund in accordance
with section 99-nn of the state finance law and the following
subschedule. At least $17,028,000 of this appropriation shall be
held in reserve to be paid to local governments pursuant to a plan
or plans by the office of addiction services and supports which are
consistent with statewide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and
consistent with statewide opioid settlement agreements, the money
hereby appropriated may be transferred to state operations appropri-
ations of the office of addiction services and supports for services
and expenses associated with the administration of programs and
activities supported by the opioid settlement fund and in accordance
with the terms of statewide opioid settlement agreements, with the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding sections 163 of the state finance law and section 142
of the economic development law, or any other inconsistent provision
of law, funds available for expenditure pursuant to this appropri-
ation may be allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the
office of addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the office of

1122 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
mental health, department of health including transfers to the
health research institute (HRI), the higher education services
corporation, and/or other agencies for use in accordance with state-
wide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of addiction services and supports shall be author-
ized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, to
continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31, 2024
with entities providing services for substance use disorder
prevention, treatment, harm reduction, and recovery services, with-
out any additional requirements that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for proposal process or other admin-
istrative procedures.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, payments made
pursuant to this appropriation shall not exceed the value of actual
deposits to the opioid settlement fund as a result of statewide
opioid settlement agreements (11809) ...............................
86,229,000 ....................................... (re. $65,965,000)
sub-schedule
Reserved for Municipalities ..... 26,068,000
Harm Reduction .................. 10,348,000
Treatment ........................ 5,535,000
Investments Across the Service
Continuum ..................... 16,565,000
Priority Populations ............. 5,013,000
Housing .......................... 6,136,000
Recovery ......................... 6,658,000
Prevention ....................... 4,773,000
Transportation ................... 3,369,000
Public Awareness ................... 842,000
Research ........................... 922,000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payments of monies from the opioid settlement fund in accordance
with section 99-nn of the state finance law and the following sub-
schedule. At least $48,414,000 of this appropriation shall be held
in reserve to be paid to local governments pursuant to a plan or
plans by the office of addiction services and supports which are
consistent with statewide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and
consistent with statewide opioid settlement agreements, the money
hereby appropriated may be transferred to state operations appropri-
ations of the office of addiction services and supports for services
and expenses associated with the administration of programs and
activities supported by the opioid settlement fund and in accordance
with the terms of statewide opioid settlement agreements, with the
approval of the director of the budget.

1123 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding sections 163 of the state finance law and section 142
of the economic development law, or any other inconsistent provision
of law, funds available for expenditure pursuant to this appropri-
ation may be allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the
office of addiction services and supports.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the office of
mental health, department of health including transfers to the
health research institute (HRI), the higher education services
corporation, and/or other agencies for use in accordance with state-
wide opioid settlement agreements.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, payments made
pursuant to this appropriation shall not exceed the value of actual
deposits to the opioid settlement fund as a result of statewide
opioid settlement agreements (11809) ...............................
212,253,000 ..................................... (re. $124,315,000)
sub-schedule
Reserved for Municipalities ..... 48,414,000
Harm Reduction .................. 36,430,000
Treatment ....................... 20,046,000
Investments Across the Service
Continuum ..................... 26,214,000
Priority Populations ............ 23,998,000
Housing ......................... 16,287,000
Recovery ........................ 16,287,000
Prevention ...................... 11,951,000
Transportation ................... 8,674,000
Public Awareness ................. 2,699,000
Research ......................... 1,253,000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payments of monies from the Opioid Settlement Fund in accordance
with section 99-nn of the State Finance Law. Up to $900,000 of this
appropriation may be available for payment pursuant to a plan or
plans drafted by the Office of the Attorney General and approved by
the Office of Addiction Services and Supports which are in accord-
ance with and necessary to effectuate Statewide Opioid Settlement
Agreements as defined in Section 99-nn of the State Finance Law.
Additionally, at least $59,000,000 of this appropriation shall be
held in reserve for payments to local governments pursuant to a plan
or plans by the Office of Addiction Services and Supports which are
consistent with Statewide Opioid Settlement Agreements.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and
consistent with statewide opioid settlement agreements, the money
hereby appropriated may be transferred to state operations appropri-
ations of the office of addiction services and supports for services
and expenses associated with the administration of programs and
activities supported by the opioid settlement fund and in accordance

1124 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
with the terms of statewide opioid settlement agreements, with the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding sections 163 of the state finance law and section 142
of the economic development law, or any other inconsistent provision
of law, funds available for expenditure pursuant to this appropri-
ation may be allocated and distributed by the commissioner of the
office of addiction services and supports, without a competitive bid
or request for proposal process.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to other agencies for
use in accordance with Statewide Opioid Settlement Agreements.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, payments made
pursuant to this appropriation shall not exceed the value of actual
deposits to the Opioid Settlement Fund as a result of Statewide
Opioid Settlement Agreements (11809) ...............................
208,000,000 ...................................... (re. $44,464,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Opioid Stewardship account - 22239
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to a public health-style approach to
mitigating the impact of opioid addiction, to include harm reduction
and patient-centered services, harm reduction services overseen by
the AIDS institute of the state department of health, and initi-
atives to assist individuals who are uninsured or underinsured
afford treatment appointments and medications.
Notwithstanding section 97-aaaaa of the state finance law or any other
provision of law to the contrary, up to $54,854,528.36 of the funds
appropriated herein shall be paid to AmerisourceBergen Drug Corp.,
Amerisource Health Services LLC (d/b/a American Health Packaging),
ASD Specialty Healthcare, LLC, H.D. Smith, LLC, PharMEDium Services,
LLC, Cardinal Health, Inc., The Harvard Drug Group, LLC, Integrated
Commercialization Solutions, McKesson Corporation (collectively
"Plaintiffs") in accordance with the March 2025 Stipulation of
Settlement, Release and "Order of Dismissal between Plaintiffs and
certain New York state agencies and employees in their official
capacities stemming from the state's enactment and implementation of
the 2018 opioid stewardship act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be transferred to state operations and/or any appropriation
of the office of addiction services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for expenses of localities, nonprofit and
for-profit agencies that may arise from the assumption of opera-
tional responsibilities for programs when operating certificates for

1125 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
such programs cease to be in effect and/or programs are placed into
receivership pursuant to section 19.41 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funding made
available by this appropriation may be transferred to the research
foundation for mental hygiene, inc. (RFMH) and/or health research
incorporated (HRI) with the approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to the state department of
health to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation (11809) .....
200,000,000 ...................................... (re. $66,742,000)
PREVENTION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
[Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment (SAPT) Account - 25147]
Substance Use Prevention, Treatment, and Recovery Services Block Grant
(SUBG) Account - 25147
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses related to prevention, intervention, treat-
ment, and recovery programs provided by the substance use
prevention, treatment and recovery services [(SUPTRS)] block grant
(SUBG).
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the
funds hereby appropriated may, subject to the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget, be transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office of addiction services and supports
consistent with the terms and conditions of the [SUPTRS block grant]
SUBG award.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of addiction services and supports shall be author-
ized, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, to
continue contracts which were executed on or before March 31, 2025
with entities providing services for problem gambling and substance
use disorder prevention, treatment, harm reduction and recovery
services, without any additional requirements that such contracts be
subject to competitive bidding, a request for proposal process or
other administrative procedures (11825) ............................
48,656,000 ....................................... (re. $32,370,000)

1126 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to recovery services including hous-
ing (12097) ... 23,000,000 ....................... (re. $23,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
NYS Drug Treatment and Education Fund
NYS Drug Treatment & Public Education Account - 24802
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of substance use disorder treatment,
prevention, recovery, and harm reduction services, including the
development, implementation, and evaluation of public health educa-
tion and prevention campaigns focused on the health effects and
legal use of cannabis and the support of substance use disorder
treatment programs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be transferred to state operations and/or any appropriation
of the office of addiction services and supports, with the approval
of the director of the budget (11825) ..............................
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Chemical Dependence Service Fund
Substance Abuse Services Fund Account - 22700
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of community substance use disorder treat-
ment, prevention, harm reduction, and recovery services programs
including services and expenses related to staff training, evalu-
ation, and workforce development activities.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, a portion of this appropriation related to enforcement
action fine and/or levy moneys may be made available to localities
and nonprofit and for-profit agencies for payment of expenses for
facilities operating under a receivership pursuant to section 19.41
of the mental hygiene law. Such funds may also be transferred to
state operations and/or any appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports with the approval of the director of the budg-
et (11825) ... 7,313,000 .......................... (re. $6,113,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of community substance use disorder treat-
ment, prevention, harm reduction, and recovery services programs
including services and expenses related to staff training, evalu-
ation, and workforce development activities.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, a portion of this appropriation related to enforcement
action fine and/or levy moneys may be made available to localities
and nonprofit and for-profit agencies for payment of expenses for
facilities operating under a receivership pursuant to section 19.41
of the mental hygiene law. Such funds may also be transferred to

1127 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state operations and/or any appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports with the approval of the director of the budg-
et (11825) ... 7,313,000 .......................... (re. $7,313,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of community chemical dependence treatment,
prevention, and recovery services programs including services and
expenses related to staff training, evaluation, and workforce devel-
opment activities.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, a portion of this appropriation related to enforcement
action fine and/or levy moneys may be made available to localities
and nonprofit and for-profit agencies for payment of expenses for
facilities operating under a receivership pursuant to section 19.41
of the mental hygiene law. Such funds may also be transferred to
state operations and/or any appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports with the approval of the director of the budg-
et (11825) ... 7,313,000 .......................... (re. $7,313,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of community chemical dependence treatment,
prevention, and recovery services programs including services and
expenses related to staff training, evaluation, and workforce devel-
opment activities.
Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, a portion of this appropriation related to enforcement
action fine and/or levy moneys may be made available to localities
and nonprofit and for-profit agencies for payment of expenses for
facilities operating under a receivership pursuant to section 19.41
of the mental hygiene law. Such funds may also be transferred to
state operations and/or any appropriation of the office of addiction
services and supports with the approval of the director of the budg-
et (11825) ... 7,313,000 .......................... (re. $7,313,000)

1128 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 3,357,072,000 204,174,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 133,466,000 363,539,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 8,930,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 3,499,468,000 567,713,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM ................................... 2,992,641,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of various adult
community mental health services, includ-
ing transfer to the department of health
to reimburse the department for the state
and/or local share of medical assistance
for various community mental health
services.
For payment of state financial assistance,
net of disallowances, for community mental
health programs pursuant to article 41 and
other provisions of the mental hygiene
law. The moneys hereby appropriated for
allocation to local governments and volun-
tary agencies for services are available
to reimburse or advance funds to local
governments and voluntary agencies for
expenditures made or to be made during
local program years commencing January 1,
2026 or July 1, 2026 and for advances for
the period beginning January 1, 2027 for
local governments and voluntary agencies
with program years beginning January 1.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office
of mental health shall be authorized,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, to continue contracts and
state aid letter payments to support coun-
ty contracts which were executed on or
before March 31, 2026 with entities
providing services to persons with mental

1129 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
illness, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for
proposals process or other administrative
procedures.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized
to receive funds from the office of mental
health that were returned from providers
in the current fiscal year in respect of a
settlement of local assistance funds from
prior fiscal years, and is authorized to
refund such moneys to the credit of the
local assistance account of the general
fund for the purpose of reimbursing the
2026-27 appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, and consistent with
section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law,
the directors of facilities licensed but
not operated by the office of mental
health who act as federally appointed
representative payees and who assume
management responsibility over the funds
of a resident may continue to use such
funds for the cost of the resident's care
and treatment, consistent with federal law
and regulations.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the commissioner of mental health shall,
until July 1, 2027, be solely authorized,
in his or her discretion, to designate
those general hospitals, local govern-
mental units and voluntary agencies which
may apply and be considered for the
approval and issuance of an operating
certificate pursuant to article 31 of the
mental hygiene law for the operation of a
comprehensive psychiatric emergency
program.
Notwithstanding any provision of section 21
of chapter 723 of the laws of 1989, as
amended, to the contrary, the provisions
of sections 1, 2 and 4-20 of such chapter
shall remain in full force and effect
until July 1, 2027, when upon such date
the amendments and additions made by such
sections of chapter 723 of the laws of
1989 shall expire and be deemed repealed,
and any provision of law amended by any
such sections shall revert to its text as

1130 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
it existed prior to the effective date of
chapter 723 of the laws of 1989.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, any of the amounts appro-
priated herein may be increased or
decreased by interchange or transfer with-
out limit, with any appropriation of the
office of mental health or by transfer or
suballocation to any department, agency or
public authority for expenditures incurred
in the operation of such programs with the
approval of the director of the budget:
For transfer to the department of health to
reimburse the department for the state
and/or local share of medical assistance
payments for various mental health
services. (36942) .......................... 500,287,000
Funding for recruitment and retention of
psychiatrists and psychiatric nurse prac-
titioners and other licensed clinicians in
mental health programs licensed by the
office of mental health deemed to have
critical capacity shortages as determined
by the commissioner of mental health,
including psychiatric inpatient units of
general hospitals, comprehensive psychiat-
ric emergency programs, crisis, residen-
tial, and outpatient programs (37051) ....... 14,000,000
Funding for the recruitment and retention of
psychiatrists and psychiatric nurses prac-
titioners and other licensed clinicians in
mental health programs for children
licensed by the office of mental health or
the office of children and family services
deemed to have critical capacity shortages
as determined by the commissioner of the
office of mental health or the commission-
er of the office of children and family
services, including, but not limited to
psychiatric inpatient units of general
hospitals, comprehensive psychiatric emer-
gency programs, crisis, residential and
outpatient programs (37081) .................. 4,000,000
For services and expenses of the medical
assistance program including reinvestment
in behavioral health services of general
fund savings directly related to savings
realized through the transition of popu-
lations from the medicaid fee-for-service
system to a managed care model, including

1131 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
savings resulting from the reduction of
inpatient and outpatient behavioral health
services provided under the medicaid
program (37049) ............................. 74,000,000
For services and expenses related to the
Farmers Supporting Farmers program (37012)
................................................ 400,000
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
and except for transfers to the department
of health to reimburse the department for
the state and/or local share of medical
assistance payments and as modified below,
this appropriation shall be available for
obligations for the period commencing July
1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2027 and shall
be available for expenditure from July 1,
2026 through September 15, 2027.
For services and expenses of various commu-
nity mental health non-residential
programs, pursuant to article 41 of the
mental hygiene law, including but not
limited to sections 41.13, 41.18, and
41.47. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law to the contrary, up to $7,000,000
of this appropriation may be made avail-
able to the Research Foundation for Mental
Hygiene, Inc. pursuant to a contract with
the office of mental health for two mental
health demonstration programs. One program
shall be a behavioral health care manage-
ment program for persons with serious
mental illness, and the other program
shall be a mental health and health care
coordination demonstration program for
persons with mental illness who are
discharged from impacted adult homes in
the city of New York. An amount from this
appropriation when combined with the
appropriation for the miscellaneous
special revenue fund medication reimburse-
ment account shall provide up to
$15,000,000 for grants to the counties and
city of New York to provide medication,
and other services necessary to prescribe
and administer medication pursuant to a
plan approved by the commissioner of
mental health, as authorized under chapter
408 of the laws of 1999 as amended (36940)
............................................ 492,225,000

1132 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds appropriated herein shall be
made available for the payment of costs as
determined by the commissioner of the
office of mental health in consultation
with the commissioner of the office of
addiction services and supports associated
with the administration, design, installa-
tion, construction, operation, or mainte-
nance of a 9-8-8 suicide prevention and
behavioral health crisis hotline system
serving the state. Such costs shall
include, but not be limited to: staffing,
hardware, software, consultants, financing
and other administrative costs to operate
crisis call-centers throughout the state
and the provision of acute and crisis
services for mental health and substance
use disorders by directly responding to
the 9-8-8 hotline established pursuant to
the National Suicide Hotline Designation
Act of 2020 (47 U.S.C. Section 251(e)) and
rules adopted by the Federal Communication
Commission. Such costs incurred by the
state, shall not supplant any separate
existing, future appropriations, or future
funding sources dedicated to the 9-8-8
crisis response system (37050) .............. 61,800,000
For services and expenses of various commu-
nity mental health emergency programs
including comprehensive psychiatric emer-
gency programs pursuant to section 41.51
of the mental hygiene law. Funds appropri-
ated herein will be made available to
support the creation of new transitional
housing beds and residences, Safe Option
Support Critical Time Intervention (SOS
CTI) teams, and Critical Time Intervention
(CTI) teams (36941) ......................... 83,224,400
For services and expenses of various commu-
nity mental health residential programs,
including but not limited to community
residences pursuant to sections 41.44 and
41.38 of the mental hygiene law. Notwith-
standing the provisions of section 31.03
of the mental hygiene law and any other
inconsistent provision of law, moneys
appropriated for family care shall be
available for, but not limited to, the
purchase of substitute caretakers up to a

1133 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
maximum of 14 days and payments limited to
$795 per year based upon financial need
for the personal needs of each client
residing in the family care home. Funds
appropriated herein will be made available
to support the development of new transi-
tional stepdown units to help individuals
transitioning from various levels of care
to community-based living (36911) ........ 1,266,796,000
For services and expenses related to the
Individual Placement and Supports (IPS)
employment program (37067) .................. 12,000,000
For services and expenses related to the
expansion and evaluation of the Intensive
and Sustained Engagement Treatment (INSET)
program (37068) .............................. 2,800,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the commissioner
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement.
For services and expenses of the office of
mental health to implement a chapter of
the laws of 2026, to provide funding for a
targeted inflationary increase for the
purpose of establishing rates of payments,
contracts or any other form of reimburse-
ment for the period April 1, 2026 through
March 31, 2027. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, and
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, the amounts appropriated here-
in may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer without limit to any
local assistance appropriation, and may
include advances to local governments and
voluntary agencies, to accomplish this
purpose (36928) ............................. 88,596,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funding made available by this
appropriation shall support direct salary
costs and related fringe benefits associ-
ated with any minimum wage increase that

1134 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
takes effect on or after December 31,
2016, pursuant to section 652 of the labor
law. Organizations eligible for funding
made available by this appropriation shall
be limited to those that are required to
file a consolidated fiscal report with the
office of mental health. Each eligible
organization in receipt of funding made
available by this appropriation shall
submit written certification, in such form
and at such time as the commissioner shall
prescribe, attesting to how such funding
will be or was used for purposes eligible
under this appropriation. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, and
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, the amounts appropriated here-
in may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer without limit to any
local assistance appropriation of the
office of mental health, and may include
advances to organizations authorized to
receive such funds to accomplish this
purpose (36987) .............................. 7,630,000
Funds appropriated herein shall be used for
services and expenses associated with
reinvestment for the expansion of state
community hubs and voluntary operated
services for adults and children, includ-
ing, but not limited to, expanding crisis
and respite beds, home and community based
services waiver slots, supported housing,
mental health urgent care walk-in centers,
mobile engagement teams, first episode
psychosis teams, family resource centers,
evidence-based family support services,
peer-operated recovery centers, suicide
prevention services, community forensic
and diversion services, tele-psychiatry,
transportation services, family concierge
services, and adjustments to managed care
premiums. The amounts in this appropri-
ation shall be deemed to satisfy the fund-
ing requirements of section 41.55 of the
mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, any of the amounts appro-
priated herein may be increased or
decreased by interchange or transfer with-
out limit, with any appropriation of the

1135 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
office of mental health, with the approval
of the director of the budget:
For services and expenses associated with
reinvestment for the expansion of state
community hubs and voluntary operated
services for adults and children (37013) ... 119,500,000
For services and expenses associated with
the provision of education, assessments,
training, in-reach, care coordination,
supported housing and the services needed
by mentally ill residents of adult homes
and persons with mental illness who are
discharged from adult homes, including,
but not limited to, the individuals
included in the implementation of the
settlement of O'Toole et. al. v. Cuomo
provided, however, no funds from this
appropriation shall be used to pay for the
services of an independent reviewer
appointed by such district court (36958) .... 67,911,000
For services and expenses associated with
the provision of care coordination,
supported housing and the services needed
by qualified current and future mentally
ill residents of nursing homes, and
persons with mental illness who are
discharged from nursing homes, to imple-
ment settlement of 2011 federal litigation
Joseph S. v. Hogan (37000) .................. 12,000,000
For services and expenses of the comprehen-
sive care centers for eating disorders
program (37031) .............................. 1,178,000
For services to expand access to eating
disorder treatment (37069) ................... 2,000,000
For services and expenses related to suicide
prevention efforts for veterans, first
responders, law enforcement and
corrections officers (37032) ................. 1,000,000
For services and expenses of organizations
related to suicide prevention, peer-to-
peer training, and other mental health
supports and services for veterans and
first responders, including disaster
relief workers (37082) ....................... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of the Joseph P.
Dwyer Veteran Peer to Peer Services
Program in accordance with the following
sub-schedule (37001) ......................... 8,023,600

1136 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
sub-schedule
Albany County ...................... 109,200
Allegany County .................... 104,000
Broome County ...................... 192,400
Cattaraugus County ................. 192,400
Cayuga County ...................... 104,000
Chautauqua County .................. 192,400
Chemung County ..................... 104,000
Chenango County .................... 104,000
Clinton County ...................... 54,600
Columbia County .................... 104,000
Cortland County .................... 104,000
Delaware County .................... 104,000
Dutchess County .................... 192,400
Erie County ........................ 192,400
Essex County ....................... 104,000
Franklin County ..................... 54,600
Fulton County ...................... 104,000
Genesee County ...................... 83,200
Greene County ...................... 104,000
Hamilton County .................... 104,000
Herkimer County .................... 104,000
Jefferson County ................... 192,400
Lewis County ....................... 104,000
Livingston County .................. 104,000
Madison County ..................... 104,000
Monroe County ...................... 192,400
Montgomery County .................. 104,000
Nassau County ...................... 192,400
Niagara County ..................... 192,400
Oneida County ...................... 109,200
Onondaga County .................... 192,400
Ontario County ..................... 104,000
Orange County ...................... 192,400
Orleans County ...................... 54,600
Oswego County ...................... 104,000
Otsego County ...................... 104,000
Putnam County ...................... 192,400
Rensselaer County .................. 192,400
Rockland County .................... 192,400
Saratoga County .................... 192,400
Schenectady County ................. 109,200
Schoharie County ................... 104,000
Schuyler County .................... 104,000
Seneca County ...................... 104,000
St. Lawrence County ................ 104,000
Steuben County ..................... 104,000
Suffolk County ..................... 192,400
Sullivan County .................... 192,400
Tioga County ....................... 104,000

1137 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Tompkins County .................... 104,000
Ulster County ...................... 192,400
Warren and Washington Counties ..... 192,400
Wayne County ....................... 104,000
Westchester County ................. 192,400
Wyoming County ...................... 54,600
Yates County ....................... 104,000
Research Foundation for the
State University of New York
for the University at Albany
School of Social Welfare ......... 218,400
New York City ...................... 416,000
--------------
Total of sub-schedule .......... 8,023,600
--------------
For services and expenses to improve public
safety by addressing serious mental
illness in accordance with the following
sub-schedule. Notwithstanding any
provision of the law to the contrary, the
amount appropriated herein may be trans-
ferred to state operations with the
approval of the director of the budget
(37084) ..................................... 31,087,000
sub-schedule
Intensive FACT (Forensic
Assertive Community Treat-
ment) Teams ................... 14,600,000
Court-Based Mental Health
Navigators ..................... 8,200,000
Transitional Housing for Indi-
viduals Referred Through
Court System ................... 4,300,000
Specialized Housing for People
with SMI and Criminal Histo-
ry ............................. 2,800,000
Law Enforcement and Mental
Health Coordination Team ....... 1,000,000
Crisis Intervention Team (CIT)
Training for Law Enforcement ..... 187,000
--------------
Total of sub-schedule ......... 31,087,000
--------------
For community mental health services and/or
expenses of contracts with the following
organizations:

1138 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
EverGreen Meadow Services, Inc ................... 250,000
Syracuse Crunch Corps (Mental Wellness
Program) ....................................... 250,000
Mental Health Association of Erie County ......... 250,000
Amudim Community Resources, Inc .................. 250,000
Venture House, Inc. Club House ................... 200,000
Family Service League, Inc. - North Fork
Mental Health Initiative ....................... 175,000
Family Service League, Inc. - South Fork
Behavioral Health Initiative ................... 175,000
Keren Zichron Yisroel Meier, Inc ................. 150,000
Unconditional Support, Inc. ...................... 150,000
Family Service League, Inc. ...................... 100,000
Global Trauma Research, Inc ...................... 100,000
Rainbow Heights Club .............................. 75,000
For services and expenses of Cohen Veterans
Network, Inc. .................................. 500,000
For services and expenses of Crisis Services
of Buffalo and Erie County (Suicide
Prevention and Crisis Service Inc) ............. 300,000
For services and expenses of EAC Network ......... 100,000
For additional services and expenses related
to FarmNet peer to peer support program
for farmers .................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Finger Lakes
Health Systems Agency (Common Ground
Health) ........................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of the Mental
Health Association in New York State, Inc.
(MHANYS) ....................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of The Harris
Project Inc (Encompass Project) ................ 100,000
For services and expenses of The Harris
Project Inc (Include Project) .................. 100,000
For services and expenses of University of
Rochester (Sources of Strength) ................ 200,000
For services and expenses of Westchester
Jewish Community Services Inc (WJCS) ........... 200,000
For services and expenses of the Veteran's
Mental Health Training Initiative (VMHTI).
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds from this appropri-
ation may be suballocated or transferred
to any state department, agency or author-
ity to effectuate the intent of this
appropriation with the approval of the
temporary president of the senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any

1139 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............... 350,000
For services and expenses of grants or
reimbursement of expenses supporting the
expansion or creation of community behav-
ioral health crisis response pilot
programs consistent with the Daniel's Law
Task Force Behavioral Health Crisis
Response report established pursuant to
chapter 57 of the laws of 2023. Funds
herein appropriated shall be available to
support programs that deliver a communi-
ty-based, public health-led response to
behavioral health crises utilizing teams
that include mental health professionals
and peer advocates. Provided however,
grants awarded under this appropriation
shall not support expenses of police law
enforcement agencies. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any state depart-
ment, agency, authority and/or capital
projects appropriations to effectuate the
intent of this appropriation with the
approval of the director of the budget ....... 8,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 2,864,733,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Community Mental Health Services Block Grant Account -
25180
For services and expenses related to adult
mental health services funded by the
community mental health services block

1140 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
grant. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, a portion of this appro-
priation, consistent with the terms and
conditions of the block grant, may be
transferred to other programs within the
office of mental health for aid to locali-
ties, administrative and support services,
including fringe benefits, associated with
the federal block grant (36947) ............. 62,619,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 62,619,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25100
For services and expenses associated with
federal grant awards yet to be allocated.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the director of the budget is
hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any
other federal fund or program within the
office of mental health services for aid
to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits
(36948) ..................................... 50,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 50,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
PATH Account - 25124
For programs to assist and transition from
homelessness (PATH) grants. Notwithstand-
ing any inconsistent provision of law, a
portion of this appropriation, consistent
with the terms and conditions of the PATH
grant, may be transferred to other
programs within the office of mental
health for aid to localities, administra-
tive and support services, including
fringe benefits, associated with the grant
(36946) ...................................... 6,359,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 6,359,000
--------------

1141 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Mental Illness Anti-Stigma Fund Account - 20205
For grants to organizations dedicated to
eliminating the stigma attached to mental
illness pursuant to chapter 422 of the
laws of 2015 (36901) ........................... 350,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 350,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Medication Reimbursement Account - 22128
For services and expenses related to adult
mental health services, including assisted
outpatient treatment pursuant to article 9
and other provisions of the mental hygiene
law (36939) .................................. 7,580,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 7,580,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Suicide Prevention Account - 22271
For services and expenses, including grants
to organizations, supporting suicide
prevention, education, and awareness
pursuant to section 99-ss of the state
finance law (37097) .......................... 1,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000
--------------
CHILDREN AND YOUTH SERVICES PROGRAM ........................ 506,827,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of various chil-
dren and families community mental health
services, including transfer to the
department of health to reimburse the
department for the state and/or local

1142 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
share of medical assistance for various
community mental health services.
This appropriation anticipates the transfer
of funds from the state education depart-
ment to the office of mental health of
tuition funds advanced in previous years
and reimbursed by the child's school
district of origin to the state of New
York pursuant to chapter 810 of the laws
of 1986 and applicable provisions of the
education law.
For payment of state financial assistance,
net of disallowances, for community mental
health programs pursuant to article 41 and
other provisions of the mental hygiene
law. The moneys hereby appropriated for
allocation to local governments and volun-
tary agencies for services are available
to reimburse or advance funds to local
governments and voluntary agencies for
expenditures made or to be made during
local program years commencing January 1,
2026 or July 1, 2026 and for advances for
the period beginning January 1, 2027 for
local governments and voluntary agencies
with program years beginning January 1.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commissioner of the office
of mental health shall be authorized,
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget, to continue contracts and
state aid letter payments to support coun-
ty contracts which were executed on or
before March 31, 2026 with entities
providing services to persons with mental
illness, without any additional require-
ments that such contracts be subject to
competitive bidding, a request for
proposals process or other administrative
procedures.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized
to receive funds from the office of mental
health that were returned from providers
in the current fiscal year in respect of a
settlement of local assistance funds from
prior fiscal years, and is authorized to
refund such moneys to the credit of the
local assistance account of the general
fund for the purpose of reimbursing the
2026-27 appropriation.

1143 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, any of the amounts appro-
priated herein may be increased or
decreased by interchange or transfer with-
out limit, with any appropriation of the
office of mental health or by transfer or
suballocation to any department, agency or
public authority for expenditures incurred
in the operation of such programs with the
approval of the director of the budget:
For transfer to the department of health to
reimburse the department for the state
and/or local share of medical assistance
payments for various mental health
services. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, the state comptroller
is hereby authorized to refund moneys from
the department of health to the office of
mental health, consisting of medicaid
reimbursement for expenses previously
incurred by the office of mental health in
prior fiscal years to fund services
provided by residential treatment facili-
ties for children and youth. Such funds
shall be credited to the local assistance
account of the general fund for the
purpose of reimbursing the 2026-27 appro-
priation. (36912) .......................... 181,604,000
For services and expenses related to youth
suicide prevention. (37070) ................. 10,000,000
For services and expenses related to high
fidelity wrap around services for children
(37071) ..................................... 10,000,000
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
and except for transfers to the department
of health to reimburse the department for
the state and/or local share of medical
assistance payments and as modified below,
this appropriation shall be available for
obligations for the period commencing July
1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2027 and shall
be available for expenditure from July 1,
2026 through September 15, 2027.
Of the amounts appropriated herein, up to
$5,000,000 may be used to provide state
aid to voluntary non-profit agencies, as
defined in the mental hygiene law, for
expenditures incurred in the operation of
residential treatment facilities for chil-
dren and youth, including but not limited

1144 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
to, expenditures related to the transition
to managed care from fee for service and
re-design pilots/projects. Funds appropri-
ated herein will be made available to
support the expansion of the Healthy Steps
program for children.
For services and expenses of various commu-
nity mental health non-residential
programs, pursuant to article 41 of the
mental hygiene law, including but not
limited to sections 41.13 and 41.18
(36963) .................................... 220,839,000
For services and expenses of various commu-
nity mental health emergency programs.
Funds appropriated herein will be made
available for services and expenses
related to the home based crisis inter-
vention program for children. (36965) ....... 54,702,000
For services and expenses of various commu-
nity mental health residential programs,
including but not limited to community
residences pursuant to sections 41.44 and
41.38 of the mental hygiene law (36964) ..... 15,194,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 492,339,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25180
For services and expenses related to chil-
dren's mental health services funded by
the community mental health services block
grant. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, a portion of this appro-
priation, consistent with the terms and
conditions of the block grant, may be
transferred to other programs within the
office of mental health for aid to locali-
ties, administrative and support services,
including fringe benefits, associated with
the federal block grant (36961) ............. 14,488,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 14,488,000
--------------

1145 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of various adult community mental health
services, including transfer to the department of health to reim-
burse the department for the state and/or local share of medical
assistance for various community mental health services.
For payment of state financial assistance, net of disallowances, for
community mental health programs pursuant to article 41 and other
provisions of the mental hygiene law. The moneys hereby appropriated
for allocation to local governments and voluntary agencies for
services are available to reimburse or advance funds to local
governments and voluntary agencies for expenditures made or to be
made during local program years commencing January 1, 2025 or July
1, 2025 and for advances for the period beginning January 1, 2026
for local governments and voluntary agencies with program years
beginning January 1.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of mental health shall be authorized, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts and
state aid letter payments to support county contracts which were
executed on or before March 31, 2025 with entities providing
services to persons with mental illness, without any additional
requirements that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding,
a request for proposals process or other administrative procedures.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized to receive funds from the
office of mental health that were returned from providers in the
current fiscal year in respect of a settlement of local assistance
funds from prior fiscal years, and is authorized to refund such
moneys to the credit of the local assistance account of the general
fund for the purpose of reimbursing the 2025-26 appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and
consistent with section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, the direc-
tors of facilities licensed but not operated by the office of mental
health who act as federally appointed representative payees and who
assume management responsibility over the funds of a resident may
continue to use such funds for the cost of the resident's care and
treatment, consistent with federal law and regulations.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of mental
health shall, until July 1, 2026, be solely authorized, in his or
her discretion, to designate those general hospitals, local govern-
mental units and voluntary agencies which may apply and be consid-
ered for the approval and issuance of an operating certificate
pursuant to article 31 of the mental hygiene law for the operation
of a comprehensive psychiatric emergency program.
Notwithstanding any provision of section 21 of chapter 723 of the laws
of 1989, as amended, to the contrary, the provisions of sections 1,

1146 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
2 and 4-20 of such chapter shall remain in full force and effect
until July 1, 2026, when upon such date the amendments and additions
made by such sections of chapter 723 of the laws of 1989 shall
expire and be deemed repealed, and any provision of law amended by
any such sections shall revert to its text as it existed prior to
the effective date of chapter 723 of the laws of 1989.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of the
amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer without limit, with any appropriation of the
office of mental health or by transfer or suballocation to any
department, agency or public authority for expenditures incurred in
the operation of such programs with the approval of the director of
the budget:
Funding for recruitment and retention of psychiatrists and psychiatric
nurse practitioners and other licensed clinicians in mental health
programs licensed by the office of mental health deemed to have
critical capacity shortages as determined by the commissioner of
mental health, including psychiatric inpatient units of general
hospitals, comprehensive psychiatric emergency programs, crisis,
residential, and outpatient programs (37051) .......................
14,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,000,000)
Funding for the recruitment and retention of psychiatrists and psychi-
atric nurses practitioners and other licensed clinicians in mental
health programs for children licensed by the office of mental health
or the office of children and family services deemed to have crit-
ical capacity shortages as determined by the commissioner of the
office of mental health or the commissioner of the office of chil-
dren and family services, including, but not limited to psychiatric
inpatient units of general hospitals, comprehensive psychiatric
emergency programs, crisis, residential and outpatient programs
(37081) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,000,000)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except for transfers
to the department of health to reimburse the department for the
state and/or local share of medical assistance payments and as modi-
fied below, this appropriation shall be available for obligations
for the period commencing July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026 and
shall be available for expenditure from July 1, 2025 through Septem-
ber 15, 2026.
For services and expenses of various community mental health emergency
programs including comprehensive psychiatric emergency programs
pursuant to section 41.51 of the mental hygiene law. Funds appropri-
ated herein will be made available to support the creation of new
transitional housing beds and residences, Safe Option Support Crit-
ical Time Intervention (SOS CTI) teams, and Critical Time Inter-
vention (CTI) teams (36941) ... 80,986,400 ........ (re. $1,500,000)
For services and expenses related to the Individual Placement and
Supports (IPS) employment program (37067) ..........................
12,000,000 ....................................... (re. $12,000,000)
Funds appropriated herein shall be used for services and expenses
associated with reinvestment for the expansion of state community

1147 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
hubs and voluntary operated services for adults and children,
including, but not limited to, expanding crisis and respite beds,
home and community based services waiver slots, supported housing,
mental health urgent care walk-in centers, mobile engagement teams,
first episode psychosis teams, family resource centers, evidence-
based family support services, peer-operated recovery centers,
suicide prevention services, community forensic and diversion
services, tele-psychiatry, transportation services, family concierge
services, and adjustments to managed care premiums. The amounts in
this appropriation shall be deemed to satisfy the funding require-
ments of section 41.55 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of the
amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer without limit, with any appropriation of the
office of mental health, with the approval of the director of the
budget:
For services and expenses of the Joseph P. Dwyer Veteran Peer to Peer
Services Program in accordance with the following sub-schedule
(37001) ... 8,023,600 ............................. (re. $4,050,000)
sub-schedule
Albany County ...................... 109,200
Allegany County .................... 104,000
Broome County ...................... 192,400
Cattaraugus County ................. 192,400
Cayuga County ...................... 104,000
Chautauqua County .................. 192,400
Chemung County ..................... 104,000
Chenango County .................... 104,000
Clinton County ...................... 54,600
Columbia County .................... 104,000
Cortland County .................... 104,000
Delaware County .................... 104,000
Dutchess County .................... 192,400
Erie County ........................ 192,400
Essex County ....................... 104,000
Franklin County ..................... 54,600
Fulton County ...................... 104,000
Genesee County ...................... 83,200
Greene County ...................... 104,000
Hamilton County .................... 104,000
Herkimer County .................... 104,000
Jefferson County ................... 192,400
Lewis County ....................... 104,000
Livingston County .................. 104,000
Madison County ..................... 104,000
Monroe County ...................... 192,400
Montgomery County .................. 104,000
Nassau County ...................... 192,400
Niagara County ..................... 192,400

1148 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Oneida County ...................... 109,200
Onondaga County .................... 192,400
Ontario County ..................... 104,000
Orange County ...................... 192,400
Orleans County ...................... 54,600
Oswego County ...................... 104,000
Otsego County ...................... 104,000
Putnam County ...................... 192,400
Rensselaer County .................. 192,400
Rockland County .................... 192,400
Saratoga County .................... 192,400
Schenectady County ................. 109,200
Schoharie County ................... 104,000
Schuyler County .................... 104,000
Seneca County ...................... 104,000
St. Lawrence County ................ 104,000
Steuben County ..................... 104,000
Suffolk County ..................... 192,400
Sullivan County .................... 192,400
Tioga County ....................... 104,000
Tompkins County .................... 104,000
Ulster County ...................... 192,400
Warren and Washington Counties ..... 192,400
Wayne County ....................... 104,000
Westchester County ................. 192,400
Wyoming County ...................... 54,600
Yates County ....................... 104,000
Research Foundation for the
State University of New York
for the University at Albany
School of Social Welfare ......... 218,400
New York City ...................... 416,000
For services and expenses of grants or reimbursement of expenses
supporting the expansion or creation of community behavioral health
crisis response pilot programs consistent with the Daniel's Law Task
Force Behavioral Health Crisis Response report established pursuant
to chapter 57 of the laws of 2023. Up to $2,000,000 of this appro-
priation may be reserved to support expenses associated with the
creation of a statewide behavioral health crisis technical assist-
ance center pursuant to section 36.07 of the mental hygiene law.
Funds herein appropriated shall be available to support programs
that deliver a community-based, public health-led response to behav-
ioral health crises utilizing teams that include mental health
professionals and peer advocates. Provided however, grants awarded
under this appropriation shall not support expenses of police law
enforcement agencies. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agency, authority and/or capi-
tal projects appropriations to effectuate the intent of this appro-

1149 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
priation with the approval of the director of the budget (37090) ...
8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,000,000)
For community mental health services and/or expenses of contracts with
the following organizations:
Buffalo Federation of Neighborhood Centers (37091) ...................
400,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
EverGreen Meadow (37072) ... 250,000 .................. (re. $250,000)
Syracuse Crunch (Mental Wellness Program) (37087) ....................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
Mental Health Advocates of Western NY (37092) ........................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
Venture House Club House (37093) ... 200,000 .......... (re. $200,000)
Amudim Community Resources (37094) ... 200,000 ......... (re. 200,000)
Family Service League - North Fork Mental Health Initiative (37023)
... 175,000 ......................................... (re. $175,000)
Family Service League - South Fork Behavioral Health Initiative
(36908) ... 175,000 .................................. (re. $25,000)
Achizat Aharon, Inc (37095) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $150,000)
Unconditional Support Incorporated (37075) ...........................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
Family Service League (37058) ... 100,000 ............. (re. $100,000)
Global Trauma Research, Inc (36993) ... 100,000 ....... (re. $100,000)
Rainbow Heights Club (37056) ... 75,000 ................ (re. $75,000)
NY Mental Health Association in Orange County Inc (37073) ............
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of Crisis services of Buffalo and Erie Coun-
ty (Suicide Prevention and Crisis Service Inc) (37044) .............
300,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Farmnet (37076) .........................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Finger Lakes Health Systems Agency
(Common Ground Health) (37096) .....................................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Mental Health Association in New York
State, Inc. (MHANYS) (37008) ... 100,000 ............ (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of The Harris Project Inc (Encompass
Project) (37055) ... 100,000 ........................ (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of The Harris Project Inc (Include Project)
(37057) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of University of Rochester (Sources of
Strength) (37088) ... 200,000 ....................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Westchester Jewish Community Services Inc
(WJCS) (37034) ... 200,000 .......................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Veteran's Mental Health Training
Initiative. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to
any state department, agency or authority to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of the temporary president
of the senate and the director of the budget. Provided further,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from

1150 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (37079) ................
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing community adult and youth mental health programs and
services, which include but are not limited to, behavioral services,
crisis intervention/response services, educational services, outpa-
tient services and substance use disorder prevention programs.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from
this appropriation may be suballocated or transferred to any state
department, agency or authority to effectuate the intent of this
appropriation with the approval of the temporary president of senate
and the director of the division of the budget. Provided further,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds from
this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the division of the budget which sets forth either an itemized
list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for the expendi-
ture of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote
(37061) ... 1,500,000 ............................. (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of various adult community mental health
services, including transfer to the department of health to reim-
burse the department for the state share of medical assistance for
various community mental health services.
For payment of state financial assistance, net of disallowances, for
community mental health programs pursuant to article 41 and other
provisions of the mental hygiene law. The moneys hereby appropriated
for allocation to local governments and voluntary agencies for
services are available to reimburse or advance funds to local
governments and voluntary agencies for expenditures made or to be
made during local program years commencing January 1, 2024 or July
1, 2024 and for advances for the period beginning January 1, 2025
for local governments and voluntary agencies with program years
beginning January 1.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of mental health shall be authorized, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts and

1151 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state aid letter payments to support county contracts which were
executed on or before March 31, 2024 with entities providing
services to persons with mental illness, without any additional
requirements that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding,
a request for proposals process or other administrative procedures.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized to receive funds from the
office of mental health that were returned from providers in the
current fiscal year in respect of a settlement of local assistance
funds from prior fiscal years, and is authorized to refund such
moneys to the credit of the local assistance account of the general
fund for the purpose of reimbursing the 2024-25 appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and
consistent with section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, the direc-
tors of facilities licensed but not operated by the office of mental
health who act as federally appointed representative payees and who
assume management responsibility over the funds of a resident may
continue to use such funds for the cost of the resident's care and
treatment, consistent with federal law and regulations.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of mental
health shall, until July 1, 2025, be solely authorized, in his or
her discretion, to designate those general hospitals, local govern-
mental units and voluntary agencies which may apply and be consid-
ered for the approval and issuance of an operating certificate
pursuant to article 31 of the mental hygiene law for the operation
of a comprehensive psychiatric emergency program.
Notwithstanding any provision of section 21 of chapter 723 of the laws
of 1989, as amended, to the contrary, the provisions of sections 1,
2 and 4-20 of such chapter shall remain in full force and effect
until July 1, 2025, when upon such date the amendments and additions
made by such sections of chapter 723 of the laws of 1989 shall
expire and be deemed repealed, and any provision of law amended by
any such sections shall revert to its text as it existed prior to
the effective date of chapter 723 of the laws of 1989.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of the
amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer without limit, with any appropriation of the
office of mental health or by transfer or suballocation to any
department, agency or public authority for expenditures incurred in
the operation of such programs with the approval of the director of
the budget:
Funding for recruitment and retention of psychiatrists and psychiatric
nurse practitioners and other licensed clinicians in mental health
programs licensed by the office of mental health deemed to have
critical capacity shortages as determined by the commissioner of
mental health, including psychiatric inpatient units of general
hospitals, comprehensive psychiatric emergency programs, crisis,
residential, and outpatient programs (37051) .......................
14,000,000 ........................................ (re. $7,000,000)
Funding for the recruitment and retention of psychiatrists and psychi-
atric nurses practitioners and other licensed clinicians in mental

1152 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
health programs for children licensed by the office of mental health
or the office of children and family services deemed to have crit-
ical capacity shortages as determined by the commissioner of the
office of mental health or the commissioner of the office of chil-
dren and family services, including, but not limited to psychiatric
inpatient units of general hospitals, comprehensive psychiatric
emergency programs, crisis, residential and outpatient programs
(37081) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,162,000)
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
reinvestment in behavioral health services of general fund savings
directly related to savings realized through the transition of popu-
lations from the medicaid fee-for-service system to a managed care
model, including savings resulting from the reduction of inpatient
and outpatient behavioral health services provided under the medi-
caid program (37049) ... 74,000,000 .............. (re. $38,968,000)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except for transfers
to the department of health to reimburse the department for the
state share of medical assistance payments and as modified below,
this appropriation shall be available for obligations for the period
commencing July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2025 and shall be avail-
able for expenditure from July 1, 2024 through September 15, 2025.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein shall be made available for the payment of costs as deter-
mined by the commissioner of the office of mental health in consul-
tation with the commissioner of the office of addiction services and
supports associated with the administration, design, installation,
construction, operation, or maintenance of a 9-8-8 suicide
prevention and behavioral health crisis hotline system serving the
state. Such costs shall include, but not be limited to: staffing,
hardware, software, consultants, financing and other administrative
costs to operate crisis call-centers throughout the state and the
provision of acute and crisis services for mental health and
substance use disorders by directly responding to the 9-8-8 hotline
established pursuant to the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act
of 2020 (47 U.S.C. Section 251(e)) and rules adopted by the Federal
Communication Commission. Such costs incurred by the state, shall
not supplant any separate existing, future appropriations, or future
funding sources dedicated to the 9-8-8 crisis response system
(37050) ... 60,000,000 ........................... (re. $10,000,000)
Funds appropriated herein shall be used for services and expenses
associated with reinvestment for the expansion of state community
hubs and voluntary operated services for adults and children,
including, but not limited to, expanding crisis and respite beds,
home and community based services waiver slots, supported housing,
mental health urgent care walk-in centers, mobile engagement teams,
first episode psychosis teams, family resource centers, evidence-
based family support services, peer-operated recovery centers,
suicide prevention services, community forensic and diversion
services, tele-psychiatry, transportation services, family concierge
services, and adjustments to managed care premiums. The amounts in

1153 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
this appropriation shall be deemed to satisfy the funding require-
ments of section 41.55 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of the
amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer without limit, with any appropriation of the
office of mental health, with the approval of the director of the
budget:
For services to expand access to eating disorder treatment (37069) ...
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of organizations related to suicide
prevention, peer-to-peer training, and other mental health supports
and services for veterans and first responders, including disaster
relief workers (37082) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $1,200,000)
For services and expenses to improve public safety by addressing seri-
ous mental illness in accordance with the following sub-schedule.
Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein may be transferred to state operations with the
approval of the director of the budget (37084) .....................
33,087,000 ....................................... (re. $22,887,000)
sub-schedule
Intensive FACT (Forensic
Assertive Community Treat-
ment) Teams ................... 14,600,000
Court-Based Mental Health
Navigators ..................... 8,200,000
Transitional Housing for Indi-
viduals Referred Through
Court System ................... 4,300,000
Specialized Housing for People
with SMI and Criminal Histo-
ry ............................. 2,800,000
Law Enforcement and Mental
Health Coordination Team ....... 1,000,000
Crisis Intervention Team (CIT)
Training for Law Enforcement ..... 187,000
Shower buses. Notwithstanding
state finance law section
163 and economic development
law section 142, and subject
to a plan developed by the
commissioner of mental heal-
th and approved by the dire-
ctor of the budget ............. 2,000,000
For community mental health services and/or expenses of contracts with
the following organizations:
Crisis Intervention Teams (36913) ... 2,000,000 ..... (re. $1,335,000)
Syracuse Crunch (Mental Wellness Program) (37087) ....................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)

1154 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ARA Emotional Wellness Mental Hygiene, Inc (37085) ...................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
NY Mental Health Association in Orange County Inc (37073) ............
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of City University of New York (CUNY) School
of Public Health and Health Policy (Harlem Strong Model Mental
Health programs) (37086) ... 150,000 ................ (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses, grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or community-based service
providers, not-for-profit service providers or their employees
providing community adult and youth mental health programs and
services, which include but are not limited to, behavioral services,
crisis intervention/response services, educational services and
outpatient services. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agency or authority to effectu-
ate the intent of this appropriation with the approval of the tempo-
rary president of the senate and the director of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the
senate and the director of the budget which sets forth either an
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for the expendi-
ture of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote
(37061) ... 1,500,000 ............................... (re. $185,000)
For services and expenses of grants or reimbursement of expenses
incurred by local government agencies and/or not-for-profit service
providers or their employees providing crisis intervention services
programs to respond to mental health crises. Crisis intervention
services may include activities designed to interrupt and ameliorate
a behavioral health crisis, wherever the crisis occurs, through
crisis resolution, de-escalation, safety planning and follow-up.
Such services shall provide response, support, intervention and
resource information to individuals who may, are or have experienced
a crisis or trauma and entities providing services to individuals
who may, are or have experienced a crisis or trauma. These grants
for crisis intervention services will serve to provide resources
throughout the State to help communities prevent, prepare and
respond to mental health crises. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any state department, agency or authority to
effectuate the intent of this appropriation with the approval of the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary president of the
senate and the director of the budget which sets forth either an

1155 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or
the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is
after that included in a senate resolution calling for the expendi-
ture of such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority
vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote
(37080) ... 1,500,000 ............................... (re. $815,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of various adult community mental health
services, including transfer to the department of health to reim-
burse the department for the state share of medical assistance for
various community mental health services.
For payment of state financial assistance, net of disallowances, for
community mental health programs pursuant to article 41 and other
provisions of the mental hygiene law. The moneys hereby appropriated
for allocation to local governments and voluntary agencies for
services are available to reimburse or advance funds to local
governments and voluntary agencies for expenditures made or to be
made during local program years commencing January 1, 2023 or July
1, 2023 and for advances for the period beginning January 1, 2024
for local governments and voluntary agencies with program years
beginning January 1.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner
of the office of mental health shall be authorized, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, to continue contracts and
state aid letter payments to support county contracts which were
executed on or before March 31, 2023 with entities providing
services to persons with mental illness, without any additional
requirements that such contracts be subject to competitive bidding,
a request for proposals process or other administrative procedures.
The state comptroller is hereby authorized to receive funds from the
office of mental health that were returned from providers in the
current fiscal year in respect of a settlement of local assistance
funds from prior fiscal years, and is authorized to refund such
moneys to the credit of the local assistance account of the general
fund for the purpose of reimbursing the 2023-24 appropriation.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and
consistent with section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, the direc-
tors of facilities licensed but not operated by the office of mental
health who act as federally appointed representative payees and who
assume management responsibility over the funds of a resident may
continue to use such funds for the cost of the resident's care and
treatment, consistent with federal law and regulations.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner of mental
health shall, until July 1, 2024, be solely authorized, in his or
her discretion, to designate those general hospitals, local govern-
mental units and voluntary agencies which may apply and be consid-
ered for the approval and issuance of an operating certificate
pursuant to article 31 of the mental hygiene law for the operation
of a comprehensive psychiatric emergency program.

1156 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provision of section 21 of chapter 723 of the laws
of 1989, as amended, to the contrary, the provisions of sections 1,
2 and 4-20 of such chapter shall remain in full force and effect
until July 1, 2024, when upon such date the amendments and additions
made by such sections of chapter 723 of the laws of 1989 shall
expire and be deemed repealed, and any provision of law amended by
any such sections shall revert to its text as it existed prior to
the effective date of chapter 723 of the laws of 1989.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any of the
amounts appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by inter-
change or transfer without limit, with any appropriation of the
office of mental health or by transfer or suballocation to any
department, agency or public authority for expenditures incurred in
the operation of such programs with the approval of the director of
the budget:
For transfer to the department of health to reimburse the department
for the state share of medical assistance payments for various
mental health services.
For the period April 1, 2023 through March 31, 2024, the office of
mental health is authorized to recover from community residences and
family-based treatment providers licensed by the office of mental
health, consistent with contractual obligations of such providers
and notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of law to the
contrary, for the period January 1, 2003 through December 31, 2009
and January 1, 2011 through December 31, 2022 for programs located
outside of the city of New York and for the period July 1, 2003
through June 30, 2010 and July 1, 2011 through June 30, 2022 for
programs located in the city of New York, in an amount equal to 50
percent of the income received by such providers which exceed the
fixed amount of annual medicaid revenue limitations, as established
by the commissioner of mental health.
For services and expenses of the medical assistance program including
reinvestment in behavioral health services of general fund savings
directly related to savings realized through the transition of popu-
lations from the medicaid fee-for-service system to a managed care
model, including savings resulting from the reduction of inpatient
and outpatient behavioral health services provided under the medi-
caid program (37049) ... 74,000,000 .............. (re. $57,564,000)
For services and expenses of the comprehensive care centers for eating
disorders program (37031) ... 1,178,000 ........... (re. $1,178,000)
For community mental health services and/or expenses of contracts with
municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Crisis Intervention Teams (36913) ... 2,000,000 ..... (re. $1,389,000)
NY Mental Health Association in Orange County Inc (37073) ............
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
The Trevor Project (37054) ... 150,000 ................ (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Daniel's Law Task Force. Notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, the amount appropri-
ated herein may be suballocated or transferred between other state

1157 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
agencies and state operations with the approval of the director of
division of the budget (37077) ... 1,000,000 ...... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of a maternal mental health workgroup.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the amount
appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred between other
state agencies and state operations with the approval of the direc-
tor of the division of budget (37078) ... 250,000 ... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or not-for-profit service providers or
their employees providing programs and services which include but
are not limited to, mental health services, addiction treatment
services and support programs, crisis intervention, behavioral
health services and supports. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, the amount appropriated herein may be suballocated
or transferred between other state agencies with the approval of the
temporary president of the senate and director of the division of
the budget. Notwithstanding section twenty-four of the state finance
law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appro-
priation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount
to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating such
appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resol-
ution must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to
the Senate upon a roll call vote (37080) ...........................
1,750,000 ......................................... (re. $1,224,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For community mental health services and/or expenses of contracts with
municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Children of Promise, NYC. Funds from this appropriation shall be
suballocated to the Office of Children and Family Services (37059)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For community mental health services and/or expenses of contracts with
municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Crisis Intervention Teams (36913) ... 2,000,000 ..... (re. $1,106,000)
FarmNet (37012) ... 400,000 ........................... (re. $300,000)
Family Service League - North Fork Mental Health Initiative (37023)
... 175,000 ......................................... (re. $175,000)
Rainbow Heights Club (37056) ... 125,000 .............. (re. $125,000)
Mental Health Association in New York State, Inc (37008) .............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or not-for-profit service providers or

1158 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
their employees providing mental health, addiction treatment
services and support programs. Notwithstanding section 24 of the
state finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan
(i) approved by the temporary president of the senate and the direc-
tor of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of gran-
tees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for
allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included
in a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (37061) ................
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $48,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For community mental health services and/or expenses of contracts with
municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Children of Promise, NYC. Funds from this appropriation shall be
suballocated to the Office of Children and Family Services (37059)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to suicide prevention efforts for
high-risk populations, including Latina adolescents, Black youth,
members of the Lesbian, Gay, Bi-sexual, Transgender, and Queer
community, and Rural Communities (37046) ...........................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For community mental health services and/or expenses of contracts with
municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Mental Health Association in New York State, Inc. (37008) ............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $50,000)
North Fork Mental Health Initiative (37023) ..........................
175,000 ............................................. (re. $175,000)
Crisis Intervention Teams (36913) ... 1,000,000 ..... (re. $1,000,000)
The Penn Foundation, Inc. (37042) ... 25,000 ........... (re. $25,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For community mental hygiene services and/or expenses of contracts
with municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
For services and expenses related to the expansion of crisis inter-
vention services and diversion programs, including a) training,
implementation and evaluation of police crisis intervention teams,
b) regional Mental Health First Aid Training for police, c) conduct-
ing an analysis, including an evaluation of local diversion
centers,to determine any programmatic changes necessary to facili-
tate the planning and implementation of alternative diversion

1159 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
programs that would provide support for crisis intervention teams
and police related diversion services (36936) ......................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $583,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Community Mental Health Services Block Grant Account - 25180
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to adult mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36947) ... 62,619,000 ............... (re. $61,455,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to adult mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36947) ... 62,619,000 ................ (re. $3,921,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to adult mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36947) ... 55,329,000 .................. (re. $402,000)
For services and expenses associated with federal block grant awards
yet to be allocated by the federal department of health and human
services. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health for aid to localities,
administrative and support services, including fringe benefits,
associated with the federal block grant. Notwithstanding sections
112 and 163 of the state finance law and section 142 of the economic
development law, or any other inconsistent provision of law, funds
available for expenditure pursuant to this appropriation for the
development, expansion, and/or operation of various community mental
health services, may be allocated and distributed by the commission-

1160 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
er of the office of mental health, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for
proposal process.
Funds shall be administered by the office of mental health consistent
with federal law and requirements. The agency shall prepare annual
reporting to the chairperson of the senate finance committee, the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee, the chair-
person of the senate committee on mental health, the chairperson of
the assembly mental health committee, on the disbursement of funding
for each purpose. Such reports shall include: (a) description of
types of projects supported by these funds; (b) total funds commit-
ted by project type; (c) total funds liquidated by project type; and
(d) number of mental health providers who have received direct grant
payments. Such reports shall be due July 1, 2021, October 1, 2021,
and annually thereafter (37047) ....................................
111,050,000 ...................................... (re. $34,842,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to adult mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36947) ... 32,546,000 .................. (re. $641,000)
For services and expenses associated with federal block grant awards
yet to be allocated by the federal department of health and human
services. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health for aid to localities,
administrative and support services, including fringe benefits,
associated with the federal block grant. Notwithstanding sections
112 and 163 of the state finance law and section 142 of the economic
development law, or any other inconsistent provision of law, funds
available for expenditure pursuant to this appropriation for the
development, expansion, and/or operation of various community mental
health services, may be allocated and distributed by the commission-
er of the office of mental health, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for
proposal process.
Funds shall be administered by the office of mental health consistent
with federal law and requirements. The agency shall prepare annual
reporting to the chairperson of the senate finance committee, the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee, the chair-
person of the senate committee on mental health, the chairperson of
the assembly mental health committee, on the disbursement of funding
for each purpose. Such reports shall include: (a) description of
types of projects supported by these funds; (b) total funds commit-

1161 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ted by project type; (c) total funds liquidated by project type; and
(d) number of mental health providers who have received direct grant
payments. Such reports shall be due July 1, 2021, October 1, 2021,
and annually thereafter (37047) ... 40,620,000 .... (re. $4,554,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25100
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses associated with federal grant awards yet to
be allocated. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health services for aid to
localities, administrative and support services, including fringe
benefits (36948) ... 50,000,000 .................. (re. $50,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses associated with federal grant awards yet to
be allocated. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health services for aid to
localities, administrative and support services, including fringe
benefits (36948) ... 50,000,000 .................. (re. $50,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses associated with federal grant awards yet to
be allocated. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health services for aid to
localities, administrative and support services, including fringe
benefits (36948) ... 50,000,000 .................. (re. $50,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses associated with federal grant awards yet to
be allocated. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health services for aid to
localities, administrative and support services, including fringe
benefits (36948) ... 30,000,000 .................. (re. $30,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses associated with federal grant awards yet to
be allocated. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or

1162 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
program within the office of mental health services for aid to
localities, administrative and support services, including fringe
benefits (36948) ... 10,000,000 .................. (re. $10,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
PATH Account - 25124
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For programs to assist and transition from homelessness (PATH) grants.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the PATH
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the grant
(36946) ... 6,359,000 ............................. (re. $6,359,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For programs to assist and transition from homelessness (PATH) grants.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the PATH
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the grant
(36946) ... 6,359,000 ............................. (re. $6,257,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For programs to assist and transition from homelessness (PATH) grants.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the PATH
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the grant
(36946) ... 6,359,000 ............................. (re. $3,439,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For programs to assist and transition from homelessness (PATH) grants.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the PATH
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the grant
(36946) ... 6,359,000 ............................. (re. $3,159,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For programs to assist and transition from homelessness (PATH) grants.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the PATH
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support

1163 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the grant
(36946) ... 6,359,000 ............................... (re. $715,000)
CHILDREN AND YOUTH SERVICES PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25180
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to children's mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36961) ... 14,488,000 ............... (re. $14,488,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to children's mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36961) ... 14,488,000 ................ (re. $8,451,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to children's mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36961) ... 14,488,000 ................ (re. $7,851,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to children's mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36961) ... 12,778,000 ................ (re. $1,958,000)
For services and expenses associated with federal block grant awards
yet to be allocated by the federal department of health and human

1164 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
services. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health for aid to localities,
administrative and support services, including fringe benefits,
associated with the federal block grant. Notwithstanding sections
112 and 163 of the state finance law and section 142 of the economic
development law, or any other inconsistent provision of law, funds
available for expenditure pursuant to this appropriation for the
development, expansion, and/or operation of various community mental
health services, may be allocated and distributed by the commission-
er of the office of mental health, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for
proposal process.
Funds shall be administered by the office of mental health consistent
with federal law and requirements. The agency shall prepare annual
reporting to the chairperson of the senate finance committee, the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee, the chair-
person of the senate committee on mental health, the chairperson of
the assembly mental health committee, on the disbursement of funding
for each purpose. Such reports shall include: (a) description of
types of projects supported by these funds; (b) total funds commit-
ted by project type; (c) total funds liquidated by project type; and
(d) number of mental health providers who have received direct grant
payments. Such reports shall be due July 1, 2021, October 1, 2021,
and annually thereafter (37048) ... 26,250,000 ... (re. $14,727,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to children's mental health services
funded by the community mental health services block grant.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this
appropriation, consistent with the terms and conditions of the block
grant, may be transferred to other programs within the office of
mental health for aid to localities, administrative and support
services, including fringe benefits, associated with the federal
block grant (36961) ... 7,516,000 .................... (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses associated with federal block grant awards
yet to be allocated by the federal department of health and human
services. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the
director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropri-
ation authority contained herein to any other federal fund or
program within the office of mental health for aid to localities,
administrative and support services, including fringe benefits,
associated with the federal block grant. Notwithstanding sections
112 and 163 of the state finance law and section 142 of the economic
development law, or any other inconsistent provision of law, funds
available for expenditure pursuant to this appropriation for the
development, expansion, and/or operation of various community mental
health services, may be allocated and distributed by the commission-
er of the office of mental health, subject to the approval of the

1165 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
director of the budget, without a competitive bid or request for
proposal process.
Funds shall be administered by the office of mental health consistent
with federal law and requirements. The agency shall prepare annual
reporting to the chairperson of the senate finance committee, the
chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee, the chair-
person of the senate committee on mental health, the chairperson of
the assembly mental health committee, on the disbursement of funding
for each purpose. Such reports shall include: (a) description of
types of projects supported by these funds; (b) total funds commit-
ted by project type; (c) total funds liquidated by project type; and
(d) number of mental health providers who have received direct grant
payments. Such reports shall be due July 1, 2021, October 1, 2021,
and annually thereafter (37048) ... 9,380,000 ....... (re. $234,000)

1166 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 7,883,188,000 6,312,173,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 7,883,188,000 6,312,173,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM ............................... 7,883,188,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the community
services program, net of disallowances,
for community programs for people with
developmental disabilities pursuant to
article 41 of the mental hygiene law,
and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974,
chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter
412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the
laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of
1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and
other provisions of the mental hygiene
law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the following appropri-
ation shall be net of prior and/or current
year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and
credits.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
advances and reimbursement made pursuant
to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and
section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law
shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and
in a manner prescribed by the agency head
and approved by the director of the budg-
et. The moneys hereby appropriated are
available to reimburse or advance locali-
ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for
expenditures made during local fiscal
periods commencing January 1, 2026, April
1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances
for the 3 month period beginning January
1, 2027.
Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41
of the mental hygiene law or any other

1167 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
inconsistent provision of law, rule or
regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to
such contract and in the manner provided
therein, may pay all or a portion of the
expenses incurred by such voluntary agen-
cies arising out of loans which are funded
from the proceeds of bonds and notes
issued by the dormitory authority of the
state of New York.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office for people
with developmental disabilities with the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for state aid of up to 100 percent
of the net deficit costs of day training
programs and family support services.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section
16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any
other inconsistent provision of law, with
relation to the operation of certified
family care homes, including family care
homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro-
fit agencies, moneys from this appropri-
ation may be used for payments to purchase
general services including but not limited
to respite providers, up to a maximum of
14 days, at rates to be established by the
commissioner and approved by the director
of the budget in consideration of factors
including, but not limited to, geographic
area and number of clients cared for in
the home and for payment in an amount
determined by the commissioner for the
personal needs of each client residing in
the family care home.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi-
sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance
law and any other inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for expenses of family care homes
including payments to operators of certi-
fied family care homes for damages caused
by clients to personal and real property
in accordance with standards established
by the commissioner and approved by the
director of the budget.

1168 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for appropriate day program
services and residential services includ-
ing, but not limited to, direct housing
subsidies to individuals, start-up
expenses for family care providers, envi-
ronmental modifications, adaptive technol-
ogies, appraisals, property options,
feasibility studies and preoperational
expenses.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available to increase the
family care residential habilitation fee
schedule in effect on December 31, 2026 by
5 percent, effective January 1, 2027.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the commissioner
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement; provided that this shall
not prevent the commissioner from applying
prior adjustments for the purpose of
establishing rates resulting from a rebas-
ing of base year costs or a 5 percent
increase to the family care residential
habilitation fee schedule.
Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa-
tion law and any other provision of law,
rule or regulation to the contrary, direct
support staff in programs certified or
approved by the office for people with
developmental disabilities, including the
home and community based services waiver
programs that the office for people with
developmental disabilities is authorized
to administer with federal approval pursu-
ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of
the federal social security act, are
authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD
may specify when performed under the
supervision, training and periodic

1169 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
inspection of a registered professional
nurse and in accordance with an authorized
practitioner's ordered care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, and consistent with
section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law,
the directors of facilities licensed but
not operated by the office for people with
developmental disabilities who act as
federally-appointed representative payees
and who assume management responsibility
over the funds of a resident may continue
to use such funds for the cost of the
resident's care and treatment, consistent
with federal law and regulations.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
in accordance with the following:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the director of the budget is
authorized to make suballocations from
this appropriation to the department of
health medical assistance program.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, and pursuant to criteria estab-
lished by the commissioner of the office
for people with developmental disabilities
and approved by the director of the budg-
et, expenditures may be made from this
appropriation for residential facilities
which are pending recertification as
intermediate care facilities for people
with developmental disabilities.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section
41.36 of the mental hygiene law and any
other inconsistent provision of law,
moneys from this appropriation may be used
for payment up to $250 per year per
client, at such times and in such manner
as determined by the commissioner on the
basis of financial need for the personal
needs of each client residing in voluntar-
y-operated community residences and volun-
tary-operated community residential alter-
natives, including individualized
residential alternatives under the home
and community based services waiver. The
commissioner shall, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
alter existing advance payment schedules
for voluntary-operated community resi-

1170 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
dences established pursuant to section
41.36 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for the operation of clinics
licensed pursuant to article 16 of the
mental hygiene law including, but not
limited to, supportive and habilitative
services consistent with the home and
community based services waiver.
For the state and/or local share of medical
assistance services expenses incurred by
the department of health for the provision
of medical assistance services to people
with developmental disabilities (37835) .. 7,085,493,000
For additional state and/or local share
medical assistance services expenses
incurred by the department of health for
the provision of medical assistance
services to people with developmental
disabilities, related to the development
of new service opportunities for individ-
uals with disabilities that are currently
living at home and whose caregivers are
unable to continue caring for them (37818) ... 2,000,000
For services and expenses of the office for
people with developmental disabilities to
implement a chapter of the laws of 2026,
to provide funding for a targeted infla-
tionary increase for the purpose of estab-
lishing rates of payments, contracts or
any other form of reimbursement for the
period April 1, 2026 through March 31,
2027. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law to the contrary, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget,
the amounts appropriated herein may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer without limit to any local
assistance appropriation, and may include
advances to local governments and volun-
tary agencies, to accomplish this purpose
(37807) .................................... 151,290,000
For services and expenses of the community
services program, net of disallowances,
for community programs for people with
developmental disabilities pursuant to
article 41 of the mental hygiene law,
and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974,
chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter

1171 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the
laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of
1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and
other provisions of the mental hygiene
law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the following appropri-
ation shall be net of prior and/or current
year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and
credits.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
advances and reimbursement made pursuant
to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and
section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law
shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and
in a manner prescribed by the agency head
and approved by the director of the budg-
et. The moneys hereby appropriated are
available to reimburse or advance locali-
ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for
expenditures made during local fiscal
periods commencing January 1, 2026, April
1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances
for the 3 month period beginning January
1, 2027.
Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41
of the mental hygiene law or any other
inconsistent provision of law, rule or
regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to
such contract and in the manner provided
therein, may pay all or a portion of the
expenses incurred by such voluntary agen-
cies arising out of loans which are funded
from the proceeds of bonds and notes
issued by the dormitory authority of the
state of New York.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the money hereby appropriated may be
transferred to state operations and/or any
appropriation of the office for people
with developmental disabilities with the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for state aid of up to 100 percent
of the net deficit costs of day training
programs and family support services.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section
16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any
other inconsistent provision of law, with
relation to the operation of certified

1172 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
family care homes, including family care
homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro-
fit agencies, moneys from this appropri-
ation may be used for payments to purchase
general services including but not limited
to respite providers, up to a maximum of
14 days, at rates to be established by the
commissioner and approved by the director
of the budget in consideration of factors
including, but not limited to, geographic
area and number of clients cared for in
the home and for payment in an amount
determined by the commissioner for the
personal needs of each client residing in
the family care home.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi-
sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance
law and any other inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for expenses of family care homes
including payments to operators of certi-
fied family care homes for damages caused
by clients to personal and real property
in accordance with standards established
by the commissioner and approved by the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used for appropriate day program
services and residential services includ-
ing, but not limited to, direct housing
subsidies to individuals, start-up
expenses for family care providers, envi-
ronmental modifications, adaptive technol-
ogies, appraisals, property options,
feasibility studies and preoperational
expenses.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu-
lation to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available to increase the
family care residential habilitation fee
schedule in effect on December 31, 2026 by
5 percent, effective January 1, 2027.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, moneys from this appropriation may
be used to fund continuity of care
services, family reimbursed respite, other
than personal services and direct housing
subsidies for people who are enrolled in
OPWDD's self-direction program, provided

1173 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
any or all such costs are identified in a
self-direction budget approved by OPWDD.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law except pursuant to a chapter of the
laws of 2026 authorizing a 2.7 percent
targeted inflationary increase, for the
period commencing on April 1, 2026 and
ending March 31, 2027 the commissioner
shall not apply any other inflationary
increases, cost of living type increases,
inflation factors, or trend factors for
the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement; provided that this shall
not prevent the commissioner from applying
prior adjustments for the purpose of
establishing rates resulting from a rebas-
ing of base year costs or a 5 percent
increase to the family care residential
habilitation fee schedule.
Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa-
tion law and any other provision of law,
rule or regulation to the contrary, direct
support staff in programs certified or
approved by the office for people with
developmental disabilities, including the
home and community based services waiver
programs that the office for people with
developmental disabilities is authorized
to administer with federal approval pursu-
ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of
the federal social security act, are
authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD
may specify when performed under the
supervision, training and periodic
inspection of a registered professional
nurse and in accordance with an authorized
practitioner's ordered care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, and consistent with
section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law,
the directors of facilities licensed but
not operated by the office for people with
developmental disabilities who act as
federally-appointed representative payees
and who assume management responsibility
over the funds of a resident may continue
to use such funds for the cost of the
resident's care and treatment, consistent
with federal law and regulations.

1174 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Funds appropriated herein shall be available
in accordance with the following:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
are available to reimburse in- and out-of-
state private residential schools, pursu-
ant to subdivision (c) of section 13.37-a
and subdivision (g) of section 13.38 of
the mental hygiene law, for costs of
supporting the residential and day program
services available to individuals who are
over the age of 21 years of age, provided
that the amount paid for residential
services and/or maintenance costs is net
of any supplemental security income bene-
fit to which the individual receiving
services is eligible, and provided further
that funding for nonresidential services
will be in an amount not to exceed the
maximum reimbursement for appropriate day
services delivered by the office for
people with developmental disabilities
certified or approved providers other than
in- and out-of-state private residential
schools, unless otherwise authorized by
the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 163 of the state
finance law, section 142 of the economic
development law, and article 41 of the
mental hygiene law, the commissioner of
the office for people with developmental
disabilities may make the funds appropri-
ated herein available as state aid, a loan
or a grant, pursuant to terms and condi-
tions established by the commissioner of
the office for people with developmental
disabilities, to cover a portion of the
development costs of private, public
and/or non-profit organizations, including
corporations and partnerships established
pursuant to the private housing finance
law and/or any other statutory provisions,
for supportive housing units that have
been set aside for individuals with intel-
lectual and developmental disabilities.
Further, the office for people with devel-
opmental disabilities shall have a lien on
the real property developed with such
state aid, loans or grants, which shall be
in the amount of the loan or grant, for a

1175 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
maximum term of 30 years, or other longer
term consistent with the requirements of
another regulatory agency.
For services and expenses related to the
provision of residential services to
people with developmental disabilities
(37802) .................................... 424,647,000
For services and expenses related to the
provision of day program services to
people with developmental disabilities
(37803) ..................................... 86,224,000
For services and expenses related to the
provision of family support services to
people with developmental disabilities
(37804) ..................................... 63,400,000
For services and expenses related to the
provision of workshop, day training and
employment services to people with devel-
opmental disabilities. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, up to $800,000 of
this appropriation may be transferred to
the New York State Education Departments'
Adult Career and Continuing Education
Services - Vocational Rehabilitation
(ACCES-VR) program to support the LongTerm
Sheltered Employment program operated by
FEDCAP Rehabilitation Services, Inc.
(37805) ..................................... 16,601,000
For other services and expenses provided to
people with developmental disabilities
including but not limited to hepatitis B,
care at home waiver, epilepsy services,
Special Olympics New York, Inc. and volun-
tary fingerprinting (37806) ................. 14,203,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funding made available by this
appropriation shall support direct salary
costs and related fringe benefits associ-
ated with any minimum wage increase that
takes effect on or after December 31,
2016, pursuant to section 652 of the labor
law. Organizations eligible for funding
made available by this appropriation shall
be limited to those that are required to
file a consolidated fiscal report with the
office for people with developmental disa-
bilities. Each eligible organization in
receipt of funding made available by this
appropriation shall submit written certif-
ication, in such form and at such time as

1176 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the commissioner shall prescribe, attest-
ing to how such funding will be or was
used for purposes eligible under this
appropriation. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, and subject to
the approval of the director of the budg-
et, the amounts appropriated herein may be
increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer without limit to any local
assistance appropriation of the office for
people with developmental disabilities,
and may include advances to organizations
authorized to receive such funds to accom-
plish this purpose (37889) .................. 39,330,000
For community mental hygiene services and/or
expenses of contracts with municipalities;
educational institutions; and/or not-for-
profit agencies:
The Autism Society Greater Hudson Region for
Albany Autism Society, Inc. .................... 200,000
Brain Injury Association of New York State, Inc. . 150,000
Special Olympics New York, Inc. .................. 150,000
People, Inc. ..................................... 150,000
Jawonio, Inc. .................................... 130,000
Family Residences and Essential Enterprises,
Inc. (F.R.E.E) .................................. 50,000
Backyard Players & Friends, Inc. .................. 50,000
For services and expenses of Best Buddies
International, Inc. ............................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Jawonio, Inc. ....... 130,000
For services and expenses of Special Olym-
pics New York, Inc. ............................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Special Olym-
pics New York, Inc. (Transportation
programs and services) ......................... 200,000
--------------

1177 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the community services program, net of
disallowances, for community programs for people with developmental
disabilities pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law,
and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, chapter 660 of the laws of
1977, chapter 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the laws of
1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of
1993 and other provisions of the mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, the following appropriation shall
be net of prior and/or current year refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, and credits.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, advances and reimbursement
made pursuant to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and section 41.18
of the mental hygiene law shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and
in a manner prescribed by the agency head and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. The moneys hereby appropriated are available to
reimburse or advance localities and voluntary non-profit agencies
for expenditures made during local fiscal periods commencing January
1, 2025, April 1, 2025 or July 1, 2025, and for advances for the 3
month period beginning January 1, 2026.
Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 of the mental hygiene law
or any other inconsistent provision of law, rule or regulation, the
commissioner, pursuant to such contract and in the manner provided
therein, may pay all or a portion of the expenses incurred by such
voluntary agencies arising out of loans which are funded from the
proceeds of bonds and notes issued by the dormitory authority of the
state of New York.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be transferred to state operations and/or any appropriation
of the office for people with developmental disabilities with the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for state aid of up to 100 percent of the
net deficit costs of day training programs and family support
services.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 16.23 of the mental hygiene
law and any other inconsistent provision of law, with relation to
the operation of certified family care homes, including family care
homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-profit agencies, moneys from
this appropriation may be used for payments to purchase general
services including but not limited to respite providers, up to a
maximum of 14 days, at rates to be established by the commissioner
and approved by the director of the budget in consideration of
factors including, but not limited to, geographic area and number of
clients cared for in the home and for payment in an amount deter-

1178 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
mined by the commissioner for the personal needs of each client
residing in the family care home.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 12 of section 8 of the
state finance law and any other inconsistent provision of law,
moneys from this appropriation may be used for expenses of family
care homes including payments to operators of certified family care
homes for damages caused by clients to personal and real property in
accordance with standards established by the commissioner and
approved by the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for appropriate day program services and
residential services including, but not limited to, direct housing
subsidies to individuals, start-up expenses for family care provid-
ers, environmental modifications, adaptive technologies, appraisals,
property options, feasibility studies and preoperational expenses.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement; provided
that this shall not prevent the commissioner from applying prior
adjustments for the purpose of establishing rates resulting from a
rebasing of base year costs.
Notwithstanding section 6908 of the education law and any other
provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, direct support
staff in programs certified or approved by the office for people
with developmental disabilities, including the home and community
based services waiver programs that the office for people with
developmental disabilities is authorized to administer with federal
approval pursuant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of the federal
social security act, are authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD
may specify when performed under the supervision, training and peri-
odic inspection of a registered professional nurse and in accordance
with an authorized practitioner's ordered care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and
consistent with section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, the direc-
tors of facilities licensed but not operated by the office for
people with developmental disabilities who act as federally-appoint-
ed representative payees and who assume management responsibility
over the funds of a resident may continue to use such funds for the
cost of the resident's care and treatment, consistent with federal
law and regulations.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available in accordance with the
following:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the
budget is authorized to make suballocations from this appropriation
to the department of health medical assistance program.

1179 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and pursuant to
criteria established by the commissioner of the office for people
with developmental disabilities and approved by the director of the
budget, expenditures may be made from this appropriation for resi-
dential facilities which are pending recertification as intermediate
care facilities for people with developmental disabilities.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 41.36 of the mental hygiene
law and any other inconsistent provision of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for payment up to $250 per year per
client, at such times and in such manner as determined by the
commissioner on the basis of financial need for the personal needs
of each client residing in voluntary-operated community residences
and voluntary-operated community residential alternatives, including
individualized residential alternatives under the home and community
based services waiver. The commissioner shall, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, alter existing advance
payment schedules for voluntary-operated community residences estab-
lished pursuant to section 41.36 of the mental hygiene law.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for the operation of clinics licensed
pursuant to article 16 of the mental hygiene law including, but not
limited to, supportive and habilitative services consistent with the
home and community based services waiver.
For the state and/or local share of medical assistance services
expenses incurred by the department of health for the provision of
medical assistance services to people with developmental disabili-
ties (37835) ... 6,720,177,000 ................ (re. $5,746,515,000)
For additional state and/or local share medical assistance services
expenses incurred by the department of health for the provision of
medical assistance services to people with developmental disabili-
ties, related to the development of new service opportunities for
individuals with disabilities that are currently living at home and
whose caregivers are unable to continue caring for them (37818) ...
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of the office for people with developmental
disabilities to implement a chapter of the laws of 2025, to provide
funding for a targeted inflationary increase for the purpose of
establishing rates of payments, contracts or any other form of
reimbursement for the period April 1, 2025 through March 31, 2026.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and
subject to the approval of the director of the budget, the amounts
appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or
transfer without limit to any local assistance appropriation, and
may include advances to local governments and voluntary agencies, to
accomplish this purpose (37807) ....................................
143,452,000 ..................................... (re. $143,452,000)
For services and expenses of the community services program, net of
disallowances, for community programs for people with developmental
disabilities pursuant to article 41 of the mental hygiene law,
and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, chapter 660 of the laws of

1180 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
1977, chapter 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the laws of
1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of
1993 and other provisions of the mental hygiene law. Notwithstanding
any inconsistent provision of law, the following appropriation shall
be net of prior and/or current year refunds, rebates, reimburse-
ments, and credits.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, advances and reimbursement
made pursuant to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and section 41.18
of the mental hygiene law shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and
in a manner prescribed by the agency head and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. The moneys hereby appropriated are available to
reimburse or advance localities and voluntary non-profit agencies
for expenditures made during local fiscal periods commencing January
1, 2025, April 1, 2025 or July 1, 2025, and for advances for the 3
month period beginning January 1, 2026.
Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 of the mental hygiene law
or any other inconsistent provision of law, rule or regulation, the
commissioner, pursuant to such contract and in the manner provided
therein, may pay all or a portion of the expenses incurred by such
voluntary agencies arising out of loans which are funded from the
proceeds of bonds and notes issued by the dormitory authority of the
state of New York.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri-
ated may be transferred to state operations and/or any appropriation
of the office for people with developmental disabilities with the
approval of the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for state aid of up to 100 percent of the
net deficit costs of day training programs and family support
services.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 16.23 of the mental hygiene
law and any other inconsistent provision of law, with relation to
the operation of certified family care homes, including family care
homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-profit agencies, moneys from
this appropriation may be used for payments to purchase general
services including but not limited to respite providers, up to a
maximum of 14 days, at rates to be established by the commissioner
and approved by the director of the budget in consideration of
factors including, but not limited to, geographic area and number of
clients cared for in the home and for payment in an amount deter-
mined by the commissioner for the personal needs of each client
residing in the family care home.
Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 12 of section 8 of the
state finance law and any other inconsistent provision of law,
moneys from this appropriation may be used for expenses of family
care homes including payments to operators of certified family care
homes for damages caused by clients to personal and real property in
accordance with standards established by the commissioner and
approved by the director of the budget.

1181 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used for appropriate day program services and
residential services including, but not limited to, direct housing
subsidies to individuals, start-up expenses for family care provid-
ers, environmental modifications, adaptive technologies, appraisals,
property options, feasibility studies and preoperational expenses.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, moneys from this
appropriation may be used to fund continuity of care services, fami-
ly reimbursed respite, other than personal services and direct hous-
ing subsidies for people who are enrolled in OPWDD's self-direction
program, provided any or all such costs are identified in a self-di-
rection budget approved by OPWDD.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law except pursuant to a
chapter of the laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent targeted
inflationary increase, for the period commencing on April 1, 2025
and ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner shall not apply any other
inflationary increases, cost of living type increases, inflation
factors, or trend factors for the purpose of establishing rates of
payments, contracts or any other form of reimbursement; provided
that this shall not prevent the commissioner from applying prior
adjustments for the purpose of establishing rates resulting from a
rebasing of base year costs.
Notwithstanding section 6908 of the education law and any other
provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, direct support
staff in programs certified or approved by the office for people
with developmental disabilities, including the home and community
based services waiver programs that the office for people with
developmental disabilities is authorized to administer with federal
approval pursuant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of the federal
social security act, are authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD
may specify when performed under the supervision, training and peri-
odic inspection of a registered professional nurse and in accordance
with an authorized practitioner's ordered care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and
consistent with section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, the direc-
tors of facilities licensed but not operated by the office for
people with developmental disabilities who act as federally-appoint-
ed representative payees and who assume management responsibility
over the funds of a resident may continue to use such funds for the
cost of the resident's care and treatment, consistent with federal
law and regulations.
Funds appropriated herein shall be available in accordance with the
following:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein are available to reimburse in-and out-of-state
private residential schools, pursuant to subdivision (c) of section
13.37-a and subdivision (g) of section 13.38 of the mental hygiene
law, for costs of supporting the residential and day program
services available to individuals who are over the age of 21 years
of age, provided that the amount paid for residential services

1182 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and/or maintenance costs is net of any supplemental security income
benefit to which the individual receiving services is eligible, and
provided further that funding for nonresidential services will be in
an amount not to exceed the maximum reimbursement for appropriate
day services delivered by the office for people with developmental
disabilities certified or approved providers other than in-and out-
of-state private residential schools, unless otherwise authorized by
the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law, section 142 of
the economic development law, and article 41 of the mental hygiene
law, the commissioner of the office for people with developmental
disabilities may make the funds appropriated herein available as
state aid, a loan or a grant, pursuant to terms and conditions
established by the commissioner of the office for people with devel-
opmental disabilities, to cover a portion of the development costs
of private, public and/or non-profit organizations, including corpo-
rations and partnerships established pursuant to the private housing
finance law and/or any other statutory provisions, for supportive
housing units that have been set aside for individuals with intel-
lectual and developmental disabilities. Further, the office for
people with developmental disabilities shall have a lien on the real
property developed with such state aid, loans or grants, which shall
be in the amount of the loan or grant, for a maximum term of 30
years, or other longer term consistent with the requirements of
another regulatory agency.
For services and expenses related to the provision of residential
services to people with developmental disabilities (37802) .........
351,614,000 ..................................... (re. $166,254,000)
For services and expenses related to the provision of day program
services to people with developmental disabilities (37803) .........
86,224,000 ....................................... (re. $71,982,000)
For services and expenses related to the provision of family support
services to people with developmental disabilities (37804) .........
97,033,000 ....................................... (re. $77,851,000)
For services and expenses related to the provision of workshop, day
training and employment services to people with developmental disa-
bilities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, up to $800,000
of this appropriation may be transferred to the New York State
Education Departments' Adult Career and Continuing Education
Services - Vocational Rehabilitation (ACCES-VR) program to support
the LongTerm Sheltered Employment program operated by FEDCAP Reha-
bilitation Services, Inc. (37805) ..................................
56,001,000 ....................................... (re. $50,758,000)
For other services and expenses provided to people with developmental
disabilities including but not limited to hepatitis B, care at home
waiver, epilepsy services, Special Olympics New York, Inc. and
voluntary fingerprinting (37806) ...................................
14,203,000 ....................................... (re. $12,608,000)
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funding made avail-
able by this appropriation shall support direct salary costs and

1183 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
related fringe benefits associated with any minimum wage increase
that takes effect on or after December 31, 2016, pursuant to section
652 of the labor law. Organizations eligible for funding made avail-
able by this appropriation shall be limited to those that are
required to file a consolidated fiscal report with the office for
people with developmental disabilities. Each eligible organization
in receipt of funding made available by this appropriation shall
submit written certification, in such form and at such time as the
commissioner shall prescribe, attesting to how such funding will be
or was used for purposes eligible under this appropriation. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, the amounts appropriated
herein may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer
without limit to any local assistance appropriation of the office
for people with developmental disabilities, and may include advances
to organizations authorized to receive such funds to accomplish this
purpose (37889) ....................................................
38,050,000 ....................................... (re. $38,050,000)
For community mental hygiene services and/or expenses of contracts
with municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Autism Society of the Greater Capital Region (37906) .................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
Brain Injury Alliance (37916) ... 150,000 ............. (re. $150,000)
Special Olympics New York, Inc. (37920) ..............................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
Jawonio, Inc. (37900) ... 130,000 ..................... (re. $130,000)
Family Residences and Essential Enterprises (F.R.E.E) (37917) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
Backyard Players & Friends Inc. (37912) ..............................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
Bring On the Spectrum, Inc. (37921) ..................................
30,000 ............................................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of Best Buddies International, Inc. (37892)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Jawonio, Inc. (37813) ...................
130,000 ............................................. (re. $130,000)
For services and expenses of Special Olympics New York, Inc. (37838)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Gigi's Playhouse - Buffalo, LLC (37922)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For community mental hygiene services and/or expenses of contracts
with municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Autism Society of the Greater Capital Region [(37911)] (37906) .......
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
Jawonio, Inc. (37900) ... 130,000 ..................... (re. $130,000)

1184 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE
OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Family Residences and Essential Enterprises (F.R.E.E) (37917) ........
50,000 ............................................... (re. $38,000)
For services and expenses of Special Olympics New York (37838) .......
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Jawonio, Inc. (37813) ...................
130,000 .............................................. (re. $45,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For community mental hygiene services and/or expenses of contracts
with municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Autism Society of the Greater Capital Region (37906) .................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
Brain Injury Alliance (37916) ... 150,000 ............. (re. $150,000)
Jawonio, Inc. (37900) ... 130,000 ...................... (re. $16,000)
Family Residences and Essential Enterprises (F.R.E.E) (37917) ........
50,000 ................................................ (re. $6,000)
For community mental hygiene services and/or expenses of contracts
with municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Special Olympics New York (37838) ... 150,000 ......... (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For community mental hygiene services and/or expenses of contracts
with municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Autism Society of the Greater Capital Region (37906) .................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
Backyard Players & Friends' (37912) ... 25,000 .......... (re. $3,000)
Jawonio, Inc. (37900) ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $3,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For community mental hygiene services and/or expenses of contracts
with municipalities; educational institutions; and/or not-for-profit
agencies:
Autism Society of the Greater Capital Region (37906) .................
200,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
Jawonio, Inc. (37813) ... 130,000 ...................... (re. $45,000)
NYSARC Inc. Rockland County Chapter (37867) ..........................
40,000 ................................................ (re. $4,000)
AccessCNY, Inc. (37909) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $10,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
Jawonio, Inc. (37813) ... 90,000 ........................ (re. $5,000)

1185 12653-09-6
METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 2,169,808,900 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 2,169,808,900 0
================ ================
SCHEDULE
DEDICATED MASS TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND...................1,925,558,900
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund
Railroad Account - 20852
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for deposit in the dedicated tax fund for
the expenses of the New York city transit
authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface
transit operating authority, and the
Staten Island rapid transit operating
authority, the Long Island rail road
company and the Metro-North commuter rail-
road company which includes the New York
state portion of the Harlem, Hudson, Port
Jervis, Pascack, and the New Haven commu-
ter railroad service regardless of whether
the services are provided directly or
pursuant to joint service agreements for
the period April 1, 2027 to March 31, 2028
provided, however, that such appropriation
shall become available only pursuant to
subdivision 3 of section 89-c of the state
finance law and notwithstanding section 40
of the state finance law shall take effect
on April 1, 2027 and shall lapse on March
31, 2028 (43804) ........................... 288,972,400
--------------
Program account subtotal...................288,972,400
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund
Transit Authorities Account - 20851
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for deposit in the dedicated tax fund for
the expenses of the New York city transit
authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface

1186 12653-09-6
METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
transit operating authority, and the
Staten Island rapid transit operating
authority, the Long Island rail road
company and the Metro-North commuter rail-
road company which includes the New York
state portion of the Harlem, Hudson, Port
Jervis, Pascack, and the New Haven commu-
ter railroad service regardless of whether
the services are provided directly or
pursuant to joint service agreements for
the period April 1, 2027 to March 31, 2028
provided, however, that such appropriation
shall become available only pursuant to
subdivision 3 of section 89-c of the state
finance law and notwithstanding section 40
of the state finance law shall take effect
on April 1, 2027 and shall lapse on March
31, 2028 (43804) ......................... 1,636,586,500
--------------
Program account subtotal.................1,636,586,500
--------------
METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY SUPPORT PROGRAM........244,250,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Metropolitan Transportation Authority Financial Assist-
ance Fund
Mobility Tax Trust Account - 23651
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for deposit in the metropolitan transpor-
tation authority finance fund pursuant to
the provisions of section 92-ff of the
state finance law, for the period April 1,
2027 to March 31, 2028 and notwithstanding
section 40 of the state finance law shall
take effect on April 1, 2027 and shall
lapse on March 31, 2028 (43805) ............ 244,250,000
--------------
Program account subtotal...................244,250,000
--------------

1187 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 5,500,000 5,376,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 5,500,000 5,376,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
MILITARY READINESS PROGRAM ................................... 1,500,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For the payment of reimbursements mandated
by subdivision 9 of section 210 of the
military law. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations for
administrative expenses (38700) .............. 1,500,000
--------------
SPECIAL SERVICES PROGRAM ..................................... 4,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to World
Trade Center death and disability benefits
for members of New York's organized mili-
tia, including liabilities incurred prior
to April 1, 2026.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated or transferred to any other
state agency, office or department for the
purposes stated herein (38716) ............... 4,000,000
--------------

1188 12653-09-6
DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
MILITARY READINESS PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For the payment of reimbursements mandated by subdivision 9 of section
210 of the military law. A portion of these funds may be transferred
to state operations for administrative expenses (38700) ............
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,491,000)
SPECIAL SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to World Trade Center death and
disability benefits for members of New York's organized militia,
including liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated or transferred to any other state agency,
office or department for the purposes stated herein (38716) ........
4,000,000 ......................................... (re. $3,885,000)

1189 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 25,000,000 96,997,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 25,000,000 96,997,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
GOVERNOR'S TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMITTEE ......................... 25,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Highway Safety Section 402 Account - 25319
For services and expenses related to local
governments' federal highway safety
projects pursuant to an allocation plan
subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ... 25,000,000
--------------

1190 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
GOVERNOR'S TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMITTEE
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Highway Safety Section 402 Account - 25319
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
24,900,000 ....................................... (re. $24,900,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
24,900,000 ....................................... (re. $24,900,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
24,800,000 ........................................ (re. $9,752,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
24,800,000 ........................................ (re. $3,399,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
22,200,000 ........................................ (re. $2,957,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
22,200,000 ........................................ (re. $2,157,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may

1191 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
22,200,000 ........................................ (re. $5,628,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
22,000,000 ........................................ (re. $5,576,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
21,800,000 ........................................ (re. $6,387,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other agencies (39009) ..........................
21,600,000 ........................................ (re. $4,216,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses related to local governments' federal high-
way safety projects pursuant to an allocation plan subject to the
approval of the director of the budget. A portion of these funds may
be suballocated to other state agencies (39009) ....................
21,400,000 ........................................ (re. $7,125,000)

1192 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 1,550,000 11,829,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 18,170,000 41,235,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 8,135,000 18,262,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 27,855,000 71,326,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
HISTORIC PRESERVATION PROGRAM ................................ 1,120,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25462
For expenses of acquisition, development and
administration of historic properties
(39901) ...................................... 1,120,000
--------------
RECREATION SERVICES PROGRAM ................................. 26,735,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to:
ArtPark and Company, Inc (40437) ................. 300,000
For additional services and expenses related
to ArtPark and Company, Inc. ................... 700,000
Buffalo Fine Arts Academy ........................ 200,000
For services and expenses related to Green-
Wood Historic Fund, Inc. for the 250th
Anniversary of the Battle of Brooklyn .......... 350,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,550,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25383
For services and expenses related to grants
for recreation services projects including
acquisition, research, development, educa-
tion and rehabilitation of parklands,
programs and facilities (39910) ............. 17,050,000

1193 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 17,050,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Snowmobile Trail Development and Maintenance Account -
21932
For services and expenses related to snowmo-
bile law enforcement and trail development
and maintenance (39910) ...................... 8,135,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 8,135,000
--------------

1194 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
HISTORIC PRESERVATION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to:
Hudson River Museum, for reinterpretation and digitization of the
collection (40432) ... 150,000 ....................... (re. $15,000)
Hudson River Museum, for the new community and partnership gallery
(40433) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $17,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25462
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For expenses of acquisition, development and administration of histor-
ic properties (39901) ... 1,120,000 ............... (re. $1,120,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For expenses of acquisition, development and administration of histor-
ic properties (39901) ... 1,120,000 ............... (re. $1,120,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For expenses of acquisition, development and administration of histor-
ic properties (39901) ... 1,120,000 ............... (re. $1,090,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For expenses of acquisition, development and administration of histor-
ic properties (39901) ... 1,120,000 ................. (re. $847,000)
NATURAL HERITAGE TRUST PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses related to operations of historic proper-
ties, including:
Friends of Cunningham Park (40410) ... 20,000 .......... (re. $20,000)
Nassau County Museum of Art (40411) ... 15,000 ......... (re. $15,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses related to operations of historic proper-
ties, including:
Yaddo (40400) ... 250,000 .............................. (re. $38,000)
Bayside Historical Society (40402) ... 100,000 ........ (re. $100,000)
Friends of Brinckerhoff Colonial Cemetery (40405) ....................
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:

1195 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to the Putnam Visitors Bureau
(39947) ... 60,000 .................................... (re. $7,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007:
For services and expenses associated with Belmont State Park Lake
Assessment and Restoration Project (39938) .........................
200,000 .............................................. (re. $99,000)
For services and expenses related to the Preservation League of New
York (39939) ... 150,000 ............................ (re. $150,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006:
For services and expenses for improvements to Tioga State Park (39941)
... 1,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005:
For services and expenses, grants in aid or for contracts with munici-
palities and/or private not-for-profit agencies to be determined
pursuant to a plan to be developed by the director of the budget in
consultation with the temporary president of the senate for New York
State Heritage Trail tourism projects (39940) ......................
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $59,000)
By chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2002:
For services and expenses related to repair and restoration of New
York State Division monuments in the Gettysburg Battlefield (39942)
... 250,000 .......................................... (re. $48,000)
RECREATION SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For additional services and expenses related to: ArtPark and Company,
Inc [(40437)](40447) ... 300,000 .................... (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the Forest Park Trust (40450) ...........
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the 250th commemoration commission. All
or a portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, public benefit corporation,
or public authority for the purposes stated herein (40448) .........
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to projects at state parks and
historic sites and for grants to municipalities, historical socie-
ties, conservancies, and other cultural institutions. Notwithstand-
ing section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to
the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-

1196 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (40443)
... 2,000,000 ..................................... (re. $1,600,000)
For services and expenses related to: Queens Botanical Garden Society,
Inc (40444) ... 200,000 ............................. (re. $200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to projects at state parks and
historic sites and for grants to municipalities, historical socie-
ties, conservancies, and other cultural institutions. Notwithstand-
ing section 24 of the state finance law or any provision of law to
the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated only
pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter
included in an assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of
all members elected to the assembly upon a roll call vote (40434)
... 3,000,000 ....................................... (re. $958,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to:
The Point Community Development Corporation, for operating to continue
to offer a multi-faceted approach to asset-based community develop-
ment through youth Development, Arts and Culture and Community
Development (40425) ... 20,000 ....................... (re. $20,000)
Belle Harbor Yacht Club building improvement (40426) .................
45,000 ............................................... (re. $45,000)
Preservation Buffalo Niagara (40429) ... 125,000 ........ (re. $5,000)
For Erie County for Seneca Bluffs Natural Habitat Park and Red Jacket
Riverfront Natural Habitat Park (40431) ............................
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
Prospect Park Alliance (40417) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses related to:
Prospect Park Alliance (40417) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000)
Narrows Botanical Gardens (40418) ... 10,000 ........... (re. $10,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses related to:
Coastal Preservation Network (40413) ... 30,000 ........ (re. $30,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For services and expenses related to:
Alley Pond Environmental Health Center Inc (39920) ...................
15,000 ............................................... (re. $15,000)

1197 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to:
City Parks Foundation (40407) ... 250,000 .............. (re. $16,000)
Snug Harbor Cultural Center (40409) ... 200,000 ....... (re. $107,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the administration of
the programs of section 79-b of the navigation law (39910) .........
2,920,000 ........................................... (re. $555,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the administration of
the programs of section 79-b of the navigation law (39910) .........
2,920,000 ........................................... (re. $570,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25383
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to grants for recreation services
projects including acquisition, research, development, education and
rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910) ...
17,050,000 ....................................... (re. $17,050,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to grants for recreation services
projects including acquisition, research, development, education and
rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910) .......
17,050,000 ....................................... (re. $15,008,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to grants for recreation services
projects including acquisition, research, development, education and
rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910) .......
2,050,000 ........................................... (re. $437,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to grants for recreation services
projects including acquisition, research, development, education and
rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910) .......
2,050,000 ......................................... (re. $2,050,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to grants for recreation services
projects including acquisition, research, development, education and
rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910) .......
2,800,000 ......................................... (re. $1,610,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses related to grants for recreation services
projects including acquisition, research, development, education and

1198 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910) .......
3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $537,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses related to grants for recreation services
projects including acquisition, research, development, education and
rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910) .......
3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $366,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Snowmobile Trail Development and Maintenance Account - 21932
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to snowmobile law enforcement and
trail development and maintenance (39910) ..........................
8,135,000 ......................................... (re. $7,564,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to snowmobile law enforcement and
trail development and maintenance (39910) ..........................
8,135,000 ......................................... (re. $1,773,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to snowmobile law enforcement and
trail development and maintenance (39910) ..........................
8,135,000 ......................................... (re. $3,308,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to snowmobile law enforcement and
trail development and maintenance (39910) ..........................
6,135,000 ........................................... (re. $809,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to snowmobile law enforcement and
trail development and maintenance (39910) ..........................
6,135,000 ......................................... (re. $1,441,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to snowmobile law enforcement and
trail development and maintenance (39910) ..........................
6,135,000 ......................................... (re. $1,485,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses related to snowmobile law enforcement and
trail development and maintenance (39910) ..........................
6,135,000 ......................................... (re. $1,882,000)

1199 12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 10,885,000 23,090,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 1,500,000 2,834,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 12,385,000 25,924,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 12,385,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of programs that
prevent domestic and gender-based
violence, including contracts for the
operation of hotlines for victims of
domestic and gender-based violence (47402) ... 1,165,000
For services and expenses of the Capital
District domestic violence law clinic, the
family violence and women's rights clinic
at the SUNY Buffalo law school, and other
legal services and programs that prevent
domestic and gender-based violence (47403) ..... 170,000
For services and expenses of rape crisis
centers, including but not limited to
prevention, education and victim services
on college campuses and within their
communities in the state. Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the office for
the prevention of domestic violence shall
administer the program and allocate funds
pursuant to a plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Such allocation method-
ology shall be based in part on the
following factors: certification status,
number of programs, and regional diversi-
ty. Funds hereby appropriated may be
transferred or suballocated to any state
department or agency (81116) ................. 4,500,000
For services, expenses and grants to govern-
ment entities and not-for-profits to
provide financial assistance to victims
and survivors of domestic violence,
distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the office for the prevention of domestic
violence and approved by the director of

1200 12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the budget. A portion of these funds may
be transferred to state operations and may
be suballocated to other state agencies
(47405) ...................................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses of the family
violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school ......................... 50,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 10,885,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Miscellaneous Discretionary Account - 25370
Funds herein appropriated may be used to
disburse federal grants in support of
state and local programs to support domes-
tic violence prevention programs. A
portion of these funds may be transferred
to state operations and may be suballo-
cated to other state agencies (81001) ........ 1,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,500,000
--------------

1201 12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic and
gender-based violence, including contracts for the operation of
hotlines for victims of domestic and gender-based violence (47402)
... 1,165,000 .................................... (re. $1,155,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District domestic violence
law clinic, the family violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school, and other legal services and programs that
prevent domestic and gender-based violence (47403) .................
170,000 ............................................. (re. $170,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers, including but not
limited to prevention, education and victim services on college
campuses and within their communities in the state. Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence shall administer the program and allocate funds pursuant to
a plan approved by the director of the budget. Such allocation meth-
odology shall be based in part on the following factors: certif-
ication status, number of programs, and regional diversity.
Funds hereby appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any
state department or agency (81116) .................................
4,500,000 ......................................... (re. $4,500,000)
For services, expenses and grants to government entities and not-for-
profits to provide financial assistance to victims and survivors of
domestic violence, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office for the prevention of domestic violence and approved by the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
to state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(47405) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,999,000)
For services and expenses of the family violence and women's rights
clinic at the SUNY Buffalo law school (47400).......................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic and
gender-based violence, including contracts for the operation of
hotlines for victims of domestic and gender-based violence (47402)
... 1,165,000 ....................................... (re. $631,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District domestic violence
law clinic, the family violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school, and other legal services and programs that
prevent domestic and gender-based violence (47403) .................
170,000 ............................................. (re. $110,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers, including but not
limited to prevention, education and victim services on college
campuses and within their communities in the state. Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence shall administer the program and allocate funds pursuant to

1202 12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
a plan approved by the director of the budget. Such allocation meth-
odology shall be based in part on the following factors: certif-
ication status, number of programs, and regional diversity. Funds
hereby appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any state
department or agency (81116) .......................................
4,500,000 ........................................... (re. $819,000)
For services, expenses and grants to government entities and not-for-
profits to provide financial assistance to victims and survivors of
domestic violence, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office for the prevention of domestic violence and approved by the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
to state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(47405) ... 5,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,353,000)
For services and expenses of the family violence and women's rights
clinic at the SUNY Buffalo law school (47400) ......................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $22,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic and
gender-based violence, including contracts for the operation of
hotlines for victims of domestic and gender-based violence (47402)
... 1,165,000 ....................................... (re. $513,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District domestic violence
law clinic, the family violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school, and other legal services and programs that
prevent domestic and gender-based violence (47403) .................
170,000 ............................................. (re. $116,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers, including but not
limited to prevention, education and victim services on college
campuses and within their communities in the state. Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence shall administer the program and allocate funds pursuant to
a plan approved by the director of the budget. Such allocation meth-
odology shall be based in part on the following factors: certif-
ication status, number of programs, and regional diversity. Funds
hereby appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any state
department or agency (81116) .......................................
4,500,000 ........................................... (re. $584,000)
For services, expenses and grants to government entities and not-for-
profits to provide financial assistance to victims and survivors of
domestic violence, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the
office for the prevention of domestic violence and approved by the
director of the budget. A portion of these funds may be transferred
to state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
... 5,000,000 ....................................... (re. $624,000)
For services and expenses of the family violence and women's rights
clinic at the SUNY Buffalo law school (47400) ......................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic and
gender-based violence, including contracts for the operation of

1203 12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
hotlines for victims of domestic and gender-based violence (47402)
... 1,165,000 ....................................... (re. $716,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District domestic violence
law clinic, the family violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school, and other legal services and programs that
prevent domestic and gender-based violence (47403) .................
170,000 ............................................. (re. $115,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers, including but not
limited to prevention, education and victim services on college
campuses and within their communities in the state. Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the office for the prevention of domestic
violence shall administer the program and allocate funds pursuant to
a plan approved by the director of the budget. Such allocation meth-
odology shall be based in part on the following factors: certif-
ication status, number of programs, and regional diversity.
Funds hereby appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any
state department or agency (81116) .................................
4,500,000 ........................................... (re. $277,000)
For services and expenses of the family violence and women's rights
clinic at the SUNY Buffalo law school (47400) ......................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Sexual Harassment and Gender Based
Violence Awareness Program. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the temporary president of the senate and the director
of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees
with the amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allo-
cating such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in
a senate resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (47401) ................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic and
gender-based violence, including contracts for the operation of
hotlines for victims of domestic and gender-based violence (47402)
... 1,165,000 ....................................... (re. $363,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District domestic violence
law clinic, the family violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school, and other legal services and programs that
prevent domestic and gender-based violence (47403) .................
170,000 ............................................... (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses of rape crisis centers, including but not
limited to prevention, education and victim services on college
campuses and within their communities in the state. Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary, the Office for the Prevention of Domestic
Violence shall administer the program and allocate funds pursuant to
a plan approved by the director of the budget. Such allocation meth-
odology shall be based in part on the following factors: certif-
ication status, number of programs, and regional diversity. Funds

1204 12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
hereby appropriated may be transferred or suballocated to any state
department or agency (81116) ... 4,500,000 .......... (re. $854,000)
For services and expenses of the family violence and women's rights
clinic at the SUNY Buffalo law school (47400) ......................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $16,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence,
including contracts for the operation of hotlines for victims of
domestic violence (47402) ... 1,115,000 ............. (re. $919,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District domestic violence
law clinic, the family violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school, and other legal services and programs that
prevent domestic violence (47403) ... 170,000 ........ (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of the family violence and women's rights
clinic at the SUNY Buffalo law school (47400) ......................
50,000 ............................................... (re. $16,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of programs that prevent domestic violence,
including contracts for the operation of hotlines for victims of
domestic violence (47402) ... 1,115,000 ............. (re. $863,000)
For services and expenses of the Capital District domestic violence
law clinic, the family violence and women's rights clinic at the
SUNY Buffalo law school, and other legal services and programs that
prevent domestic violence (47403) ... 170,000 ........ (re. $21,000)
For services and expenses of the family violence and women's rights
clinic at the SUNY Buffalo law school (47400) ......................
50,000 ................................................ (re. $5,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Miscellaneous Discretionary Account - 25370
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse federal grants in
support of state and local programs to support domestic violence
prevention programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(81001) ... 1,500,000 ............................. (re. $1,432,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse federal grants in
support of state and local programs to support domestic violence
prevention programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to
state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(81001) ... 1,000,000 ............................... (re. $836,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse federal grants in
support of state and local programs to support domestic violence
prevention programs. A portion of these funds may be transferred to

1205 12653-09-6
OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state operations and may be suballocated to other state agencies
(81001) ... 1,000,000 ............................... (re. $566,000)

1206 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 33,000,000 48,500,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 5,750,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 38,750,000 48,500,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
REGULATION OF UTILITIES PROGRAM .............................. 5,750,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Article VII Intervenor Account - 21901
For services and expenses of any munici-
pality or other local parties pursuant to
section 122 of the public service law
(48603) ...................................... 3,250,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 3,250,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Article X Intervenor Account - 22203
For services and expenses of any munici-
pality or other local parties pursuant to
section 164 of the public service law
(48602) ...................................... 2,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,500,000
--------------
EXCELSIOR POWER PROGRAM ..................................... 33,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the Excelsior
Power Program, including but not limited
to providing eligible and participating
utility customers utility bill credits,
pursuant to section 67-b of the public
service law. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, amounts

1207 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
appropriated herein may be disbursed to
utilities, including the Long Island Power
Authority, for the purpose of providing
credits or benefits to eligible utility
customers. A portion of this appropriation
may be transferred to state operations to
support the administration, implementa-
tion, and evaluation of the Excelsior
Power Program ............................... 33,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 33,000,000
--------------

1208 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ENERGY AFFORDABILITY PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
To provide an energy affordability guarantee to participating low-in-
come residential customers in the EmPower Plus Program administered
by the New York State Energy Research and Development Authority who
electrify their homes in accordance with program standards required
by the authority. The energy affordability guarantee shall provide
that any participating residential customer in the EmPower Plus
Program shall spend no more than six percent of household income on
electric utility bills for the estimated useful life of the related
electrification project. The energy affordability guarantee is to
remain with the residence that participated in the EmPower Plus
Program and can transfer between tenants or owners through the elec-
tric corporation's application for service, provided however that
the benefits of this program can only be transferred to eligible new
tenants or owners. For the purpose of the energy affordability guar-
antee the Public Service Commission is authorized to establish a cap
on a participating residential customer's annual total electric
usage by kilowatt hour applicable to the guarantee when establishing
such program. Amounts appropriated herein may be disbursed to the
utilities, including the Long Island Power Authority, on behalf of
eligible electric residential utility customers who participate in
the EmPower Plus Program. No more than three percent of the amount
appropriated herein may be transferred to state operations to
support the proper administration, implementation and evaluation of
the energy affordability guarantee. A portion of these funds may be
transferred or suballocated to any other state agency, department,
public authority or public benefit corporation (48609) .............
[50,000,000]48,500,000 ........................... (re. $48,500,000)

1209 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 184,060,000 340,845,500
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 219,700,000 434,367,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 1,500,000 4,500,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 405,260,000 779,712,500
================ ================
SCHEDULE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM ............ 226,277,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to the
administration of the Public Utility Law
Project for the purpose of delivering
civil legal services to the poor. All or
a portion of the funds may be suballocated
or transferred to the New York State Ener-
gy Research and Development Authority or
any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appro-
priation ..................................... 1,375,000
For additional services and expenses related
to the administration of the Public Utili-
ty Law Project for the purpose of deliver-
ing civil legal services to the poor. All
or a portion of the funds may be suballo-
cated or transferred to the New York State
Energy Research and Development Authority
or any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appro-
priation Public Utility Law Project .......... 1,375,000
For services and expenses of the NY Legal
Assistance Group Incorporated ................... 75,000
For services and expenses of the NYS Immi-
gration Coalition ............................ 2,000,000
For services and expenses of BronxNet ............ 200,000
For services and expenses of the Caribbean
Preparedness & Response ........................ 200,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Caribbean Preparedness & Response ............... 50,000
For services and expenses of the Capitol
District Management Association, Inc.
(161 Street Bid) ............................... 150,000

1210 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Haitian
Roundtable ..................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the HASTE Help
Africa Save Their Childrenà ..................... 60,000
For services and expenses of the Doe Fund,
Inc ............................................ 342,000
For services and expenses of Riseboro Commu-
nity Partnership ............................... 150,000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, for services and expenses includ-
ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1,
2026 of the public utility law project.
Funds appropriated herein reflect funds
originally appropriated to the department
of state by chapter 53 of the laws of 2023
and suballocated to the New York state
energy research and development authority ...... 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 6,577,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25127
For allocations from the community services
block grant to community action agencies
and other eligible entities, including
suballocation to other state departments
and agencies provided however, each recip-
ient of funds from this appropriation
shall not be required to secure a local
share equivalent (51019) ................... 125,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 125,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
AmeriCorps Program Account - 25449
For services and expenses associated with
grant programs to support poverty
reduction and prevention initiatives and
related activities (51273) ................... 2,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,500,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund

1211 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Appalachian Technical Assistance Account - 25382
For services and expenses of the appalachian
regional grants program. The funds appro-
priated herein may be transferred to state
operations (51023) ........................... 1,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Coastal Zone Management Program Account - 25449
For services and expenses of the coastal
zone management program (51034) .............. 2,200,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,200,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Coastal Zone Management Program Account - 25449
For services and expenses of the coastal
program. The funds appropriated herein may
be transferred to state operations. A
portion of the funds may be suballocated
or transferred to any other department,
agency or public authority for the
purposes of such appropriation (51253) ...... 85,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 85,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Local Government Federal Programs Account - 25449
For services and expenses of the local
government federal program. The amounts
appropriated herein may be transferred to
state operations (51037) ..................... 4,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 4,000,000
--------------
OFFICE OF FAITH AND NON-PROFIT DEVELOPMENT SERVICES .......... 3,500,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

1212 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any provisions to the
contrary contained in section 163 and
section 112 of the state finance law or
any other law, funding from this appropri-
ation shall be made available for services
and expenses associated with program
administration, projects and purposes
authorized below, including the payment of
liabilities incurred prior to April 1,
2026. All or a portion of the funds appro-
priated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency,
public authority, or transferred to state
operations for the following:
For services and expenses related to grants
awarded by the office of faith and nonpro-
fit development services (51259) ............. 3,500,000
--------------
OFFICE FOR NEW AMERICANS .................................... 83,983,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any provisions to the
contrary contained in section 163 and
section 112 of the State finance law or
any other law, funding from this appropri-
ation shall be made available for services
and expenses associated with program
administration, projects and purposes
authorized below, including the payment of
liabilities incurred prior to April 1,
2026. All or a portion of the funds appro-
priated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency,
public authority, or transferred to state
operations for the following:
For services and expenses related to
programs which assist non-citizens. Such
services shall include, but not be limited
to, case management, English-as-a-second-
language, job training and placement
assistance, post-employment services
necessary to ensure job retention,
services necessary to assist the individ-
ual and family members to establish and
maintain a permanent residence in New York
state, legal services, case management and
retraining programs for immigrant
engineers(51047) ............................ 64,200,000

1213 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, for services and expenses associ-
ated with the costs of migrant individuals
and families entering New York State,
including but not limited to legal and
ancillary services. Funds appropriated
herein reflect an apportionment of funds
to the department of state originally
appropriated to the office of temporary
and disability assistance by chapter 53 of
the laws of 2024 as amended by chapter 53
of the laws of 2025 .......................... 7,868,000
For services and expenses of the Alex R.
Jimenez New York state military immigrant
legacy program. (54824) ........................ 415,000
For additional services and expenses related
to programs which assist non-citizens.
Such services shall include, but not be
limited to, case management, English-as-a-
second-language, job training and place-
ment assistance, post-employment services
necessary to ensure job retention,
services necessary to assist the individ-
ual and family members to establish and
maintain a permanent residence in New York
state, legal services, case management and
retraining programs for immigrant engi-
neers ....................................... 10,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 82,483,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Office for New Americans Account - 22258
For services and expenses of bequests,
grants, gifts or other contributions to
the office for new Americans. These funds
may be transferred to state operations
(51326) ...................................... 1,500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,500,000
--------------
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES AND CIVIC ENGAGEMENT PROGRAM ........ 90,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

1214 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Pursuant to the following sub-schedule, and
notwithstanding any provisions to the
contrary contained in section 163 and
section 112 of the state finance law or
any other law, funding from this appropri-
ation shall be made available for services
and expenses of the following community
nonprofit organizations and civic organ-
izations, for purposes including but not
limited to, supporting community based
programming, census-related activities,
crisis intervention initiatives, housing
assistance, economic development, work-
force training, educational initiatives
and healthcare services in underserved
communities ................................. 90,000,000
sub-schedule
Asian American Federation ....... 15,000,000
Coalition for Asian American
Children and Families ......... 15,000,000
New York Urban League ............ 5,000,000
United Way of New York State .... 10,000,000
Federation of Protestant
Welfare Agencies .............. 10,000,000
Elmcor Youth & Adult Activ-
ities Inc. ..................... 5,000,000
Catholic Charities Community
Services of the Archdiocese
of New York .................... 7,500,000
Fund for the City of New York .... 7,500,000
Hispanic Federation ............. 15,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .... 90,000,000
--------------

1215 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses related to the administration of the Public
Utility Law Project for the purpose of delivering civil legal
services to the poor. All or a portion of the funds may be suballo-
cated or transferred to the New York State Energy Research and
Development Authority or any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appropriation (51025) ...........
1,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,250,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the administration of
the Public Utility Law Project for the purpose of delivering civil
legal services to the poor. All or a portion of the funds may be
suballocated or transferred to the New York State Energy Research
and Development Authority or any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appropriation (51279) ...........
1,250,000 ......................................... (re. $1,250,000)
For services and expenses of the NYS Immigration Coalition (51276) ...
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For services and expenses of the NY Legal Assistance Group Incorpo-
rated (51293) ... 75,000 ............................. (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of ACE NY (51268) ..........................
342,000 ............................................. (re. $342,000)
For services and expenses of [H.A.S.T.E Help Africa Save Their Chil-
dren] HASTE Helps Inc. (Help Africa Save Their Children) (51269) ...
60,000 ............................................... (re. $60,000)
For services and expenses related to Caribbean Preparedness &
Response, Inc. (51252) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses related to the [Capital] Capitol District
Management Association, Inc. (161 street bid) (64000) .............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For the services and expenses of BronxNet (64002) ....................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Haitian Round Table (51267) .........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses related to the administration of the Public
Utility Law Project for the purpose of delivering civil legal
services to the poor. All or a portion of the funds may be suballo-
cated or transferred to the New York State Energy Research and
Development Authority or any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appropriation (51025) ...........
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the administration of
the Public Utility Law Project for the purpose of delivering civil
legal services to the poor. All or a portion of the funds may be

1216 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
suballocated or transferred to the New York State Energy Research
and Development Authority or any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appropriation (51279) ...........
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For grants in aid to certain municipalities and not-for-profit insti-
tutions. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
speaker of the assembly and the director of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call vote (51329) .............................
6,050,000 ......................................... (re. $6,050,000)
For services and expenses of the Haitian Round Table (51267) .........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of ACE NY (51268) ..........................
342,000 ............................................. (re. $342,000)
For services and expenses of the NYS Immigration Coalition (51276) ...
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
For services and expenses of the Doe Fund, Inc (51277) ...............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of [H.A.S.T.E Help Africa Save Their Chil-
dren] HASTE Helps Inc. (Help Africa Save Their Children) (51269) ...
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the NY Legal Assistance Group Incorpo-
rated (51293) ... 75,000 ............................. (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses related to Caribbean Preparedness &
Response, Inc. (51252) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses related to the [Capital] Capitol District
Management Association, Inc. (64000) ... 150,000 ... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, including program adminis-
tration costs, for the New York State Commission on African American
History, including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to
April 1, 2024. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may
be suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes stated herein (51260) ...................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, including program adminis-
tration costs related to the New York statewide investment in more
swimming initiative, including but not limited to the reimbursement
of municipalities for expenses related to lifeguard bonuses, certif-
ication costs, or expansions of operating hours, including the
payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. All or a
portion of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein (51261) .....................................
5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $5,000,000)

1217 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of Rockland County (51327) .................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of the Doe Fund, Inc. (51277) ..............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses related to Caribbean Preparedness and
Response, Inc. (51252) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $200,000)
For grants in aid to certain municipalities and not-for-profit insti-
tutions. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
speaker of the assembly and the director of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call vote (51329) .............................
3,700,000 ......................................... (re. $2,277,000)
For services and expenses of the NYS Immigration Coalition (51276) ...
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $739,000)
For services and expenses for Westchester Opportunity Centers (51250)
... 224,000 ......................................... (re. $224,000)
For services and expenses of Rockefeller Institute of Government for
municipal studies (51251) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the NY Legal Assistance Group Incorpo-
rated (51293) ... 75,000 ............................. (re. $56,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Funds appropriated herein shall be for services, expenses, grants, and
costs of administration related to the hurricane ida assistance
program for undocumented New Yorkers. For the purpose of providing
expedited relief to undocumented storm survivors who are
uninsured/underinsured and ineligible to receive federal emergency
assistance.
The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated to other state
agencies or accounts for expenditures incurred in the operation of
programs funded by such appropriation subject to the approval of the
director of the budget (51049) ... 25,000,000 .... (re. $23,908,000)
For services and expenses of the Doe Fund, Inc. (51277) ..............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the NY Legal Assistance Group Incorpo-
rated (51293) ... 75,000 ............................. (re. $75,000)
For grants in aid to certain municipalities and not-for-profit insti-
tutions. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any
provision of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the
speaker of the assembly and the director of the budget which sets
forth either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropri-
ation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an assembly resol-

1218 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
assembly upon a roll call vote (51329) .............................
790,000 ............................................. (re. $446,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the Doe Fund, Inc. (51277) ..............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Arab American Association of New York
(51296) ... 15,000 ................................... (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of the Catholic Charities of Orange, Sulli-
van, and Ulster (51289) ... 20,000 ................... (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of the Empire Justice Center (51292) .......
54,000 ............................................... (re. $54,000)
For services and expenses of the Levittown VFW (51298) ...............
55,000 ............................................... (re. $55,000)
For services and expenses of the Catholic Charities Community Services
Archdiocese of New York (51291) ....................................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Immigrant Families Together (51287) .....
95,000 ............................................... (re. $95,000)
For services and expenses of NY Legal Assistance Group Incorporated
(51293) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of the NYS Immigration Coalition (51276) ...
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of a local code enforcement program (51299)
... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses related to the administration of the Public
Utility Law Project for the purpose of delivering civil legal
services to the poor. All or a portion of the funds may be suballo-
cated or transferred to the New York State Energy Research and
Development Authority or any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appropriation (51025) ...........
450,000 ............................................. (re. $450,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Immigration Coalition
(51276) ... 75,000 .................................... (re. $2,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of Immigrant Families Together (51287) .....
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For additional services and expenses related to the administration of
the Public Utility Law Project for the purpose of delivering civil
legal services to the poor. All or a portion of the funds may be
suballocated or transferred to the New York State Energy Research
and Development Authority or any other department, agency, or public
authority for the purposes of such appropriation (51279) ...........
450,000 ............................................. (re. $450,000)
For services and expenses of Mobilization for Justice Inc. (51288) ...
16,500 ............................................... (re. $16,500)

1219 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Catholic Charities of Orange, Sullivan,
and Ulster (51289) ... 20,000 ........................ (re. $20,000)
For services and expenses of Catholic Charities Community Services
Archdiocese of New York (51291) ... 75,000 ........... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Empire Justice Center (51292) ...........
52,251 ............................................... (re. $52,000)
For services and expenses of New York Legal Assistance Group Incorpo-
rated (51293) ... 75,000 ............................. (re. $75,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of the Doe Fund, Inc (51277) ...............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Immigration Coalition
(51276) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $ 2,000)
For services and expenses of a Student Loan Consumer Assistance
Program. Funds shall be allocated from this appropriation pursuant
to a plan prepared by the temporary president of the Senate and
approved by the Director of the Budget (51281) .....................
250,000 ............................................... (re. $2,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25127
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent (51019) ............................
125,000,000 ..................................... (re. $125,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent (51019) ............................
125,000,000 ...................................... (re. $84,697,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent (51019) ............................
125,000,000 ...................................... (re. $62,680,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each

1220 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent (51019) ............................
125,000,000 ...................................... (re. $62,839,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent (51019) ............................
125,000,000 ...................................... (re. $27,279,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent (51019) ............................
104,500,000 ....................................... (re. $3,296,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent (51019) ............................
65,200,000 ........................................ (re. $3,989,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent as required by section 159-j of the
executive law (51019) ... 65,200,000 .............. (re. $5,581,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For allocations from the community services block grant to community
action agencies and other eligible entities, including suballocation
to other state departments and agencies provided however, each
recipient of funds from this appropriation shall not be required to
secure a local share equivalent as required by section 159-j of the
executive law (51019) ... 65,200,000 .............. (re. $6,373,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
AmeriCorps Program Account - 25449
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

1221 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses associated with grant programs to support
poverty reduction and prevention initiatives and related activities
(51273) ... 2,500,000 ............................. (re. $2,500,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Coastal Zone Management Program Account - 25449
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:

1222 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For services and expenses of the coastal zone management program
(51034) ... 2,200,000 ............................. (re. $2,200,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Local Government Federal Programs Account - 25449
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the local government federal program. The
amounts appropriated herein may be transferred to state operations
(51037) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the local government federal program. The
amounts appropriated herein may be transferred to state operations
(51037) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the local government federal program. The
amounts appropriated herein may be transferred to state operations
(51037) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,437,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the local government federal program. The
amounts appropriated herein may be transferred to state operations
(51037) ... 2,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,396,000)
OFFICE OF FAITH AND NON-PROFIT DEVELOPMENT SERVICES

1223 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and
expenses associated with program administration, projects and
purposes authorized below, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2025. All or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, public authority, or transferred to state oper-
ations for the following:
For services and expenses related to grants awarded by the office of
faith and non-profit development services (51259) ..................
3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and
expenses associated with program administration, projects and
purposes authorized below, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2024. All or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, public authority, or transferred to state oper-
ations for the following:
For services and expenses related to grants awarded by the office of
faith and non-profit development services (51259) ..................
3,500,000 ......................................... (re. $3,015,000)
OFFICE FOR NEW AMERICANS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as
transferred to the department of state, is hereby amended and reap-
propriated to read:
For services and expenses of the Alex R. Jimenez New York state mili-
tary immigrant legacy program. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, funds hereby appropriated may be transferred to
state operations and/or suballocated to any appropriation of the
department of state (54824) ... 525,000 ............. (re. $525,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in section
163 and section 112 of the State finance law or any other law, fund-
ing from this appropriation shall be made available for services and
expenses associated with program administration, projects and
purposes authorized below, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2025. All or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, public authority, or transferred to state oper-
ations for the following:

1224 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses related to programs which assist non-citiz-
ens. Such services shall include, but not be limited to, case
management, English-as-a-second-language, job training and placement
assistance, post-employment services necessary to ensure job
retention, services necessary to assist the individual and family
members to establish and maintain a permanent residence in New York
state, legal services, case management and retraining programs for
immigrant engineers (51047) ... 44,200,000 ....... (re. $42,171,000)
For additional expenses and services related to programs which assist
noncitizens. Such services shall be limited to, legal services, case
management, English-as-a-second-language, job training and placement
assistance, and postemployment services necessary to ensure job
retention (51270) ... 20,000,000 ................. (re. $15,622,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in section
163 and section 112 of the State finance law or any other law, fund-
ing from this appropriation shall be made available for services and
expenses associated with program administration, projects and
purposes authorized below, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2024. All or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, public authority, or transferred to state oper-
ations for the following:
For additional expenses and services related to programs which assist
non-citizens. Such services shall be limited to, legal services,
case management, English-as-a-second-language, job training and
placement assistance, and post-employment services necessary to
ensure job retention (51270) ... 20,000,000 ...... (re. $10,640,000)
For services and expenses of Asian American Pacific Islander crisis
intervention initiatives, and community based programs combatting
biased crimes (51330) ... 30,000,000 ............. (re. $24,445,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as
supplemented by a transfer in accordance with the state finance law,
is hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses related to programs which assist non-citiz-
ens. Such services shall include, but not be limited to, case
management, English-as-a-second-language, job training and placement
assistance, post-employment services necessary to ensure job
retention, services necessary to assist the individual and family
members to establish and maintain a permanent residence in New York
state, legal services, case management and retraining programs for
immigrant engineers (51047) ........................................
[44,200,000]64,200,000 ........................... (re. $37,402,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, for services and
expenses associated with program administration, projects and
purposes authorized below, including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2023. All or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any

1225 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
department, agency, public authority, or transferred to state oper-
ations for the following:
For services and expenses related to programs which assist non-citiz-
ens. Such services shall include, but not be limited to, case
management, English-as-a-second-language, job training and placement
assistance, post-employment services necessary to ensure job
retention, services necessary to assist the individual and family
members to establish and maintain a permanent residence in New York
state, legal services, case management, and retraining programs for
immigrant engineers provided by The Cooper Union for the Advancement
of Science and Art (51047) .........................................
43,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,994,000)
For additional expenses and services related to programs which assist
non-citizens. Such services shall be limited to, legal services,
case management, English-as-a-second-language, job training and
placement assistance, and post-employment services necessary to
ensure job retention (51270) ... 20,000,000 ....... (re. $7,948,000)
Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in section
163 and section 112 of the state finance law or in any other law,
funding from this appropriation shall be made available for services
and expenses of Asian American Pacific Islander crisis intervention
initiatives, and community based programs combatting biased crimes
(51330) ... 30,000,000 ........................... (re. $12,546,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses related to programs which assist non-citiz-
ens in their attainment of citizenship, including suballocation or
transfer to any department, agency or public authority. Such
services shall include, but not be limited to, case management,
English-as-a-second-language, job training and placement assistance,
post-employment services necessary to ensure job retention, and
services necessary to assist the individual and family members to
establish and maintain a permanent residence in New York state
(51047) ... 8,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,751,000)
For additional expenses and services related to programs which assist
non-citizens, including suballocation or transfer to any department,
agency or public authority. Such services shall be limited to, legal
services, case management, English-as-a-second-language, job train-
ing and placement assistance, and post-employment services necessary
to ensure job retention. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds made available from this appropriation shall be
subject to a plan approved by the director of the division of the
budget and such plan may reduce or limit the amount of funds made
available from this appropriation to address any imbalance in the
general fund (51270) ... 12,000,000 ............... (re. $4,671,000)
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in section 163
and section 112 of the state finance law or in any other law, fund-
ing from this appropriation shall be made available for services and
expenses of community based programs combatting biased crimes
(51325) ... 10,000,000 .............................. (re. $590,000)
Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in section
163 and section 112 of the state finance law or in any other law,

1226 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
funding from this appropriation shall be made available for services
and expenses of Asian American Pacific Islander crisis intervention
(51330) ... 10,000,000 ............................ (re. $6,232,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses related to programs which assist non-citiz-
ens in their attainment of citizenship, including suballocation or
transfer to any department, agency or public authority. Such
services shall include, but not be limited to, case management,
English-as-a-second-language, job training and placement assistance,
post-employment services necessary to ensure job retention, and
services necessary to assist the individual and family members to
establish and maintain a permanent residence in New York state
(51047) ... 6,440,000 ................................ (re. $19,000)
For additional expenses and services related to programs which assist
non-citizens, including suballocation or transfer to any department,
agency or public authority. Such services shall be limited to, legal
services, case management, English-as-a-second-language, job train-
ing and placement assistance, and post-employment services necessary
to ensure job retention. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds made available from this appropriation shall be
subject to a plan approved by the director of the division of the
budget and such plan may reduce or limit the amount of funds made
available from this appropriation to address any imbalance in the
general fund (51270) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $927,000)
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in section 163
and section 112 of state finance law or in any other law, funding
from this appropriation shall be made available for services and
expenses of community based programs combatting biased crimes
(51325) ... 10,000,000 ............................ (re. $1,328,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For additional expenses and services related to programs, which
assist, non-citizens, including sub allocation or transfer to any
department, agency or public authority. Such services shall be
limited to, legal services, case management, English-as-a-second-
language, job training and placement assistance, and post-employment
services necessary to ensure job retention. Notwithstanding any
provision of law, this appropriation shall be allocated only pursu-
ant to a plan submitted by the temporary president of the senate,
setting forth an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for allocation for such appro-
priation. Such plan and the grantees listed therein shall be subject
to the approval of the director of the budget and thereafter shall
be included in a resolution calling for the expenditure of such
monies, which resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll call vote (51282) ........
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $617,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
Office for New Americans Account

1227 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of bequests, grants, gifts or other contrib-
utions to the office for new Americans. These funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations (51326) .................................
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of bequests, grants, gifts or other contrib-
utions to the office for new Americans. These funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations (51326) .................................
1,500,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of bequests, grants, gifts or other contrib-
utions to the office for new Americans. These funds may be trans-
ferred to state operations (51326) ... 1,500,000 .. (re. $1,500,000)
UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES AND CIVIC ENGAGEMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, as amended by chapter
172, section 5, of the laws of 2025:
Pursuant to the following sub-schedule, and notwithstanding any
provisions to the contrary contained in section 163 and section 112
of the state finance law or any other law, funding from this appro-
priation shall be made available for services and expenses of the
following community nonprofit organizations and civic organizations,
for purposes including but not limited to, supporting community
based programming, crisis intervention initiatives, housing assist-
ance, economic development, workforce training, educational initi-
atives and healthcare services in underserved communities (64004)
... 90,000,000 ................................... (re. $90,000,000)
sub-schedule
Asian American Federation ....... 15,000,000
Coalition for Asian American
Children and Families ......... 15,000,000
New York Urban League ............ 8,000,000
United Way of New York State ..... 8,000,000
Local Initiatives Support
Corporation .................... 8,000,000
Federation of Protestant
Welfare Agencies ............... 3,000,000
Elmcor Youth & Adult Activ-
ities Inc. ..................... 3,000,000
Catholic Charities Community
Services of the Archdiocese
of New York .................... 7,500,000

1228 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF STATE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Fund for the City of New York .... 7,500,000
Hispanic Federation ............. 15,000,000
--------------
Total of sub-schedule ......... 90,000,000
--------------

1229 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ......................... 508,223,000 367,599,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 508,223,000 367,599,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
GENERAL FUND COMMUNITY COLLEGE OPERATING ASSISTANCE ........ 467,340,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding subdivision 15 of section
355 of the education law, for state finan-
cial assistance, net of disallowances, for
operating expenses, including funds
required to reimburse base aid costs for
the 2025-26 and 2026-27 academic years,
pursuant to regulations developed jointly
with the city university trustees and
approved by the director of the budget,
and subject to the availability of appro-
priations therefor; provided that no
community college shall receive less than
100 percent of the base aid funding that
it had received in the college fiscal year
2025-26.
Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or
regulation to the contrary, full funding
for aidable community college enrollment
for the college fiscal years 2026-27 and
heretofore as provided under this appro-
priation shall be determined by the oper-
ating aid formulas defined in rules and
regulations developed jointly by the
boards of trustees of the state and city
universities and approved by the director
of the budget, provided that local spon-
sors may use funds contained in reserves
for excess student revenue for operating
support of a community college program
even though said expenditures may cause
expenses and student revenues to exceed
one-third of the college's net operating
costs for the college fiscal year 2026-27,
provided that such funds do not cause the
college's revenues from the local spon-

1230 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
sor's contributions in aggregate to be
less than the comparable amounts for the
previous community college fiscal year,
and further provided that pursuant to
standards and regulations of the state
university trustees and the city universi-
ty trustees for the college fiscal year
2026-27, community colleges may increase
tuition and fees above the amount allow-
able under the education law if such stan-
dards and regulations require that in
order to exceed the tuition limit other-
wise set forth in the education law, local
sponsor contributions either in the aggre-
gate or for each fulltime equivalent
student shall be no less than the compara-
ble amounts for the previous community
college fiscal year (50958) ................ 417,250,000
For additional operating services and
expenses of community colleges pursuant to
a plan approved by the director of the
budget (50823) .............................. 16,000,000
For further additional operating services
and expenses of community colleges pursu-
ant to a plan approved by the director of
the budget ................................... 9,000,000
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, next generation job linkage
funds shall be made available to community
colleges based on a workforce development
plan submitted by the state university of
New York for approval by the director of
the budget (50400) ........................... 3,000,000
For payment of rental aid (50957) ............. 11,579,000
For state financial assistance for community
college contract courses and workforce
development (50956) .......................... 1,880,000
For state financial assistance to expand
high-need programs (50955) ................... 1,692,000
For services and expenses related to the
establishment, renovation, alteration,
expansion, improvement or operation of
child care centers for the benefit of
students at the community college campuses
of the state university of New York,
provided that matching funds of at least
35 percent from nonstate sources be made
available (50954) ............................ 2,099,000
For state operating assistance to community
colleges with low enrollment (50953) ........... 940,000
For services and expenses of the apprentice
SUNY program to support SUNY community

1231 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
colleges in establishing and developing
registered apprenticeship programs with
area businesses, which may include educa-
tional opportunity centers (50910) ........... 3,000,000
For services and expenses of the Orange
county community college bridges program
(50438) ........................................ 100,000
For services and expenses of the Orange
county community college simulation lab
(50896) ......................................... 50,000
For services and expenses of the Institute
for Advanced Manufacturing at Clinton
Community College .............................. 250,000
For services and expenses of the Dutchess
community college initiative to alleviate
housing and food insecurity for students ....... 300,000
For services and expenses of the SUNY Sche-
nectady community college initiative to
alleviate housing and food insecurity for
students ....................................... 200,000
--------------
Total for community colleges - all funds ... 467,340,000
--------------
NEW YORK OPPORTUNITY PROMISE SCHOLARSHIP .................... 34,763,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the New York
opportunity promise scholarship program,
including costs incurred prior to April 1,
2026, pursuant to a plan approved by the
director of the budget, provided that the
funds appropriated herein may be expended
on student awards, advising and other
student support, operating costs,
outreach, marketing, and administration;
provided further that student awards under
this program shall be calculated on a per
term basis prior to the start of each term
the applicant is successfully enrolled and
shall not exceed the positive difference,
if any, of (i) the sum of actual tuition,
fees, books, and applicable supplies
charged to the applicant and approved by
the applicable community college, less
(ii) the sum of all payments received by
the applicant from all sources of finan-
cial aid received by the applicant with
the exception of aid received pursuant to

1232 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
federal work-study programs authorized
under sections 1087-51 through 1087-58 of
title 20 of the United States code and
educational loans taken by the applicant
or guardian.
Provided further that an eligible student
shall meet the following conditions: (a)
be at least 25 years of age, but in no
case more than 55 years of age, as of
January 1 of the calendar year for the
semester for which the applicant makes
initial application; (b) have applied for
a New York state tuition assistance
program award pursuant to section 667 of
the education law, a federal Pell grant
pursuant to section 1070 of title 20 of
the United States code, et. seq., and any
other applicable financial aid; (c) be
matriculated at a community college within
the state university of New York in an
approved program directly leading to an
associate's degree in a high-demand field
including but not limited to advanced
manufacturing, technology, cybersecurity,
engineering, artificial intelligence,
nursing and allied health professions,
green and renewable energy, and pathways
to teaching in shortage areas; (d) be
eligible for the payment of tuition and
fees at a rate no greater than that
imposed for resident students in community
colleges; (e) complete at least 6 credits
per semester, for a total of at least 12
credits per academic year, in an approved
program of study; (f) have been contin-
uously enrolled without a gap of more than
one academic year, provided, however, that
such duration may be extended for an
allowable interruption of study including,
but not limited to, death of a family
member, medical leave, military service,
and parental leave; (g) continue to make
satisfactory academic progress; and (h)
have not already obtained any postsecon-
dary degree prior, unless that student is
pursuing an associate's degree in nursing.
Provided further that eligible students
include a student who is already enrolled
in an eligible associate degree program
and meets all other requirements.
Provided further that by September 1, 2027,
the chancellor of the state university of

1233 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
New York shall submit a report on the
program to the governor, the speaker of
the assembly, and the temporary president
of the senate, including but not limited
to the following information: (i) enroll-
ment by full- and part-time status; (ii)
retention and completion rates by full-
and part-time status; (iii) barriers to
student participation; (iv) demographic
data related to the program; (v) average
prior learning and transfer credit
awarded; (vi) the total amount of funds
awarded and the average award per student;
and (vii) post-completion outcomes includ-
ing transfer, employment, and wages, as
applicable. Provided further that partic-
ipating campuses shall take steps consist-
ent with established policy to maximize
the award of credit for prior learning and
the transferability of earned credit for
participating students.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, subject to the approval of the
director of the budget, a portion of the
funds appropriated herein and designated
for uses other than student awards may be
transferred to any state university of New
York special revenue fund to accomplish
the purpose of this appropriation (15559) ... 34,575,000
For services and expenses of the reconnect
for foster scholars program .................... 188,000
--------------
COUNTY COOPERATIVE EXTENSION ASSOCIATION GRANT PROGRAM
ADMINISTERED BY CORNELL UNIVERSITY ......................... 6,120,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For the support of county cooperative exten-
sion associations pursuant to paragraph
(d) of subdivision (8) of section 224 of
the county law (50952) ....................... 4,420,000
For additional services and expenses of the
county cooperative extension associations,
provided that $500,000 shall be provided
for services and expenses of the New York
City office of Cornell Cooperative Exten-
sion ......................................... 1,700,000
--------------

1234 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
COMMUNITY COLLEGE OPERATING ASSISTANCE
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, next generation
job linkage funds shall be made available to community colleges
based on a workforce development plan submitted by the state univer-
sity of New York for approval by the director of the budget (50400)
... 3,000,000 ..................................... (re. $3,000,000)
For state financial assistance for community college contract courses
and workforce development (50956) ..................................
1,880,000 ......................................... (re. $1,880,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For state financial assistance for community college contract courses
and workforce development (50956) ... 1,880,000 ..... (re. $718,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For state financial assistance for community college contract courses
and workforce development (50956) ... 1,880,000 ... (re. $1,182,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to the establishment of child care
centers at additional campuses and/or the expansion of existing
on-campus child care centers to serve additional children (50899)
... 5,400,000 ..................................... (re. $2,580,000)
NEW YORK OPPORTUNITY PROMISE SCHOLARSHIP
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the New York opportunity promise scholar-
ship program for the 2025-26 academic year pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget, provided that the funds
appropriated herein may be expended on student awards, advising and
other student support, operating costs, outreach, marketing, and
administration; provided further that student awards under this
program shall be calculated on a per term basis prior to the start
of each term the applicant is successfully enrolled and shall not
exceed the positive difference, if any, of (i) the sum of actual
tuition, fees, books, and applicable supplies charged to the appli-
cant and approved by the applicable community college, less (ii) the
sum of all payments received by the applicant from all sources of
financial aid received by the applicant with the exception of aid
received pursuant to federal work-study programs authorized under
sections 1087-51 through 1087-58 of title 20 of the United States
code and educational loans taken by the applicant or guardian.

1235 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Provided further that an eligible student shall meet the following
conditions: (a) be at least 25 years of age, but in no case more
than 55 years of age, as of January 1 of the calendar year for the
semester for which the applicant makes initial application; (b) have
applied for a New York state tuition assistance program award pursu-
ant to section 667 of the education law, a federal Pell grant pursu-
ant to section 1070 of title 20 of the United States code, et.
seq., and any other applicable financial aid; (c) be matriculated at
a community college within the state university of New York in an
approved program directly leading to an associate's degree in a
high-demand field including but not limited to advanced manufactur-
ing, technology, cybersecurity, engineering, artificial intelli-
gence, nursing and allied health professions, green and renewable
energy, and pathways to teaching in shortage areas; (d) be eligible
for the payment of tuition and fees at a rate no greater than that
imposed for resident students in community colleges; (e) complete at
least 6 credits per semester, for a total of at least 12 credits per
academic year, in an approved program of study; (f) have been
continuously enrolled without a gap of more than one academic year,
provided, however, that such duration may be extended for an allow-
able interruption of study including, but not limited to, death of a
family member, medical leave, military service, and parental leave;
(g) continue to make satisfactory academic progress; and (h) have
not already obtained any postsecondary degree prior. Provided
further that eligible students include a student who is already
enrolled in an eligible associate degree program and meets all other
requirements.
Provided further that by September 1, 2026, the chancellor of the
state university of New York shall submit a report on the program to
the governor, the speaker of the assembly, and the temporary presi-
dent of the senate, including but not limited to the following
information: (i) enrollment by full-and part-time status; (ii)
retention and completion rates by full-and part-time status; (iii)
barriers to student participation; (iv) demographic data related to
the program; (v) average prior learning and transfer credit awarded;
(vi) the total amount of funds awarded and the average award per
student; and (vii) post-completion outcomes including transfer,
employment, and wages, as applicable. Provided further that partic-
ipating campuses shall take steps consistent with established policy
to maximize the award of credit for prior learning and the transfer-
ability of earned credit for participating students.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, subject to the
approval of the director of the budget, a portion of the funds
appropriated herein and designated for uses other than student
awards may be transferred to any state university of New York
special revenue fund to accomplish the purpose of this appropriation
(15559) ... 21,150,000 ........................... (re. $17,170,000)
STATE MATCH FOR ENDOWMENT CONTRIBUTIONS
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

1236 12653-09-6
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For state matching contributions to endowments of the four university
centers of the state university of New York as defined in section
352 of the education law, provided that such matching contributions
shall provide one dollar of state matching funds for every two
dollars of new private donations contributed to the foundation
endowments of the university centers at Albany, Binghamton, Buffalo,
and Stony Brook, not to exceed $500,000,000 in total state matching
contributions; provided that each university center shall be eligi-
ble for state matching contributions of no less than $25,000,000 and
no more than $200,000,000; and provided further that payment of such
matching contributions shall be pursuant to a plan developed by the
state university and approved by the director of the budget, and
such plan at a minimum shall: (i) require annual reporting on the
allocation of state matching contributions and an accounting of
private donations to the university center foundations secured for
state matching contributions; (ii) require use of such matching
contributions to support the employment of faculty members, student
financial aid, grants for research and development, and/or any other
program or function that supports university center operations; and
(iii) align with student needs, programmatic needs, and the diversi-
ty, equity, and inclusion activities of the state university of New
York, and provided further that as a condition of eligibility for
state matching contributions, each foundation shall be required to
have a contract with its respective university center that provides,
at a minimum, the services the foundation will provide to the
university center, with such contract being subject to audit by the
state comptroller to the extent permitted by state finance law
(50851) ... 500,000,000 ......................... (re. $341,069,000)

1237 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 926,000 0
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 7,000,000 0
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 7,926,000 0
================ ================
SCHEDULE
MEDICAL CANNABIS PROGRAM ..................................... 7,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Medical Cannabis Fund
Medical Cannabis County Distribution - 23752
For payment of aid to New York state coun-
ties in which medical cannabis is manufac-
tured, in proportion to the gross sales
occurring in each such county pursuant to
section 89-h of the state finance law, as
certified on a quarterly basis by the
commissioner of taxation and finance.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, New York state counties in which
the medical cannabis was manufactured
shall receive aid in an amount equal to
twenty-two and five-tenths percent of all
moneys required to be deposited in the
medical cannabis trust fund pursuant to
the provisions of section 490 of the tax
law (51302) .................................. 3,500,000
For payment of aid to New York state coun-
ties in which medical cannabis is
dispensed, in proportion to the gross
sales occurring in each such county pursu-
ant to section 89-h of the state finance
law, as certified on a quarterly basis by
the commissioner of taxation and finance.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, New York state counties in which
the medical cannabis was dispensed and
allocated shall receive aid in an amount
equal to twenty-two and five-tenths
percent of all moneys required to be
deposited in the medical cannabis trust
fund pursuant to the provisions of section
490 of the tax law (51305) ................... 3,500,000
--------------

1238 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
REVENUE ANALYSIS, COLLECTION, ENFORCEMENT, PROCESSING, AND
REAL PROPERTY TAX PROGRAM .................................... 926,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For state financial assistance for improve-
ment of the real property tax adminis-
tration pursuant to a plan submitted by
the department of taxation and finance and
approved by the division of the budget.
Such financial assistance shall include up
to $750,000 pursuant to sections 1537 and
1573 of the real property tax law,
provided that the aid authorized by subdi-
visions 1 and 2 of section 1573 of the
real property tax law shall only be paya-
ble to assessing units conducting a reap-
praisal that have not received aid pursu-
ant to this section in the previous two
years; and up to $176,000 for reimburse-
ment for training of assessors and county
directors of real property tax services
pursuant to sections 318, 354 and 1530 of
the real property tax law (51313) .............. 926,000
--------------

1239 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 325,371,300 40,401,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 117,300,000 835,299,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 5,486,038,923 106,258,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 5,928,710,223 981,958,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADDITIONAL MASS TRANSPORTATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM .......... 249,490,500
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the following appropriations are
for the payment of mass transportation
operating assistance provided that
payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved
by the director of the budget.
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for fifty percent of $7,000,000 to provide
a twenty-five cent rebate in each direc-
tion for registered Staten Island resi-
dents who make a trip using a New York
Customer Service Center E-ZPass Account
and properly mounted NYCSC E-ZPass Tag on
the Verrazzano Narrows Bridge (54248) ........ 3,500,000
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for one hundred percent of the cost to
provide an additional twelve cent rebate
in each direction for registered Staten
Island residents who make a trip using a
New York Customer Service Center E-ZPass
Account and properly mounted NYCSC E-ZPass
Tag on the Verrazzano Narrows Bridge
(54247) ...................................... 3,300,000
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for one hundred percent of the cost to
provide an additional twelve cent rebate
in each direction for registered Staten
Island residents who make a trip using a
New York Customer Service Center E-ZPass
Account and properly mounted NYCSC E-ZPass
Tag on the Verrazzano Narrows Bridge
(54206) ...................................... 3,500,000

1240 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for fifty percent of the costs associated
with providing a $7,000,000 Verrazzano
Narrows Bridge commercial vehicle rebate
program, which provides for a partial
rebate of the E-ZPass toll for commercial
vehicles with more than twenty trips per
month across the Verrazzano Narrows Bridge
using the same New York Customer Service
Center E-ZPass Account (54246) ............... 3,500,000
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for one hundred percent of the cost to
provide an additional twenty cent rebate
in each direction for registered Staten
Island residents who make a trip using a
New York Customer Service Center E-ZPass
Account and properly mounted NYCSC E-ZPass
Tag on the Verrazzano Narrows Bridge
(54226) ...................................... 5,200,000
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for one hundred percent of the cost to
provide an additional twenty-six cent
rebate in each direction for registered
Staten Island residents who make a trip
using a New York Customer Service Center
E-ZPass Account and properly mounted NYCSC
E-ZPass Tag on the Verrazzano Narrows
Bridge (54105) ............................... 7,000,000
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for one hundred percent of the cost to
provide an additional twenty-nine cent
rebate in each direction for registered
Staten Island residents who make a trip
using a New York Customer Service Center
E-ZPass Account and properly mounted NYCSC
E-ZPass Tag on the Verrazzano Narrows
Bridge ....................................... 6,000,000
To the Capital District transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53206) ................................. 41,649,000
To the Central New York regional transporta-
tion authority for the operating expenses
thereof (53207) ............................. 30,341,700
To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor-
tation authority for the operating
expenses thereof (53208) .................... 36,171,800
To the Niagara Frontier transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53209) ................................. 43,731,500
To all other public transportation systems
serving primarily outside of the metropol-
itan commuter transportation district

1241 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
eligible to receive operating assistance
under the provisions of section 18-b of
the transportation law for the operating
expenses thereof in accordance with a
service and usage formula to be estab-
lished by the commissioner of transporta-
tion with the approval of the director of
the budget (53210) .......................... 31,824,800
To the Capital District transportation
authority for the additional operating
expenses thereof (54277) ....................... 990,100
To the Central New York regional transporta-
tion authority for the additional operat-
ing expenses thereof (54224) ................... 818,100
To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor-
tation authority for the additional oper-
ating expenses thereof (54273) ................. 980,500
To the Niagara Frontier transportation
authority for the additional operating
expenses thereof (54274) ..................... 1,273,600
To all other public transportation systems
serving primarily outside of the metropol-
itan commuter transportation district
eligible to receive operating assistance
under the provisions of section 18-b of
the transportation law for the additional
operating expenses thereof in accordance
with a service and usage formula to be
established by the commissioner of trans-
portation with the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (54238) ...................... 937,700
To Rockland county for the expenses thereof,
incurred for public transportation
services within the county provided
directly or under contract (53211) .............. 33,500
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses of the Staten Island ferry
notwithstanding any other provision of law
(53212) ........................................ 326,900
To the county of Westchester for the operat-
ing expenses thereof incurred for the
public transportation services, provided
within the county directly or under
contract (53213) ............................... 548,700
To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees
for the operating expenses thereof
incurred for public transportation
services (53214) ............................... 663,700
To the county of Suffolk for operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within

1242 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the county directly or under contract
(53215) ........................................ 258,200
For the operating costs of the south fork
commuter bus service, including for the
operation of last-mile shuttle services or
other alternative transportation services,
between the Speonk station and the Montauk
station on the Montauk branch of the Long
Island Rail Road in Suffolk county (53153)
................................................ 500,000
For the additional operating costs of the
south fork commuter bus service, including
for the operation of last-mile shuttle
services or other alternative transporta-
tion services, between the Speonk station
and the Montauk branch of the Long Island
Rail Road in Suffolk county (54107) ............ 250,000
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the city directly or under contract
(53216) ........................................ 873,700
To all other public transportation systems
serving primarily within the metropolitan
commuter transportation district eligible
to receive operating assistance under the
provisions of section 18-b of the trans-
portation law for the operating expenses
thereof in accordance with a service and
usage formula to be established by the
commissioner of transportation with the
approval of the director of the budget
(53217) ........................................ 317,000
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the reimbursement of costs associated
with the subway co-response outreach teams
(SCOUT) program ............................. 25,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 249,490,500
--------------
DEDICATED MASS TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND PROGRAM ......... 1,974,735,900
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund
Non-MTA Capital Account - 20853
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the following appropriations are
for payment of mass transportation operat-
ing assistance for public transportation

1243 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
systems eligible to receive operating
assistance under the provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law, provided
that payments from this appropriation
shall be made pursuant to a financial plan
approved by the director of the budget.
To the Capital District transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (54253) .................................. 9,969,200
To the Central New York regional transporta-
tion authority for the operating expenses
thereof (54251) .............................. 8,907,900
To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor-
tation authority for the operating
expenses thereof (54252) ..................... 9,960,800
To the Niagara Frontier regional transporta-
tion authority for the operating expenses
thereof (54254) ............................. 12,975,800
To all other public transportation bus
systems serving primarily areas outside of
the metropolitan transportation commuter
district eligible to receive operating
assistance under the provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law for the
operating expenses thereof in accordance
with the service and usage formula to be
established by the commissioner of trans-
portation with the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (54250) .................... 8,437,300
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 50,251,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund
Railroad Account - 20852
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for deposit in the metropolitan transpor-
tation authority dedicated tax fund for
the expenses of the New York city transit
authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface
transit operating authority, and the
Staten Island rapid transit operating
authority, the Long Island rail road
company and the Metro-North commuter rail-
road company which includes the New York
state portion of the Harlem, Hudson, Port
Jervis, Pascack, and the New Haven commu-
ter railroad service regardless of whether
the services are provided directly or
pursuant to joint service agreements.

1244 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
No expenditure shall be made hereunder until
a certificate of approval has been issued
by the director of the budget and a copy
of such certificate filed with the state
comptroller, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of
the assembly ways and means committee.
Moneys appropriated herein may be made
available at such times and upon such
conditions as may be deemed appropriate by
the commissioner of transportation and the
director of the budget in accordance with
the following:
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the Long
Island rail road company and the Metro-
North commuter railroad company which
include operating expenses for the New
York state portion of Harlem, Hudson, Port
Jervis, Pascack, and New Haven commuter
railroad services regardless of whether
such services are provided directly or
pursuant to joint service agreements
(54282) .................................... 288,812,900
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 288,812,900
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Dedicated Mass Transportation Trust Fund
Transit Authorities Account - 20851
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for deposit in the metropolitan transpor-
tation authority dedicated tax fund for
the expenses of the New York city transit
authority, the Manhattan and Bronx surface
transit operating authority, and the
Staten Island rapid transit operating
authority, the Long Island rail road
company and the Metro-North commuter rail-
road company which includes the New York
state portion of the Harlem, Hudson, Port
Jervis, Pascack, and the New Haven commu-
ter railroad service regardless of whether
the services are provided directly or
pursuant to joint service agreements.
No expenditure shall be made hereunder until
a certificate of approval has been issued
by the director of the budget and a copy
of such certificate filed with the state
comptroller, the chairperson of the senate

1245 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
finance committee and the chairperson of
the assembly ways and means committee.
Moneys appropriated herein may be made
available at such times and upon such
conditions as may be deemed appropriate by
the commissioner of transportation and the
director of the budget in accordance with
the following:
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the New York
city transit authority, the Manhattan and
Bronx surface transit operating authority,
and the Staten Island rapid transit oper-
ating authority (53173) .................. 1,635,672,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 1,635,672,000
--------------
GATEWAY DEVELOPMENT OPERATING PROGRAM ....................... 30,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
To the Gateway Development Commission for
payment of the state share of annual oper-
ating expenses. Funds paid from this
appropriation shall be paid consistent
with an operating budget adopted by the
Commission pursuant to subdivision 13 of
section 2 of chapter 108 of the laws of
2019 and paid on a periodic basis pursuant
to a spending plan consistent with such
budget submitted to the department of
transportation and the division of the
budget. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein shall be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereaft-
er to accrue (54104) ........................ 30,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 30,000,000
--------------
LOCAL TRANSPORTATION PLANNING STUDIES PROGRAM ............... 50,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
FHWA Local Planning Account - 25472

1246 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For continuing comprehensive transportation
planning and coordinated support of trans-
it studies undertaken as part of the
unified work programs of participating
local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by
the federal highway administration (53174) .. 35,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 35,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
FTA Local Planning Account - 25473
For continuing comprehensive transportation
planning and coordinated support of trans-
it studies undertaken as part of the
unified work programs of participating
local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by
the federal transit administration (54283) .. 15,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 15,000,000
--------------
MASS TRANSPORTATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ...................... 25,251,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment to the metropolitan transporta-
tion authority for the costs of the
student fare for school children program
for the 2026-27 school year provided
however, that the program shall maintain
the same eligibility criteria and discount
structure for students as was provided
during the 2019-20 school year. No expend-
iture shall be made hereunder until a
certificate of approval has been issued by
the director of the budget and a copy of
such certificate filed with the state
comptroller, the chairperson of the senate
finance committee and the chairperson of
the assembly ways and means committee.
Moneys appropriated herein may only be
made available prior to the beginning of
each school year semester designated fall,
spring, and summer after the receipt of
student fare passes by the New York City

1247 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
department of education from the metropol-
itan transportation authority (53175) ....... 25,251,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 25,251,000
--------------
MASS TRANSPORTATION OPERATING ASSISTANCE FUND PROGRAM .... 2,904,834,900
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund
Metropolitan Mass Transportation Operating Assistance
Account - 21402
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the following appropriations are
for payment of mass transportation operat-
ing assistance provided that payments from
this appropriation shall be made pursuant
to a financial plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget.
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the New York
city transit authority, the Manhattan and
Bronx surface transit operating authority,
and the Staten Island rapid transit oper-
ating authority (53176) .................. 1,481,881,800
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the Long
Island rail road company and the Metro-
North commuter railroad company which
includes the New York state portion of
Harlem, Hudson, Port Jervis, Pascack, and
the New Haven commuter railroad services
regardless of whether the services are
provided directly or pursuant to joint
service agreements (53177) ................. 676,052,200
To Rockland county for the expenses thereof
incurred for public transportation
services within the county, provided
directly or under contract (53178) ........... 6,841,900
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses of the Staten Island ferry
notwithstanding any other provisions of
law (53179) ................................. 63,974,700
To the county of Westchester for the operat-
ing expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the county directly or under contract
(53180) .................................... 109,227,900
To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees
for the operating expenses thereof

1248 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
incurred for public transportation
services (53181) ........................... 132,960,100
To the county of Suffolk for operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the county directly or under contract
(53182) ..................................... 51,780,000
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the city directly or under contract;
provided however, that $2,000,000 of this
appropriation shall be for expenses
incurred for the Staten Island express bus
service (53183) ............................ 171,601,600
To the New York state department of trans-
portation for the expenses thereof
incurred for trans-Hudson public transpor-
tation services, provided directly or
under contract (54217) ...................... 19,400,000
To all other public transportation systems
serving primarily within the metropolitan
commuter transportation district, as
defined in section 1262 of the public
authorities law, eligible to receive oper-
ating assistance under the provisions of
section 18-b of the transportation law for
the operating expenses thereof in accord-
ance with a service and usage formula to
be established by the commissioner of
transportation with the approval of the
director of the budget (53184) .............. 62,675,700
For supplemental transportation operating
assistance to public transportation
systems eligible to receive assistance
from this account, to the extent available
and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2026-27, in an amount to be
determined by the commissioner of trans-
portation subject to the approval of the
director of the budget. Amounts herein may
be made available for incentive payments
to public transportation systems which
achieve service or financial benchmarks
specified in an annual incentive plan to
be submitted by the commissioner of trans-
portation and approved by the director of
the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions
of section 18-b of the transportation law
or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times

1249 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
and upon such conditions as may be deemed
appropriate by the commissioner of trans-
portation and the director of the budget
(53190) ...................................... 6,200,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ............... 2,782,595,900
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund
Public Transportation Systems Operating Assistance
Account - 21401
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the following appropriations are
for payment of mass transportation operat-
ing assistance provided that payments from
this appropriation shall be made pursuant
to a financial plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget.
To the Capital District transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53185) ................................. 19,561,900
To the Central New York regional transporta-
tion authority for the operating expenses
thereof (53186) ............................. 17,995,000
To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor-
tation authority for the operating
expenses thereof (53187) .................... 22,417,100
To the Niagara Frontier transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53188) ................................. 33,318,800
To all other public transportation bus
systems serving primarily areas outside of
the metropolitan commuter transportation
district eligible to receive operating
assistance under the provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law for the
operating expenses thereof in accordance
with the service and usage formula to be
established by the commissioner of trans-
portation with the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (53189) ................... 26,146,200
For supplemental transportation operating
assistance to public transportation
systems eligible to receive assistance
from this account, to the extent available
and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2026-27, in an amount to be
determined by the commissioner of trans-
portation subject to the approval of the
director of the budget. Amounts herein may

1250 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
be made available for incentive payments
to public transportation systems which
achieve service or financial benchmarks
specified in an annual incentive plan to
be submitted by the commissioner of trans-
portation and approved by the director of
the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions
of section 18-b of the transportation law
or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times
and upon such conditions as may be deemed
appropriate by the commissioner of trans-
portation and the director of the budget
(53190) ...................................... 2,800,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 122,239,000
--------------
MASS TRANSPORTATION OPERATING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ........... 221,869,900
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the following appropriations are
for the payment of mass transportation
operating assistance pursuant to section
18-b of the transportation law.
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the New York
city transit authority, the Manhattan and
Bronx surface transit operating authority,
and the Staten Island rapid transit oper-
ating authority (53192) ...................... 2,195,400
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the Long
Island rail road company and the Metro-
North commuter railroad company which
include operating expenses for the New
York state portion of Harlem, Hudson, Port
Jervis, Pascack, and New Haven commuter
railroad services regardless of whether
such services are provided directly or
pursuant to joint service agreements
(53193) ...................................... 3,666,600
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses of the Staten Island ferry
notwithstanding any other provision of law
(53198) ........................................ 309,000

1251 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
To the county of Westchester for the operat-
ing expenses thereof incurred for the
public transportation services, provided
within the county directly or under
contract (53199) ............................... 261,100
To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees
for the operating expenses thereof
incurred for public transportation
services (53200) ............................... 211,200
To the county of Suffolk for operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the county directly or under contract
(53201) ......................................... 74,800
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the city directly or under contract
(53202) ........................................ 737,100
To all other public transportation systems
serving primarily within the metropolitan
commuter transportation district eligible
to receive operating assistance under the
provisions of section 18-b of the trans-
portation law for the operating expenses
thereof in accordance with a service and
usage formula to be established by the
commissioner of transportation with the
approval of the director of the budget
(53203) ........................................ 207,600
To the Capital District transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53194) .................................. 1,389,300
To the Central New York regional transporta-
tion authority for the operating expenses
thereof (53195) .............................. 2,192,500
To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor-
tation authority for the operating
expenses thereof (53196) ..................... 2,740,500
To the Niagara Frontier transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53197) .................................. 2,854,000
To all other public transportation systems
serving primarily outside the metropolitan
commuter transportation district eligible
to receive operating assistance under the
provisions of section 18-b of the trans-
portation law for the operating expenses
thereof in accordance with a service and
usage formula to be established by the
commissioner of transportation with the

1252 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
approval of the director of the budget
(53204) ...................................... 2,040,700
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 18,879,800
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund
Metropolitan Mass Transportation Operating Assistance
Account - 21402
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the following appropriations are
for the payment of mass transportation
operating assistance pursuant to section
18-b of the transportation law and section
88-a of the state finance law.
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the New York
city transit authority, the Manhattan and
Bronx surface transit operating authority,
and the Staten Island rapid transit oper-
ating authority (53192) .................... 156,476,600
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for the operating expenses of the Long
Island rail road company and the Metro-
North commuter railroad company which
include operating expenses for the New
York state portion of Harlem, Hudson, Port
Jervis, Pascack, and New Haven commuter
railroad services regardless of whether
such services are provided directly or
pursuant to joint service agreements
(53193) ..................................... 25,585,400
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses of the Staten Island ferry
(53198) ...................................... 2,462,700
To the county of Westchester for the operat-
ing expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the county directly or under contract
(53199) ...................................... 2,542,300
To the county of Nassau or its sub-grantees
for the operating expenses thereof
incurred for public transportation
services (53200) ............................. 2,328,300
To the county of Suffolk for operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the county directly or under contract
(53201) ........................................ 849,500

1253 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
To the city of New York for the operating
expenses thereof incurred for public
transportation services, provided within
the city directly or under contract
(53202) ...................................... 6,031,100
To eligible public transportation systems
serving primarily within the metropolitan
commuter transportation district, as
defined in section 1262 of the public
authorities law, eligible to receive oper-
ating assistance under the provisions of
section 18-b of the transportation law for
the operating expenses thereof in accord-
ance with a service and usage formula to
be established by the commissioner of
transportation with the approval of the
director of the budget (53203) ............... 1,818,200
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 198,094,100
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund
Public Transportation Systems Operating Assistance
Account - 21401
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, the following appropriations are
for the payment of mass transportation
operating assistance pursuant to section
18-b of the transportation law and section
88-a of the state finance law.
To the Capital District transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53194) .................................... 606,100
To the Central New York regional transporta-
tion authority for the operating expenses
thereof (53195) .............................. 1,023,100
To the Rochester-Genesee regional transpor-
tation authority for the operating
expenses thereof (53196) ..................... 1,169,000
To the Niagara Frontier transportation
authority for the operating expenses ther-
eof (53197) .................................. 1,246,000
To all other public transportation bus
systems serving areas outside of the
metropolitan commuter transportation
district eligible to receive operating
assistance under the provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law for the
operating expenses thereof in accordance

1254 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
with the service and usage formula to be
established by the commissioner of trans-
portation with the approval of the direc-
tor of the budget (54289) ...................... 851,800
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 4,896,000
--------------
METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY SUPPORT PROGRAM ...... 403,478,023
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Metropolitan Transportation Authority Financial Assist-
ance Fund
Mobility Tax Trust Account - 23651
To the metropolitan transportation authority
for deposit in the metropolitan transpor-
tation authority finance fund pursuant to
the provisions of section 92-ff of the
state finance law. Moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times
and upon such conditions as may be deemed
appropriate by the commissioner of trans-
portation and the director of the budget
in accordance with section 92-ff of the
state finance law (54298) .................. 244,250,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 244,250,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Metropolitan Transportation Authority Financial Assist-
ance Fund
New York Central Business District Trust Fund - 23653
To the metropolitan transportation authority
pursuant to section 99-ff of the state
finance law for deposit in the central
business district tolling capital lockbox
established pursuant to section 553-j of
the public authorities law (54298) ......... 159,228,023
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 159,228,023
--------------
OFFICE OF PASSENGER AND FREIGHT TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM ...... 36,750,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance - 10000

1255 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
To the ogdensburg bridge and port authority,
subject to a plan approved by the director
of the division of the budget (54108) ........ 1,750,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 1,750,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
FTA Program Management Account - 25314
For eligible federal transit administration
capital, planning and operating assistance
activities apportioned to serve the
special needs of transit-dependent popu-
lations beyond traditional public trans-
portation services and americans with
disabilities act (ADA). Such activities
may include public transportation projects
planned, designed, and carried out to meet
the special needs of seniors and individ-
uals with disabilities when public trans-
portation is insufficient, inappropriate,
or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that
improve access to fixed-route service and
decrease reliance by individuals with
disabilities on complementary paratransit;
and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with
disabilities. Eligible recipients of fund-
ing may include local governments, public
transportation authorities, private
nonprofit organizations, state agencies or
other operators of public transportation
that receive a grant indirectly through a
recipient (54292) ........................... 35,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 35,000,000
--------------
RURAL AND SMALL URBAN TRANSIT AID PROGRAM ................... 32,300,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Rural and Small Urban Transit Aid Account - 25471
For eligible federal transit administration
capital, planning and operating assistance
activities apportioned to the state to
support public transportation services

1256 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
that are publicly owned, operated directly
or under contract, or otherwise sponsored
by an eligible municipality, federally
recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ..................................... 32,300,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 32,300,000
--------------

1257 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ADDITIONAL MASS TRANSPORTATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for the payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
For the operating costs of the south fork commuter bus service,
including for the operation of last-mile shuttle services or other
alternative transportation services, between the Speonk station and
the Montauk station on the Montauk branch of the Long Island Rail
Road in Suffolk county (53153) ... 500,000 .......... (re. $500,000)
For the additional operating costs of the south fork commuter bus
service, including for the operation of last-mile shuttle services
or other alternative transportation services, between the Speonk
station and the Montauk branch of the Long Island Rail Road in
Suffolk county (54107) ... 250,000 .................. (re. $250,000)
For the costs of conducting a study of transit service in the Hudson
Valley, including to west of Hudson River destinations. All or a
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations or
capital projects and may be suballocated to other state agencies or
public authorities (54116) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000)
For payment to the QueensRail Corporation for costs associated with
the local match for a grant under the Reconnecting Communities Pilot
Program to study the feasibility of the QueensLink Project, a poten-
tial North-South rail corridor in Queens, New York (54117) .........
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For a study to re-examine the feasibility of high-speed rail along the
I-90 NYS Thruway corridor which may provide a more direct option
that allows for higher speed rail above 120 miles per hour. All or a
portion of these funds may be transferred to state operations or
capital projects and may be suballocated to other state agencies or
public authorities for the purposes stated herein (54119) ..........
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment to the Regional Transit Service in Monroe County to [begin
a study on a bus rapid transit corridor] conduct a feasibility and
cost study for safety and transit enhancements on Lake Ave in the
City of Rochester (54118) ... 250,000 ............... (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For the additional operating costs of the south fork commuter bus
service, including for the operation of last-mile shuttle services
or other alternative transportation services, between the Speonk
station and the Montauk branch of the Long Island Rail Road in
Suffolk county (54107) ... 250,000 .................. (re. $169,000)

1258 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the operating costs of a shuttle bus service between the city of
Hudson and the village of Chatham in Columbia county (54112) .......
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
To the county of Orange, for the provision of fare free bus service in
the vicinity of the city of Middletown, provided directly or under
contract (54113) ... 200,000 ........................ (re. $200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for the payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
For expenses incurred over a five-year period to support an innovative
transit mobility pilot program to assist riders facing barriers to
traditional public transit. Eligible expenses shall include, but are
not limited to, those which serve as a 20 percent match for federal
funds; trip request and fare payment application technology; the
purchase of small transit vehicles; and other transit service costs
that suit local needs including locations without transit services.
Funds will be allocated pursuant to plans approved by the department
of transportation and division of the budget. The following systems
shall be eligible for up to $1 million each from this appropriation:
Capital District transportation authority, Central New York regional
transportation authority, Rochester-Genesee regional transportation
authority, Niagara Frontier transportation authority, county of
Westchester, county of Nassau, and county of Suffolk. The amount of
$3 million shall be available for other transit systems, which are
eligible to receive operating expenses under the provisions of
section 18-b of the transportation law, through a competitive proc-
ess. The moneys hereby appropriated are for transit services
provided by other than the metropolitan transportation authority and
its subsidiaries (54101) ... 10,000,000 ........... (re. $9,797,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
To the Niagara Frontier transportation authority for a study (54232)
... 750,000 ......................................... (re. $750,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For the cost of conducting a study of accessibility and capacity at
the Kingsbridge Road/Jerome Avenue subway station in the Bronx. The
study shall anticipate the operation of the Kingsbridge National Ice
Center and its impact on ridership at the station. The study shall
include the cost of providing direct access from the station to the
Kingsbridge National Ice Center and the cost of bringing the station
into compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (54245) ...
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
GATEWAY DEVELOPMENT OPERATING PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

1259 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
To the Gateway Development Commission for payment of the state share
of annual operating expenses. Funds paid from this appropriation
shall be paid consistent with an operating budget adopted by the
Commission pursuant to subdivision 13 of section 2 of chapter 108 of
the laws of 2019 and paid on a periodic basis pursuant to a spending
plan consistent with such budget submitted to the department of
transportation and the division of the budget (54104) ..............
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,815,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
To the Gateway Development Commission for payment of the state share
of annual operating expenses, including but not limited to
reimbursements to the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey.
Funds paid from this appropriation shall be paid consistent with an
operating budget adopted by the Commission pursuant to subdivision
13 of section 2 of chapter 108 of the laws of 2019 and paid on a
periodic basis pursuant to a spending plan consistent with such
budget submitted to the department of transportation and the divi-
sion of the budget (54104) ... 24,300,000 ......... (re. $9,800,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
To the Gateway Development Commission for payment of the state share
of annual operating expenses, including but not limited to
reimbursements to the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey.
Funds paid from this appropriation shall be paid consistent with an
operating budget adopted by the Commission pursuant to subdivision
13 of section 2 of chapter 108 of the laws of 2019 and paid on a
periodic basis pursuant to a spending plan consistent with such
budget submitted to the department of transportation and the divi-
sion of the budget (54104) ... 24,300,000 ............ (re. $18,000)
INTERCITY RAIL PASSENGER SERVICE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2000:
For services and expenses:
For the provision of technical assistance as part of the New York
Statewide Opportunities for Airport Revitalization ("NY SOARs")
program, including but not limited to air services studies, market
analysis, the preparation of applications and the coordination and
facilitation of public-private partnerships and the pledge of commu-
nity and/or local industry funding, to airports and communities
where improved commercial air service is essential for the economic
development of the community or communities and such commercial
services are characterized by unreasonably high air fares and/or
insufficient service for the application to and the participation in
the federal low fare demonstration program established pursuant to
Section 203 of Public Law 106-181 (53225) ..........................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $234,000)

1260 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1999:
For the Town of Carmel Hamlet Revitalization Program (53228) .........
490,300 ............................................. (re. $327,000)
LOCAL TRANSPORTATION PLANNING STUDIES PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses of the New York City Department of Transpor-
tation for a preliminary design investigation study for constructing
on- and off-ramps from the southbound Hutchinson River Parkway as
well as a service road in the vicinity of the Hutchinson Metro
Center Complex to address existing/future circulation/congestion and
safety for all street users (54249) ... 1,000,000 ... (re. $191,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
FHWA Local Planning Account - 25472
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 35,000,000 ................. (re. $33,281,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 35,000,000 ................. (re. $18,887,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 35,000,000 ................. (re. $22,048,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 35,000,000 ................. (re. $31,245,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work

1261 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 27,000,000 ................. (re. $17,466,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 27,000,000 ................. (re. $19,380,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 25,400,000 .................. (re. $6,847,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 25,400,000 .................. (re. $2,689,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 25,400,000 ................. (re. $11,007,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,789,000 .................. (re. $1,164,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,789,000 .................. (re. $3,117,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,789,000 .................. (re. $6,183,000)

1262 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,789,000 .................... (re. $677,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,789,000 .................. (re. $2,511,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,149,000 .................. (re. $2,734,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,149,000 .................... (re. $393,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 14,149,000 .................... (re. $209,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration (53174) ... 16,590,000 .................... (re. $142,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal highway admin-
istration:

1263 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the grant period October 1, 2006 to September 30, 2007: (53174)
... 12,181,000 ....................................... (re. $32,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
FTA Local Planning Account - 25473
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 15,000,000 ................. (re. $14,815,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 15,000,000 ................. (re. $12,242,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 15,000,000 ................. (re. $11,299,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 15,000,000 ................. (re. $10,449,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 9,000,000 ................... (re. $5,345,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 9,000,000 ................... (re. $6,961,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work

1264 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 8,100,000 ................... (re. $4,151,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 8,100,000 ................... (re. $4,116,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 8,100,000 ................... (re. $4,821,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 7,379,000 ................... (re. $1,177,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 7,379,000 ................... (re. $3,145,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 7,379,000 ................... (re. $2,741,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 4,553,000 ..................... (re. $911,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 4,553,000 ..................... (re. $142,000)

1265 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 4,719,000 ..................... (re. $228,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 4,719,000 ..................... (re. $171,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration (54283) ... 4,719,000 ....................... (re. $5,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For continuing comprehensive transportation planning and coordinated
support of transit studies undertaken as part of the unified work
programs of participating local planning or municipal agencies
pursuant to grant agreements approved by the federal transit admin-
istration:
For the grant period October 1, 2006 to September 30, 2007: (54283)
... 4,506,000 ........................................ (re. $14,000)
MASS TRANSPORTATION OPERATING ASSISTANCE FUND PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund
Metropolitan Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Account - 21402
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
11,000,000 ....................................... (re. $11,000,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state

1266 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2025-26, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
6,200,000 ......................................... (re. $6,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
11,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,787,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2024-25, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
6,200,000 ......................................... (re. $6,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
11,000,000 ........................................ (re. $8,528,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state

1267 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2023-24, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
6,200,000 ......................................... (re. $6,200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
11,000,000 .......................................... (re. $152,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2022-23, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ......................................... (re. $4,312,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
11,000,000 ............................................ (re. $1,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state

1268 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2021-22, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ......................................... (re. $4,312,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
11,000,000 .......................................... (re. $167,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2020-21, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ......................................... (re. $2,812,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
11,000,000 ........................................... (re. $27,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state

1269 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
fiscal year 2018-19, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ......................................... (re. $4,312,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
To the New York state department of transportation for the expenses
thereof incurred for trans-Hudson public transportation services,
provided directly or under contract (54217) ........................
8,000,000 ............................................ (re. $21,000)
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2018-19, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ......................................... (re. $4,312,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2017-18, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions

1270 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ......................................... (re. $4,312,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2016-17, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ......................................... (re. $3,508,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2012-13, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ........................................... (re. $160,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2011-12, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation

1271 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
4,312,000 ........................................... (re. $135,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund
Public Transportation Systems Operating Assistance Account - 21401
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2025-26, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
2,800,000 ......................................... (re. $2,800,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2024-25, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
2,800,000 ......................................... (re. $2,800,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:

1272 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the following
appropriations are for payment of mass transportation operating
assistance provided that payments from this appropriation shall be
made pursuant to a financial plan approved by the director of the
budget.
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2023-24, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
2,800,000 ......................................... (re. $2,800,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2022-23, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2021-22, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation

1273 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2020-21, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2018-19, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2018-19, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation

1274 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2017-18, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2016-17, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2015-16, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation

1275 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2014-15, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2013-14, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2012-13, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation

1276 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2011-12, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2010-11, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2009-10, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation

1277 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008:
For supplemental transportation operating assistance to public trans-
portation systems eligible to receive assistance from this account,
to the extent available and necessary for costs incurred in state
fiscal year 2008-09, in an amount to be determined by the commis-
sioner of transportation subject to the approval of the director of
the budget. Amounts herein may be made available for incentive
payments to public transportation systems which achieve service or
financial benchmarks specified in an annual incentive plan to be
submitted by the commissioner of transportation and approved by the
director of the budget. Notwithstanding any provisions of section
18-b of the transportation law or any other law, moneys appropriated
herein may be made available at such times and upon such conditions
as may be deemed appropriate by the commissioner of transportation
and the director of the budget (53190) .............................
1,960,000 ......................................... (re. $1,960,000)
OFFICE OF PASSENGER AND FREIGHT TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
FTA Program Management Account - 25314
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $35,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and

1278 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $35,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $34,572,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
35,000,000 ....................................... (re. $34,996,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:

1279 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $17,435,000)
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA),
in relation to funds provided by any federal COVID-l9 emergency
response act. Such activities may include public transportation
projects planned, designed, and carried out to meet the special
needs of seniors and individuals with disabilities when public
transportation is insufficient, inappropriate, or unavailable;
projects that exceed the requirements of the ADA; projects that
improve access to fixed-route service and decrease reliance by indi-
viduals with disabilities on complementary paratransit; and alterna-
tives to public transportation that assist seniors and individuals
with disabilities. Eligible recipients of funding may include local
governments, public transportation authorities, private nonprofit
organizations, state agencies or other operators of public transpor-
tation that receive a grant indirectly through a recipient (54225)
... 10,000,000 .................................... (re. $9,115,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a

1280 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,715,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
17,900,000 ........................................ (re. $9,818,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
17,900,000 ........................................ (re. $2,595,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixedroute
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on

1281 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private nonprofit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
17,900,000 ........................................ (re. $1,618,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private non-profit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
16,800,000 ........................................ (re. $7,746,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private non-profit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
16,800,000 ........................................ (re. $5,003,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).

1282 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private non-profit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
16,800,000 ........................................ (re. $6,699,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to serve the special
needs of transit-dependent populations beyond traditional public
transportation services and americans with disabilities act (ADA).
Such activities may include public transportation projects planned,
designed, and carried out to meet the special needs of seniors and
individuals with disabilities when public transportation is insuffi-
cient, inappropriate, or unavailable; projects that exceed the
requirements of the ADA; projects that improve access to fixed-route
service and decrease reliance by individuals with disabilities on
complementary paratransit; and alternatives to public transportation
that assist seniors and individuals with disabilities. Eligible
recipients of funding may include local governments, public trans-
portation authorities, private non-profit organizations, state agen-
cies or other operators of public transportation that receive a
grant indirectly through a recipient (54292) .......................
16,800,000 ........................................ (re. $8,219,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010:
Maintenance undistributed (54292) ... 9,094,000 ....... (re. $735,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008:
Maintenance undistributed (54292) ... 8,634,000 ........ (re. $77,000)
PREVENTIVE MAINTENANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For the deposit into an account with the Office of the State Comp-
troller for payments to the counties of Erie and Cattaraugus for the
maintenance costs associated with the South Cascade Drive/Miller
Road (former Route 219) Bridge upon completion of the bridge
replacement. The counties shall provide the Office of the State
Comptroller any documentation required by the New York State Depart-
ment of Transportation in order to receive reimbursement for mainte-

1283 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
nance costs associated with the South Cascade Drive/Miller Road
Bridge (54243) ... 300,000 .......................... (re. $300,000)
RURAL AND SMALL URBAN TRANSIT AID PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Rural and Small Urban Transit Aid Account - 25471
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publicly owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 32,300,000 ........................... (re. $32,300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publicly owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 32,300,000 ........................... (re. $32,300,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publicly owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 32,300,000 ........................... (re. $31,693,000)
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state in relation
to the Federal coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act or
similar COVID-l9 emergency response act to support public transpor-
tation services that are publicly owned, operated directly or under
contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible municipality, feder-
ally recognized tribal nation, or the state (54223) ................
22,428,000 ....................................... (re. $22,428,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publicly owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 30,000,000 ........................... (re. $30,000,000)
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state in relation
to the Federal coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act or
similar COVID-l9 emergency response act to support public transpor-

1284 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
tation services that are publicly owned, operated directly or under
contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible municipality, feder-
ally recognized tribal nation, or the state (54223) ................
10,000,000 ....................................... (re. $10,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publicly owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 25,000,000 ........................... (re. $25,000,000)
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state in relation
to the Federal coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act or
similar COVID-l9 emergency response act to support public transpor-
tation services that are publicly owned, operated directly or under
contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible municipality, feder-
ally recognized tribal nation, or the state (54223) ................
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $18,783,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publicly owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 25,000,000 ........................... (re. $19,907,000)
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state in relation
to the Federal coronavirus aid, relief, and economic security act or
similar COVID-l9 emergency response act to support public transpor-
tation services that are publicly owned, operated directly or under
contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible municipality, feder-
ally recognized tribal nation, or the state (54223) ................
66,000,000 ....................................... (re. $14,389,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publicly owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 21,900,000 ........................... (re. $13,820,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publically owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 21,900,000 ........................... (re. $10,553,000)

1285 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publically owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 21,900,000 ............................ (re. $9,851,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publically owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 25,100,000 ........................... (re. $14,800,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publically owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 25,100,000 ............................ (re. $8,748,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publically owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 25,100,000 ............................ (re. $9,143,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For eligible federal transit administration capital, planning and
operating assistance activities apportioned to the state to support
public transportation services that are publically owned, operated
directly or under contract, or otherwise sponsored by an eligible
municipality, federally recognized tribal nation, or the state
(53222) ... 25,100,000 ............................ (re. $4,089,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For public mass transportation operating assistance and capital
projects and transit related technical support services or special
studies undertaken by participating localities or by the department
of transportation on behalf of localities through contractual
arrangements with private carriers, private nonprofit corporations
or consultants, pursuant to a program approved by the federal
government, for non-urbanized area formula program, job access,
reverse commute, and new freedoms (53222) ..........................
25,100,000 ........................................ (re. $5,079,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:

1286 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For public mass transportation operating assistance and capital
projects and transit related technical support services or special
studies undertaken by participating localities or by the department
of transportation on behalf of localities through contractual
arrangements with private carriers, private nonprofit corporations
or consultants, pursuant to a program approved by the federal
government, for non-urbanized area formula program, job access,
reverse commute, and new freedoms (53222) ..........................
25,100,000 ....................................... (re. $12,522,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010:
For public mass transportation operating assistance and capital
projects and transit related technical support services or special
studies undertaken by participating localities or by the department
of transportation on behalf of localities through contractual
arrangements with private carriers, private nonprofit corporations
or consultants, pursuant to a program approved by the federal
government, for non-urbanized area formula program, job access,
reverse commute, and new freedoms (53222) ..........................
25,100,000 ........................................ (re. $6,054,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009:
For public mass transportation operating assistance and capital
projects and transit related technical support services or special
studies undertaken by participating localities or by the department
of transportation on behalf of localities through contractual
arrangements with private carriers, private nonprofit corporations
or consultants, pursuant to a program approved by the federal
government, for non-urbanized area formula program, job access,
reverse commute, and new freedoms (53222) ..........................
25,100,000 ........................................ (re. $5,329,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008:
For public mass transportation operating assistance and capital
projects and transit related technical support services or special
studies undertaken by participating localities or by the department
of transportation on behalf of localities through contractual
arrangements with private carriers, private nonprofit corporations
or consultants, pursuant to a program approved by the federal
government, for non-urbanized area formula program, job access,
reverse commute, and new freedoms (53222) ..........................
22,214,000 ........................................ (re. $4,496,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007:
For public mass transportation operating assistance and capital
projects and transit related technical support services or special
studies undertaken by participating localities or by the department
of transportation on behalf of localities through contractual
arrangements with private carriers, private nonprofit corporations
or consultants, pursuant to a program approved by the federal
government, for non-urbanized area formula program, job access,
reverse commute, and new freedoms.

1287 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For the grant period October 1, 2006 to September 30, 2007 (53222) ...
21,803,000 ....................................... (re. $10,118,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006:
For public mass transportation operating assistance and capital
projects and transit related technical support services or special
studies undertaken by participating localities or by the department
of transportation on behalf of localities through contractual
arrangements with private carriers, private nonprofit corporations
or consultants, pursuant to a program approved by the federal
government, for non-urbanized area formula program, job access,
reverse commute, and new freedoms:
For the grant period October 1, 2005 to September 30, 2006 (53222) ...
17,975,000 ........................................ (re. $1,809,000)

1288 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 415,916,500 1,198,836,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 0 15,959,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 415,916,500 1,214,795,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ............................... 415,916,500
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of the minority
and women-owned business development and
lending program (47107) ........................ 635,000
For additional services and expenses of the
minority and women-owned business develop-
ment and lending program ....................... 250,000
For services and expenses consistent with
the federal community development finan-
cial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701
et seq.). Up to $1,000,000 shall be used
for program activities conducted by commu-
nity development financial institutions in
economically distressed and highly
distressed areas (47108) ..................... 1,495,000
For services and expenses of the entrepre-
neurial assistance program for all desig-
nated centers. Notwithstanding any incon-
sistent provision of law, the director of
the budget may suballocate the full amount
of this appropriation to the department of
economic development (47114) ................. 4,900,000
For services and expenses related to the
global entrepreneurs program. All or
portions of the funds appropriated hereby
may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority
(58038) ...................................... 4,000,000
For services and expenses of contractual
payments related to the retention of
professional football in Western New York
(47110) ...................................... 6,670,000
For services and expenses of the urban and
community development program in econom-
ically distressed areas (47115) .............. 3,404,000

1289 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the empire
state economic development fund (47106) ..... 26,180,000
For services and expenses, loans, grants,
and costs associated with program adminis-
tration, to support economic development
initiatives of the state. Such economic
development purposes may include, but
shall not be limited to, efforts to
promote New York state as a tourism desti-
nation, efforts to attract and expand
business investment and job creation in
New York state including through the Open
for Business program as well as all
expenses associated with Global NY initi-
atives and trade missions, domestic and
international, promoting New York busi-
nesses; provided that in the event funds
are used for the purpose of advertising
and promoting the benefits of the START-UP
NY program, no more than 60 percent of the
funds used for such purpose shall be used
for advertising and promotion outside the
state of New York. For any individual
advertising contract over $5,000,000 fund-
ed from this appropriation and entered
into by the department of economic devel-
opment or the New York state urban devel-
opment corporation, such contract shall
include outcomes, specific targets, goals
and benchmarks for evaluating performance
outcomes for the advertising contract. In
addition, the department of economic
development shall monitor each such adver-
tising contract and evaluate the perform-
ance outcomes of the contract, and prepare
an annual report on the cost-effectiveness
of such contract. Notwithstanding the
foregoing, a portion of this appropriation
may be used by the New York state urban
development corporation for a marketing
campaign to support New York State's
recovery from the COVID-19 pandemic, and
the New York state urban development
corporation is authorized to enter into a
contract or contracts with entities to
produce and market this campaign notwith-
standing any law to the contrary, includ-
ing without limitation section 2879-a of
the public authorities law and any appli-
cable provision of the state finance law.
All or portions of the funds appropriated
hereby may be suballocated or transferred

1290 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
to any department, agency, or public
authority (47014) ........................... 47,000,000
For services and expenses, loans, and
grants, related to the market New York
program, including but not limited to,
marketing and advertising to promote
regional attractions in the state of New
York. All or portions of the funds appro-
priated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or
public authority (45619) ..................... 7,000,000
For services and expenses related to market-
ing and tourism for the 2026 FIFA World
Cup .......................................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses, loans, grants,
and costs associated with program adminis-
tration, to support the office of work-
force and economic development and other
workforce and economic development initi-
atives of the state, including but not
limited to those listed in the schedule
below, and pursuant to a plan approved by
the director of the budget. Reporting
requirements for program implementation
for funds appropriated herein shall be
established by the president and chief
executive officer of the New York state
urban development corporation. This appro-
priation is available for payments for
state operations, aid to localities, or
capital purposes and all or a portion of
the funds appropriated herein may be
suballocated, transferred, or allocated to
any department, division, agency, or
public authority (58003) ................... 188,360,000
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the operation of the teacher
residency program ............. 30,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding internships at state
university of New York and
city university of New York,

1291 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
including but not limited to
community colleges ............ 10,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding apprenticeships at
state university of New York
and city university of New
York, including but not limi-
ted to community colleges ...... 5,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of psychiatric
rehabilitation services at
the office of mental health ... 10,300,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
employment and training
programs at the office for
people with developmental
disabilities .................. 10,160,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the Associated Medical
Schools of New York Scholars
in Medicine and Science ........ 2,400,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of a suny
pre-medical opportunities
program ........................ 1,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
caregiver flexibility for
direct care workers ........... 39,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
financial burden relief for

1292 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
healthcare workers ............ 47,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
training capacity expansion
for statewide institutions .... 22,500,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the one network for regional
advanced manufacturing part-
nership initiative. Such
initiative may include but
is not limited to community
colleges ...................... 11,000,000
--------------
Total ...................... 188,360,000
--------------
For services and expenses, loans, and grants
associated with supporting youth soccer
facilities in disadvantaged communities
across the state. All or a portion of the
funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department,
agency, or public authority .................. 1,000,000
For services and expenses, loans, and grants
related to an innovation venture competi-
tion program located in western NY. All or
a portion of the funds appropriated hereby
may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority ...... 5,000,000
For services and expenses for the Assistive
Technology Innovation Center to be located
in the City of Albany ........................ 5,000,000
For services and expenses, loans, and grants
for the Fashion Innovation Center ............... 60,000
For services and expenses, loans, and grants
related to the Bolstering Biotech Initi-
ative. All or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or
public authority ............................ 65,000,000
For services and expenses of the Metropol-
itan Opera ................................... 2,000,000
For services and expenses related to a
comprehensive study for the redevelopment
of Roosevelt Island. Notwithstanding any
other provision of the law to the contra-
ry, funds appropriated herein may be

1293 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
suballocated or transferred to any aid to
localities, state operations, or capital
appropriation or any state department,
agency, or public authority for the
purposes stated herein ....................... 2,000,000
For additional services and expenses related
to marketing and tourism for the 2026 FIFA
World Cup. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, all or a
portion of the money hereby appropriated
may be transferred or suballocated to any
aid to localities, state operations or
capital appropriation of any state depart-
ment, agency, or public authority for
services and expenses, loans, grants, and
costs associated with program adminis-
tration, to support the 2026 World Cup and
large scale events and promotions through-
out New York. Such support may include,
but shall not be limited to, marketing and
advertising to promote such events, trans-
portation costs, workforce, security, and
travel ...................................... 20,000,000
For services and expenses of BRIC Arts/
Media/BKLYN, Inc. .............................. 100,000
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Peace
Center Inc. Arts and Culture Collective ........ 100,000
For services and expenses of Society for the
Preservation of Weeksville and Bedford
Stuyvesant History ........................... 1,000,000
For additional services and expenses of
Harriman Campus feasibility study .............. 750,000
For services and expenses of Amherst Chamber
of Commerce Inc. ................................ 50,000
For services and expenses of ArtsNYS ............. 125,000
For services and expenses of Association of
Community Employment Programs for the
Homeless, Inc. (ACE Programs for the Home-
less, Inc.) .................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Bronx Chamber
of Commerce (Bronx Chamber of Commerce
Foundation, Inc.) .............................. 150,000
For services and expenses of Bronx Museum of
Arts ........................................... 300,000
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Cham-
ber of Commerce, Inc. .......................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Neigh-
borhood Improvement Association, Inc. .......... 100,000
For services and expenses of Cayuga County
Chamber of Commerce ............................. 50,000
For services and expenses of Centerstate

1294 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
Corporation for Economic Opportunity
(Centerstate CEO) .............................. 750,000
For services and expenses of Columbia County
Chamber of Commerce ............................. 50,000
For services and expenses of Cortland County
Chamber of Commerce Inc. ........................ 50,000
For services and expenses of County Chamber
of Commerce, Inc. (Business Council of
Westchester - BCW) .............................. 50,000
For services and expenses of Dutchess County
Regional Chamber of Commerce, Inc. .............. 50,000
For services and expenses of Finger Lakes
Association, Inc. (Finger Lakes Tourism
Alliance) ...................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Greater Bing-
hamton Chamber of Commerce, Inc. ................ 50,000
For services and expenses of Greater Harlem
Chamber of Commerce ............................ 150,000
For services and expenses of Greater Roches-
ter Chamber of Commerce, Inc. ................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Greene County
Chamber of Commerce Inc ......................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Harriman Campus
feasibility study .............................. 250,000
For services and expenses of Hudson River
Museum of Westchester .......................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge
Riverdale Van Cortland Development Corpo-
ration ......................................... 140,000
For services and expenses of Manhattan Cham-
ber of Commerce (Manhattan Chamber of
Commerce Foundation) ........................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Orange County
Chamber of Commerce, Inc. ....................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Philharmonic-
Symphony Society of New York, Inc. (New
York Philharmonic) ............................. 500,000
For services and expenses of Queens Carnival ..... 160,000
For services and expenses of Queens Chamber
of Commerce .................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Richardson
Center Corporation (Richardson Olmsted
Campus) ........................................ 500,000
For services and expenses of Staten Island
Chamber of Commerce (Staten Island Chamber
of Commerce Foundation, Inc.) .................. 150,000
For services and expenses of Suffolk County
Alliance of Chambers, Inc. ...................... 50,000
For services and expenses of Tompkins County
Chamber of Commerce ............................. 50,000
For services and expenses of Ulster County
Regional Chamber of Commerce, Inc. .............. 50,000

1295 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Western New
York Law Center, Inc. (Small Business
Legal Clinic) .................................. 250,000
For services and expenses of Yonkers Down-
town Waterfront Business Improvement
District, Inc ................................... 75,000
For services and expenses, grants or
reimbursement of expenses incurred by
local government agencies and/or communi-
ty-based service providers, not-for-profit
service providers or their employees
providing services for economic develop-
ment programs, including but not limited
to chambers of commerce, district manage-
ment associations, local development
corporations and community based organiza-
tions. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation may be suballocated or
transferred to any state department, agen-
cy or authority to effectuate the intent
of this appropriation with the approval of
the temporary president of senate and the
director of the division of the budget.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is
thereafter included in a senate resolution
calling for the expenditure of such funds,
which resolution must be approved by a
majority vote of all members elected to
the senate upon a roll call vote ............... 500,000
For services and expenses related to provid-
ing loans, loan guarantees, loan subsi-
dies, or grants for the food retail estab-
lishment subsidization for healthy
communities (FRESH Communities) pilot
program. Such establishments must be open
to the general public, offer a variety of
fresh foods, and may be located within
underserved areas of Erie County, specif-
ically within low and moderate-income
census tracts. Notwithstanding any rule,
regulation, or provision of law to the
contrary, all or a portion of the funds

1296 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
herein appropriated shall be available to
support operating and capital projects and
may be suballocated or transferred to any
state department, agency or authority.
Provided further, notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, funds
from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by
the temporary president of the senate and
the director of the division of the budget
which sets forth with an itemized list of
the grantees with the amount to be
received by each, or the methodology for
allocating such appropriation, and (ii)
which is thereafter included in a senate
resolution calling for the expenditure of
such funds, which resolution must be
approved by the majority vote of all
members elected to the senate upon a roll
call vote ...................................... 500,000
For services and expenses of Stony Brook
Medicine's National Cancer Institute ......... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of CenterState CEO ..... 750,000
For services and expenses of the Rochester
Monroe County Anti-poverty (RMAPI) Initi-
ative .......................................... 750,000
For services and expenses of the Bronx Over-
all Economic Development Corporation ........... 700,000
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn
Alliance, Inc. ................................. 650,000
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn
Academy of Music, Inc. ......................... 500,000
For services and expenses of the Queens
Chamber of Commerce ............................ 500,000
For services and expenses of Syracuse Film
Center, Inc. ................................... 350,000
For services and expenses of Rensselaer
Polytechnic Institute's (RPI) Seed to City
(S2C) Initiative ............................... 250,000
For services and expenses of Syracuse Jazz-
fest Productions, Inc .......................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Plattsburgh
- North Country Chamber of Commerce, Inc. ...... 225,000
For services and expenses of the Arts
Services Initiative of Western New York,
Inc. ........................................... 200,000
For services and expenses of the New Bronx
Chamber of Commerce ............................ 200,000
For services and expenses of the Michigan
Street African American Heritage Corridor
Commission, Inc. ............................... 200,000

1297 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Finger
Lakes Tourism Alliance ......................... 150,000
For services and expenses of Harlem Week,
Inc. ........................................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Historic
Hudson Hoosic River Partnership - Cham-
plain Canal Region Gateway Visitors Center ..... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Queens
Economic Development Corporation ............... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Adirondack
North Country Association, Inc. ................ 100,000
For services and expenses of the Downtown
Syracuse Foundation, Inc. ...................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Hudson
River Museum of Westchester .................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the People's
Theatre Project, Inc. ........................... 75,000
For services and expenses of The Bronx Muse-
um of the Arts .................................. 62,500
For services and expenses of the Central New
York Ballet, Inc. ............................... 50,000
For services and expenses of the Day of
Independence Committee of Panamanians in
New York, Inc. .................................. 50,000
For services and expenses of the Hampton
Bays Chamber of Commerce, Inc. .................. 50,000
For services and expenses of small arts and
cultural organizations outside of New York
City ........................................... 250,000
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses of
the City of Middletown Para-
mount Theatre ..................... 50,000
For services and expenses of
Hudson Opera House, Inc. .......... 50,000
For services and expenses of
Hudson River Music Hall
Productions, Inc. ................. 50,000
For services and expenses of
Park Playhouse, Inc. .............. 50,000
For services and expenses of
the Theatre of Youth Compa-
ny, Inc. .......................... 50,000
For services and expenses of participating
arts and cultural venues of Alive Down-
towns!, LLC .................................. 5,000,000

1298 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses of
Shea's Performing Arts
Center in the City of
Buffalo ........................ 1,197,700
For services and expenses of
Proctor's Theater in the
City of Schenectady .............. 968,000
For services and expenses of
the Rochester Broadway Thea-
tre League, Inc. in the City
of Rochester ..................... 900,000
For services and expenses of
the Syracuse Area Landmark
Theatre in the City of Syra-
cuse ............................. 300,000
For services and expenses of
the Palace Performing Arts
Center, Inc. in the City of
Albany ........................... 300,000
For services and expenses of
Ulster Performing Arts
Center d.b.a. Bardavon 1869
Opera House ...................... 300,000
For services and expenses of
Bardavon 1869 Opera House in
the City of Poughkeepsie ......... 191,200
For services and expenses of
the Clemens Center in the
City of Elmira ................... 120,600
For services and expenses of
the Stanley Theatre in the
City of Utica .................... 120,600
For services and expenses of
the Troy Savings Bank Music
Hall Corporation in the City
of Troy .......................... 300,000
For services and expenses of
the Smith Center for the
Arts, Inc in the City of
Geneva ........................... 103,000
For services and expenses of
the Reg Lenna Center for the
Arts, Inc. in the City of
Jamestown ......................... 95,900
For services and expenses of
the State Theatre of Ithaca,
Inc. in the City of Ithaca ....... 103,000
--------------
Total .......................... 5,000,000
--------------

1299 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $635,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women-owned
business development landing program (47123) .......................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ......................................... (re. $1,495,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 4,650,000 ................. (re. $4,650,000)
For services and expenses related to the global entrepreneurs program.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(58038) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $4,000,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) .....
5,405,000 ......................................... (re. $1,128,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ...................... (re. $26,180,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support economic development initiatives
of the state. Such economic development purposes may include, but
shall not be limited to, efforts to promote New York state as a
tourism destination, efforts to attract and expand business invest-
ment and job creation in New York state including through the Open
for Business program as well as all expenses associated with Global
NY initiatives and trade missions, domestic and international,
promoting New York businesses; provided that in the event funds are
used for the purpose of advertising and promoting the benefits of
the START-UP NY program, no more than 60 percent of the funds used
for such purpose shall be used for advertising and promotion outside
the state of New York. For any individual advertising contract over
$5,000,000 funded from this appropriation and entered into by the
department of economic development or the New York state urban
development corporation, such contract shall include outcomes,
specific targets, goals and benchmarks for evaluating performance

1300 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
outcomes for the advertising contract. In addition, the department
of economic development shall monitor each such advertising contract
and evaluate the performance outcomes of the contract, and prepare
an annual report on the cost-effectiveness of such contract.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, a portion of this appropriation may
be used by the New York state urban development corporation for a
marketing campaign to support New York State's recovery from the
COVID-19 pandemic, and the New York state urban development corpo-
ration is authorized to enter into a contract or contracts with
entities to produce and market this campaign notwithstanding any law
to the contrary, including without limitation section 2879-a of the
public authorities law and any applicable provision of the State
finance law. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be
suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public
authority (47014) ..................................................
47,000,000 ....................................... (re. $47,000,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York. All
or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority (45619)
... 7,000,000 ..................................... (re. $7,000,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support the office of workforce and
economic development and other workforce and economic development
initiatives of the state, including but not limited to those listed
in the schedule below, and pursuant to a plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Reporting requirements for program implementation
for funds appropriated herein shall be established by the president
and chief executive officer of the New York state urban development
corporation. This appropriation is available for payments for state
operations, aid to localities, or capital purposes and all or a
portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, trans-
ferred, or allocated to any department, division, agency, or public
authority (58003) ..................................................
191,360,000 ..................................... (re. $191,360,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the operation of the teacher
residency program ............. 30,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program

1301 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
administration related to
funding internships at state
university of New York and
city university of New York,
including but not limited to
community colleges ............ 10,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding apprenticeships at
state university of New York
and city university of New
York, including but not limi-
ted to community colleges ...... 5,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of psychiatric
rehabilitation services at
the office of mental health ... 10,300,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
employment and training
programs at the office for
people with developmental
disabilities .................. 10,160,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the [diversity in medicine
program] Associated Medical
Schools of New York Scholars
in Medicine and Science ........ 2,400,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of a suny
pre-medical opportunities
program ........................ 1,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
caregiver flexibility for
direct care workers ........... 39,000,000
For services and expenses,

1302 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
financial burden relief for
healthcare workers ............ 47,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
training capacity expansion
for statewide institutions .... 22,500,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the one network for regional
advanced manufacturing part-
nership initiative. Such
initiative may include but
is not limited to community
colleges ...................... 14,000,000
--------------
Total sub-schedule ......... 191,360,000
--------------
For services and expenses of the Bedford Stuyvesant Restoration Corpo-
ration (64208) ... 2,500,000 ........................ (re. $2,500,000)
For services and expenses of Sail250NYC, Inc (45892) .................
2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000)
For service and expenses of the Amherst Chamber of Commerce (45876)
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the ArtsNYS (Empire Arts Cultural Conven-
ing) (45873) ... 125,000 ............................ (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Association of Community Employment
Programs (58001) ... 150,000 ........................ (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Chamber of Commerce (45884) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Museum of the Arts (64209) ...
62,500 ............................................... (re. $62,500)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce (47148)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Neighborhood Improvement
Association(85522) ... 100,000 ...................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Business Council of Westchester
(45877) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Cayuga County Chamber of Commerce
(45878) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of CenterState CEO (47346) .................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of the Columbia County Chamber of Commerce
(45879) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)

1303 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Cortland Area Chamber of Commerce
(45880) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Dutchess County Chamber of Commerce
(45881) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Finger Lakes Tourism Alliance (45890)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Binghamton Chamber of
Commerce (45882) ... 50,000 .......................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Harlem Chamber of Commerce
(45854) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Rochester Chamber of Commerce
(45885) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Greene Chamber of Commerce (45886)
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Kingsbridge Riverdale Van Cortland
Development Corporation (47304) ... 140,000 ......... (re. $140,000)
For services and expenses of the Long Island Children's Museum (64210)
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Manhattan Chamber of Commerce (45883)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Orange County Chamber of Commerce
(45644) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Chamber of Commerce (58035)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Staten Island Chamber of Commerce
(45872) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Suffolk County Alliance of Chambers
(45887) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce
(45888) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Ulster County Regional Chamber of
Commerce(45889) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Western New York Law Center for their
Small Business Legal Clinic (64211) ... 250,000 ..... (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Yonkers Downtown Waterfront Business
Improvement District (45874) ... 75,000 .............. (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of economic development and community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated
or transferred between any other agencies, including but not limited
to, the department of economic development with the approval of the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary presi-
dent of the senate and the director of the budget which sets forth
with an itemized list of the grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and
(ii) which is thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for
the expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by
the majority vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll

1304 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
call vote (45864) ..................................................
1,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of Stony Brook Medicine's National Cancer
Institute (45620) ... 1,000,000 ................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of CenterState CEO (47100) .................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of the Rochester Monroe County Anti-poverty
(RMAPI) Initiative (58034) ... 750,000 .............. (re. $750,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 700,000 ..................... (re. $700,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Alliance, Inc. (85517) .....
650,000 ............................................. (re. $650,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Academy of Music, Inc.
(45866) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Chamber of Commerce (45621)
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Syracuse Film Center, Inc. (64212) ......
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses of Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute's (RPI)
Seed to City (S2C) Initiative (64213) ..............................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Syracuse Jazzfest Productions, Inc
(45858) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the Plattsburgh - North Country Chamber
of Commerce (64214) ... 225,000 ..................... (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of the Arts Services Initiative of Western
New York, Inc. (45870) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Chamber of Commerce (64215) ...
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Michigan Street African American
Heritage Corridor (64216) ... 200,000 ............... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Niagara Falls Underground Railroad
Heritage Center (64217) ... 200,000 ................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Finger Lakes Tourism Alliance (45859)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Harlem Week, Inc. (45861) ...............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Hoosick River Partnership - Champlain
Canal Region Gateway Visitors Center (64218) .......................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Economic Development Corpo-
ration (85523) ... 150,000 .......................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Adirondack North Country Association
(ANCA) (21413) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Downtown Syracuse Foundation, Inc
(45867) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Hudson River Museum of Westchester
(64219) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Local Development Corporation of East
New York (64220) ... 100,000 ........................ (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the People's Theatre Project, Inc.
(58033) ... 75,000 ................................... (re. $75,000)

1305 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of The Bronx Museum of the Arts (64221)
62,500 ............................................... (re. $62,500)
For services and expenses of the Central New York Ballet (64222) .....
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Day of Independence Committee of
Panamanians in NY, Inc. (64223) ... 50,000 ........... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Hampton Bays Chamber of Commerce
(58032) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Inwood Merchant Association, Inc.
(64224) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Staten Island Economic Development
Corporation (45629) ... 50,000 ....................... (re. $50,000)
For additional grants in aid to certain not-for-profit arts and
cultural organizations located outside of cities with a population
greater than one million. Notwithstanding section 24 of the state
finance law or any provision of law to the contrary, funds from this
appropriation shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan (i)
approved by the speaker of the Assembly and the director of the
budget which sets forth either an itemized list of grantees with the
amount to be received by each, or the methodology for allocating
such appropriation, and (ii) which is thereafter included in an
Assembly resolution calling for the expenditure of such funds, which
resolution must be approved by a majority vote of all members
elected to the Assembly upon a roll call vote (64225) ..............
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of participating arts and cultural venues of
Alive! Downtowns, LLC (58037) ... 5,000,000 ....... (re. $5,000,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses of
Shea's Performing Arts
Center in the City of
Buffalo ........................ 1,197,700
For services and expenses of
Proctor's Theater in the
City of Schenectady .............. 968,000
For services and expenses of
the Rochester Broadway Thea-
ter League, Inc. in the City
of Rochester ..................... 900,000
For services and expenses of
the Landmark Theater in the
City of Syracuse ................. 300,000
For services and expenses of
the Palace Theater in the
City of Albany ................... 300,000
For services and expenses of
the Bardavon 1869 Opera
House in the City of Pough-

1306 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
keepsie .......................... 191,200
For services and expenses of
the Ulster Performing Arts
Center in the City of King-
ston ............................. 300,000
For services and expenses of
the Clemens Center in the
City of Elmira ................... 120,600
For services and expenses of
the Stanley Theater in the
City of Utica .................... 120,600
For services and expenses of
the Troy Savings Bank Music
Hall in the City of Troy ......... 300,000
For services and expenses of
the Smith Center for the
Arts in the City of Geneva ....... 103,000
For services and expenses of
the Reg Lenna Center for the
Arts in the City of James-
town .............................. 95,900
For services and expenses of
the State Theatre of Ithaca
in the City of Ithaca ............ 103,000
--------------
Total sub-schedule ........... 5,000,000
--------------
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $635,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women-owned
business development and lending program ...........................
365,000 ............................................. (re. $365,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ......................................... (re. $1,495,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 4,500,000 ................. (re. $1,878,000)
For services and expenses related to the global entrepreneurs program.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(58038) ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $3,996,000)

1307 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110)
5,335,000 ........................................... (re. $138,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ...................... (re. $26,180,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support economic development initiatives
of the state. Such economic development purposes may include, but
shall not be limited to, efforts to promote New York state as a
tourism destination, efforts to attract and expand business invest-
ment and job creation in New York state including through the Open
for Business program as well as all expenses associated with Global
NY initiatives and trade missions, domestic and international,
promoting New York businesses; provided that in the event funds are
used for the purpose of advertising and promoting the benefits of
the START-UP NY program, no more than 60 percent of the funds used
for such purpose shall be used for advertising and promotion outside
the state of New York. For any individual advertising contract over
$5,000,000 funded from this appropriation and entered into by the
department of economic development or the New York state urban
development corporation, such contract shall include outcomes,
specific targets, goals and benchmarks for evaluating performance
outcomes for the advertising contract. In addition, the department
of economic development shall monitor each such advertising contract
and evaluate the performance outcomes of the contract, and prepare
an annual report on the cost-effectiveness of such contract.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, a portion of this appropriation may
be used by the New York state urban development corporation for a
marketing campaign to support New York State's recovery from the
COVID-19 pandemic, and the New York state urban development corpo-
ration is authorized to enter into a contract or contracts with
entities to produce and market this campaign notwithstanding any law
to the contrary, including without limitation section 2879-a of the
public authorities law and any applicable provision of the State
finance law. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be
suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public
authority (47014) ... 45,000,000 .................. (re. $4,031,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York. All
or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority (45619)
... 7,000,000 ..................................... (re. $6,899,000)
For services and expenses of Stony Brook Medicine's National Cancer
Institute (45620) ... 1,000,000 ................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of CenterState CEO (47100) .................
750,000 ............................................. (re. $501,000)
For services and expenses of the Rochester Monroe County Anti-poverty
(RMAPI) Initiative (58034) ... 750,000 .............. (re. $750,000)

1308 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Bronx Overall Economic Development Corpo-
ration (47314) ... 700,000 .......................... (re. $700,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Alliance, Inc. [85516]
(85517) ... 650,000 ................................. (re. $195,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Academy of Music (45871) ...
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of North Country Chamber of Commerce (85506)
... 225,000 ......................................... (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Economic Development Corpo-
ration (85523) ... 150,000 .......................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Historic Hudson Hoosick Rivers Partner-
ship (58031) ... 150,000 ............................ (re. $101,000)
For services and expenses of Buffalo Niagara Partnership (85518)
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Downtown Syracuse Foundation, Inc.
(45867) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of People's Theatre Project (58033) ........
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of the Hampton Bays Chamber of Commerce
(58032) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Staten Island Economic Development
Corporation (45629) ... 50,000 ....................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expense of CNY on Camera (45868) ....................
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses of Finger Lakes Tourism Alliance (45859) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Niagara Military Affairs Council (45869)
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Arts Services Initiative of Western New
York, Inc (45870) ... 100,000 ....................... (re. $100,000)
For service and expenses of the Brooklyn Academy of Music (45866) ...
500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of Centerstate CEO (47346) .................
600,000 ............................................. (re. $600,000)
For services and expenses of the Association of Community Employment
Programs (58001) ... 150,000 ........................ (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Chamber of Commerce (47148)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Finger Lakes Tourism Alliance (45890) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Chamber of Commerce (58035)
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Staten Island Chamber of Commerce
(45872) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Kingsbridge Riverdale Van Cortland Devel-
opment Corp. (47304) ... 140,000 .................... (re. $140,000)
For services and expenses of the ArtsNY, Inc (45873) .................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Neighborhood Improvement
Association (85522) ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Yonkers Downtown Waterfront Business
Improvement Association (45874) ... 75,000 ........... (re. $75,000)

1309 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Buffalo Heritage Carousel Inc.
(45875) ... 65,000 ................................... (re. $65,000)
For services and expenses of the Amherst Chamber of Commerce (45876)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Business Council of Westchester
(45877) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Cayuga County Chamber of Commerce
(45878) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Columbia County Chamber of Commerce
(45879) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Cortland Area Chamber of Commerce
(45880) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Dutchess County Chamber of Commerce
(45881) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Binghamton Chamber of
Commerce (45882) ... 50,000 .......................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Manhattan Chamber of Commerce (45883) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Chamber of Commerce (45884) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Harlem Chamber of Commerce
(45854) ... 150,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Rochester Chamber of Commerce
(45885) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Greene Chamber of Commerce (45886)
... 50,000 ........................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Suffolk County Alliance of Chambers
(45887) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Tompkins County Chamber of Commerce
(45888) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Ulster County Regional Chamber of
Commerce (45889) ... 50,000 .......................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Orange County Chamber of Commerce
(45644) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of economic development and community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated
or transferred between other agencies, including but not limited to,
the department of economic development with the approval of the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision
of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary presi-
dent of the senate and the director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and
(ii) which is thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for
the expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by
a majority vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll
call vote (45864) ... 1,000,000 ..................... (re. $847,000)

1310 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024 as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of the Michigan Street African American
Heritage Corridor Commission, Inc. (45632) .........................
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses of the Adirondack Sports Council, including
but not limited to the empire state winter games and a study on the
reestablishment of the empire state summer games (58030) ...........
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support the office of workforce and
economic development and other workforce and economic development
initiatives of the state, including but not limited to those listed
in the schedule below, and pursuant to a plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Reporting requirements for program implementation
for funds appropriated herein shall be established by the president
and chief executive officer of the New York state urban development
corporation. This appropriation is available for payments for state
operations, aid to localities, or capital purposes and all or a
portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, trans-
ferred, or allocated to any department, division, agency, or public
authority (58003) ... 190,360,000 ................ (re. $94,460,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the operation of the teacher
residency program ............. 30,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding internships at state
university of New York and
city university of New York,
including but not limited to
community colleges ............ 10,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding apprenticeships at
state university of New York
and city university of New
York, including but not limi-

1311 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ted to community colleges ...... 5,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of psychiatric
rehabilitation services at
the office of mental health ... 10,300,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
employment and training
programs at the office for
people with developmental
disabilities .................. 10,160,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the [diversity in medicine
program] Associated Medical
Schools of New York Scholars
in Medicine and Science ........ 2,400,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of a suny
pre-medical opportunities
program ........................ 1,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
caregiver flexibility for
direct care workers ........... 39,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
financial burden relief for
healthcare workers ............ 47,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
training capacity expansion
for statewide institutions .... 22,500,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program

1312 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
administration related to
the one network for regional
advanced manufacturing part-
nership initiative. Such ini-
tiative may include but is not
limited to community colleges . 13,000,000
--------------
Total .......................... 190,360,000
--------------
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $635,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women owned
business development and lending program (47123) ...................
1,365,000 ......................................... (re. $1,365,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ......................................... (re. $1,495,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget may suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,764,000 ................... (re. $116,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
5,270,000 ........................................... (re. $238,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ....................... (re. 26,180,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support economic development initiatives
of the state. Such economic development purposes may include, but
shall not be limited to, efforts to promote New York state as a
tourism destination, efforts to attract and expand business invest-
ment and job creation in New York state including through the Open
for Business program as well as all expenses associated with Global
NY initiatives and trade missions, domestic and international,
promoting New York businesses; provided that in the event funds are
used for the purpose of advertising and promoting the benefits of
the START-UP NY program, no more than 60 percent of the funds used
for such purpose shall be used for advertising and promotion outside
the state of New York. For any individual advertising contract over
$5,000,000 funded from this appropriation and entered into by the
department of economic development or the New York state urban
development corporation, such contract shall include outcomes,

1313 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
specific targets, goals and benchmarks for evaluating performance
outcomes for the advertising contract. In addition, the department
of economic development shall monitor each such advertising contract
and evaluate the performance outcomes of the contract, and prepare
an annual report on the cost-effectiveness of such contract.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, a portion of this appropriation may
be used by the New York state urban development corporation for a
marketing campaign to support New York State's recovery from the
COVID-19 pandemic, and the New York state urban development corpo-
ration is authorized to enter into a contract or contracts with
entities to produce and market this campaign notwithstanding any law
to the contrary, including without limitation section 2879-a of the
public authorities law and any applicable provision of the State
finance law. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be
suballocated or transferred to any department, agency, or public
authority (47014) ..................................................
45,000,000 ........................................... (re. $88,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 7,000,000 ............................. (re. $5,316,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support the office of workforce and
economic development and other workforce and economic development
initiatives of the state, including but not limited to those listed
in the schedule below, and pursuant to a plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Reporting requirements for program implementation
for funds appropriated herein shall be established by the president
and chief executive officer of the New York state urban development
corporation. This appropriation is available for payments for state
operations, aid to localities, or capital purposes and all or a
portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, trans-
ferred, or allocated to any department, division, agency, or public
authority (58003) ..................................................
180,360,000 ..................................... (re. $131,360,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the operation of the teacher
residency program ............. 30,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs

1314 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
associated with program
administration related to
funding internships at state
university of New York and
city university of New York
schools ....................... 10,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding apprenticeships at
state university of New York
and city university of New
York schools ................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of alternative
teacher certifications ........ 10,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
upskilling school parapro-
fessionals ..................... 8,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of psychiatric
rehabilitation services at
the office of mental health .... 5,300,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
employment and training
programs at the office for
people with developmental
disabilities ..................... 160,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the [diversity in medicine
program] Associated Medical
Schools of New York Scholars
in Medicine and Science ........ 2,400,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program

1315 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
administration related to
the expansion of a suny
pre-medical opportunities
program ........................ 1,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
caregiver flexibility for
direct care workers ........... 39,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
financial burden relief for
healthcare workers ............ 47,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
training capacity expansion
for statewide institutions .... 22,500,000
--------------
Total ...................... 180,360,000
--------------
For grants, services and expenses related to the small business and
entrepreneurs grant program pilot as established under section 16-hh
of the New York state urban development corporation act (58028) ...
400,000 ............................................. (re. $400,000)
For services and expenses of a museum study as established under
section 1 of part FF of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023 (58029) ...
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $367,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 550,000 ..................... (re. $550,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (45606) ... 150,000 ..................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Alliance, Inc. (85517) ...
500,000 .............................................. (re. $18,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Chamber of Commerce (45621)
... 500,000 ......................................... (re. $165,000)
For services and expenses of CenterState CEO (47100) .................
500,000 ............................................. (re. $190,000)
For services and expenses of the Hampton Bays Chamber of Commerce
(58032) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the North Country Chamber of Commerce
(85506) ... 225,000 ................................. (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of the Staten Island Economic Development
Corporation (45629) ... 50,000 ....................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Stony Brook Medicine's National Cancer
Institute (45620) ... 1,000,000 ................... (re. $1,000,000)

1316 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Rochester Monroe Anti-Poverty Initi-
ative (58034) ... 750,000 ........................... (re. $629,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Chamber of Commerce (58035)
... 150,000 ......................................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of New York Medical College BioInc (58036)
... 375,000 ......................................... (re. $375,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Neighborhood Improvement
Association (85522) ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $100,000)
For Services and expenses of Finger Lakes Tourism Alliance (45859) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Centerstate CEO (47346) .................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $389,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women owned
business development and lending program (47123) ...................
1,365,000 ......................................... (re. $1,365,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ........................................... (re. $748,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
(47109) ... 490,000 .................................. (re. $81,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ...................... (re. $25,883,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 7,000,000 ............................... (re. $135,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to an innovation
venture competition program. All or portions of the funds appropri-
ated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department,
agency, or public authority (58002) ................................
75,000,000 ....................................... (re. $36,822,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:

1317 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support the office of workforce and
economic development and other workforce and economic development
initiatives of the state, including but not limited to those listed
in the schedule below, and pursuant to a plan approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Reporting requirements for program implementation
for funds appropriated herein shall be established by the president
and chief executive officer of the New York state urban development
corporation. This appropriation is available for payments for state
operations, aid to localities, or capital purposes and all or a
portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated, trans-
ferred, or allocated to any department, division, agency, or public
authority (58003) ... 350,000,000 ............... (re. $249,740,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the office of workforce and
economic development .......... 20,840,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to a
workforce development grant
program. Up to $50,000,000
may be made available from
this appropriation for costs
associated with training in
basic to advanced or emerg-
ing energy efficiency tech-
nologies, and renewable
energy technologies. Up to
$5,000,000 may be made
available for SUNY and CUNY
mental health training
initiatives. Up to
$10,000,000 may be made
available for YouthBuild,
inc. centers located within
New York state for workforce
training ..................... 115,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to a
workforce development capi-
tal grant program ............. 35,000,000
For services and expenses,

1318 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the operation of the teacher
residency program ............. 30,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding internships at state
university of New York and
city university of New York
schools ....................... 10,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
funding apprenticeships at
state university of New York
and city university of New
York schools ................... 5,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of alternative
teacher certifications ........ 10,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
upskilling school parapro-
fessionals ..................... 8,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of psychiatric
rehabilitation services at
the office of mental health .... 2,800,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
employment and training
programs at the office for
people with developmental
disabilities ................... 2,660,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to

1319 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the [diversity in medicine
program] Associated Medical
Schools of New York Scholars
in Medicine and Science ........ 1,200,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
the expansion of a suny
pre-medical opportunities
program ........................ 1,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
caregiver flexibility for
direct care workers ........... 39,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
financial burden relief for
healthcare workers ............ 47,000,000
For services and expenses,
loans, grants, and costs
associated with program
administration related to
training capacity expansion
for statewide institutions .... 22,500,000
--------------
Total ...................... 350,000,000
--------------
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Neighborhood Improvement Associ-
ation (85522) ... 100,000 ........................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Harlem Park to Park Initiative (85521)
... 100,000 .......................................... (re. $43,000)
For services and expenses related to military base redevelopment and
research efforts (45860) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $288,000)
For services and expenses of Stony Brook Medicine's National Cancer
Institute (45620) ... 1,000,000 ................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 550,000 ..................... (re. $550,000)
For services and expenses of the North Country Chamber of Commerce
(85506) ... 225,000 ................................. (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of economic development and community
services organizations. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated
or transferred between other agencies, including but not limited to,
the department of economic development with the approval of the
temporary president of the senate and the director of the budget.
Notwithstanding section 24 of the state finance law or any provision

1320 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
of law to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allo-
cated only pursuant to a plan (i) approved by the temporary presi-
dent of the senate and the director of the budget which sets forth
either an itemized list of grantees with the amount to be received
by each, or the methodology for allocating such appropriation, and
(ii) which is thereafter included in a senate resolution calling for
the expenditure of such funds, which resolution must be approved by
a majority vote of all members elected to the senate upon a roll
call vote (45864) ... 1,500,000 ..................... (re. $709,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $474,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
(47109) ... 490,000 ................................. (re. $153,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $85,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,605,000 ........................................... (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ...................... (re. $26,180,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 7,000,000 ............................... (re. $565,000)
For additional services and expenses of Minority and Women Owned Busi-
ness Development (47123) ... 1,365,000 ............ (re. $1,365,000)
For services and expenses of the Citizens Committee for New York City
(45641) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the Flatbush Development Corporation
(45642) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the Haitian-American Business Network
(45643) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Women's Chamber of Commerce
(NYWCC) (45632) ... 40,000 ........................... (re. $40,000)
For services and expenses of the Douglaston Local Development Corpo-
ration (45646) ... 50,000 ............................ (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Floral Park Bellerose Indian
Merchants Association Inc (45647) ... 50,000 ......... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Trust for Governors Island (45649)
... 185,000 ......................................... (re. $185,000)

1321 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Bronx Cooperative Development Initi-
ative (85525) ... 25,000 ............................. (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the Hudson Valley Gateway Chamber of
Commerce for tourism and economic development initiatives (45851)
... 25,000 ............................................ (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of the Joint Bellerose Business District
Development Corporation (85526) ... 50,000 ........... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Adirondack North Country, Inc (21413) ...
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Brooklyn Neighborhood Improvement
Association (85522) ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Greater Harlem Chamber of Commerce
(45854) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Harlem Park to Park Initiative
(85521) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Economic Development Council
(85523) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the City of Amsterdam Urban Renewal Agen-
cy (45855) ... 310,000 .............................. (re. $310,000)
For services and expenses of Urban Upbound (45857) ...................
200,000 ............................................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Buffalo Niagara International Trade
Gateway Organization (45623) ... 50,000 .............. (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 550,000 ..................... (re. $140,000)
For services and expenses of Syracuse Jazz-Fest Productions, Inc
(45858) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of the North Country Chamber of Commerce
(85506) ... 200,000 ................................... (re. $3,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $121,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 ................... (re. $131,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,605,000 ........................................... (re. $362,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ...................... (re. $16,259,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support economic development initiatives
of the state. Such economic development purposes may include, but
shall not be limited to, efforts to promote New York state as a
tourism destination, efforts to attract and expand business invest-

1322 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ment and job creation in New York state including through the Open
for Business program as well as all expenses associated with Global
NY initiatives and trade missions, domestic and international,
promoting New York businesses; provided that in the event funds are
used for the purpose of advertising and promoting the benefits of
the START-UP NY program, no more than 60 percent of the funds used
for such purpose shall be used for advertising and promotion outside
the state of New York; and expenses associated with the New York
wine and culinary center in an amount not to exceed 550,000, the
city of Geneva in an amount not to exceed $125,000, and the Thousand
Islands Bridge Authority in an amount not to exceed $200,000. For
any individual advertising contract over $5,000,000 funded from this
appropriation and entered into by the department of economic devel-
opment or the New York state urban development corporation, such
contract shall include outcomes, specific targets, goals and bench-
marks for evaluating performance outcomes for the advertising
contract. In addition, the department of economic development shall
monitor each such advertising contract and evaluate the performance
outcomes of the contract, and prepare an annual report on the cost-
effectiveness of such contract. All or portions of the funds appro-
priated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any department,
agency, or public authority (47014) ................................
42,500,000 ....................................... (re. $10,327,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 7,000,000 ............................. (re. $7,000,000)
For services and expenses, grants, and costs associated with program
administration in executing a count of New Yorkers, including but
not limited to recommendations put forth by the New York state
complete count commission, in association with the 2020 federal
census. Such efforts may include but not be limited to community-
based outreach and efforts by public libraries. Subject to the
director of the budget's approval, all or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority, including any disbursements
therefrom (85527) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $10,000,000)
For additional services and expenses of Minority and Women Owned Busi-
ness Development (47123) ... 365,000 ................ (re. $365,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 550,000 ...................... (re. $31,000)
For services and expenses of Buffalo Niagara Partnership (85518) ...
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of Buffalo Niagara International Trade Gate-
way Organization (45623) ... 50,000 .................. (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Invest Buffalo Niagara, Inc (85519) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:

1323 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Harlem Park to Park initiative (85521)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Neighborhood Improvement associ-
ation (85522) ... 100,000 ........................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Women's Chamber of Commerce
(45632) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of The Joint Bellerose Business District
Development Corporation (85526) ... 50,000 ........... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Adirondack North Country, Inc. (21413)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $430,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ........................................... (re. $713,000)
For additional services and expenses consistent with the federal
community development financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701
et seq.). Up to $100,000 shall be used for program activities
conducted by community development financial institutions in econom-
ically distressed and highly distressed areas (47005) ..............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
(47109) ... 490,000 .................................. (re. $15,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,605,000 ........................................... (re. $283,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ....................... (re. $8,707,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 7,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,804,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 550,000 ...................... (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of Buffalo Niagara Partnership (85518) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $51,000)

1324 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Invest Buffalo Niagara, Inc (85519) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For additional services and expenses of Minority and Women Owned Busi-
ness Development (47123) ... 365,000 ................ (re. $365,000)
For services and expenses of Canisius College for NCAA Hockey (85520)
... 100,000 .......................................... (re. $34,000)
For services and expenses of Brooklyn Neighborhood Improvement associ-
ation (85522) ... 100,000 ........................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Cooperative Development Initiative
(85525) ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of The Joint Bellerose Business District
Development Corporation (85526) ... 50,000 ........... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of Bayside Business Association (45630) ...
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses, grants, and costs associated with program
administration in executing a count of New Yorkers, including but
not limited to recommendations put forth by the New York State
complete count commission, in association with the 2020 federal
census. Such efforts may include but not be limited to community
based outreach and efforts by public libraries. Subject to the
director of the budget's approval, all or a portion of the funds
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority, including any disbursements
therefrom (85527) ... 20,000,000 .................. (re. $6,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................... (re. $8,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority- and women-owned
business development and lending program, with priority given to
recapitalizing the minority- and women-owned business investment
fund (47123) ... 365,000 ............................ (re. $365,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ........................................... (re. $196,000)
For additional services and expenses consistent with the federal
community development financial institutions program (12 U.S.C.
4701 et seq.). Up to $200,000 shall be used for program activities
conducted by community development financial institutions in econom-
ically distressed and highly distressed areas (47005) ..............
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $16,000)

1325 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,605,000 ........................................... (re. $276,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,404,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ...................... (re. $26,180,000)
For services and expenses, loans, grants, and costs associated with
program administration, to support economic development initiatives
of the state. Such economic development purposes may include, but
shall not be limited to, efforts to promote New York state as a
tourism destination, efforts to attract and expand business invest-
ment and job creation in New York state including through the Open
for Business program as well as all expenses associated with Global
NY initiatives and trade missions, domestic and international,
promoting New York businesses; provided that in the event funds are
used for the purpose of advertising and promoting the benefits of
the START-UP NY program, no more than 60 percent of the funds used
for such purpose shall be used for advertising and promotion outside
the state of New York. For any individual advertising contract over
$5,000,000 funded from this appropriation and entered into by the
department of economic development or the New York state urban
development corporation, such contract shall include outcomes,
specific targets, goals and benchmarks for evaluating performance
outcomes for the advertising contract. In addition, the department
of economic development shall monitor each such advertising contract
and evaluate the performance outcomes of the contract, and prepare
an annual report on the cost-effectiveness of such contract. All or
portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or
transferred to any department, agency, or public authority (47014)
... 44,500,000 ...................................... (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York,
provided however that up to $3,300,000 may be made available for
liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2018. All or portions of the
funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority (45619) ....................
10,300,000 ........................................ (re. $1,769,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 550,000 ...................... (re. $78,000)
For services and expenses of the Queens Chamber of Commerce (45621)
... 500,000 ........................................... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of Buffalo Niagara International Trade Gate-
way Organization (45623) ... 50,000 ................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of Gerry Foundation (45624) ................
25,000 ............................................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of military base retention and research
efforts. Notwithstanding any provision of law this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan setting forth an itemized
list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the

1326 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
methodology for allocating such appropriation. Such plan shall be
subject to the approval of the temporary president of senate and the
director of the budget and thereafter shall be included in a resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such monies, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
senate upon a roll call vote (47116) ...............................
3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,201,000)
For grants to be awarded under the beginning farmers NY fund pursuant
to section 16-w of the New York State urban development corporation
act (47308) ... 1,000,000 ........................... (re. $127,000)
For services and expenses of Black Institute Inc. (85509) ............
75,000 ................................................ (re. $1,000)
For services and expenses of the New Bronx Chamber of Commerce Inc.
(47305) ... 100,000 ................................... (re. $2,000)
For services and expenses of the Bayside Business Association, Inc.
(45630) ... 115,000 .................................. (re. $22,000)
For services and expenses of Community Development revolving loan fund
(45631) ... 400,000 .................................. (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of the New York Women's Chamber of Commerce
Inc. (45632) ... 125,000 ............................ (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Queensborough Community College
Auxiliary Enterprise (45633) ... 25,000 .............. (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the Sunset Park District Management Asso-
ciation Inc. (45634) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the Care Center of New York, Inc.
(45636) ... 10,000 ................................... (re. $10,000)
For services and expenses of the Centro Civicio Culural Dominicano
Inc. (45639) ... 25,000 .............................. (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Overall Economic Development Corpo-
ration (45606) ... 350,000 ........................... (re. $71,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $285,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ........................................... (re. $280,000)
For additional services and expenses consistent with the federal
community development financial institutions program (12 U.S.C.
4701 et seq.). Up to $200,000 shall be used for program activities
conducted by community development financial institutions in econom-
ically distressed and highly distressed areas (47005) ..............
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
(47109) ... 490,000 ................................. (re. $490,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the

1327 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $32,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,605,000 ........................................... (re. $313,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $3,314,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 26,180,000 ...................... (re. $14,704,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (45606) ... 550,000 ...................... (re. $56,000)
For services and expenses of Canisius College (45617) ................
100,000 ............................................... (re. $4,000)
For services and expenses Related to Military Base Retention and
Research Efforts (47116) ... 3,000,000 ............ (re. $1,587,000)
For grants to be awarded under the beginning, farmers NY fund pursuant
to section 16-w of the New York State urban development corporation
act (47308) ... 1,000,000 ........................... (re. $286,000)
For services and expenses of Bronx Overall Economic Development Corpo-
ration (47314) ... 300,000 ............................ (re. $2,000)
For service and expenses of the Carnegie Hall Corporation (47072) ...
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of Camba, Inc. (85511) .....................
75,000 ............................................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expense of Asian Americans for Equality, Inc.
(85512) ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $50,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 7,000,000 ............................... (re. $199,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $249,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ............................................. (re. $4,000)
For additional services and expenses consistent with the federal
community development financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701
et seq.). Up to $200,000 shall be used for program activities
conducted by community development financial institutions in econom-

1328 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
ically distressed and highly distressed areas (47005) ..............
300,000 .............................................. (re. $25,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
(47109) ... 490,000 .................................. (re. $55,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,557,000 ........................................... (re. $264,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ......................................... (re. $1,704,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 31,180,000 ....................... (re. $3,794,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (45606) ... 550,000 ..................... (re. $321,000)
For services and expenses of the Veterans Farmers Grant Fund (47011)
... 250,000 .......................................... (re. $91,000)
For services and expenses of the Town of Tonawanda for an industrial
water usage study (47018) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $50,000)
For services and expenses of military base Retention and research
efforts (47116) ... 3,000,000 ....................... (re. $696,000)
For grants to be awarded under the beginning Farmers NY fund pursuant
to section 16-w Of the New York State urban development Corporation
act (47308) ... 1,000,000 ............................ (re. $28,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 400,000 ...................... (re. $37,000)
For services and expenses for the renovation of Most IMAX Theatre
(47017) ... 100,000 ................................. (re. $100,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 5,000,000 ................................ (re. $44,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $103,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
(47109) ... 490,000 .................................. (re. $14,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the

1329 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $30,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,508,000 ........................................... (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ........................................... (re. $930,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 31,180,000 ....................... (re. $4,004,000)
For services and expenses of military base retention and research
efforts. Notwithstanding any provision of law this appropriation
shall be allocated only pursuant to a plan setting forth an itemized
list of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the
methodology for allocating such appropriation. Such plan shall be
subject to the approval of the temporary president of senate and the
director of the budget and thereafter shall be included in a resol-
ution calling for the expenditure of such monies, which resolution
must be approved by a majority vote of all members elected to the
senate upon a roll call vote (47116) ...............................
3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $783,000)
For services and expenses of the Seneca Army Depot (47130) ...........
600,000 .............................................. (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of fishing tournament promotions (47303) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $13,000)
For grants to be awarded under the beginning farmers NY fund pursuant
to section 16-w of the New York State urban development corporation
act (47308) ... 1,000,000 ........................... (re. $338,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for the support of a veterans assistance program. Provided
that any funding to support centers or development centers that
provide management and assistance to veterans who are seeking to
start or are starting new business ventures, or to train veterans in
the principles and practices of entrepreneurship in order to prepare
them to pursue self-employment opportunities, shall be based on the
extent, quality, and comprehensiveness of services provided, direct-
ly or indirectly, and the numbers served, and need not be distrib-
uted equally to all support centers or development centers (47300)
... 350,000 ......................................... (re. $337,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 500,000 ...................... (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of Kings County security improvements
(45609) ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $162,000)
For services and expenses of Onondaga County for facility improvements
(45612) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $192,000)
For services and expenses of Cayuga Community Center (45613) .........
60,000 ................................................ (re. $2,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women-owned
business development and lending program (47123) ...................
365,000 .............................................. (re. $39,000)
For additional services and expenses consistent with the federal
community development financial institutions program (12 U.S.C.

1330 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
4701 et seq.). Up to $200,000 shall be used for program activities
conducted by community development financial institutions in econom-
ically distressed and highly distressed areas (47301) ..............
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Children's Museum (45602) ...
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of Canisius College (45617) ................
200,000 ............................................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (45606) ... 550,000 ..................... (re. $378,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York.
All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated
or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(45619) ... 5,000,000 ................................ (re. $71,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 .............................................. (re. $36,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women-owned
business development and lending program (47123) ...................
365,000 .............................................. (re. $90,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ............................................ (re. $11,000)
For additional services and expenses consistent with the federal
community development financial institutions program (12 U.S.C.
4701 et seq.). Up to $200,000 shall be used for program activities
conducted by community development financial institutions in econom-
ically distressed and highly distressed areas (47301) ..............
300,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 ..................... (re. $5,000)
For services and expenses of contractual payments related to the
retention of professional football in Western New York (47110) ...
4,457,000 ............................................ (re. $48,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ........................................... (re. $323,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 31,180,000 ....................... (re. $2,155,000)

1331 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of military base retention and research
efforts (47116) ... 2,000,000 ....................... (re. $350,000)
For services and expenses of the Bronx Overall Economic Development
Corporation (47314) ... 500,000 ....................... (re. $2,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for the support of a veterans assistance program (47300) ...
350,000 .............................................. (re. $63,000)
For services and expenses of fishing tournament promotions (47303) ...
150,000 .............................................. (re. $38,000)
For grants to be awarded under the New Farmers NY fund pursuant to
section 16-w of the urban development corporation act (47308) ......
614,000 .............................................. (re. $29,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $160,000)
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.). Up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ............................................ (re. $56,000)
For services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance program
(47109) ... 490,000 .................................. (re. $62,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47114) ... 1,274,000 .................... (re. $11,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ........................................... (re. $133,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 19,180,000 ....................... (re. $2,039,000)
For services and expenses of the EB-5 Immigrant Program at the small
business development center at York college (47313) ................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $18,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women-owned
business development and lending program (47123) ...................
365,000 .............................................. (re. $48,000)
For services and expenses of military base retention efforts (47116)
... 2,000,000 ....................................... (re. $900,000)
For services and expenses related to the sponsorship of regional
events at Canisius College (47118) ... 50,000 ......... (re. $2,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses, loans, and grants, related to the market
New York program, including but not limited to, marketing and adver-
tising to promote regional attractions in the state of New York and
New York produced goods and products. All or portions of the funds

1332 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority (45619) ....................
7,000,000 ........................................... (re. $699,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $160,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
7,404,000 ........................................... (re. $429,000)
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 50,400,000 ....................... (re. $5,975,000)
For services and expenses of the jobs now program (47146) ............
16,200,000 ........................................ (re. $8,591,000)
For services and expenses related to military base redevelopment
(47333) ... 600,000 ................................. (re. $300,000)
For additional services and expenses of the minority and women-owned
business development and lending program (47123) ...................
365,000 .............................................. (re. $15,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For services and expenses of military base retention efforts, provided
that not less than $1,050,000 is provided to the griffiss local
development corporation, not less than $600,000 is provided to the
cyber research institute, and not less than $450,000 is provided to
the United States military academy at west point (47116) ...........
5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $162,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For services and expenses consistent with the federal community devel-
opment financial institutions program (12 U.S.C. 4701 et seq.), up
to $1,000,000 shall be used for program activities conducted by
community development financial institutions in economically
distressed and highly distressed areas (47108) .....................
1,495,000 ............................................ (re. $13,000)
For services and expenses of the western NY STAMP project (47345) ...
2,000,000 ............................................. (re. $9,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For services and expenses related to economic development purposes,
including but not limited to, marketing and advertising to promote
economic development in the state of New York. Funds appropriated
herein shall be available for services and expenses, loans and
grants, provided, that not more than 50 percent of this appropri-
ation shall be available for the 2011-12 state fiscal year (81018)
... 62,360,000 .................................... (re. $6,348,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010:

1333 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the empire state economic development
fund (47106) ... 6,180,000 ........................... (re. $60,000)
For additional services and expenses of the entrepreneurial assistance
program for all designated centers. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, the director of the budget shall suballocate the
full amount of this appropriation to the department of economic
development (47109) ... 1,274,000 ..................... (re. $9,000)
For services and expenses of the urban and community development
program in economically distressed areas (47115) ...................
3,404,000 ............................................ (re. $79,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $115,000)
For services and expenses of the university at Buffalo's Krabbe
disease research institute (47112) ... 980,000 ........ (re. $2,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 55,
section 1, of the laws of 2010:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(47111) ... 5,234,000 ............................. (re. $1,152,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................... 872,333
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Greater Rochester center
of excellence in photonics
and microsystems ................. 872,333
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............... 872,333
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ......... 872,333
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and

1334 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
information technology ........... 872,333
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton Center of
Excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ........................ 872,333
--------------
Total ........................ 5,234,000
==============
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008:
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
635,000 ............................................. (re. $274,000)
For services and expenses of military base retention efforts (47116)
... 980,000 ......................................... (re. $406,000)
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority
(47111) ... 6,934,000 ............................. (re. $2,313,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................. 1,155,666
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Greater Rochester center
of excellence in photonics
and microsystems ............... 1,155,666
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............. 1,155,666
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ....... 1,155,666
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ......... 1,155,666
For services and expenses
related to the operation of

1335 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
the Binghamton Center of
Excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ...................... 1,155,666
--------------
Total ........................ 6,934,000
==============
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as amended by chapter 1,
section 4, of the laws of 2009:
Bronx Business Alliance (47117) ... 115,000 ........... (re. $115,000)
Canisius College Women's Business Center (47118) .....................
38,000 ............................................... (re. $38,000)
Jamaica Chamber of Commerce (47119) ... 38,000 .......... (re. $6,000)
Queens Chamber of Commerce (47122) ... 75,000 .......... (re. $75,000)
Queens Minority and Women's Business Center (47123) ..................
113,000 .............................................. (re. $38,000)
Watervliet Arsenal (47124) ... 158,000 ................ (re. $158,000)
The promotion and marketing of property surrounding the Niagara Falls
International Airport (47125) ... 75,000 ............. (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses of the MDA CNY Essential Initiative (47126)
... 301,000 ......................................... (re. $102,000)
For services and expenses of Griffiss airforce base redevelopment
(47128) ... 1,053,000 ............................... (re. $482,000)
For services and expenses related to the New York Industrial Retention
Network (47133) ... 188,000 ......................... (re. $188,000)
Hudson Valley Economic Development Corporation (47135) ...............
376,000 ............................................. (re. $249,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008, as added by chapter 53,
section 5, of the laws of 2008:
Within the amount appropriated herein, up to $5 million shall be
available, upon approval of the director of the budget, for payment
to the Belmont Park host communities, at such time as the franchise
oversight board certifies to the director of the budget that real
estate development with a value of at least $50 million has been
approved by the board pursuant to subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a)
of subdivision 8 of section 212 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering,
and breeding law. Such monies shall be available upon application by
the host communities, subject to the unanimous approval of the fran-
chise oversight board, and shall be used for expenses incurred by
such host communities, including but not limited to, public safety,
street and highway construction, maintenance and lighting, sanita-
tion, and water supply in order to minimize or reduce real property
taxes. Belmont Park host communities shall mean those in the immedi-
ate vicinity of Belmont racetrack, including but not limited to the
county of Nassau, the unincorporated hamlets of Elmont and Bellerose
Terrace, and the incorporated villages of Floral Park, South Floral
Park and Bellerose Village (47136) ... 5,000,000 .. (re. $5,000,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007:

1336 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the minority and women-owned business
development and lending program (47107) ............................
1,948,000 ......................................... (re. $1,091,000)
For services and expenses of Griffiss airforce base redevelopment
(47128) ... 1,400,000 ............................... (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses related to infrastructure and other improve-
ments at Plattsburgh air force base (47129) ........................
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $263,000)
For services and expenses of:
Metropolitan Development Association - Grants for Growth (47139) .....
1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $331,000)
DaVinci Project (47140) ... 45,000 ..................... (re. $40,000)
Watervliet Arsenal (47124) ... 210,000 ................. (re. $81,000)
Metropolitan Development Association-Indoor Environmental Quality
Center (47142) ... 250,000 ........................... (re. $62,000)
Queens Minority and Women's Business Center (47123) ..................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $38,000)
CAPITAL REGION LOC, Inc. (47143) ... 50,000 ............ (re. $28,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter
496, section 6, of the laws of 2008:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority,
provided, however, that the amount of this appropriation available
for expenditure and disbursement on and after September 1, 2008
shall be reduced by six percent of the amount that was undisbursed
as of August 15, 2008 (47111) ... 7,075,000 ......... (re. $821,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
(thousands)
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and
life sciences .................. 1,179,166
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Greater Rochester center
of excellence in photonics
and microsystems ............... 1,179,166
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............. 1,179,166
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-

1337 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
lence in nanoelectronics ....... 1,179,166
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ......... 1,179,166
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Binghamton Center of
Excellence in small scale
systems integration and
packaging ...................... 1,179,166
--------------
Total ........................ 7,075,000
==============
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006:
For services and expenses of the jobs now program (47146) ............
32,134,000 ....................................... (re. $14,901,000)
For services and expenses of:
Garment Industry Development Center (47141) ..........................
750,000 .............................................. (re. $84,000)
Metropolitan Development Association-Indoor Environmental Quality
Center (47142) ... 250,000 .......................... (re. $109,000)
For services and expenses related to the Long Island Hispanic Chamber
of Commerce (47149) ... 500,000 ..................... (re. $193,000)
For services and expenses related to the county enhancement to the
Essential New York Initiative to be distributed on a per capita
basis to each of the twelve counties in the program central New York
service region (47398) ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $692,000)
For services and expenses related to the Rochester Area Colleges Math
and Science Hub (47396) ... 500,000 ................. (re. $136,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as amended by chapter
496, section 6, of the laws of 2008:
For services and expenses related to the operation of the centers of
excellence pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budg-
et. All or portions of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballo-
cated or transferred to any department, agency, or public authority,
provided, however, that the amount of this appropriation available
for expenditure and disbursement on and after September 1, 2008
shall be reduced by six percent of the amount that was undisbursed
as of August 15, 2008 (47111) ... 7,075,000 ....... (re. $1,513,000)
Project Schedule
PROJECT AMOUNT
--------------------------------------------
(thousands)
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Buffalo center of excel-
lence in bioinformatics and

1338 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
life sciences .................. 1,415,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Greater Rochester center
of excellence in photonics
and microsystems ............... 1,415,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Syracuse center of
excellence in environmental
and energy systems ............. 1,415,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Albany center of excel-
lence in nanoelectronics ....... 1,415,000
For services and expenses
related to the operation of
the Stony Brook center of
excellence in wireless and
information technology ......... 1,415,000
--------------
Total ........................ 7,075,000
==============
For services and expenses of the university at Buffalo's Krabbe
disease research institute, provided, however, that the amount of
this appropriation available for expenditure and disbursement on and
after September 1, 2008 shall be reduced by six percent of the
amount that was undisbursed as of August 15, 2008 (47112) ..........
1,000,000 ............................................ (re. $15,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2006, as added by chapter 108,
section 5, of the laws of 2006:
For infrastructure and other improvements at Plattsburgh air force
base (47129) ... 1,400,000 .......................... (re. $213,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 1,
section 4, of the laws of 2009:
For services and expenses of the jobs now program (47146) ............
30,634,000 .......................................... (re. $193,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as amended by chapter 62,
section 4, of the laws of 2005:
For services and expenses of infrastructure and other improvements
associated with cooperative state/federal efforts at the Seneca army
depot (47344) ... 900,000 ........................... (re. $134,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Tourism Grant Account
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:

1339 12653-09-6
NEW YORK STATE URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Funds herein appropriated, including liabilities prior to April 1,
2025, may be used to disburse federal grants in support of state and
local marketing, infrastructure, workforce, tourism, outdoor recre-
ation, and safe leisure, business, and international travel.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law, all or a portion
of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to any depart-
ment, agency or public authority. All or a portion of funds may be
transferred to state operations (58009) ............................
18,000,000 ....................................... (re. $15,959,000)

1340 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 16,110,000 30,487,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 500,000 0
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 600,000 1,035,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 17,210,000 31,522,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 1,099,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of supplemental burial benefits
to eligible families of military personnel
dying of any cause inside a combat zone or
dying outside a combat zone from wounds
incurred in combat, pursuant to section 8
of the veterans' services law, and for
transfer of such amounts as are necessary
to state operations for related adminis-
trative expenses (54604) ....................... 400,000
For payments of gold star annuity benefits
to eligible families of military personnel
(54605) ........................................ 699,000
--------------
BLIND VETERAN ANNUITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ..................... 6,380,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of annuities to blind veterans
and eligible surviving spouses. Up to
$15,000 of this appropriation may be
transferred to state operations for admin-
istrative costs associated with this
program (54606) .............................. 6,380,000
--------------
VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM .......................... 9,731,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000

1341 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment of aid to county and city veter-
ans' service agencies pursuant to section
13 of the veterans' services law (54608) ..... 2,380,000
For services and expenses of the veterans
outreach center, inc. (Monroe county)
(54609) ........................................ 250,000
For payment of burial services for veterans,
as provided for in paragraph (a) of subdi-
vision 1-a of section 148 of the general
municipal law, to congressionally char-
tered veterans services organizations.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated to the office of temporary and disa-
bility assistance for expenses related to
this program (54625) ........................... 106,000
For services and expenses of veteran-to-vet-
eran support services. These monies may be
used for the following purposes: to estab-
lish and support veterans treatment
courts, to support veteran-to-veteran
programs maintained by veterans service
organizations; to connect veteran defend-
ants to treatment and support services
directed by the criminal justice system;
to support such treatment and support
services; to provide services to support
veterans to avoid involvement with the
criminal justice system; to support
programs providing counseling and advocacy
activities for veterans, and to provide
assistance in securing linkages at the
national, state, and local level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a
plan prepared by the department of veter-
ans' services and approved by the director
of the budget (54626) ........................ 1,000,000
For payment of services related to the
justice for heroes initiative, provided
however, the department of veterans'
services shall be required to submit an
annual report to the temporary president
of the senate and the speaker of the
assembly by December 31, 2027 that shall
include the law schools which have
received funds, the number of veterans
served by each law school, and the
services provided, broken down by semes-
ter. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, funds appropriated here-
in may be suballocated to the division of
military and naval affairs or any other

1342 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
agency for the administration of this
program (54627) ................................ 250,000
For services and expenses of veteran suicide
prevention initiatives and other veteran
supports. Funds are to be made available
pursuant to a plan prepared by the depart-
ment of veterans' services and approved by
the director of the budget.
Funds may be transferred as necessary to
state operations for program expenses
(54823) ...................................... 1,000,000
For services and expenses of the African
American Veterans Monument Inc (54822) ......... 500,000
For services and expenses of American Legion
Boys State ..................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of American Legion
Girls State .................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Clear Path for
Veterans (54635) ............................... 325,000
For services and expenses of Enlisted for
Life (54820) ................................... 100,000
For services and expenses of Helmets-to-
Hardhats (54623) ............................... 125,000
For services and expenses of the Legal
Services of Long Island Veterans Rights
Project (54826) ................................ 120,000
For services and expenses of the Legal
Services of NYC Veterans Justice Project
(54616) ........................................ 200,000
For services and expenses of the Legal
Services of the Hudson Valley Veterans and
Military Families Advocacy Project (54636)
................................................ 180,000
For services and expenses of the New York
State Defenders Association Veterans
Defense Program (54629) ........................ 250,000
For payment of services related to the
Outdoor RX program. Notwithstanding any
inconsistent provision of law, funds
appropriated herein may be suballocated to
any other agency for administration of
this program (54806) ........................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veter-
ans' Project (54618) ........................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Touro
University Law Center Veteran's and Servi-
cemembers' Rights Clinic (54821) ............... 125,000
For services and expenses of the Utica
Center for Development (54818) ................. 100,000
For additional services and expenses of the
Veterans Outreach Center, Inc. (Monroe
County) (54600) ................................ 100,000

1343 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For services and expenses of Helmets-to-
Hardhats (54819) ............................... 150,000
For services and expenses of the Legal
Services of the Hudson Valley Veterans and
Military Families Advocacy Project (54620)
................................................ 225,000
For services and expenses of the New York
State Defenders Association Veterans
Defense Program (54622) ........................ 250,000
For services and expenses of the New York
State Defenders Association Veterans
Defense Program - Long Island expansion
(54633) ........................................ 220,000
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veter-
ans' Project (54632) ........................... 100,000
For services and expenses of the Department
of New York Veterans of Foreign Wars of
United States, Inc. (54628) .................... 125,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 8,631,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Homeless Veterans Assistance Fund
Homeless Veterans Assistance Account - 20204
For services and expenses related to home-
less veterans' housing (54815) ................. 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal...................... 500,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Military Family Relief Fund
Military Family Relief Account - 23807
For services and expenses related to mili-
tary family relief initiatives (54825) ......... 100,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Health and Human Services Fund
Federal HHS Account - 25100
For services and expenses related to veter-
ans' counseling and outreach (54607) ........... 500,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000
--------------

1344 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
BLIND VETERAN ANNUITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of annuities to blind veterans and eligible surviving
spouses. Up to $15,000 of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations for administrative costs associated with this
program (54606) ... 6,380,000 ..................... (re. $4,646,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of annuities to blind veterans and eligible surviving
spouses. Up to $15,000 of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations for administrative costs associated with this
program (54606) ... 6,380,000 ..................... (re. $1,563,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment of annuities to blind veterans and eligible surviving
spouses. Up to $15,000 of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations for administrative costs associated with this
program (54606) ... 6,380,000 ..................... (re. $2,205,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment of annuities to blind veterans and eligible surviving
spouses. Up to $15,000 of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations for administrative costs associated with this
program (54606) ... 6,380,000 ..................... (re. $2,136,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of annuities to blind veterans and eligible surviving
spouses. Up to $15,000 of this appropriation may be transferred to
state operations for administrative costs associated with this
program (54606) ... 6,380,000 ..................... (re. $2,365,000)
VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payment of aid to county and city veterans' service agencies
pursuant to section 13 of the veterans' services law (54608) .......
2,380,000 ......................................... (re. $1,546,000)
For services and expenses of the veterans outreach center, inc.
(Monroe county) (54609) ... 250,000 ................. (re. $250,000)
For payment of burial services for veterans, as provided for in para-
graph (a) of subdivision 1-a of section 148 of the general municipal
law, to congressionally chartered veterans services organizations.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the office of tempo-
rary and disability assistance for expenses related to this program
(54625) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $25,000)

1345 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of veteran-to-veteran support services.
These monies may be used for the following purposes: to establish
and support veterans treatment courts, to support veteran-to-veteran
programs maintained by veterans service organizations; to connect
veteran defendants to treatment and support services directed by the
criminal justice system; to support such treatment and support
services; to provide services to support veterans to avoid involve-
ment with the criminal justice system; to support programs providing
counseling and advocacy activities for veterans, and to provide
assistance in securing linkages at the national, state, and local
level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
department of veterans' services and approved by the director of the
budget (54626) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $997,000)
For services and expenses of veteran suicide prevention initiatives.
Funds may be transferred as necessary to state operations for program
expenses (54823) ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $1,000,000)
For services and expenses of the African American Veterans Monument
Inc (54822) ... 500,000 ............................. (re. $500,000)
For services and expenses of the Buffalo and Erie County Naval and
Military Park (54816) ... 100,000 ................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses for Clear Path for Veterans (54635) ........
325,000 ............................................. (re. $325,000)
For services and expenses of Enlisted for Life (54820) ...............
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Helmets-to-Hardhats (54623) .............
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of NYC Veterans
Justice Project (54616) ... 200,000 ................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
Veterans and Military Families Advocacy Project (54636) ............
180,000 ............................................. (re. $180,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of Long Island Veter-
ans Rights Project (54826) ... 120,000 .............. (re. $120,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54629) ... 250,000 ........ (re. $250,000)
For payment of services related to the Outdoor RX program. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated here-
in may be suballocated to any other agency for administration of
this program (54806) ...............................................
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veterans' Project (54618) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Touro University Law Center Veteran's
and Servicemembers' Rights Clinic (54821) ..........................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the Utica Center for Development (54818)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Vietnam Veterans of America New York
State Council (54615) ... 100,000 ................... (re. $100,000)
For additional services and expenses of the Veterans Outreach Center,
Inc. (Monroe County) (54600) ... 100,000 ............ (re. $100,000)

1346 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of Helmets-to-Hardhats (54819) .............
150,000 ............................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
Veterans and Military Families Advocacy Project (54620) ............
225,000 ............................................. (re. $225,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54622) ... 250,000 ........ (re. $250,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program - Long Island expansion (54633) ...........
220,000 ............................................. (re. $220,000)
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veterans' Project (54632) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Department of New York Veterans of
Foreign Wars of United States, Inc. (54628) ........................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative,
provided however, the department of veterans' services shall be
required to submit an annual report to the temporary president of
the senate and the speaker of the assembly by December 31, 2026 that
shall include the law schools which have [recieved] received funds,
the number of veterans served by each law school, and the services
provided, broken down by semester. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to
the division of military and naval affairs or any other agency for
the administration of this program (54627) .........................
250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of aid to county and city veterans' service agencies
pursuant to section 13 of the veterans' services law (54608) .......
2,380,000 ........................................... (re. $242,000)
For services and expenses of veteran-to-veteran support services.
These monies may be used for the following purposes: to establish
and support veterans treatment courts, to support veteran-to-veteran
programs maintained by veterans service organizations; to connect
veteran defendants to treatment and support services directed by the
criminal justice system; to support such treatment and support
services; to provide services to support veterans to avoid involve-
ment with the criminal justice system; to support programs providing
counseling and advocacy activities for veterans, and to provide
assistance in securing linkages at the national, state, and local
level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
department of veterans' services and approved by the director of the
budget (54626) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $935,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
Veterans and Military Families Advocacy Project (54620) ............
225,000 ............................................. (re. $225,000)

1347 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54622) ... 250,000 ......... (re. $80,000)
For services and expenses of the Department of New York Veterans of
Foreign Wars of United States, Inc. (54628) ........................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veterans' Project (54632) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program - Long Island expansion (54633) ...........
220,000 .............................................. (re. $98,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of NYC Veterans
Justice Project (54616) ... 200,000 ................. (re. $200,000)
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veterans' Project (54618) ......
100,000 ............................................. (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54629) ... 250,000 .......... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of the Hudson Valley
Veterans and Military Families Advocacy Project (54636) ............
180,000 .............................................. (re. $10,000)
For payment of services related to the Outdoor RX program. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated here-
in may be suballocated to any other agency for administration of
this program (54806) ...............................................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $42,000)
For services and expenses of the Buffalo and Erie County Naval and
Military Park (54816) ... 100,000 ................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of THE POINT Community Development Corpo-
ration (54817) ... 15,000 ............................ (re. $15,000)
For services and expenses of the Utica Center for Development (54818)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of Enlisted for Life (54820) ...............
100,000 .............................................. (re. $86,000)
For services and expenses of the Touro University Law Center Veterans'
and Servicemembers' Rights Clinic (54821) ..........................
80,000 ............................................... (re. $80,000)
For services and expenses of the African American Veterans Monument
Inc. (54822) ... 500,000 ............................ (re. $339,000)
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative,
provided however, the department of veterans' services shall be
required to submit an annual report to the temporary president of
the senate and the speaker of the assembly by December 31, 2024 that
shall include the law schools which have [recieved] received funds,
the number of veterans served by each law school, and the services
provided, broken down by semester. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to
the division of military and naval affairs or any other agency for
the administration of this program (54627) .........................
250,000 .............................................. (re.$140,000)

1348 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of veteran-to-veteran support services.
These monies may be used for the following purposes: to establish
and support veterans treatment courts, to support veteran-to-veteran
programs maintained by veterans service organizations; to connect
veteran defendants to treatment and support services directed by the
criminal justice system; to support such treatment and support
services; to provide services to support veterans to avoid involve-
ment with the criminal justice system; to support programs providing
counseling and advocacy activities for veterans, and to provide
assistance in securing linkages at the national, state, and local
level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
department of veterans' services and approved by the director of the
budget (54626) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $619,000)
For services and expenses of the Buffalo and Erie County Naval and
Military Park (54816) ... 100,000 ................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
(54805) ... 250,000 .................................. (re. $42,000)
For payment of services related to the Outdoor RX program. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated here-
in may be suballocated to any other agency for administration of
this program (54806) ...............................................
150,000 .............................................. (re. $75,000)
For services and expenses of the Utica Center for Development (54818)
... 100,000 ......................................... (re. $100,000)
For services and expenses of the Department of New York Veterans of
Foreign Wars of United States, Inc. (54628) ........................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program - Long Island expansion (54633) ...........
220,000 .............................................. (re. $55,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative,
provided however, the department of veterans' services shall be
required to submit an annual report to the temporary president of
the senate and the speaker of the assembly by December 31, 2024 that
shall include the law schools which have received funds, the number
of veterans served by each law school, and the services provided,
broken down by semester. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision
of law, funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the divi-
sion of military and naval affairs or any other agency for the
administration of this program (54627) .............................
250,000 .............................................. (re. $99,000)
For payment of aid to county and city veterans' service agencies
pursuant to section 13 of the veterans' services law (54608) .......
2,380,000 ............................................ (re. $66,000)
For services and expenses of THE POINT Community Development Corpo-
ration (54817) ... 15,000 ............................ (re. $15,000)

1349 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to the division of military and naval
affairs or any other agency for the administration of this program
(54627) ... 250,000 .................................. (re. $55,000)
For services and expenses of the American Legion Dunbar Post 1642
(54804) ... 100,000 .................................. (re. $47,000)
For payment of services related to the Outdoor RX program. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated here-
in may be suballocated to any other agency for administration of
this program (54806) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $127,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program - Long Island expansion (54633) ...........
220,000 .............................................. (re. $33,000)
For services and expenses of the Legal Services of NYC Veterans
Justice Project (54616) ... 200,000 .................. (re. $14,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54629) ... 250,000 ......... (re. $72,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of veteran-to-veteran support services.
These monies may be used for the following purposes: to establish
and support veterans treatment courts, to support veteran-to-veteran
programs maintained by veterans service organizations; to connect
veteran defendants to treatment and support services directed by the
criminal justice system; to support such treatment and support
services; to provide services to support veterans to avoid involve-
ment with the criminal justice system; to support programs providing
counseling and advocacy activities for veterans, and to provide
assistance in securing linkages at the national, state, and local
level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
department of veterans' services and approved by the director of the
budget (54626) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $695,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of aid to county and city veterans' service agencies
pursuant to section 13 of the veterans' services law (54608) .......
2,380,000 ........................................... (re. $207,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to the division of military and naval
affairs or any other agency for the administration of this program
(54627) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veterans' Project (54618) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $50,000)

1350 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the Department of New York Veterans of
Foreign Wars of United States, Inc. (54628) ........................
125,000 ............................................. (re. $125,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54622) ... 250,000 ......... (re. $59,000)
For services and expenses of the Veterans Rebuilding Life Program
(54638) ... 7,000 ..................................... (re. $7,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program - Long Island expansion (54633) ...........
220,000 .............................................. (re. $26,000)
For service and expenses, grants in aid, or for contracts with certain
municipalities and/or not-for-profit institutions. Notwithstanding
section twenty-four of the state finance law or any provision of law
to the contrary, funds from this appropriation shall be allocated
only pursuant to a plan approved by the speaker of the assembly and
the director of the budget which sets forth either an itemized list
of grantees with the amount to be received by each, or the methodol-
ogy for allocating such appropriation (54641) ......................
2,000,000 ........................................... (re. $938,000)
For services and expenses of the VFW Post #184 (54644) ...............
10,000 ............................................... (re. $10,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of veteran-to-veteran support services.
These monies may be used for the following purposes: to establish
and support veterans treatment courts, to support veteran-to-veteran
programs maintained by veterans service organizations; to connect
veteran defendants to treatment and support services directed by the
criminal justice system; to support such treatment and support
services; to provide services to support veterans to avoid involve-
ment with the criminal justice system; to support programs providing
counseling and advocacy activities for veterans, and to provide
assistance in securing linkages at the national, state, and local
level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
department of veterans' services and approved by the director of the
budget (54626) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $621,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of aid to county and city veterans' service agencies
pursuant to section 13 of the veterans' services law (54608) .......
1,380,000 ........................................... (re. $112,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to the division of military and naval
affairs or any other agency for the administration of this program
(54627) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $150,000)

1351 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54622) ... 250,000 ......... (re. $36,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as added by chapter 50,
section 4, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54629) ... 250,000 ......... (re. $36,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program - Long Island expansion (54633) ...........
220,000 .............................................. (re. $34,000)
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veterans' Project (54632) ......
50,000 ................................................ (re. $1,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of veteran-to-veteran support services.
These monies may be used for the following purposes: to support
veteran-to-veteran programs maintained by veterans service organiza-
tions; to connect veteran defendants to treatment and support
services directed by the criminal justice system; to support such
treatment and support services; to provide services to support
veterans to avoid involvement with the criminal justice system; to
support programs providing counseling and advocacy activities for
veterans, and to provide assistance in securing linkages at the
national, state, and local level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
department of veterans' services and approved by the director of the
budget (54626) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $768,000)
By chapter 53 section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of aid to county and city veterans' service agencies
pursuant to section 13 of the veterans' services law (54608) .......
1,380,000 ............................................ (re. $49,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to the division of military and naval
affairs or any other agency for the administration of this program
(54627) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $128,000)
For services and expenses of the SAGE Veterans' Project (54618) ......
50,000 ............................................... (re. $12,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program (54622) ... 250,000 ......... (re. $41,000)
For services and expenses of the New York State Defenders Association
Veterans Defense Program - Long Island expansion (54633) ...........
220,000 .............................................. (re. $63,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:

1352 12653-09-6
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of veteran-to-veteran support services.
These monies may be used for the following purposes: to support
veteran-to-veteran programs maintained by veterans service organiza-
tions; to connect veteran defendants to treatment and support
services directed by the criminal justice system; to support such
treatment and support services; to provide services to support
veterans to avoid involvement with the criminal justice system; to
support programs providing counseling and advocacy activities for
veterans, and to provide assistance in securing linkages at the
national, state, and local level.
Funds are to be made available pursuant to a plan prepared by the
department of veterans' services and approved by the director of the
budget (54626) ... 1,000,000 ........................ (re. $708,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment of aid to county and city veterans' service agencies
pursuant to section 13 of the veterans' services law (54608) ...
1,380,000 ............................................ (re. $86,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For payment of services related to the justice for heroes initiative.
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein may be suballocated to the division of military and naval
affairs or any other agency for the administration of this program
(54627) ... 250,000 .................................. (re. $79,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Homeless Veterans Assistance Fund
Homeless Veterans Assistance Account - 20204
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses related to homeless veterans' housing
(54815) ... 1,100,000 ............................... (re. $685,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Military Family Relief Fund
Military Family Relief Account - 23807
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to military family relief initi-
atives in an amount not to exceed the uncommitted fund balance as of
March 31 of the prior fiscal year (54825) ..........................
350,000 ............................................. (re. $350,000)

1353 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 102,000,000 222,000,000
Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 161,523,000 490,525,000
Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 62,322,000 267,947,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 325,845,000 980,472,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
PAYMENTS TO VICTIMS PROGRAM ................................. 62,805,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to
responding to mass violence events.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein
shall be available for payments for state
operations, aid to localities, or capital
purposes and may be suballocated, trans-
ferred, or allocated to any state depart-
ment, division, agency, or authority
pursuant to a plan developed by the direc-
tor of the office of victim services and
approved by the director of the budget
(19924) ...................................... 2,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Crime Victims - Compensation Account - 25370
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the
executive law (19905) ....................... 11,523,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 11,523,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Criminal Justice Improvement Account - 21945
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the
executive law (19905) ....................... 49,282,000

1354 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 49,282,000
--------------
VICTIM AND WITNESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ...................... 263,040,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of programs that
provide victim assistance and witness
assistance, including culturally specific
organizations, funded through the federal
Victims of Crime Act ("VOCA") for the
three-year period October 2025 through
September 2028. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and
may be suballocated to other state agen-
cies. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provision of law, funds appropriated here-
in shall be available subject to a plan
prepared by the director of the office of
victim services and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. The funds hereby appro-
priated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereaft-
er accrued. Funds appropriated herein that
are transferred or interchanged shall
lapse on the same date as funds not trans-
ferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19923) .............................. 100,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 100,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Crime Victims Assistance Account - 25370
For services and expenses of programs that
provide victim and witness assistance,
distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the director of the office of victim
services and approved by the director of
the budget, or through a competitive proc-
ess. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies,
including but not limited to the New York
state office for the aging for enhanced
multidisciplinary teams. The director of

1355 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the office of victim services shall
provide the chairs of the senate finance
and the assembly ways and means committees
with a report on initiatives funded pursu-
ant to a plan as approved by the director
of the budget. The funds hereby appropri-
ated are to be available for payment of
liabilities heretofore accrued or hereaft-
er accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the
contrary, up to $10,000,000 of funds
appropriated herein shall be made avail-
able to support local assistance grants
for community based violence intervention
programs. Funds appropriated herein that
are transferred or interchanged shall
lapse on the same date as funds not trans-
ferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19906) .............................. 150,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ................. 150,000,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Combined Expendable Trust Fund
OVS-Gifts and Bequests Account - 20100
For services and expenses associated with
gifts and bequests to the office of victim
services. These funds may be transferred
to state operations (19906) ..................... 40,000
--------------
Program account subtotal ...................... 40,000
--------------
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Criminal Justice Improvement Account - 21945
For services and expenses of programs that
provide victim and witness assistance,
distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the director of the office of victim
services and approved by the director of
the budget, or through a competitive proc-
ess. A portion of these funds may be
transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies. The
funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore
accrued or hereafter accrued. Notwith-
standing any law to the contrary, funds

1356 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
appropriated herein that are transferred
or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or inter-
changed from this appropriation (19906) ..... 13,000,000
--------------
Program account subtotal .................. 13,000,000
--------------

1357 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
PAYMENTS TO VICTIMS PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to responding to mass violence
events. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein shall be available for payments for state oper-
ations, aid to localities, or capital purposes and may be suballo-
cated, transferred, or allocated to any state department, division,
agency, or authority pursuant to a plan developed by the director of
the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget ... 2,000,000 .............................. (re. $2,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Crime Victims - Compensation Account - 25370
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
11,523,000 ....................................... (re. $11,523,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
11,523,000 ....................................... (re. $11,523,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
11,523,000 ....................................... (re. $11,523,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
11,523,000 ....................................... (re. $11,523,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
11,523,000 ........................................ (re. $1,831,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
11,523,000 ........................................ (re. $2,415,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For payments to victims in accordance with the federal crime control
act of 1984 (19905) ... 11,523,000 .................. (re. $274,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For payments to victims in accordance with the federal crime control
act of 1984 (19905) ... 11,523,000 .................. (re. $656,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other

1358 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Criminal Justice Improvement Account - 21945
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
49,282,000 ....................................... (re. $49,282,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
42,180,000 ....................................... (re. $42,180,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
24,080,000 ....................................... (re. $24,080,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
24,080,000 ....................................... (re. $24,080,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
23,520,000 ....................................... (re. $23,520,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For payments pursuant to article 22 of the executive law (19905) .....
23,520,000 ....................................... (re. $23,520,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For payment of claims already accrued and to accrue to innocent
victims of violent crime pursuant to article 22 of the executive law
(19905) ... 23,520,000 ........................... (re. $12,670,000)
VICTIM AND WITNESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim assistance
and witness assistance, funded through the federal Victims of Crime
Act ("VOCA") for the three-year period October 2025 through Septem-
ber 2028. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein shall be available subject to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for
payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Funds appropriated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall
lapse on the same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from
this appropriation (19923) .........................................
100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000)

1359 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim assistance
and witness assistance, funded through the federal Victims of Crime
Act ("VOCA") for the three-year period October 2022 through Septem-
ber 2025. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein shall be available subject to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for
payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Funds appropriated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall
lapse on the same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from
this appropriation (19922) .........................................
20,000,000 ....................................... (re. $20,000,000)
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim assistance
and witness assistance, funded through the federal Victims of Crime
Act ("VOCA") for the three-year period October 2025 through Septem-
ber 2028. A portion of these funds may be transferred to state oper-
ations and may be suballocated to other state agencies. Notwith-
standing any inconsistent provision of law, funds appropriated
herein shall be available subject to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to be available for
payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued.
Funds appropriated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall
lapse on the same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from
this appropriation (19923) .........................................
100,000,000 ..................................... (re. $100,000,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Crime Victims Assistance Account - 25370
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies, including but not limited to the New York
state office for the aging for enhanced multidisciplinary teams. The
director of the office of victim services shall provide the chairs
of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means committees
with a report on initiatives funded pursuant to a plan as approved
by the director of the budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to
be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to
$10,000,000 of funds appropriated herein shall be made available to
support local assistance grants for community based violence inter-
vention programs. Funds appropriated herein that are transferred or
interchanged shall lapse on the same date as funds not transferred

1360 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
or interchanged from this appropriation (19906) ....................
150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $150,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies, including but not limited to the New York
state office for the aging for enhanced multidisciplinary teams. The
director of the office of victim services shall provide the chairs
of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means committees
with a report on initiatives funded pursuant to a plan as approved
by the director of the budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to
be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to
$10,000,000 of funds appropriated herein shall be made available to
support local assistance grants for community based violence inter-
vention programs. Funds appropriated herein that are transferred or
interchanged shall lapse on the same date as funds not transferred
or interchanged from this appropriation (19906) ....................
150,000,000 ..................................... (re. $150,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies, including but not limited to the New York
state office for the aging for enhanced multidisciplinary teams. The
director of the office of victim services shall provide the chairs
of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means committees
with a report on initiatives funded pursuant to a plan as approved
by the director of the budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to
be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to
$10,000,000 of funds appropriated herein shall be made available to
support local assistance grants for community based violence inter-
vention programs. Funds appropriated herein that are transferred or
interchanged shall lapse on the same date as funds not transferred
or interchanged from this appropriation (19906) ....................
150,000,000 ...................................... (re. $95,038,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies, including but not limited to the New York

1361 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
state office for the aging for enhanced multidisciplinary teams. The
director of the office of victim services shall provide the chairs
of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means committees
with a report on initiatives funded pursuant to a plan as approved
by the director of the budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to
be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to
$10,000,000 of funds appropriated herein shall be made available to
support local assistance grants for community based violence inter-
vention programs. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse
on the same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this
appropriation (19906) ... 150,000,000 ............ (re. $42,778,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies, including but not limited to the New York
state office for the aging for enhanced multidisciplinary teams. The
director of the office of victim services shall provide the chairs
of the senate finance and the assembly ways and means committees
with a report on initiatives funded pursuant to a plan as approved
by the director of the budget. The funds hereby appropriated are to
be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or here-
after accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, up to
$10,000,000 of funds appropriated herein shall be made available to
support local assistance grants for community based violence inter-
vention programs. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds
appropriated herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse
on the same date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this
appropriation (19906) ... 150,000,000 ............. (re. $1,441,000)
Special Revenue Funds - Other
Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund
Criminal Justice Improvement Account - 21945
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19906) ... 13,000,000 ..................... (re. $13,000,000)

1362 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19906) ... 13,000,000 ..................... (re. $13,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19906) ... 13,000,000 ..................... (re. $12,701,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19906) ... 13,000,000 ..................... (re. $13,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19906) ... 13,000,000 ..................... (re. $12,749,000)

1363 12653-09-6
OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of programs that provide victim and witness
assistance, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the director
of the office of victim services and approved by the director of the
budget, or through a competitive process. A portion of these funds
may be transferred to state operations and may be suballocated to
other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated are to be avail-
able for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or hereafter
accrued. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated
herein that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same
date as funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropri-
ation (19906) ... 13,000,000 ...................... (re. $4,035,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For services and expenses of programs providing services to crime
victims and witnesses, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the director of the office of victim services and approved by the
director of the budget, or through a competitive process. A portion
of these funds may be transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated
are to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (19906) ... 13,000,000 ............. (re. $91,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For services and expenses of programs providing services to crime
victims and witnesses, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by
the director of the office of victim services and approved by the
director of the budget, or through a competitive process. A portion
of these funds may be transferred to state operations and may be
suballocated to other state agencies. The funds hereby appropriated
are to be available for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued or
hereafter accrued (19906) ... 13,000,000 ............. (re. $39,000)

1364 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
COMMERCIAL GAMING PAYMENT REDUCTION OFFSETS
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
Notwithstanding any other law to the contra-
ry, for payments to local governments
related to subdivision 1 of section 1351
of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and
breeding law, as added by chapter 174 of
the laws of 2013, pursuant to a plan
approved by the director of the budget.
Funds appropriated herein may be suballo-
cated to any department, agency or public
authority (47710) ........................... 17,000,000
--------------

1365 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 250,000 1,400,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 250,000 1,400,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
OPERATIONS PROGRAM ............................................. 250,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For grants of the Hudson river valley green-
way compact and the protection and
enhancement of the Hudson river greenway
resources (81003) .............................. 250,000
--------------

1366 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
OPERATIONS PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 250,000 ................................. (re. $250,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 ................................. (re. $135,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 ................................. (re. $136,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $81,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 ................................. (re. $102,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $44,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $31,000)

1367 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $30,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $11,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $34,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2013:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $11,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 ................................... (re. $7,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 .................................. (re. $11,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 136,000 ................................... (re. $8,000)
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2009:
For grants of the Hudson river valley greenway compact and the
protection and enhancement of the Hudson river greenway resources
(81003) ... 160,000 ................................... (re. $9,000)

1368 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
HURRICANE IRENE - TROPICAL STORM LEE FLOOD RECOVERY
GRANT PROGRAM
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as added by chapter 55,
section 2, of the laws of 2011:
For implementation of the Hurricane Irene - Tropical Storm Lee Flood
Recovery Grant Program. This appropriation may be allocated to
empire state development or any other state agency for the purposes
of implementing the Hurricane Irene - Tropical Storm Lee Flood
Recovery Grant Program (80351) ... 50,000,000 .... (re. $28,416,000)

1369 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL ASSISTANCE RESOURCE PROGRAM
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 45,000,000 125,089,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 45,000,000 125,089,000
================ ================
LOCAL ASSISTANCE RESOURCE PROGRAM ........................... 45,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The sum of $45,000,000 is hereby appropri-
ated for the Local Assistance Resource
Program. Notwithstanding any inconsistent
provisions of law contained in section 163
and section 112 of the state finance law
or in any other law, funds appropriated
herein shall be made available for
services and expenses of local assistance
projects, programs, and other purposes,
including the payment of liabilities
incurred prior to April 1, 2026, as iden-
tified pursuant to a plan approved by the
director of the division of the budget.
All or a portion of the funds appropriated
hereby may be suballocated or transferred
to any department, agency, or public
authority ................................... 45,000,000
--------------

1370 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL ASSISTANCE RESOURCE PROGRAM
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
LOCAL ASSISTANCE RESOURCE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
The sum of $30,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Local Assistance
Resource Program. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law
contained in section 163 and section 112 of the state finance law or
in any other law, funds appropriated herein shall be made available
for services and expenses of local assistance projects, programs,
and other purposes, including the payment of liabilities incurred
prior to April 1, 2025, as identified pursuant to a plan approved by
the director of the division of the budget. All or a portion of the
funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority ............................
30,000,000 ....................................... (re. $30,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
The sum of $60,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Local Assistance
Resource Program. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law
contained in section 163 and section 112 of the state finance law or
in any other law, funds appropriated herein shall be made available
for services and expenses of local assistance projects, programs,
and other purposes, including the payment of liabilities incurred
prior to April 1, 2024, as identified pursuant to a plan approved by
the director of the division of the budget. All or a portion of the
funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority ............................
60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $60,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
The sum of $60,000,000 is hereby appropriated for the Local Assistance
Resource Program. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of law
contained in section 163 and section 112 of the state finance law or
in any other law, funds appropriated herein shall be made available
for services and expenses of local assistance projects, programs,
and other purposes, including the payment of liabilities incurred
prior to April 1, 2023, as identified pursuant to a plan approved by
the director of the division of the budget. All or a portion of the
funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to any
department, agency, or public authority ............................
60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $35,089,000)

1371 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 1,826,074,107 127,551,972
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 1,826,074,107 127,551,972
================ ================
SCHEDULE
AID AND INCENTIVES FOR MUNICIPALITIES ...................... 758,172,213
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment to local governments as of April
1, 2026 under the aid and incentives for
municipalities program pursuant to section
54 of the state finance law in accordance
with the following:
For base level grants to municipalities;
notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, in the state fiscal year
commencing April 1, 2026, each munici-
pality shall receive a base level grant in
an amount equal to the base level grant
that such municipality received in the
state fiscal year commencing April 1, 2025
pursuant to paragraph b of subdivision 10
of section 54 of the state finance law
(80511) .................................... 715,172,213
For citizens re-organization empowerment
grants and citizen empowerment tax credits
administered by the department of state
pursuant to section 54 of the state
finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
no payment shall be made from this appro-
priation without a certificate of approval
by the director of the budget (80474) ....... 35,000,000
For a local government efficiency grant
program administered by the department of
state pursuant to section 54 of the state
finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
no payment shall be made from this appro-
priation without a certificate of approval
by the director of the budget (80510) ........ 8,000,000

1372 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
--------------
TEMPORARY MUNICIPAL ASSISTANCE ............................. 150,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of temporary municipal assist-
ance. There shall be apportioned and paid
temporary municipal assistance to each
municipality which received in the state
fiscal year commencing April 1, 2024 a
base level grant pursuant to section 54 of
the state finance law, provided however
that aid pursuant to this appropriation
shall not be considered a base level grant
pursuant to section 54 of the state
finance law. Such aid payment shall equal
each municipality's proportion of the
total aggregate dollar amount of base
level grants paid in the state fiscal year
commencing April 1, 2024, multiplied by
one hundred and fifty million dollars,
provided, however, that no municipality
shall receive aid greater than fifteen
million dollars, and any amount in excess
of such limit shall be proportionally
reallocated and paid to all other munici-
palities that are cities Provided further
that such funding shall be used to mini-
mize any burden on taxpayers and maintain
public safety (85110) ...................... 150,000,000
--------------
AID TO MUNICIPALITIES WITH VIDEO LOTTERY GAMING FACILITIES .. 30,119,594
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of aid to the city of Yonkers as
an eligible city in which a video lottery
gaming facility is located pursuant to
section 54-l of the state finance law. The
amount appropriated herein shall be avail-
able for payment to the city pursuant to
section 54-l of the state finance law no
earlier than April 1, 2027 and no later
than June 30, 2027 on audit and warrant of

1373 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
the state comptroller notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary including
any contrary provision of section 40 or
section 54-l of the state finance law.
Such payment shall constitute complete
liquidation of the state's obligation to
the city under section 54-l of the state
finance law for the state fiscal year
commencing on April 1, 2027 (80480) ......... 19,600,000
For payment of aid to eligible munici-
palities pursuant to section 54-1 of the
state finance law. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, such
municipalities shall receive aid in an
amount equal to the aid which such munici-
palities received in the state fiscal year
commencing April 1, 2025 pursuant to
section 54-1 of the state finance law;
provided further, and not withstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, such
payment shall also include the additional
aid required pursuant to subdivision five
of section 54-l of the state finance law
(80472) ..................................... 10,519,594
--------------
MISCELLANEOUS FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE ......................... 887,565,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment to a county in which a gaming
facility is located but does not receive a
percent of the negotiated percentage of
the net drop from gaming devices the state
receives pursuant to a compact (85015) ....... 3,750,000
For payment to the city of Albany (85053) ..... 20,000,000
For payment to the city of Buffalo pursuant
to a plan upon request by the budget
director of the city of Buffalo to the
director of the budget, with a copy trans-
mitted to the Buffalo fiscal stability
authority. Such request shall include an
attestation that the amount requested will
be pledged to close the city's budget gap
while minimizing any burden on taxpayers
and maintaining public safety, and further
the city of Buffalo shall provide a report
to the director of the budget on the use

1374 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
of the funds on or before December 31,
2026 (85092) ................................ 55,000,000
For payment to the city of Yonkers pursuant
to a plan upon request by the budget
director of the city of Yonkers to the
director of the budget. Such request
shall include an attestation that the
amount requested will be pledged to close
the city's budget gap while minimizing any
burden on taxpayers and maintaining public
safety, and further the city of Yonkers
shall provide a report to the director of
the budget on the use of the funds on or
before December 31, 2026 .................... 40,000,000
For payment to the city of Albany pursuant
to a plan upon request by the budget
director of the city of Albany to the
director of the budget. Such request
shall include an attestation that the
amount requested will be pledged to close
the city's budget gap while minimizing any
burden on taxpayers and maintaining public
safety, and further the city of Albany
shall provide a report to the director of
the budget on the use of the funds on or
before December 31, 2026 .................... 20,000,000
For payment to the city of Rochester pursu-
ant to a plan upon request by the budget
director of the city of Rochester to the
director of the budget. Such request
shall include an attestation that the
amount requested will be pledged to close
the city's budget gap while minimizing any
burden on taxpayers and maintaining public
safety, and further the city of Rochester
shall provide a report to the director of
the budget on the use of the funds on or
before December 31, 2026 .................... 20,000,000
For payment to the city of Syracuse pursuant
to a plan upon request by the director of
management and budget of the city of Syra-
cuse to the director of the budget. Such
request shall include an attestation that
the amount requested will be pledged to
close the city's budget gap while minimiz-
ing any burden on taxpayers and maintain-
ing public safety, and further the city of
Syracuse shall provide a report to the
director of the budget on the use of the
funds on or before December 31, 2026 ........ 20,000,000

1375 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment to the city of Mount Vernon
pursuant to a plan upon request by the
comptroller of the city of Mount Vernon to
the director of the budget. Such request
shall include an attestation that the
amount requested will be pledged to close
the city's budget gap while minimizing any
burden on taxpayers and maintaining public
safety, and further the city of Mount
Vernon shall provide a report to the
director of the budget on the use of the
funds on or before December 31, 2026 ........ 10,000,000
For payment to the city of New York pursuant
to a plan approved by the director of the
budget upon request by the budget director
of the city of New York to the director of
the budget, which shall include a schedule
by the city of New York to allocate $10
million of such funds for the employee
benefit fund for members and retirees of
the Uniformed Fire Officers Association
and the Uniformed Firefighters Associ-
ation, with a copy transmitted to the
financial control board. Such request
shall include an attestation that the
amount requested will be pledged to close
the city's budget gap while minimizing any
burden on taxpayers and maintaining public
safety, and further the city of New York
shall provide a report to the director of
the budget on the use of funds on or
before December 31, 2026 ................... 500,000,000
For payment to the city of New York to
refund sales tax revenue intercepted
between July 1, 2025, and March 31, 2026,
pursuant to Section 5 of part ZZ of chap-
ter 56 of the laws of 2020 amending the
tax law and the social services law relat-
ing to certain Medicaid management, as
amended by Section 2 of Part D of chapter
57 of the laws of 2024 ..................... 150,000,000
For payment to the city of New York for
costs, including to offset historical
public health costs ......................... 45,000,000
For payment to the city of Auburn (85116) ........ 200,000
For payment to the city of Auburn (85116) ...... 2,000,000
For payment to the village of New Paltz
(85114) ........................................ 300,000
For payment to the county of Onondaga for a

1376 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
school discipline pilot project with the
Syracuse city school district (80040) ........ 1,200,000
For payment to the county of Broome (85046) ...... 115,000
--------------
SMALL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE .................................... 217,300
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For payment of small government assistance
on or before March 31, 2027 upon audit and
warrant of the comptroller according to
the following:
For payment to the County of Essex (80483) ....... 124,000
For payment to the County of Franklin
(80482) ......................................... 72,000
For payment to the County of Hamilton
(80481) ......................................... 21,300
--------------

1377 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
AID AND INCENTIVES FOR MUNICIPALITIES
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025, is
hereby amended and reappropriated to read:
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) .....................................
[35,000,000]7,137,119 ............................. (re. $1,500,000)
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 8,000,000 ...... (re. $8,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 7,137,000 ...... (re. $1,500,000)
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) .....................................
8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For payment to local governments as of April 1, 2023 under the aid and
incentives for municipalities program pursuant to section 54 of the
state finance law in accordance with the following:
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) .....................................
7,117,000 ......................................... (re. $1,500,000)
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.

1378 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 4,000,000 ...... (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For payment to local governments as of April 1, 2022 under the aid and
incentives for municipalities program pursuant to section 54 of the
state finance law in accordance with the following:
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 7,117,000 ...... (re. $1,500,751)
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 4,000,000 ...... (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For payment to local governments under the aid and incentives for
municipalities program pursuant to section 54 of the state finance
law in accordance with the following:
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 5,886,000 ...... (re. $1,500,564)
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 3,800,000 ...... (re. $3,800,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 6,116,000 ...... (re. $1,730,564)
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.

1379 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 4,000,000 ...... (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 5,971,000 ...... (re. $1,500,000)
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 4,000,000 ...... (re. $4,000,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 4,000,000 ...... (re. $3,000,000)
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 5,769,921 ...... (re. $1,500,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 4,000,000 ...... (re. $1,703,368)
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 3,714,214 ........ (re. $472,772)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For a local government efficiency grant program administered by the
department of state pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.

1380 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80510) ... 4,000,000 ........ (re. $138,267)
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 600,000 .......... (re. $236,899)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For awards under the local government performance and efficiency
program administered by the financial restructuring board for local
governments or the department of state pursuant to section 54 of the
state finance law. Provided however, notwithstanding sections 112
and 163 of the state finance law or any other provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein may, in the discretion of
the financial restructuring board for local governments, be provided
to any local government for the procurement of accounting or related
services in the event that such local government (i) has applied for
a comprehensive review consistent with subsection 3 of section
160.05 of the local finance law, (ii) has not provided the state
comptroller with sufficient information to calculate the local
government's average fund balance percentage in accordance with
subsection 2(b) of section 160.05 of the local finance law by owing
more than two fiscal years of data, and (iii) agrees to use such
accounting or related services for the sole purposes of compiling
the information necessary to calculate such fund balance percentage
and submitting the local government's required annual financial
reports to the state comptroller.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80473) ... 40,000,000 .... (re. $34,428,276)
For citizens re-organization empowerment grants and citizen empower-
ment tax credits administered by the department of state pursuant to
section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80474) ... 1,892,155 ........ (re. $198,824)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For awards under the local government performance and efficiency
program administered by the financial restructuring board for local
governments or the department of state pursuant to section 54 of the
state finance law. Provided however, notwithstanding sections 112
and 163 of the state finance law or any other provision of law to
the contrary, funds appropriated herein may, in the discretion of
the financial restructuring board for local governments, be provided

1381 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
to any local government for the procurement of accounting or related
services in the event that such local government (i) has applied for
a comprehensive review consistent with subsection 3 of section
160.05 of the local finance law, (ii) has not provided the state
comptroller with sufficient information to calculate the local
government's average fund balance percentage in accordance with
subsection 2(b) of section 160.05 of the local finance law by owing
more than two fiscal years of data, and (iii) agrees to use such
accounting or related services for the sole purposes of compiling
the information necessary to calculate such fund balance percentage
and submitting the local government's required annual financial
reports to the state comptroller.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80473) ... 40,000,000 .... (re. $39,121,687)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 53,
section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For awards under a local government performance and efficiency program
pursuant to section 54 of the state finance law.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no payment shall be made
from this appropriation without a certificate of approval by the
director of the budget (80473) ... 13,000,000 ....... (re. $220,000)

1382 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 489,000 2,967,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 489,000 2,967,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
OPERATIONS PROGRAM ............................................. 489,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses of regional volun-
teer centers defined as community-based
organizations with a focus on volunteerism
that meets critical needs in communities,
that promote service and civic engagement
opportunities to a specific region of the
state and have the capacity to provide
training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volun-
teer programs. Such assistance shall be
awarded by grants through one or more
competitive processes to eligible communi-
ty-based organizations and may also be
available for sub-grants to local non-pro-
fit organizations in need of volunteer
coordination assistance. Such assistance
shall also be available for expenditure by
the Commission to support statewide coor-
dination of local volunteer assistance
(which can include but is not limited to
the hiring of support services) to support
federal grants awarded for such purposes,
or other expenditures in keeping with the
mission of the Commission (81003) .............. 489,000
--------------

1383 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
OPERATIONS PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses of regional volunteer centers defined as
community-based organizations with a focus on volunteerism that
meets critical needs in communities, that promote service and civic
engagement opportunities to a specific region of the state and have
the capacity to provide training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volunteer programs. Such assist-
ance shall be awarded by grants through one or more competitive
processes to eligible community-based organizations and may also be
available for sub-grants to local non-profit organizations in need
of volunteer coordination assistance. Such assistance shall also be
available for expenditure by the Commission to support statewide
coordination of local volunteer assistance (which can include but is
not limited to the hiring of support services) to support federal
grants awarded for such purposes, or other expenditures in keeping
with the mission of the Commission (81003) .........................
489,000 ............................................. (re. $489,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses of regional volunteer centers defined as
community-based organizations with a focus on volunteerism that
meets critical needs in communities, that promote service and civic
engagement opportunities to a specific region of the state and have
the capacity to provide training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volunteer programs. Such assist-
ance shall be awarded by grants through one or more competitive
processes to eligible community-based organizations and may also be
available for sub-grants to local non-profit organizations in need
of volunteer coordination assistance. Such assistance shall also be
available for expenditure by the Commission to support statewide
coordination of local volunteer assistance (which can include but is
not limited to the hiring of support services) to support federal
grants awarded for such purposes, or other expenditures in keeping
with the mission of the Commission (81003) .........................
489,000 ............................................. (re. $401,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2023:
For services and expenses of regional volunteer centers defined as
community-based organizations with a focus on volunteerism that
meets critical needs in communities, that promote service and civic
engagement opportunities to a specific region of the state and have
the capacity to provide training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volunteer programs. Such assist-
ance shall be awarded by grants through one or more competitive
processes to eligible community-based organizations and may also be

1384 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
available for sub-grants to local non-profit organizations in need
of volunteer coordination assistance. Such assistance shall also be
available for expenditure by the Commission to support statewide
coordination of local volunteer assistance (which can include but is
not limited to the hiring of support services) to support federal
grants awarded for such purposes, or other expenditures in keeping
with the mission of the Commission (81003) .........................
457,000 ............................................. (re. $457,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2022:
For services and expenses of regional volunteer centers defined as
community-based organizations with a focus on volunteerism that
meets critical needs in communities, that promote service and civic
engagement opportunities to a specific region of the state and have
the capacity to provide training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volunteer programs. Such assist-
ance shall be awarded by grants through one or more competitive
processes to eligible community-based organizations and may also be
available for sub-grants to local non-profit organizations in need
of volunteer coordination assistance (81003) .......................
432,000 ............................................. (re. $432,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2021:
For services and expenses of regional volunteer centers defined as
community-based organizations with a focus on volunteerism that
meets critical needs in communities, that promote service and civic
engagement opportunities to a specific region of the state and have
the capacity to provide training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volunteer programs. Such assist-
ance shall be awarded by grants through one or more competitive
processes to eligible community-based organizations and may also be
available for sub-grants to local non-profit organizations in need
of volunteer coordination assistance (81003) .......................
432,000 ............................................. (re. $432,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2020:
For services and expenses of regional volunteer centers defined as
community-based organizations with a focus on volunteerism that
meets critical needs in communities, that promote service and civic
engagement opportunities to a specific region of the state and have
the capacity to provide training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volunteer programs. Such assist-
ance shall be awarded by grants through one or more competitive
processes to eligible community-based organizations and may also be
available for sub-grants to local non-profit organizations in need
of volunteer coordination assistance (81003) .......................
432,000 ............................................. (re. $432,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2019:

1385 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
For services and expenses of regional volunteer centers defined as
community-based organizations with a focus on volunteerism that
meets critical needs in communities, that promote service and civic
engagement opportunities to a specific region of the state and have
the capacity to provide training and support for non-profits and
businesses interested in creating volunteer programs. Such assist-
ance shall be awarded by grants through one or more competitive
processes to eligible community-based organizations and may also be
available for sub-grants to local non-profit organizations in need
of volunteer coordination assistance (81003) .......................
432,000 ............................................. (re. $324,000)

1386 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
RAISE THE AGE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
For payment according to the following schedule:
APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS
General Fund ....................... 250,000,000 453,874,000
---------------- ----------------
All Funds ........................ 250,000,000 453,874,000
================ ================
SCHEDULE
RAISE THE AGE PROGRAM ...................................... 250,000,000
--------------
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
For services and expenses related to raising
the age of juvenile jurisdiction, includ-
ing but not limited to, juvenile delin-
quency prevention services, law enforce-
ment services, transportation services
including transportation provided by sher-
iffs, court operational expenses and
services, adolescent offender facilities,
detention and specialized secure detention
services, probation services, placement
services, specialized housing services,
aftercare services, program oversight and
monitoring services, local presentment
agency costs, costs of local governments
within a county and the city of New York,
and other applicable county and city of
New York costs.
Funds herein appropriated shall be available
for incremental state costs associated
with raise the age and to reimburse eligi-
ble counties and the city of New York for
incremental costs associated with raise
the age related expenditures, pursuant to
section 54-m of the state finance law.
Provided, however, counties and the city of
New York shall submit on or after April 1,
2026, a comprehensive plan, in a form and
manner prescribed by the office of chil-
dren and family services and the division
of criminal justice services, in consulta-
tion with other applicable executive state
agencies, as approved by the director of
the budget, identifying eligible incre-

1387 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
RAISE THE AGE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
mental costs for which reimbursement will
be requested. Such plans shall be reviewed
by the office of children and family
services, the division of criminal justice
services and other applicable executive
state agencies and approved by the direc-
tor of the budget. Counties and the city
of New York may amend such plans, as need-
ed, and resubmit for review by the office
of children and family services, the divi-
sion of criminal justice services and
other applicable executive state agencies
and approval by the director of the budg-
et. For individual counties and the city
of New York, availability of funds appro-
priated herein shall be contingent upon
approval of such plan by the director of
the budget. Eligible costs for which
reimbursement processes are not currently
established shall be requested by counties
and the city of New York through the
office of children and family services, in
a form and manner prescribed by the office
of children and family services. Funds
appropriated herein may be made available
to reimburse counties, municipal corpo-
rations within counties, and the city of
New York for actual expenses incurred as
identified in such approved plans. Such
sums will be payable upon the submission
of claims, which may include vouchers, by
the entity or entities designated by the
county or city of New York, which may
include the chief administrative officer
of municipal corporations. Such entity or
entities shall submit such claims consist-
ent with its plan required herein for
approval by the commissioner of the office
of children and family services or the
commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, or other applicable
state agencies. The office of children and
family services and the division of crimi-
nal justice services shall provide techni-
cal assistance to counties and the city of
New York to assist in timely coordination
of such reimbursement processes. Counties
and the city of New York may request
reimbursement for reasonable and necessary
raise the age related expenditures

1388 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
RAISE THE AGE
AID TO LOCALITIES 2026-27
incurred prior to April 1, 2018, as deter-
mined and approved by the director of the
budget.
Provided further, funds herein appropriated
shall be available for approved comprehen-
sive plans submitted prior to April 1,
2026. Nothing herein shall be construed to
prevent the reimbursement of approved
comprehensive plans submitted on or after
April 1, 2026.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, all or a portion of the
money hereby appropriated may be trans-
ferred or suballocated to any aid to
localities, state operations or capital
appropriation of any state department,
agency, or the judiciary and any state
department, agency or the judiciary may
then transfer all or a portion of such
suballocation between aid to localities,
state operations or capital to accomplish
the intent of this appropriation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
funds appropriated herein that are trans-
ferred or interchanged shall lapse on the
same date as funds not transferred or
interchanged from this appropriation.
(80604) .................................... 250,000,000
--------------

1389 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
RAISE THE AGE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
RAISE THE AGE PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2025:
For services and expenses related to raising the age of juvenile
jurisdiction, including but not limited to, juvenile delinquency
prevention services, law enforcement services, transportation
services including transportation provided by sheriffs, court opera-
tional expenses and services, adolescent offender facilities,
detention and specialized secure detention services, probation
services, placement services, specialized housing services, after-
care services, program oversight and monitoring services, local
presentment agency costs, costs of local governments within a county
and the city of New York, and other applicable county and city of
New York costs.
Funds herein appropriated shall be available for incremental state
costs associated with raise the age and to reimburse eligible coun-
ties and the city of New York for incremental costs associated with
raise the age related expenditures, pursuant to section 54-m of the
state finance law.
Provided, however, counties and the city of New York shall submit on
or after April 1, 2025, a comprehensive plan, in a form and manner
prescribed by the office of children and family services and the
division of criminal justice services, in consultation with other
applicable executive state agencies, as approved by the director of
the budget, identifying eligible incremental costs for which
reimbursement will be requested. Such plans shall be reviewed by the
office of children and family services, the division of criminal
justice services and other applicable executive state agencies and
approved by the director of the budget. Counties and the city of New
York may amend such plans, as needed, and resubmit for review by the
office of children and family services, the division of criminal
justice services and other applicable executive state agencies and
approval by the director of the budget. For individual counties and
the city of New York, availability of funds appropriated herein
shall be contingent upon approval of such plan by the director of
the budget. Eligible costs for which reimbursement processes are not
currently established shall be requested by counties and the city of
New York through the office of children and family services, in a
form and manner prescribed by the office of children and family
services. Funds appropriated herein may be made available to reim-
burse counties, municipal corporations within counties, and the city
of New York for actual expenses incurred as identified in such
approved plans. Such sums will be payable upon the submission of
claims, which may include vouchers, by the entity or entities desig-
nated by the county or city of New York, which may include the chief
administrative officer of municipal corporations. Such entity or
entities shall submit such claims consistent with its plan required

1390 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
RAISE THE AGE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
herein for approval by the commissioner of the office of children
and family services or the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, or other applicable state agencies. The office of
children and family services and the division of criminal justice
services shall provide technical assistance to counties and the city
of New York to assist in timely coordination of such reimbursement
processes. Counties and the city of New York may request reimburse-
ment for reasonable and necessary raise the age related expenditures
incurred prior to April 1, 2018, as determined and approved by the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all or a
portion of the money hereby appropriated may be transferred or
suballocated to any aid to localities, state operations or capital
appropriation of any state department, agency, or the judiciary and
any state department, agency or the judiciary may then transfer all
or a portion of such suballocation between aid to localities, state
operations or capital to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation.
(80604) ... 250,000,000 ......................... (re. $241,047,000)
By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024:
For services and expenses related to raising the age of juvenile
jurisdiction, including but not limited to, juvenile delinquency
prevention services, law enforcement services, transportation
services including transportation provided by sheriffs, court opera-
tional expenses and services, adolescent offender facilities,
detention and specialized secure detention services, probation
services, placement services, specialized housing services, after-
care services, program oversight and monitoring services, local
presentment agency costs, costs of local governments within a county
and the city of New York, and other applicable county and city of
New York costs.
Funds herein appropriated shall be available for incremental state
costs associated with raise the age and to reimburse eligible coun-
ties and the city of New York for incremental costs associated with
raise the age related expenditures, pursuant to section 54-m of the
state finance law.
Provided, however, counties and the city of New York shall submit on
or after April 1, 2024, a comprehensive plan, in a form and manner
prescribed by the office of children and family services and the
division of criminal justice services, in consultation with other
applicable executive state agencies, as approved by the director of
the budget, identifying eligible incremental costs for which
reimbursement will be requested. Such plans shall be reviewed by the
office of children and family services, the division of criminal
justice services and other applicable executive state agencies and
approved by the director of the budget. Counties and the city of New

1391 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
RAISE THE AGE
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
York may amend such plans, as needed, and resubmit for review by the
office of children and family services, the division of criminal
justice services and other applicable executive state agencies and
approval by the director of the budget. For individual counties and
the city of New York, availability of funds appropriated herein
shall be contingent upon approval of such plan by the director of
the budget. Eligible costs for which reimbursement processes are not
currently established shall be requested by counties and the city of
New York through the office of children and family services, in a
form and manner prescribed by the office of children and family
services. Funds appropriated herein may be made available to reim-
burse counties, municipal corporations within counties, and the city
of New York for actual expenses incurred as identified in such
approved plans. Such sums will be payable upon the submission of
claims, which may include vouchers, by the entity or entities desig-
nated by the county or city of New York, which may include the chief
administrative officer of municipal corporations. Such entity or
entities shall submit such claims consistent with its plan required
herein for approval by the commissioner of the office of children
and family services or the commissioner of the division of criminal
justice services, or other applicable state agencies. The office of
children and family services and the division of criminal justice
services shall provide technical assistance to counties and the city
of New York to assist in timely coordination of such reimbursement
processes. Counties and the city of New York may request reimburse-
ment for reasonable and necessary raise the age related expenditures
incurred prior to April 1, 2018, as determined and approved by the
director of the budget.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all or a
portion of the money hereby appropriated may be transferred or
suballocated to any aid to localities, state operations or capital
appropriation of any state department, agency, or the judiciary and
any state department, agency or the judiciary may then transfer all
or a portion of such suballocation between aid to localities, state
operations or capital to accomplish the intent of this appropri-
ation.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein
that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as
funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation.
(80604) ... 250,000,000 ......................... (re. $212,827,000)

1392 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
REGIONAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
REGIONAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM
General Fund
Local Assistance Account - 10000
By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as transferred by chapter
53, section 1, of the laws of 2012:
For services and expenses of the regional economic development program
pursuant to a memorandum of understanding to be executed by the
governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of
the assembly. All or a portion of the funds appropriated hereby may
be suballocated to any department, agency, or public authority,
provided, however, that the amount of this appropriation available
for expenditure and disbursement on and after September 1, 2008
shall be reduced by six percent of the amount that was undisbursed
as of August 15, 2008 (81018) ... 10,000,000 ...... (re. $5,000,000)

1393 12653-09-6
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES
WORLD TRADE CENTER -- WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD
AID TO LOCALITIES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2026-27
WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD WORLD TRADE CENTER PROGRAM
Special Revenue Funds - Federal
Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund
Federal Grants for Disaster Assistance Account - 25300
By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2002, and such amount as trans-
ferred by chapter 14, section 1, of the laws of 2003:
For transfer to the workers' compensation board for the federal share
of services and expenses related to workers' compensation benefit
costs related to the September 11, 2001 attack on the New York City
World Trade Center, in accordance with federal regulations (80555)
... 175,000,000 .................................. (re. $5,100,000)

1394 12653-09-6
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page
SECTION 1 - STATE AGENCIES ........................................... 1
AGING, OFFICE FOR THE .............................................. 5
AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS, DEPARTMENT OF ............................ 42
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL ........................................ 81
ARTS, COUNCIL ON THE .............................................. 83
CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK ....................................... 94
CIVIL SERVICE, DEPARTMENT OF ..................................... 106
CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION, DEPARTMENT OF ............. 107
CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES, DIVISION OF ........................... 116
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF .............................. 204
EDUCATION DEPARTMENT ............................................. 246
ELECTIONS, STATE BOARD OF ........................................ 384
ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION, DEPARTMENT OF ........................ 390
FAMILY ASSISTANCE, DEPARTMENT OF
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES, OFFICE OF ........................ 396
TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE, OFFICE OF ................. 657
FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF ................................ 794
GAMING COMMISSION, NEW YORK STATE ................................ 800
HEALTH, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................ 805
HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION ............................ 973
HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES, DIVISION OF ............ 988
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL, DIVISION OF ...................... 1015
MORTGAGE AGENCY, STATE OF NEW YORK ............................ 1047
INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES, OFFICE OF .............................. 1048
INTEREST ON LAWYER ACCOUNT ...................................... 1056
JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL
NEEDS ......................................................... 1058

1395 12653-09-6
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................ 1061
LAW, DEPARTMENT OF .............................................. 1093
MENTAL HYGIENE, DEPARTMENT OF
ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS, OFFICE OF .................... 1095
MENTAL HEALTH, OFFICE OF ...................................... 1128
PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES, OFFICE FOR ............ 1166
METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY ........................... 1185
MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS, DIVISION OF ......................... 1187
MOTOR VEHICLES, DEPARTMENT OF ................................... 1189
PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION, OFFICE OF .......... 1192
PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, OFFICE FOR THE ................. 1199
PUBLIC SERVICE, DEPARTMENT OF ................................... 1206
STATE, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................ 1209
STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK .................................... 1229
TAXATION AND FINANCE, DEPARTMENT OF ............................. 1237
TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF ................................... 1239
URBAN DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, NEW YORK STATE ................... 1288
VETERANS' SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF ............................... 1340
VICTIM SERVICES, OFFICE OF ...................................... 1353
MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES:
COMMERCIAL GAMING PAYMENT REDUCTION OFFSETS ................... 1364
HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL .............. 1365
HURRICANE IRENE - TROPICAL STORM LEE FLOOD RECOVERY
GRANT PROGRAM ............................................... 1368
LOCAL ASSISTANCE RESOURCE PROGRAM ............................. 1369
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE ................................... 1371
NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE ................................ 1382

1396 12653-09-6
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page
RAISE THE AGE ................................................. 1386
REGIONAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ......................... 1392
WORLD TRADE CENTER -- WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD ............. 1393